
                               1 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 31, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

EXECUTIVES BLAME CALIFORNIA HOUSING COSTS FOR DIP IN MIGRATION

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1149 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Dec. 30


The great migration of Americans to California is declining, new analyses show,
and many business leaders say that the reason is housing costs that are among
the highest in the nation.

State demographers estimate that the number of people who moved to California
from elsewhere in the country in 1981 declined by 5 to 10 percent from the 1980
influx.

It was the first significant decrease in the movement of Americans to California
since 1971, when a disastrous earthquake and troubles in the state's aerospace
industry interrupted the flow of new residents.

While the number of Americans who pulled up stakes and came to California
declined in 1981, Elizabeth Hoag, a senior population researcher for
California's Department of Finance, said there had been a ''tremendous
increase'' in immigration to the state from Latin America, Asia and other
foreign countries.

Foreigners May Be in Majority

As a result, she said, it appeared that in 1981, possibly for the first time,
more people moved to the state from foreign countries than from other states.

Mrs. Hoag said she expected ''net inmigration,'' a measurement that takes into
consideration the movement of people out of the state as well as those who move
in, to be about 225,000 in 1981.

Although final data are incomplete, she said an analysis of interstate drivers'
licenses from which some migration patterns can be deduced, suggested a drop of
about 10 percent in domestic migration to the state this year, reversing a
decadelong pattern of annual increases.

Since the Gold Rush 130 years ago, California has been at the receiving end of a
westward tide of restless immigrants from elsewhere in the nation. The
forty-niners were followed by farmers and land speculators and oilield
roustabouts from ''back East.''

Mass Migration in Depression

In the Great Depression came an enormous stream of economic refugees from the
Middle West and the parched plains of the Dust Bowl, all seeking a better life
under a benign sun advertised by California publicists and their employers, a
battalion of land hucksters.

They were followed during and after World War II by an influx of migrants who
came west to work in California's aerospace industry and, later, its electronics
companies.

In the mid-1950's, in one of the great postwar population shifts of the United
States, an average of more than 500 people a day settled in Los Angeles alone.

But this rapid growth began to take a toll in terms of air pollution and
congestion problems, and starting in 1963 the migration began to slow, and then
fell steeply. The trend accelerated after heavy layoffs in the aerospace
industry in the late 1960's and the 1971 earthquake here that killed 65 persons.


New Yorkers Go West

The migration from other states, especially New York and other older industrial
areas of the Northeast, began to pick up in 1973, and accelerated later in the
decade, fueled by a robust state economy that routinely created hundreds of
thousands of new jobs each year.

Economists, many of whom say they are optimistic about the longterm prospects
for resumption of growth, attribute the decreased domestic migration this year
partly to the nation's overall economic problems, which have slowed industrial
expansion, reduced corporate job transfers and made it harder for some families
in other states to sell a home before moving to California.

But many economists say the high price of housing in California is increasingly
turning back would-be migrants from the Northeast and other parts of the
country, as well as potential employers, in a pattern that they say is
jeopardizing the state's economic health.

The California Roundtable, a group made up of many of the state's top business
executives, said recently, ''The high cost of housing is having a feedback
effect on the entire economy and is posing a serious threat to continued
economic growth in California.''

Typical Home Costs $105,742

According to the California Association of Realtors, in October the median price
paid for a previously occupied home in the state was $105,742, more than 50
percent higher than the national average.

In most urban areas in California, as well as the most popular suburbs, prices
are much higher. For example, in Orange County, south of here, the average price
of a new home was more than $135,000 last month. Sales agents say the figure
would have been even higher had it not been for a slack market that they
attributed to high interest rates.-Marny Cox, a population research specialist
for the San Diego Association of Governments, said that in the last five years
about 55,000 newcomers a year were moving to San Diego. He said he expected
gains of less than 30,000 this year and next. ''The cost of housing here is a
major factor in the decrease,'' he said.

Many employers say they are finding it increasingly difficult to recruit people
to work in California because of housing costs, and some say they have moved
operations to other states because of the problems. Officials of the state's
respected University of California, for example, say dozens of potential faculty
members have turned down jobs here in the last year after citing the costs of
homes.

Brig. Gen. Joseph D. Mirth, who is supervising Air Force activities on the space
shuttle program here, said in an interview that an inability to lure qualified
military personnel and civilian engineers here because of the housing market had
contributed significantly to delays in the project.

''Half of the people who work for me are lieutenants,'' he said, adding that
many of them doubled up in apartments to save money.  ''More senior,
middle-level people say they can't afford to live here.''

Problem for Young Couples

As in many other parts of the country, the cost of a home, coupled with
persistently high mortgage rates, has priced a growing number of young couples
out of the housing market.

Some people believe that the inability of members of the postwar baby boom
generation to find adequate housing that they can afford may eventually have
social and political repercussions. Many of these young couples must settle for
housing that is inferior to what they were accustomed to as children.

''We are squeezing out minorities and young people'' from the housing market,
said Robert Dockson, the chairman of the California Federal Savings and Loan
Association, who headed the California Roundtable study on housing.

''We are building up to a social time bomb and sowing the seeds of revolt and
revolution,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               2 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 30, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIANS IN DETENTION DROP HUNGER STRIKE; 100 ESCAPE FACILITY

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 360 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 29


A five-day hunger strike at a detention facility for illegal aliens here ended
yesterday after the fasting Haitians were made to understand they would not be
punished for eating, the Federal authorities said today.

Beverly McFarland, the spokesman for the United States Immigration and
Naturalization Service in Miami, said the service learned yesterday morning that
''someone outside'' the camp had gotten the word around that the Haitians would
be arrested and imprisoned for one year if they broke the strike. Once that was
learned, Miss McFarland said, the service posted notices in Haitian Creole, the
language the group speaks, stating that everyone was ''free to eat without fear
of punishment.''

''Once the misconception was cleared up,'' she said, ''they went to lunch.'' The
service did not seek to find out who organized the fast, nor did its agents ask
who passed the message that the detainees would go to prison if they ate. In
effect, the Haitians are already in prison, but apparently the message had
compelling force because it is the general feeling among the camp population
that they will be let free once their cases for asylum move through the courts.

Value of Class Actions Disputed

It is the Government's opinion that a dozen class action lawsuits brought by
advocates for the Haitians' case have stalled the legal disposition of their
cases. It is the advocates' view that without the challenges, the Government
would summarily deport the Haitians.

Caught in the middle are the 2,500 Haitians being detained on the mainland, and
the 700 being held in Puerto Rico. In the middle of the hunger strike here, 150
Haitian men tried to escape while outside the front gate Haitian demonstrators
diverted the attention of security officers. In the end, 101 men were successful
in the Sunday break. Local police and immigration agents searched the area
surrounding the Krome Avenue Detention Facility, 25 miles southwest of Miami,
through yesterday afternoon.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               3 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 30, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

NEW YORK, NEW YEAR, OLD DELIGHTS

SECTION: Section C; Page 1, Column 5; Living Desk

LENGTH: 2234 words


The following article is based on reporting by Moira Hodgson and Fred Ferretti
and was written by Mr. Ferretti.

NEW Year's in New York is feasting and dancing, bidding goodbye and saying
hello, dancing and drinking, a time to be with families and to make noise. It is
Czech roast goose and French Champagne, German venison and plum brandy, Italian
baked eel and red wine, Scandinavian baked codfish and Cognac punch, Cuban roast
pig and Hungarian red wine, usually separate, occasionally together or in
combination, all reflecting the diverse ethnic character of the city and its
environs.

Nowhere are the waves of immigration more evident than in the New York area, and
at no time of the year are all the ethnic bits and pieces more evident than
during the year-end holidays, when centuries-old traditions of special holiday
foods must, it appears, be observed. In diverse neighborhoods food becomes a
proud statement of ethnicity and tradition.

Such foods as nokkelost, a special Norwegian cheese, come to Bay Ridge along
with herring from Iceland, and baby goats are spitroasted in Little Italy and
Bensonhurst. In Yorkville the pigs are marzipan and the cakes at this time of
year become Berlinerpfannkuchen. Across the Hudson in the West New York-Union
City Cuban community, it is a time for roast pig and black beans, the way it was
in Havana.

That's simply the way it is in New York.

The Middle Europeans

The celebrations and choices are seemingly endless in Yorkville during the
year-end holidays. In that uptown Middle European enclave where there are no
borders separating the German, Hungarian and Czech communities, there will be
venison or goose, stollen or marzipan pigs, tokaji, that sweet Hungarian dessert
wine, and slivovitz, a plum brandy.

Those marzipan pigs so dear to German children at New Year's seem to sit
grinning from windows along East 86th Street, the heart of Yorkville - from food
shops, from those combination pastry shopscoffee houses called konditorei and
from restaurants such as the Cafe Geiger at 206 East 86th Street and the
Bavarian Inn at 232 East 86th. They peer out from the Elk Candy Company, 240
East 86th, and from Kramer, 1643 Second Avenue (85th Street), challenging the
pig-shaped salamis fashioned by German-Americans at this time of year.

Tradition remains strong at New Year's, so there will be a party on the eve at
Liederkranz, a 135-year-old German club at 6 East 87th Street. There will be a
special holiday doughnutlike cake called Berlinerpfannkuchen and smoked and cold
meats from the Yorkville butchers, Schaller & Weber, at 1654 Second Avenue (86th
Street), and there will be dancing.

Among Hungarians there is a Budapest tradition that says that along with the
eating on New Year's Day there should be a cabaret, so Feszek, the Hungarian
Artist's Club, will offer both at the First Hungarian Reformed Church at 344
East 69th Street, between First and Second Avenues. There will be coffee and
cabbage soup, politics and a satire on Schubert. Gabriel Carelli, Feszek's
chairman, says all visitors will have to heed the club motto: ''Together with
your coats and hat leave your politics

Generally for Hungarians, New Year's Eve is a time to dine at length. The
occasion usually begins with foie gras (the Hungarians provide half the geese
for French foie gras) and tokaji. At the Red Tulip, 439 East 75th Street, there
will be thick beef goulash soup flavored with paprika and served in a kettle
with little dumplings, baked carp, roast goose or venison. That's before
midnight. After the New Year begins, cabbage soup laden with spicy Hungarian
sausage is customary.

To snack between, one of the neighborhood's more famous grocers, Paprikas Weiss,
1546 Second Avenue (80th Street), has the makings for a spread of Hungarian
sheep cheese seasoned with paprika, caraway seeds, anchovy paste and beer. For
those who are still hungry, traditional New Year's Eve desserts include beigli,
a sheet pastry filled with poppy seeds, and dios beigli, filled with walnuts.

For the Czechs New Year's Eve means roast goose with dumplings, breaded carp and
venison, which will be on the menu at Ruc Restaurant, 312 East 72d Street
(Second Avenue), along with stollen and vanilla horn-shaped cookies, all to be
washed down with slivovitz or a brandy-laced eggnog.

Jaroslav Ruc, proprietor of the restaurant bearing his name, remembers a time
when the Czech community in Yorkville included three bakeries, five butcher
shops, a national hall, restaurants, dance parlors and even a theater. Now it
lives in such restaurants as Ruc and at Vasata, 339 East 75th Street, and Praha,
1358 First Avenue (73d Street), and at a few neighborhood stores. ''But Czech
Sportsmen in Exile will still have their New Year's Eve dance at the Plaza,'' he
added.

The Italians

In Little Italy as in the other Italian neighborhoods - Bensonhurst in Brooklyn,
what is called Little Little Italy in SoHo, along Arthur Avenue in the Bronx -
the New Year is but a continuation of a festa that begins on Christmas Eve. The
streets of Little Italy are festooned with red and green tinsel ornaments that
sparkle in the street lights, and in its kitchens the tradition of seafood
during the holiday season begins with flaky codfish cooked lightly with oil on
Christmas Eve and reaches a peak with the fish and shellfish of New Year's.

''Without marinated or fried eels it wouldn't be New Year's Eve,'' said Bob
Alleva, one of the three generations of Allevas who own and work in the Alleva
Dairy, 188 Grand Street, the shop that, since 1922, has been making fresh
ricotta, fresh mozzarella and those tiny egg-size mozzarellas called bocconcini.
''I don't think my mother-inlaw would let us ring the bells if we didn't have
baked clams or calamari,'' said Josephine Lombardi, co-owner, with her husband,
of the G.Lombardi Restaurant at 53 Spring Street.

''Ringing the bells'' is an Italian New Year's observance, the counterpart of
which is all that noise made when the clock strikes midnight. Families gather
early in the evening to drink and eat. At midnight hand-held bells are rung,
becoming the signal for toasts and telephone calls to family members and
friends.

Before the bells is the seafood or perhaps an occasional pasta.  There is almost
always baccala, the ubiquitous codfish that shows up touched with oil, mixed and
sauteed with eggplant, sometimes under a cover of grated peccorino cheese. And
there are scungilli, octopus, scampi and calamari, or a combination in an
insalata di pesce, lightly dressed with olive oil and vinegar. There will be the
baked tiny clams called vongole and lobster tails covered with a fiery Fra
Diavolo sauce.

The fish markets in this holiday season are packed, as are the cheese shops like
Alleva and DiPalo's Dairy Store, 206 Grand Street (at Mott); butcher shops such
as Esposito Meats, 120 Mulberry Street, Porcelli Brothers, 262 Elizabeth Street,
and Faicco's Pork Store, 260 Bleecker Street; bakers such as D.& G. Bakery, 45
Spring Street, so busy at the ovens during these holidays that they carry their
loaves to food stores for sale, and pasta makers like Mario Bertorelli, owner of
Piemonte Homemade Ravioli Company, 190 Grand Street, who has his whole family in
his shop making manicotti stuffed with ricotta on a production line that would
make Henry Ford envious.

And what do the Bertorellis have on New Year's Eve?  ''A nice antipasto,'' Mr.
Bertorelli replied. ''Some lovely tortellini, mine, also some manicotti, mine,
and a nice roasted baby goat. Then coffee, cake and anisette.''

No fish?  ''Not in my house.''

The Scandinavians

When the snows falls heavily on the city, obliterating streets and neighborhood
boundaries, one neighborhood that is not difficult to locate is that unique
parcel of south Brooklyn called Bay Ridge. One need only look for the hundreds
of Scandinavian-Americans who regard snow accumulations with happiness because
they provide opportunities to ski.

At the New Year holiday Scandinavian Bay Ridge is quite different from the rest
of the city. Nowhere else is there so much fiskesuppe, fiskekaker, fiskepudding
or fiskeboller, those traditional and hearty year-end codfish-based soups,
cakes, puddings and balls.

The bakery windows are packed with tiny sugar-topped gingerbread houses, and in
no other part of the city can you smell the cardamomscented cakes so dear to
Norwegians, Swedes and Finns. On New Year's Eve no Scandinavian home is without
its jul-glogg, a thoroughly warming punch that begins by simmering together
cinnamon, cloves, orange rind, raisins, almonds and lemon juice. To this is
added Cognac and perhaps arrack.

''It is better to drink jul-glogg if one is sitting down,'' said Otto Petersen,
who with his wife, Vera, operates one of the few and certainly one of the most
traditionally Scandanavian food shops in the city, Heise Delicatessen, at 5417
Fifth Avenue in Bay Ridge. The shop is filled with the year-end fish delicacies
as well as such holiday treats as potato dumplings called kumpa, sylte (a
Scandanavian version of head cheese), klippfiske (salt-dried cod), pinnesteak
(salt-dried lamb) and grisselabbe, the pickled pig's feet that, Mr. Petersen is
quick to point out, are special because the knuckle is still attached.

In places like Heise's or at Hinrichsen's, 7615 Fifth Avenue, and in bakeries
such as Olsen's, 5722 Eighth Avenue, and Lund's, 8122 Fifth Avenue, the smells
of the holidays, the preserves of fresh lingonberries, the goat cheese called
gjetost, the hot krumkakes, the special New Year's macaroon pie called
fystakager and the holiday bread filled with fruit called julkager are
overwhelming.

All this week, as she does each year at this time, Thordis Johnsen, who owns the
Atlantic Restaurant, 5414 Eighth Avenue, prepares New Year's dishes called
lutefiske and risglot. The first utilizes cod smoked and cured in lye, boiled,
then fashioned into a loaf and served covered with melted butter or a cream
sauce; the second is a boiled rice pudding with fruit syrup, cinnamon and sugar.

Scandinavian-Americans come all the way from Maine and New Hampshire to Mrs.
Johnsen's tiny lunch counter for her New Year's food.  On the day itself, she
said, ''the restaurant is closed and I cook for my family.''

The Cubans

Among the metropolitan area's newest immigrants are the Cubans of West New York
and Union City. Their settlement has perceptibly altered the faces of the two
small New Jersey communities just over the Palisades. Bergenline Avenue, once an
extended boulevard of Italian shopkeepers, is now solidly Cuban, and at holiday
time the shops sell lechon (suckling pigs) or whole grown pigs, baby lamb and
sidra, a hard cider from Asturias, in Spain.

Up and down the avenue, which begins as a narrow one-way street at Washington
Park and becomes a wide boulevard as it moves northward, are scores of bodegas,
dozens of small Cuban restaurants and cafeterias, dress stores, dry-goods shops
and bakeries. In stores such as Macias y Hijas, 4520 Bergenline Avenue, Union
City, a combination grocery and butcher shop, whole pigs hang waiting to be
roasted and served with bowls of stewed black beans and rice and a salad thick
with avocado slices, all that to be followed by sweetened dates, Spanish nougat
candy, fresh walnuts and cheese.

Another festive dinner will be chicken with rice, a sort of moist paella. Or,
said Luis Lleonart, manager of the Hong Kong Grocery, 2303 Bergenline Avenue,
Union City, ''we roast a whole pig and inside him we put rice and beans - it is
very delicious.''

Traditionally the feast is not eaten until after midnight. Before that there is
dancing, and then at midnight, for good luck, according to Mr. Lleonart, ''we
throw 12 amounts of water into the street, we throw 12 bullets or stones up in
the air, we eat 12 grapes.''

Some Cubans do. Others have adopted the New Year's customs of their new country.
Yet the evening is basically an at-home holiday for families, though many people
in the community go to such places as the Habana Biltmore at 4806 Bergenline
Avenue, Union City, to Madison Manor at 545 60th Street, in West New York, or to
the Sheraton Centre at Seventh Avenue and 53d Street in Manhattan. At the
Sheraton there will be a gala New Year's Eve party for 1,200 arranged by the
Cuban singer Celia Cruz and a group of Cuban actors.

''Cubans love to go dancing,'' said Pablo Castenada, proprietor of the Habana
Biltmore, so in his restaurant - a study in brick arches, murals of Cuban
plantations, false shuttered windows and a waterfall complete with creche -
there will be a dinner of lechon, fried plantains, rice and black beans after
the salsas and meringues begin.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of list of food for the holiday (page C4) photo of
Bob Alleva with his sister and son (page C4) photo of Thordis Johnsen photo of
dinner at the Ted Tulip photo of men holding a pig

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               4 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 29, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION SERVICE SAYS OVER 100 FLED FROM HAITIAN CAMP

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 8, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 571 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 28


The Federal authorities barred all visitors from a Miami detention facility
holding Haitian refugees today and brought in additional security guards after a
stone-@ and bottle-throwing incident yesterday in which 110 men escaped from the
compound.

There were about 660 men in the camp before the escapes. They began a hunger
strike Christmas Eve, fasting for their freedom, according to leaders of Miami's
Haitian community. The 51 women at the facility joined the fast Sunday, the
authorities said.

Doctors at the camp reported this afternoon that the Haitians were ''still
extremely healthy at this point,'' said Beverly McFarland, a spokesman for the
Immigration and Naturalization Service. She said the medical staff was
''monitoring the situation very carefully,'' as the refugees continued to take
only water.

On Sunday afternoon, about 300 Miami-area Haitian residents stormed a gate at
the facility, called Krome North, hurling stones and bottles, according to Miss
McFarland, and immigration service guards responded with tear gas to disperse
the crowd.

First Incident With Outsiders

There have been similar incidents at Krome, Miss McFarland said, but this was
the first confrontation between guards and outsiders.  She said none of the
Haitians inside the camp took part in the disturbance, and that she knew of no
injuries. Those who escaped during the demonstration climbed over a rear fence
topped by barbed wire.

Miss McFarland said security personnel were searching the tall sawgrass in the
immediate area around the camp, which is in a remote section of Dade County
south of Miami near the Everglades. She said there were no plans to widen the
search.

The Dade County police arrived after most of the demonstrators had fled, and
they arrested one man on charges of arson and eight other persons for unlawful
assembly.

Miss McFarland said she did not know how many security guards were on duty when
the disturbance occurred or how many were added afterward, only that ''we called
in all available personnel.''

The immigration service said there was ''no identifiable leader'' of the
demonstration. The Rev. Gerard Jean-Juste, executive director of the Haitian
Refugee Center Inc., said the disturbance had not been planned, but that it
began after the demonstrators heard reports that some of the detainees had
fainted from hunger. The reports were denied by the immigration service.

----

Brief Disturbance at Ft. Chaffee

FORT CHAFFEE, Ark., Dec. 28 (AP) - A dispute among a small group of Cuban
refugees lead to a brief confrontation Sunday between refugees and Federal
officers at the resettlement center here, an official said today.

The disturbance ended in the arrests of three refugees, a woman, one of the men
in the dispute and another man who said he had mediated the argument.

''The heated argument, to the best of my knowledge, started over the affection
of a female refugee,'' said Gunther Wagner, deputy director of the Cuban-Haitian
Task Force at Fort Chaffee. He said no charges were filed.

Sunday night 15 to 25 refugees, protested the arrests, but the center was calm
today, the authorities said.  The 400 people held at Fort Chaffee are all that
remain to be resettled of the thousands of Cuban refugees who came to the United
States in April of last year.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               5 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 28, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section B; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 433 words


CAMP DISTURBANCE STAGED BY HAITIANS

MIAMI, Dec. 27 (AP) - Chanting ''liberte, liberte,'' more than 200 Haitian
immigrants broke through security lines and stormed the fences of a Federal
immigration camp here today in an apparent attempt to free 700 detained
countrymen.

Using clubs and tear gas, immigration security guards and Metro Dade police beat
back what one officer described as a ''mob-type'' rush while about 300 other
demonstrators shouted support for the charge.

''The plan seemed to be to help break out the interned entrants,'' said Beverly
McFarland, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service. ''They
stormed past the security line and were climbing the fences to get in.''

As the demonstrators fled the tear gas, several began setting fires in the
surrounding Everglades underbrush, said police Sgt. Joe Wiche. Twelve acres of
the Everglades burned, and more than 10 fire units were required to bring the
fires under control.

About 30 Haitian detainees escaped in the confusion, but 20 returned voluntarily
or were recaptured, said Miss McFarland.  She said no injuries were reported,
but Vera Weisz, an attorney for the Haitian Refugee Center, said the police had
used unnecessary force in subduing the crowd.

The Haitians inside the compound apparently were not involved in the
demonstration. Many of the 742 aliens at the camp have been detained for several
months awaiting immigration hearings or deportation.

Most of the male detainees have been boycotting meals since Christmas Eve. The
51 Haitian women in the camp are accepting food.  Miss McFarland said the
Haitians had never given a reason for their food boycott, but others said the
refugees were protesting their confinement.

The Haitians contend they are political refugees, while Federal immigration
authorities say the Haitians are coming to this country for economic reasons and
should not be granted asylum.

----

Cuban Refugees Protest Arrests

FORT CHAFFEE, Ark. Dec. 27 (AP) - Two small groups of angry Cuban refugees
carrying rocks gathered at the Fort Chaffee resettlement center today to protest
the arrests of two refugees that they thought had been mistreated.

Capt. Adrian Droke of the Federal Protective Service said that 25 Cubans formed
one group and that 15 others gathered about half a block away. He said the
refugees did not throw the rocks. The demonstration followed a scuffle between
police and two unidentified refugees, Captain Droke said.

The Cubans at Fort Chaffee are the last prisoners of the thousands who arrived
in the Freedom Flotilla boatlift.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of a guard subduing a protestor

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               6 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 26, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

Around the Nation;
Haitians Refuse Dinner In Second Day of Strike

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Page 12, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 117 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 25


About 650 Haitians refused a Christmas dinner of turkey, fried plantains, red
beans and rice today as a hunger strike at a Federal immigration camp entered
its second day.

The refugees began the strike Wednesday night to protest their internment at the
Krome Avenue detention center where they are awaiting immigration processing.

Two Haitian men fainted early today and were given liquids to ease dehydration
in the 74-degree weather.  A spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization
Service said the strike showed no signs of abating, but added that some refugees
were believed to be sneaking snacks from the vending machines.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               7 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 25, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIANS AT 2 DETENTION SITES REFUSING TO EAT AND TO TALK

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 658 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 24


Haitians being held at a Federal detention facility here and at a Federal prison
in Lexington, Ky., stopped eating and stopped talking to their keepers today.

Beverly McFarland, a spokesman for the United States Immigration and
Naturalization Service in Miami, said that 727 of the 730 Haitians at the Krome
Avenue detention facility here refused breakfast and lunch. ''It's a passive
resistance,'' she said. ''They don't say anything, not a word. They have not
given any reason.''

At the Federal prison in Lexington, the warden, Robert Elsea, reported that ''a
few'' of the 186 Haitians being held there refused breakfast and that 20 percent
to 30 percent of the Haitians there turned out for lunch. ''Some are saying
they're not eating because they are in jail,'' he said. ''It's kind of hard to
read between the lines. They are very passive.''

There were no reports of hunger strikes at detention facilities elsewhere in the
country. In all, about 2,500 Haitians are being detained in this country and
another 700 are being held at Fort Allen in Puerto Rico, under an agreement with
the government there.

Backlog of Court Cases

The United States contends the Haitians are illegal aliens who tried to enter
the country without proper documents. Attorneys for the Haitians have filed
class-action suits, contending that they are political refugees and should be
granted asylum. The backlog of court cases has resulted in long periods of
incarceration, with occasional riots and breakouts.

The immigration agency in Miami had to add 12 Border Patrol guards to its
26-member security detail after repeated escapes in late November. At the time,
immigration officials cited Christmas as the reason for growing tensions at the
Krome Avenue facility. Nearly all of the Haitians are Roman Catholic, and the
immigration service said that as those in detention began to realize they would
not be free by the holiday, they became restive.

This morning the Haitians at Krome refused cleaning duties, chores that in the
past were performed with relish as the only relief from the monotony of being
held at a former missile base with no recreational facilities. The Haitian
community in Miami has held demonstrations all week demanding those being
detained be released before Christmas. Haitian leaders here also sent a petition
to the White House, comparing the Haitians detained at Krome with the American
hostages in Iran.

At Fort Allen, P.R., where 200 Haitians staged a stone-throwing riot last
weekend, injuring three guards, Don Hasson, a spokesman for the immigration
service, said the situation today was ''normal'' and ''relatively quiet.''

He said those being detained had not refused meals. One-hundred Border Patrol
guards have been added to the security complement at Fort Allen, said Mr.
Hasson, who declined to give the size of the normal security unit.

Archbishop Appeals for Release

MIAMI, Dec. 24 (AP) - The Roman Catholic Archbishop of Miami appealed to
President Reagan today for the ''humane'' release of the Haitians at the Krome
Avenue Center.

Archbishop Edward McCarthy said in a telegram to the President: ''As we witness
the cruel suppression of human rights in Poland, we must show the world that we,
the people of the United States, still stand for freedom, liberty and justice.
Your release of these Haitian detainees who have come to these shores seeking
freedom, liberty and justice will speak louder than any words.''

The Archbishop also said mass for 677 Haitians at the detention center and said
he sympathized with their frustration. He called their hunger strike ''a very
human reaction to the very inhuman conditions'' of the detention site.

He held a separate service for about 70 Haitian women who are segregated from
the men for what immigration officials call ''security reasons.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               8 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             December 23, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

FOR A CARIBBEAN COMPACT

BYLINE: By Robert Pastor

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 852 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


The Reagan Administration has admirably tried to address the two difficult
issues of immigration and development in the Caribbean Basin - all the countries
in and around the Caribbean Sea.

These two initiatives generously leave Congress substantial room to improve
them, but the most serious flaw with these proposals is that they do not address
the relationship between the two problems.

To address them separately is shortsighted and could very well aggravate both
problems.  An effective policy that curbed migration would necessarily generate
uncontainable social and political tensions in the region.  Economic
development, which relies primarily on foreign investment and fails to address
the migration problem, could stimulate more illegal migration.

Moreover, the countries of the region will not with us in regulating the flow of
people without some compensatory policy, since that will probably mean they have
to support an overwhelmingly unskilled population while the United States
absorbs more of their skilled workers.

Since President Reagan will not completely unveil his Caribbean Basin initiative
until January, there is still time to correct this oversight and to fashion a
proposal that relates the two problems.

To use the Administration's own phrase, it ought to ''go to the source,'' and
propose a Caribbean Basin Compact, in which the United States and other donors
in the region or interested in it would double aid, expand private investment,
and guarantee access to their markets for textiles and other competitive
products.

The recipient countries, in turn, would agree to use their increased aid for
labor-intensive investments in agriculture and light manufacturing in regions
where emigration has been greatest.

All nations would formulate and agree to a Caribbean-wide development plan for
restructuring and relocating the region's manufacturing and agriculture during
the next 10 years.

The United States would accept more legal immigrants from the Caribbean Basin
and gradually curtail both the illegal flow and the ''brain drain.'' Returning
migrants would be given credits from a special bank established to assist small
businesses. Research institutes in the area would focus on developing
technologies to create employment. More money and attention should be given to
programs to limit population growth.

The compact would be a genuinely multilateral effort. It would not curb
migration by promoting development, but would expand opportunities in the
countries from which most migrants come so that they can cope with the
consequences of a new United States immigration law.

The United States should negotiate such a compact before Congress completes
action on curbing illegal migration.  Failure to do so would mean that the
United States would exchange one aspect of the problem for another -and later
find itself absorbing refugees fleeing violence instead of undocumented workers
seeking work. There is no escaping the links between migration, development, and
political change in the Basin.

During the last two decades, the Caribbean Basin became the largest source of
migration to the United States - approximately one-third of all legal
immigrants, two-thirds of all political refugees, and ninetenths of all
undocumented workers.

Ten percent or more of the population of many Basin countries already live in
the United States and contribute economically and culturally and in making
United States citizens more sensitive to the many sides of political change in
the region.

The possibility of negotiating such a compact will increase as nations like
Mexico begin to cope with illegal migrants from Central America.

They will also soon have to face the fact that their own ''escape valve'' to the
United States may be a short-term solution - releasing potentially explosive
tensions caused by high unemployment - and a long-term problem.

A nation that exports its problem of unemployment has little incentive to solve
it by making difficulty internal adjustments or investing more in
labor-intensive than capital-intensive projects.

By gradually closing the valve, while at the same time adding resources as part
of a comprehensive plan for the entire region, the compact would help these
countries employ those who remain as well as those who return.

The United States has a more powerful reason than anti-Communism for undertaking
this effort: Ours is a Caribbean nation.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
Robert Pastor, who is author of ''Congress and the Politics of U.S.  Foreign
Economic Policy,'' served on the National Security Council staff during the
Carter Administration and is a guest scholar at the Brookings Institution.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Cartoon

TYPE: Op-Ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                               9 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 22, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 291 words


U.S. AIDES HAITIANS' LAWYERS DISCUSS RIOT IN PUERTO RICO CAMP

SAN JUAN, P.R., Dec. 21 (UPI) - Lawyers for Haitian refugees negotiated with
United States immigration officials today at Fort Allen, where riots erupted
over the weekend because of attempts to fence in those in the camp.

The Haitians are kept segregated by sex by fences topped with barbed-wire. They
are demanding that they be allowed to contact and to speak to one another,
according to Efren Rivera, a lawyer for 795 refugees here.

Many of the men and women have been separated from their spouses because
American officials do not recognize their marriages.  Jean-Claude Bajeux,
coordinator for the Inter-Regional Council for Haitian Refugees, said the
situation was ''a tinderbox that can go off at any moment -They want to be out
by Christmas.''

The Border Patrol flew in 100 agents Sunday to help restore order.  The
disorders began Saturday night, after officials of the Immigration and
Naturalization Service entered the camp at nighttime and began putting up a
fence, Mr. Rivera said.

The police said that about 200 persons involved in the riot knocked down a fence
and threw stones at officials.

---- 900 Cubans May Stay in Prison

ATLANTA, Dec. 21 (AP) - Many of the Cuban refugees in the Federal penitentiary
here may be too dangerous for early release, an assistant United States
attorney, Douglas Roberto, said today.

He told Federal District Judge Marvin Shoob that up to 900 of the detainees
might not be eligible for release. Judge Shoob had ordered the Government to
review the status of the Cubans and release those not considered dangerous.

About 510 of the Cubans have been placed with sponsors, and 321 are about to be
released, Mr. Roberto said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              10 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 20, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CONGRESS FINALLY ACTS TO STEM THE FLOOD OF FOREIGN DOCTORS

BYLINE: By DAVID SHRIBMAN

SECTION: Section 4; Page 18, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1021 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


Virtually unnoticed amid the last minute foreign aid, farm and pension bills
Congress passed last week was a measure that could change the face of health
care in the nation's urban areas. The measure, actually a series of amendments
to the Immigration and Nationality Act, adjusts the requirements and extends the
deadline for hiring foreign doctors who wish to practice in the United States.
It is Congress's final notice to hospitals across the country that their
dependence on foreign physicians must cease.

The amendments will have several effects. Among the more important, they would
require all incoming foreign physicians to pass the visa qualifying examination,
a rigorous test of medical competency that about 80 percent of foreign doctors
fail. In the past, failure has not ruled out employment in public or voluntary
hospitals. But it will after Dec. 31, 1983, and that will restrict immigration
of foreign doctors. Americans who take their medical degrees abroad are not
affected by the legislation.

The implications for hospitals in the Northeast are troubling; for New York City
in particular, they are distressing. The latest figures indicate that foreign
doctors account for more than three-quarters of the interns and residents in a
dozen New York hospitals. They constitute more than half the interns and
residents in 23 of the city's hospitals and at least a quarter of the house
officers in 34 city hospitals. Of the house officers in pediatrics at the four
Health and Hospitals Corporation facilities in Brooklyn, 93 percent are
foreigners. Foreign physicians also make up much of the staff of New York
State's mental hospitals, and they play important roles in hospitals in
Connecticut, New Jersey, Illinois, Delaware, Maryland, Michigan and Ohio.

Since the 1960's, when the flood of immigrating physicians began, foreign
doctors have tended to concentrate in inner-city medical facilities that have
held little attraction for American physicians.  Between 1963 and 1976 their
number rose from 31,000 to more than 85,000. At their peak in 1972, foreign
doctors constituted some 46 percent of those who received licenses to practice
medicine in the United States. Many have moved into fields, such as pediatrics,
anesthesiology and rehabilitative medicine, less popular among their American
counterparts.

Their presence in the nation's physician population has not proved an
unadulterated blessing. For one thing, it has produced a medical ''brain drain''
in countries that can ill afford the loss. A 1977 study, for example, showed
that nearly two-fifths of the foreign doctors in the United

States were from India and Pakistan, which have chronic physician shortages.  On
this end, members of the American medical establishment have complained of
language difficulties and cultural differences that adversely affect some
foreign physicians' ability to treat American patients. There has been furious
debate in the medical fraternity over the adequacy of foreign medical school
training programs.

''Some of these doctors graduated from Cambridge and London - in some instances,
they have fit in very well and have made major contributions,'' said Dr. Kenneth
Moritsugu, director of the division of medicine in the Department of Health and
Human Services' Bureau of Health Professions. ''Some of them, however, have
graduated from very, very large classes and raise the issue of quality
control.'' Dr. Moritsugu said it was not unusual to find a foreign medical
doctor practicing as a psychiatric officer in a state mental institution, ''even
though he is not adequately trained or sensitized to the American socio-cultural
system.''

Since 1976, Congress has tried to reduce the size and importance of foreign
physicians in urban medical facilities. It set December 1980 as the cutoff for
hospitals hiring new foreign physicians who had not passed the visa qualifying
examination.

At the same time, Congress offered a slender carrot to medical facilities where
an immediate cutoff of foreign staff would cause a ''substantial disruption'' in
health services. Those institutions could receive waivers if they pledged to
develop and implement plans to reduce their dependency on foreign doctors. To
date, waivers have come primarily from the Northeast and Middle West. No
hospital in the West requested a waiver in 1978 and 1979. Of the 239 waivers
granted last year, 187 were to hospitals in New York City.

Easing the Transition

The number of foreign physicians moving to New York City hospitals has been
dropping, however. This year only 44 waivers were granted.  Many observers
believe that the two year extension to the hiring cutoff date will give
hospitals the time they need to compensate further for the foreign medical
doctors on whom they have become dependent.

The Federal Government is encouraging them to draw on its National Health
Service Corps, a cadre of doctors assigned to medically underserved communities
to work off their Federal education grants.  Many hospital administrators are
advocating greater use of physician assistants and nurse practitioners where
practicable.

In New York City, the Health and Hospitals Corporation has formed a group of
doctors, hospital administrators and deans of local medical schools to address
the problems and is considering intensified recruitment of American doctors, the
hiring of osteopaths, greater employment opportunities for American graduates of
foreign medical schools and increasing the attractiveness of positions in city
hospitals.

''Solutions often respond to deadlines,'' said David A. Mannis, a counsel at the
Health and Hospitals Corporation who lobbied for the deadline extension. ''We
wanted a phase-down schedule, but two years might be too short. It remains to be
seen what we can do.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: graph of physician immigrants admitted to U.S. on
permanent basis photo of doctors

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              11 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 18, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

MOON CHURCH FOLLOWER AGREES TO LEAVE U.S.

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 653 words

DATELINE: AKRON, Ohio, Dec. 17


A 20-year-old Australian woman, who came to the United States for a vacation but
spent the last 14 months in the Rev. Sun Myung Moon's Unification Church, agreed
today to leave the country voluntarily rather than face deportation as an
illegal alien.

Her parents, who had flown here to try to bring their daughter home, at one
point had her committed to a mental institution to remove her from the church's
influence.

The woman, Angela Hamersley, a former reservations clerk for Qantas Airlines,
was arrested today in Akron by officials of the United States Immigration and
Naturalization Service.

Miss Hamersley arrived in this country in October 1980 for a vacation but did
not return to Australia. Her visitation papers expired in April.

Say She Was Brainwashed

Her parents, John and Julie Hamersley, first flew here from Perth, Australia, a
month after her arrival. They later hired an Arizona ''deprogrammer'' to try to
reclaim their daughter. Although Miss Hamersley told her parents she had joined
the religious group of her own free will, they said they believed she had been
brainwashed.

An Australian consul also journeyed to Akron from Chicago to assist in getting
Miss Hamersley's cooperation to leave the country.  ''I am very happy,'' Mr.
Hamersley said after his daughter agreed not to fight deportation. He said
Thursday's session with Government officials and lawyers was ''the first time
we've seen her behave like a normal person'' since she joined the Moon church.

For the Hamersleys, the ordeal began in October 1980, when their daughter, then
18 years old, phoned them from San Francisco saying that she had canceled her
flight home and was staying in the United States.

'Nice Set of Friends'

''She said just that she had met this nice girl who had a nice set of friends
and that she had invited her to stay with them,'' Mrs.  Hamersley said.

Mr. Hamersley, a pharmacist, said he was ''shocked'' at his daughter's decision
because ''she was an extraordinarily sensible and level-headed girl.''

The Hamersleys said they learned the truth about their daughter's whereabouts
after distant relatives in this country helped them check the address their
daughter had given where she could be reached and found it was a warehouse
leased by the Mr. Moon's Unification Church.

As soon as they could get passports, they journeyed to San Francisco and told
Unification Church officials they wanted to see their daughter.

Slept on Floor of Hut

The Hamersleys said they found their daughter was living in a wood hut with
about a dozen other young girls and was sleeping on the floor. After several
visits, the Hamersleys were unable to persuade her to return with them.

Miss Hamersley then moved to New York with the Unification Church and then to
Akron, where she lived in the church commune and worked for the church at a
store in a shopping center.

The Hamersleys returned to the United States several days ago, this time aided
by a deprogrammer and some lawyers.  They succeeded in getting a court order to
have her temporarily committed to a mental hospital, where she was held for
several days.  The Hamersleys had told the court their daughter suffered from
hypoglycemia, a disorder involving low levels of blood sugar, and that her
sudden gain of about 25 pounds jeopardized her health.

By the time the mental hospital was ready to release her Thursday, immigration
officials had been alerted and were prepared to arrest her.

Peter Reilly, the Australian consul from Chicago, said foreign travelers in the
United States were often targets of religious cults. ''It is becoming an
increasing problem, the difficulties that Australians have encountered with
cults,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              12 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 15, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

A BIG WEEKEND FOR ANTELOPE WELLS, N.M., POP. 2

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 647 words

DATELINE: ANTELOPE WELLS, N.M., Dec. 13


Normally, Antelope Wells, perhaps the most remote port of entry in the United
States, has two residents. Each has a trailer behind the customs station and is
employed by the Government to enforce trade and immigration regulations. The
number of people entering here averages fewer than three a day.

For the last two days, however, Antelope Wells has been alive with ranchers,
truck drivers, ranch hands, brokers, buyers and sellers, inspectors from the
United States Department of Agriculture, vaqueros, or cowboys, and, more than
likely, a few crooks.

They came to assure safe passage of 1,221 cattle from ranches in Chihuahua,
Mexico's largest cattle-raising state, to the United States.

Before sunrise, Mexican ranch hands, who camped out in bedrolls next to
all-night fires a hundred yards south of the border, started their day with
freshly brewed coffee.

Cattle Owner Flies In

The workers arrived throughout the night after a two-hour truck ride in the
Sierra de Medio mountains. The trucks brought cattle from the ranch of Hilario
Gabilondo. Mr. Gabilondo arrived at daybreak, landing his plane in a nearby
field after the five-minute flight from his ranch.

Mr. Gabilondo's cattle, from 7 to 10 months old, were held in corrals in Mexico,
then sent single file through wooden chutes leading to a concrete shed. There,
Douglas Woody, a veterinarian of the Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service,
Department of Agriculture, and his crew felt each calf. They were looking for
ticks, scabs, lumpjaw, ringworm, warts or abcesses and verifying that each
animal had been neutered.

The few who failed inspection were sprayed on the forehead with red paint and
sent back to the Gabilondo ranch. A numbered metal strip was stapled onto the
right ear of those who passed.

The entire procedure was carefully watched by Mr. Gabilondo, who is an adviser
on livestock affairs to Mexico's President, Jose Lopez Portillo. This year, he
said, Mexican ranchers will ship less than half of their 400,000-head quota for
export to the United States because cattle now command a better price in Mexico.
He said that the American cattle industry ''is in a down market. It runs in
nine-year cycles and, barring a depression, it will begin its upturn in a year
or two.''

After weighing, the cattle were corraled, then placed in a narrow vat to be
submerged in a milky tick dip. When dry, they were sent to corrals on the other
side of the line.

''Well, they're United States citizens now,'' Mr. Gabilondo observed as the last
of his 757 calves crossed. The cattle, averaging 430 pounds, would probably be
slaughtered in a couple of years when they weigh 1,000 pounds.

The 100,000-acre Gabilondo spread is divided among four family members to
conform with land-ownership laws, according to Jose Luis Gabilondo, the
rancher's 26-year-old son.

Even when the land was known as New Spain, cattle drives crossed the area,
according to the elder Mr. Gabilondo.  Shortly after their cattle crossed, the
two Gabilondos flew off.  Just after that came Scott R. Dean, a cattle broker
from the Paul Dean Cattle Company in El Paso and Brad Tate, a Lakeland, Kan.,
rancher who was purchasing the Gabilondo cattle.

Mr. Dean paid from 80 to 90 cents a pound for the herd of 325,928 pounds. The
Customs Service collected duty of one and one-half cents a pound.

After nightfall, another herd arrived from the Villanueva Ranch, 17 miles to the
east. The 464 animals, weighing 193,366 pounds, went through the same procedure
as the Gabilondo cattle. By mid-afternoon, Antelope Wells settled back into the
tempo it maintains the other 363 days a year.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Map of New Mexico 2 photos of a cattle drive

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              13 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 11, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICAN BORDER AGENTS WARNED OF ASSASSIN TEAMS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 685 words

DATELINE: SAN YSIDRO, Calif., Dec. 10


The Immigration and Naturalization Service has told border agents to be on the
lookout for two assassination squads from Libya, including one headed by the
notorious international terrorist known as Carlos and dubbed ''the Jackal'' by
the British press.

A seven-page notice, posted in the employees' lunchroom at the nation's busiest
border-crossing point on the Mexican border south of San Diego, alerts agents to
watch for squads of terrorists reportedly dispatched by Col. Muammar el-Qaddafi,
the Libyan leader, to assassinate President Reagan and other senior officials in
the Administration.

The document, dated Dec. 6, warns that two ''hit'' teams ''may attempt to enter
the United States illegally with the help of established smugglers familiar with
the U.S.-Mexican border.''

The notice says the hit squad reportedly headed by Carlos consists of three
Syrians and three Libyans. It also says a second group consists of two Iranians,
a Palestinian, a Lebanese and an East German.

The notice, issued by the Washington headquarters of the Immigration and
Naturalization Service, says that Carlos, a 32-yearold Venezuelan whose real
name is Illich Ramirez Sanchez, is believed to be traveling on a Lebanese
passport under an assumed name.

Similar Notice on Clipboard

A border control agent in Nogales, Ariz., said a similar notice had been put on
a clipboard available only to employees at the crossing there. The agent, who
declined to be identified, said the notice was posted either Wednesday or today.

It could not be immediately determined if the notice was posted at other
stations on the Mexican border or at any other entry points.  James O'Keefe,
district director of Immigration in San Diego, said today that the border
crossing was ''operating normally.'' He and inspectors at the border declined
further comment, referring questions to Washington.

Reporters were refused admission to the facility today, but no extraordinary
precautions could be observed at the entry point, where about 40 million
crossings into the United States are made every year.

In Washington, Vernon Jervis, spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, refused to discuss any aspect of the document.

''It's a matter that's extremely sensitive, involving national security,'' Mr.
Jervis said.  The notice includes a reproduction of a Royal Canadian Mounted
Police poster of Carlos that describes him as a heavyset man who is 5 feet 9
inches tall with thick brown, curly hair and ''skilled at changing appearance
and identity.''

Beginning in August 1970, when he underwent commando training in Jordan, Carlos
has devoted most of his energies to killing for the Palestinian cause. He is
wanted in connection with the slaying of Israeli athletes at the Olympic games
in Munich in 1972, the shooting of Edward Sieff, a British Zionist, in 1973, the
kidnapping of 11 oil ministers attending the OPEC conference in Vienna in 1975
and the assassination of Ramon Trabal, a Uruguayan military attache.

Members of Teams Named

The notice listed Hasan Al-Khayer, Ali Ahmed and Walid Abdul Rahman as Syrian
nationals who are members of the assassination team, and Omar or Umar Ayad and
Ali Saghayer as Libyan nationals. It also listed a man variously named Mohamed
or Milad Muhammad el-Hadi or Hadi, also known as Milad Muhammad Hadi or
Muhamammd Ibraham Al-Hadi on that team.

A second team included Ahmed Jooma, also known as Ahmad Juma or Abase Said or
Ahmed Husayn Juma, an Iranian, about 25; Luitz Schewesman, an East German, about
50; Ahmat Abass, or Ahmed Abbas or Mouses Abou Mahmoud, a Palestianian, about
35; Ibrahim El Haya, an Iranian, about 36 and also known as Ibrahim El-Haya,
Ibraham ElHaya, Ibrahim Al-Haya, Ibrahim Al Haya, Ali Ben Ali, Ali Ben-Ali; and
Ali Chafio, a Lebanese, about 35.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              14 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 6, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

AIDES SAY THAT SEA PATROL HAS SLOWED HAITIAN ENTRIES

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 30, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 940 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Dec. 5


The Federal authorities say that the number of Haitian refugees headed for the
United States has decreased dramatically in a year. They are crediting the
Reagan Administration's decision to interdict these refugees at sea as well as
widespread word in Haiti that coming to this country without proper documents
means a loss of freedom.

Since the Government announced the interdiction policy in August, the
Immigration and Naturalization Service has taken 1,960 Haitians into custody. In
the same four months last year, the agency picked up 6,906. In all of 1980, the
Government caught 15,093 Haitians, while in 1981, through Dec. 1, 8,023 had been
detained. Last month only 47 were picked up as they reached Florida shores, as
against 1,021 in November 1980.

Though Coast Guard cutters patrolling the Windward Passage between Haiti and
Cuba since September have interdicted only one boat, and that one sinking with
57 Haitians on board, a spokesman for the immigration service here said,
''That's where the word 'deterrent' comes in.''

The spokesman, Beverly McFarland, said that the presence of the Coast Guard off
Haiti's coast, the Administration's ''detention posture'' and the attention the
Haitian press paid the drownings of 33 refugees off a Florida beach Oct. 26 were
three major reasons for the ''tremendous drop-off.'' She added that the
Government's decision to establish Fort Drum, a 107,625-acre military
installation near Watertown, N.Y., as a permanent detention facility for illegal
aliens may have contributed.

The Fear of Siberia

Of Fort Drum, she said: ''A side effect may well be that there has been so much
press about it being Siberia that it may have caused people to think twice. But
it was not an intentional deterrent.''

A spokesman for the Haitian community in Miami discounted the Government's
belief that the number of Haitians heading here had decreased. ''They're still
coming,'' said the Rev. Gerard Jean-Juste, executive director of the Haitian
Refugee Center Inc. ''They're just not caught. They drift in and I meet them
every day myself.''

The Federal authorities concede that as many as 50,000 Haitians have eluded
officials in the last 10 years and entered the United States illegally. Hundreds
still do, the immigration agency believes, but the theory is that if 1,000 were
apprehended in a month a year ago, with less manpower and less attention to the
situation, then, given this year's resources and local awareness, if fewer than
50 are picked up in one month, it must mean fewer are coming.

''The Mariel boatlift threw everything into high relief,'' said Miss McFarland,
referring to the 1980 Cuban refugees. ''There is no ignoring any boat that comes
in with people who are illegal now.''

Most Living in Misery

There are about 2,500 Haitians in detention in Florida, Texas, Kentucky, West
Virgina and New York. Some 700 others are at Fort Allen, P.R., under an
agreement with the Puerto Ricans that the number will not exceed 800. By all
accounts, the detainees are miserable.

Here in Miami, at the Krome Avenue camp on the eastern edge of the Everglades,
there was a small riot Sept. 3. Two weeks ago, 45 men escaped over the 12-foot
chain-link fence and the two-feet of barbed wire that tops it; 15 were
recaptured. The night before Thanksgiving, 15 to 20 men shoved a guard against a
wall and went over the fence; two were recaptured. In the next two nights, 21
fled.

The immigration agency added 12 Border Patrol guards to its 26-man security
detail at Krome. There have been no breakouts in a week.  Immigration officials
here say that Christmas may be a reason for tensions at Krome. The Haitians,
nearly all of them Roman Catholics, have begun to realize they will be neither
free nor home by the holiday, and to keep the place calm through this month the
Government is allowing local clergymen to say mass and is negotiating with
relief organizations for entertainment.

An ordinary day at Krome means standing around on the coral rock ground. There
are no recreational facilities, nor at Fort Allen in Puerto Rico.

More than 100 Haitians have voluntarily left Fort Allen and been flown back to
Haiti. Their places at Fort Allen have been filled by transfers of Haitians from
Krome, which, at a population of 803 Friday, was filled to capacity.

Refugees at Fort Allen said today that they had found a 30-year-old father of
five dead in his bunk, and they said they would refuse to let the authorities
remove the body until they were allowed to see lawyers or the press, United
Press International reported. The refugees said by telephone that they had found
the body of Innocent Miclisse, a 30-year-old married man and the father of five.

The Government contends there would be no need for detention if a handful of
lawyers had not taken more Haitian cases than they could handle and had not
clogged the works with delaying tactics. The civil libertarians contend that the
Haitians are political refugees, not solely economic refugees, as the
Administration holds, and that their rights are being violated. There are a
dozen unresolved suits in Federal courts in Miami. Another went to trial in
Federal District Court in Manhattan Friday.

Next month, the Haitians are to be moved to Fort Drum, issued mittens and
parkas, and taught to walk on ice and look for signs of frostbite. After that,
Krome, a missile base thrown up in the 1962 Cuban crisis, is to be a processing
facility, from which aliens will be shipped home or to Fort Drum.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: map of southern Florida photo of beds in detention
center photo of wire fence surrounding detention center photo of guard tower

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              15 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              December 5, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

The City;
Decision Delayed On Haitian Paroles

SECTION: Section 2; Page 29, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 191 words


A Federal judge reserved decision on requests that eight Haitians be paroled as
they await a ruling on their applications for political asylum.

Judge Robert L. Carter of Federal District Court in Manhattan put off a decision
after lawyers for the Haitians asserted that an immigration official's denial of
parole had discriminated against the aliens.

Lawyers for the Haitians argued that Charles D. Sava, district director of the
Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service, had acted arbitrarily and, by
refusing to parole the Haitians, had failed to exercise his discretionary power
properly.

Six of the plaintiffs, who were transferred from the Miami area after illegally
entering the United States, were represented by a group of Columbia University
Law School professors. Two others retained a private lawyer.

Each of the Haitians claimed at the time of arrival that he had fled Haiti for
fear of political persecution. While their applications for asylum are pending,
the Haitians have been held at the immigration agency's processing center in
Brooklyn.  (AP)

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              16 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               December 4, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SUIT BY 6 HAITIAN ALIENS TESTING DETENTION POLICY

BYLINE: By DAVID M. MARGOLICK

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1117 words


The first legal test of the Reagan Administration's policy of detaining ''boat
people'' from the embattled Caribbean island of Haiti will take place today in
Manhattan.

Lawyers for the the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service and for
six aliens from Haiti who have been detained in Brooklyn for the last six months
will square off in Federal District Court in Manhattan.

The six Haitians, who are seeking political asylum in this country, contend that
their detention is ''cruel, vindictive and irrational,'' and violates the United
States Constitution and United Nations protocols on the rights of refugees.

Parole Requests Cited

They also charge that the Immigration Service's district director, Charles D.
Sava, has improperly denied their requests to be released on parole, pending
determination of their asylum claims.

''If Mr. Sava's actions can be explained at all, it is that they are designed
and intended as an 'invidious discrimination' against the plaintiffs, as blacks
and Haitians, to punish them for seeking political refuge and to deter other
Haitians from seeking such refuge,'' the plaintiffs argued in papers filed on
Nov. 25 with Judge Robert L. Carter of Federal District Court.

''Possibly the Government of Haiti can jail people for no other reason than that
it will set a handy example for others,'' the plaintiffs in the suit continued,
''but such arbitrary abuse of authority is not a part of the United States legal
system.''

The Government denies that it has discriminated against the Haitians. The
Immigration Service ''has ample authority to continue the detention of the
petitioners, and this authority has been properly administered in this case,''
said Thomas H. Belote, a special assistant United States Attorney.

The six Haitians arrived separately in the United States by boat at various
times last summer. Each maintains he fled his homeland to escape persecution by
the Haitian Government and its agents. The office of the United Nations High
Commissioner for Refugees has declared three of them to be refugees.

While their asylum applications are pending before an immigration judge, they
have been held at the Immigration Service's processing center at 136 Flushing
Avenue in Brooklyn, built in 1941 to serve as a brig for the Brooklyn Navy Yard.

Earlier this year, the New York Civil Liberties Union sued the Justice
Department over what it considered unconstitutional conditions at the center,
which is in an advanced state of disrepair and has no outdoor recreation
facilities. A settlement of the suit, including an agreement to close the
Brooklyn detention facility within roughly one year, is said to be imminent.

The plaintiffs maintain that aliens seeking admission to the United States have
until recently been released on parole, pending determination of their claims,
unless they presented security risks or were likely to abscond - a policy that
represented ''the humane qualities of an enlightened civilization,'' according
to the United States Supreme Court's 1958 opinion in Leng May Ma v. Barber.

For other groups of aliens, they contend, this policy still applies.  Things
changed for Haitians last summer, they say. The plaintiffs point out that
although none of them has a criminal record and all of them have obtained
sponsorship from church organizations and have filed substantial and documented
claims for asylum, Mr. Sava has denied five of their parole requests and has
held the other in abeyance while awaiting an advisory opinion from the State
Department.

Mr. Sava made no reply to five of the parole applications for more than two
months. His decisions in these cases were handed down earlier this week after
the filing of the Haitians' lawsuit.

The plaintiffs assert that Mr. Sava's long delay in addressing the parole
applications and his failure to explain any of his decisions constitute an abuse
of discretion.

They also say that the unusual treatment accorded the Haitian aliens violates
the United Nations Convention and Protocol Relating to the Status of Refugees,
which requires that its provisions be applied ''without discrimination as to
race, religion or country of origin.''

Penalties Are Barred

The Convention, to which the United States is a signatory, also bars the
imposition of penalties for illegal entry by refugees or unnecessary
restrictions on their movements once in the country of refuge - prohibitions
that, the plaintiffs charge, the Government has ignored.

The plaintiffs also assert that their detention violates the Fifth Amendment to
the United States Constitution, which states that ''no person shall be deprived
of life, liberty or property without due process of law.'' They cite several
Federal cases in which courts have extended to aliens a variety of procedural
protections mandated for United States citizens by the Constitution.

''We're not saying that aliens have rights equal to U.S.  citizens,'' said Prof.
Harriet Rabb of the Immigration Law Clinic at Columbia Law School, counsel for
the plaintiffs. ''What we are saying is that among all those groups of aliens
hanging on here by their fingernails, only the Haitians are getting the
clippers. The Government is violating the few rights of those who have the
fewest rights of all.''

Government attorneys counter that no court has jurisdiction to review
determinations of the United States Attorney General or his agents in matters
relating to the parole of illegal aliens. Such decisions, the attorneys say, are
within the broad discretion accorded to immigration authorities.

They dispute assertions that the Haitians are entitled to constitutional
due-process protections, citing the United States Supreme Court's 1953 opinion
in Kwong Hai Chew v. Colding, which states that ''the Bill of Rights is a futile
authority for the alien seeking admission for the first time to these shores.''

----

Haitian Found Dead in Cell

BUFFALO, Dec. 3 (AP) - A young Haitian being held for deportation was found dead
in his cell early today at the nearby Alden Correctional Facility, authorities
said.

Frank M. Festa, the prison superintendent, said the Haitian, Yves H. Chapoteau,
20 years old, was found dead on his cot about 4:30 A.M. ''There were no bumps or
bruises on the body,'' Mr. Festa said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              17 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 29, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. APPROVES THE RELEASE OF 703 CUBAN REFUGEES

BYLINE: By REGINALD STUART

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 31, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 610 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, Nov. 25


United States immigration officials, acting under the close scrutiny of a
Federal judge, have approved the release of 703 Cuban refugees from prison here.
In doing so, however, the Government has asserted its right to deport them
later.

The 703 were part of a group of 125,000 Cuban refugees who came to this country
by sea in the spring of 1980; altogether, about 1,700 of those people were
detained.

They were imprisoned because of questions raised by immigration examiners about
their suspected involvement in crimes, as perpetrators or victims.

By the end of this week, 441 Cubans had been released from the Federal Detention
Center here under an expedited hearing procedure prompted by a Federal judge who
threatened in late August to take over the refugee review procedures.

Judge Had Prepared a Plan

Federal District Judge Marvin Shoob ruled that the Government had been holding
people for an unnecessarily long time and noted than fewer than a dozen Cubans
had been released in the first six months of this year. He prepared a plan to
speed up the review process but deferred carrying it out after receiving a
proposal from the Government that was put into effect immediately.

Deborah Ebel, a member of the Cuban legal aid team, said that the speeded-up
review process was ''basically accomplishing the release first of those people
who clearly should not be in prison.

''We're fairly satisfied with the most recent progress,'' she said, ''people
leaving at a rate of about 40 to 50 a week.'' But she noted that 574 refugees
were still waiting to be interviewed in a review of their cases.

The legal team representing the Cubans remains worried about the Government's
continued refusal to declare that it has no intention of deporting the Cubans,
including those cleared for release.

Confusion Over Intent

There has been considerable confusion over the Government's intent since it
filed with the court in August a status review plan that referred to the
prospects of returning the refugees to Cuba. At that point, Judge Shoob issued a
temporary restraining order barring the deportation of any of the Cubans while
his review of the release process was going on.

Since then, the Government has refused to clarify for the court the question
whether any negotiations are in progress with Cuba that could result in the
refugees' deportation.

In a conference with Judge Shoob early this month, United States Attorneys again
refused to say that the Cubans would not be deported while his review of the
release process was under way.

In Effect, on Parole

Meanwhile, the freed Cubans are, in effect, on parole, able to go to work but
with the understanding that they are subject to deportaion.

The Government is challenging the temporary restraining order before the United
States Court of Appeals for the 11th Circuit, in Atlanta.

The Cubans have argued that they are political refugees and would be subject to
persecution if returned to Cuba.  Judge Shoob has set a hearing for Dec. 21 for
arguments on whether the refugees have a well-based fear of persecution. If he
finds that they do, it could dramatically enhance the prospects of their being
allowed to remain in the United States permanently.

Lawyers for the Cubans have argued that most of those being held should be
released. But they said that some might have to be detained because of the
serious nature of the crimes in which they are alleged to have been involved, or
because of mental health problems.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              18 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 29, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIANS: WE'LL KILL OURSELVES

SECTION: Section 4; Page 19, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 879 words


Following are excerpts from an open letter to the United States Immigration
Service from 'The Unhappy Refugees of Enclave IV'-a group of Haitians held at
Fort Allen, Puerto Rico. In it, they threaten suicide. The letter was handed to
a New York Times reporter.

Dear Readers, Gentlemen, Civilian, and Military Authorities, For the last few
months we have been imprisoned without knowing what outcome our fates would
have.  You can imagine that if we risked our lives by leaving our country on
sailboats and planes it was in order to find a haven on the soil of America,
which we thought was capable of re-ceiving us, since it is a large power in the
world.

Since 1957, we have endured atro-cious suffering due to the lack of a good
government. But now it is worse, and we cannot stand it. This is why we are
forced to emigrate in larger num-bers. At home if we manage to get work, we
cannot collect our salary. If we claim our rights, our life would be in danger.
Not only one's own, but also that of the entire family, which would be
implicated by the authorities.

To our great surprise, upon arriving to the Immigration Center in Miami, we were
made to wait for several hours during which time we were in-terrogated on one
single topic, to wit, ''Why did you come to the United States?'' Since our
answer is positive and always the same, we were finally accepted although we
were told that we would have to spend a few days in the Krome (detention center)
for formalities.

Upon arriving, our eyes widened with fear and surprise at the conditions of
life. We thought we were throwing ourselves into a stable. One thousand persons
are jammed into one and the same cell.  It reminds us of black slavery. But
alas, after shedding many tears and imploring God to come help us, we finally
resigned ourselves to accepting this sufferance for a few days. Because we did
not want to go back. Each day that would go by was one day less for us. We hoped
that maybe in 8, 10, or 15 days we would be called to be freed.

One day around 4 p.m., we (women) were all gathered at the sound of whistles. We
spent a day and a night awaiting our fate, after having been tagged with a
plastic ID bracelet. After that we were made to parade in the nude in front of
men and women. We were splashed, badly dressed. Stripped of our own clothes and
belongings, we were made to sit in a room where we were to spend the night. In
this distress, the room was like a wake, where sad songs were being sung. At
that moment an enormous chill would run down the spine.  Around 5 a.m., we were
jammed into a bus which was to drive us to the airport. This is how we left
Miami for Puerto Rico.

If sometimes a few of us misbehave, it is not their fault. You must understand
that all of us don't have the strength, the same understanding, nor the same
degree of education, and that we all suffer a lot from the behavior of others.
Life at Fort Allen has been very hard for us.

When we left Miami, we were led to believe that we were only going to Puerto
Rico for a few days. And until now we have been suffering for eight months
without knowing why. Each day we hear only one thing: those who wish to return
to Haiti can come give their names.

Since we arrived on American soil, we have been mistreated. We have been made to
suffer and we have accepted it all, we have endured it.  We have left at home
relatives who are relying on our help. How can we return to Haiti now, empty
handed and stripped of everything? Oh no, it would be the greatest injustice. If
the Americans did not want to take us in, they should have sent us back the very
same day. And now, instead of making us suffer, why not send us to other
countries like Russia, Cuba, France or Canada, who are willing to take us in
with open arms?

We are Christians. We have blood in our veins and thoughts like all the other
people who are free. We want our freedom because we have been suffering for five
months, because we left our relatives in order to help others get out of the
lion's mouth in Haiti.

Our situation is pitiful. We have been locked up behind barbed wire from Miami
to Puerto Rico. The days are always the same for us. We don't know what the date
is. Sometimes we are hungry and cannot eat.

We have needs and cannot satisfy them. Is this the better life we are seeking?
We took refuge in the United States in the hopes of filling our voids. Can we
not fill them? Where are we going?

Now we cannot stand it any more. It is too much. If we have not been freed by
the end of November, a good number of us are going to commit suicide. Because we
have sworn to die in the United States.

We are asking why you treat us this way. Is it because we are Negroes? Why are
you letting us suffer this way, America? Don't you have a father's heart?
Haven't you thought we were humans, that we had a heart to suffer with and a
soul that could be wounded? Give us back our freedom. Why among all the nations
that emigrate to the United States have only the Haitians known such suffering?

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: op-ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              19 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 27, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

A Plea to Stay in the United States

BYLINE: Associated Press

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 55 words


As a Haitian refugee struggles with immigration officials in the doorway of
plane on runway in Miami, another pleads to leave aircraft, which was carrying
125 Haitian refugees to Fort Allen, P.R. Officials reported yesterday that up to
18 Haitians had escaped from the Krome Avenue detention center in the Miami
Everglades.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              20 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 27, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

'BOATLIFT' PRIESTS AWAIT SENTENCING

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 25, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 970 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Nov. 26


By May 14, 1980, when President Carter ordered a halt to the boatlifts that had
brought more than 100,000 Cubans to Florida's shores, the priests felt they had
gone too far with their plans to turn back. So they did what they believed was
morally right and knew was legally wrong. Last week in a Federal court here they
became convicted felons.

The successful prosecution of the Rev. Joe Doss and the Rev.  Leopoldo Frade
carried ''the message of this Administration: immigration laws cannot be
ignored,'' said David Hiller, special assistant to the United States Attorney
General. The priests, now awaiting sentencing, see it the same way.

''They hope our conviction will be a deterent to anyone, priests, whatever, who
want to aid people in this way,'' Mr. Doss said in an interview. ''I say that's
a base motivation. Making scapegoats in order to deter others is not the
American concept of justice.

''Had they not been able to play on prejudice, and fear of a future Mariel,'' he
said referring to the Cuban port through which 125,000 Cubans passed on their
way to the United States in 1980, ''there is no doubt in my mind that we would
have been acquitted.''

The two 38-year-old men, whose church is Grace Episcopal in New Orleans, were
found guilty of violating a 1917 statute, the Trading With the Enemy Act. They
were arrested June 12, 1980, when their 126-foot ship, God's Mercy, a World War
II minesweeper, docked in Key West with 402 Cuban refugees.

Immigration Laws Did Not Apply

They were indicted on charges of smuggling illegal aliens, but a panel of
Federal judges here held last December that the immigration laws did not apply
in Mariel cases since there was nothing surreptitious about the voyages.
Hundreds of charges against boat captains and crews were thrown out.

That left the Justice Department smarting. David Hammer, the Assistant United
States Attorney here and the prosecutor in the case against the priests,
remembers that more than 100 investigators were recalled to Washington and that
a ''small team'' of lawyers ''was kept down here to prove the Government had the
power and the right to simply prohibit people from going down and bringing back
anyone they wanted to..'' He added, ''It is important to remember that as of
last year that fact had not been established.''

Mr. Hammer said it was eventually decided to use the Trading With the Enemy Act.
Under it, to take an American-registered vessel to Cuba, exchange money, stay in
a hotel room or engage in commerce in any way with the intent to transport
Cubans back here was viewed as a crime punishable by up to 10 years in prison
and a fine of $15,000.

A Matter of Government Power

Mr. Hammer said his office ''no longer has the resources to bring hundreds to
trial'' but that it was his duty ''to investigate and prosecute the most major
violations of the boatlift.''

''What we were hoping to achieve,'' he went on, ''were decisions making clear
that the Government had the power to prohibit future Mariels and also that the
Government, in fact, took this type of activity with the utmost seriousness. We
were not simply willing to put Mariel behind us, in other words. We drew up a
list of about seven or eight cases that we wanted to prosecute on the basis of
the seriousness of the offense, the willfullness of the conduct involved, and
the numbers of people brought in, and we indicted them all.''

The convictions of the priests were the fourth and fifth under the act. A
Methodist minister in Miami, the Rev. Roberto Perez, who was charged in the same
case against the Episcopalians, was acquitted.  Profit motives were established
in the earlier cases. When the question of profit came up in the clergymen's
trial, Mr. Doss said, ''We were ready for them. They went to first base and
found out they shouldn't be standing there.''

The priests raised about $220,000 to buy, outfit and man the World War II vessel
Palace III from a Boston shipyard in the spring of 1980. Their main intent, they
say, was to bring out relatives of their parishioners, a majority of whom are
Cuban. By May 9, 1980, they had given a list of names of those they were after
to the Cuban interests section of the Czechoslovak Embassy in Washington. On May
14, President Carter announced the blockade. The priests say they feared
reprisals against the Cubans they wanted to bring here.

We Had Crossed the Rubicon'

''We had already crossed the Rubicon,'' Mr. Doss said. ''We couldn't then say,
'Nice boys don't get in trouble.' The prosecution made a great deal of this,
saying we knew we were going to be subject to criminal prosecution. We would
have gone anyway; when lives are at stake, you complete your mission. But, in
fact, based on what the President said, we didn't think about criminal
prosecution. We knew it was illegal, but we didn't think it was criminally
illegal.''

Mr. Doss said he expected to be fined, and that the ship would be seized.  The
clergymen flew to Havana on May 28 to begin negotiations. The God's Mercy,
renamed for the mission, arrived in Cuban waters on May 29. On June 12, it
arrived at Key West with Mr. Doss, Mr. Frade, and 402 refugees, 288 of whom were
on the priests' list. They were all singing, ''In Jesus Christ, There Is No East
or West.''

''I'd much rather sleep free in my conscience for 10 years in jail,'' said Mr.
Frade, ''than to know we had been responsible for the deaths of 400 people. We
had to go. It was an act of compulsion.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              21 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 26, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

STAGE: 'HOUSE MUSIC' STUDIES GERMAN ATTITUDES

BYLINE: By RICHARD F. SHEPARD

SECTION: Section C; Page 13, Column 1; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 768 words


THEY say a drowning person sees his life just before he dies, but what do you
see when you are a survivor returning to the scene of your early life that
drowned 30 years ago? This is what Hans Sahl, one of that most impressive of
immigration waves to America, the German-speaking refugees, explores in a new
play, ''House Music,'' done by the American Jewish Theater at the 92d Street Y.

Mr. Sahl, who was a theater and movie critic as a young 24-year-old in Berlin,
continued as a writer in America, both in German and in English. In ''House
Music'' he vividly recalls the particularly bourgeois mores that had enveloped
German Jewry and gives us a tentative answer to the constantly nagging question,
''Why didn't they get out, if they knew what was happening?''

In this touching piece, which is more a reminiscence and a philosophical query
than a plot, the central figure is a 55-year-old Jewish refugee who returns to
Berlin 30 years after. At the apartment where he grew up, he is immersed in
memories of the rich family life, very assimilationist, more German than the
German, attitude of this upper middle-class family. Yet their links to
Jewishness, strengthened by the anti-Semitism of society, remain beneath the
devotion to Prussian ideals and they are torn, but not too much, by inner
conflict until the unthinkable occurs and they no longer have options.

''House Music,'' with a cast that understands the situation, under the direction
of Geoffrey Sherman, assails the intellect and the emotions. Its issues give you
something to chew on while the knowledge of what would happen to these Berlin
Jews provokes the shivers you get while viewing a film about the unsinkable
Titanic. In one scene, in particular, where they toast the Kaiser's birthday,
wave flags and sing the anthem as the leader passes by, the selfdelusion of
belonging becomes a chilling spectacle.

Clement Fowler, as the grown refugee returned to the scene, provides a solid,
even low-key cement that binds the vignettes together. Robert Blumenfeld is the
very model of a Prussian familydominating father, while Shirin Trainer is
marvelously bubbly and vapid as the strong-minded, culturally oriented mother.
Jean Hackett is beauteous as the younger sister, who loves the family musicales,
especially when they play Schumann, and Elaine Grollman is effective as the old
Grandma from, Lord help us, Galicia, from a shtetl.

Eberle Thomas is a dapper family friend who believes, to the end, that his
patriotism will place him above anti-Semitism and persecution, while Albert S.
Bennett and Waltrudis Buck make touching ''good'' Germans, friendly to their
Jewish friends.

''House Music'' is not your usual Holocaust theme, and it takes for granted that
we know the brutality without seeing it again. It is more effective and more
interesting in that it is a portrait of a frame of mind that senses the future
but does not trust its senses.

Before the Holocaust
HOUSE MUSIC, by Hans Sahl; directed by Geof- frey Sherman; sets and lights, Paul
Wonsek; costumes, Barbara Weiss; original music and adapted lyrics, Alan Menken;
production stage manager, Greta Minsky; sound, Hal Schuler.  Presented by the
American Jewish Theater. At the 92d Street Y, at Lexington Avenue.  Edgar
Rosengarten, the man .............Clement Fowler Felix Rosengarten
...................Robert Blumenfeld Anna Rosengarten
.......................Shirin Trainer Marianne Rosengarten
.....................Jean Hackett Edgar Rosengarten, the boy .............Brian
Zoldessy Josepha ...............................Elaine Grollman Mr. Bukofzer and
He-Mariann's Husband Eberle Thomas Mrs. Bukofzer and Carola Muller
........Waltrudis Buck Mr. Kleeman ................................Jack Poggi
Dr. Gottschalk ............................Sol Frieder Hase
......................................George Buck Skwara
..............................Albert S. Bennett The Woman in the Courtyard
...............Fran Anthony

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Jean Hackett

TYPE: review

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              22 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             November 25, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

OF ALIENS' CHILDREN, EDUCATION AND HYPOCRISY

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 323 words


To the Editor:

Your recent editorial on the education of alien children (Oct. 13) ignored two
main points on this issue which I have emphasized repeatedly.

First, the immigration laws are Federal, not state laws. The failure of the
Federal Government to enforce Federal laws is the genesis of the problem of
illegal aliens and their families in our state.

I fail to see why the taxpayers of Texas should be forced to shoulder the burden
of educating such children when, contrary to statements made by The Times, our
education dollars already are stretched thin trying to provide bilingual
programs and a quality education for the children of Spanish-speaking Americans
who reside legally in the state.

I am not opposed to educating children from any background.  However, I believe
that American citizens have first call on the services of our education system.
It is the height of hypocrisy for the Federal Government to fail to enforce the
immigration laws which prevent illegal entry of alien workers and then refuse to
bear the expense of educating the children of such undocumented workers.

Second, it is even more hypocritical for the Federal Government to insist that
Texas finance a free education for the children of illegal aliens and refuse on
the other hand to provide those aliens any Federal benefits or social services,
such as unemployment insurance, Social Security, food stamps, Medicaid,
Medicare, education grants, rent subsidies, school-lunch funds, energy
assistance, day care and legal services.

Your philosophy, carried to its logical conclusion, would have Texas subsidize
all those benefits which the Federal Government deliberately denies to those
whom it chooses to exclude from its programs.

I suggest in the future that you do more research before editorializing on a
subject about which you obviously do not have all the facts.
MARK WHITE, Attorney General of Texas, Austin, Tex., Nov. 6, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              23 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 23, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

Israeli's Trial Starts

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 6, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 79 words

DATELINE: TEL AVIV, Nov. 22


Aharon Abuhazira, an Israeli Cabinet minister accused of larceny, pleaded not
guilty today as his trial opened in District Court. Mr. Abuhazira, Minister of
Labor, Welfare and Immigration, announced that he would take a leave of absence
from his Cabinet post for the duration of the trial. Mr. Abuhazira is charged
with using $4,300 in public money for household expenses while he was Mayor of
Ramleh from 1975 to 1978.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              24 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 23, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

BACKLOG GROWS ON ALIEN FILES

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section B; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 536 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Nov. 22


Bureaucratic problems have left the Immigration and Naturalization Service
unable to keep track of 30 million forms filed by foreign visitors, and it may
be 1983 before it is known who entered or left the country in the last two
years.

Disclosure of the backlog was made in a study conducted for the agency and by
immigration officials in interviews.  The forms have not been processed so that
they can be fed into the agency's computer system. Meanwhile, the millions of
forms have simply been put on microfilm and left stacking up in cartons at
agency facilities here.

Only a year ago, immigration officials told Congress that the agency would
upgrade its computer system so it could monitor the flow of aliens into the
country, including 10 million visitors a year. The Reagan Administration has
also submitted proposals to Congress calling for stricter controls on illegal
immigration.

A Threat to Credibility

Robert Kane, the agency's Associate Commissioner for operations support, said
the backlog in processing visitor forms ''puts the whole credibility of the
system into question - it puts the credibility of the I.N.S. into question.''

He said that the computer that stores visitors' data was ''outmoded.'' Irvin
Klavan, the Associate Commissioner for information services, said the backlog of
I-94 forms, which are filed when visitors enter and leave, totaled more than 30
million on Sept. 30, at the last official count. He said it was now probably 32
million.

He also said 664,000 visitors' applications for extensions of their temporary
visas had not been put into the agency's computer because they could not be
matched to the original arrival forms.

Long Wait Is Foreseen

Immigration officials say it will be at least January 1983 before the files are
brought up to date.  Price Waterhouse & Company, a private consulting firm that
conducted a six-month, $100,000 study of the control system, termed the backlog
''very troublesome.''

Agency officials blamed a private contractor, Milmark Services Inc. of Crofton,
Md. They said Milmark failed to perform acceptably on a contract calling for it
to enter the data into the computer system.

The task is complicated because the visitors' forms are often written in foreign
languages.

Company Official Responds

Thomas Ruger, Milmark's treasurer, said in Wilmington, Del., that his company
was being unfairly portrayed as a ''goat'' and that the backlog was 10 million
forms before the company got the contract.

Mr. Ruger said the agency postponed the start of work under the contract six
times while Milmark's previous owners frantically built up and reduced their
staff in anticipation of the work. He said the company finally got only a week's
notice, and ''you just don't put 100 people together in a week.'' Mr. Ruger said
Milmark had been a successful Government contractor for 14 years and that the
immigration episode threatened its future.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of boxes of alien registration forms

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              25 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 22, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

FUND SET UP TO HELP HAITIANS

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 56, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 413 words


Several Haitian-American businessmen in New York City have established a fund to
provide emergency food, clothing, medical supplies and legal assistance to
Haitians, with an eye toward discouraging the influx of illegal refugees.

Henri LaMarque, chairman of the group, the American Haitian Humanitiarian
Foundation, said the organization was established by people ''who are not
political activists, but deeply, deeply concerned expatriates.''

''We must stop the exodus,'' he said. ''Our plan is to tell our people that
leaving by boat is not the answer.'' Haitians have been fleeing to the United
States from what they say is their Government's political and economic
repression. Many have been detained by the Immigration and Naturalization
Service as illegal aliens. According to the Coast Guard, as many as 1,000
illegal Haitian refugees a month tried to reach the United States in the last
year.

Seeking Church Aid

Part of the foundation's work, Mr. LaMarque said, will be to enlist churches in
Haiti as distribution centers, instead of relying on what the group feels is an
obstructionist bureaucracy there. In this way, Mr. LaMarque said, the funds
stand a better chance of actually reaching the people they are intended for.

The fund, with more than $200,000 in pledges, is seeking aid from international
companies based in New York that have affiliates in Haiti, companies that once
had operations in Haiti and the several thousand Haitians who now live in New
York City.

The foundation expects a 40-member delegation to make its first trip to Haiti
next month to set up the distribution network. They will work in cooperation
with volunteers already in Haiti.

''One of our goals is to educate the people there to what the situation really
is,'' Mr. LaMarque said. ''They sell their possessions, risk their lives only to
be sent back or jailed here in the United States. Leaving is not the answer. The
political crisis must be addressed.

''We are strictly a charity organization,'' he said. ''We don't espouse any
political point of view, even though personally we may have our own particular
beliefs.

''We do what we can to help even to the point of risking our lives. It is a
risky business, but we are talking about the deterioration of a nation and its
children.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              26 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 19, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

MIGRANT SLAVERY PERSISTS ON SOUTHEAST'S FARMS

BYLINE: By WENDELL RAWLS Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 2019 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, Nov. 17


The recent Federal indictment of four men on charges of enslaving eight migrant
farm workers in North Carolina has drawn attention to what appears to be a
broader problem of involuntary servitude in the fields of the Southeast.

The two brothers and two other members of a black clan of migrant labor
contractors were accused of enticing the workers with drink and marijuana and
then holding them against their will.

Lawyers for the four men deny the charges. But regardless of the outcome of the
case the Justice Department official who monitors such situations, as well as
advocates for farm workers, contend this type of incident is a serious and
continuing problem in the region.

Federal Efforts Stepped Up

The plight of the domestic laborers is gaining attention as the Immigration and
Naturalization Service and the Justice Department are stepping up efforts to
halt the smuggling into the United States of illegal aliens, who are also often
forced to work for little or no money. Like the aliens, the domestic workers are
trucked to fields by labor contractors and crew leaders who recruit, deliver and
supervise them.

Daniel F. Rinzel, chief of the civil rights division's criminal section, and
Richard Roberts, the Involuntary Servitude Coordinator, both said it was unclear
whether the incidence of enslavement and peonage was on the increase or whether
more active social and legal services were producing more complaints.

Steven Edelstein, a lawyer for Farmworkers Migrant Services, in Newton Grove,
N.C., said that involuntary servitude and peonage were an expanding phenomenon
in the Florida-to-New York migrant stream, affecting ''certainly hundreds,
perhaps in the low thousands'' of itinerant workers and involving at least 15
labor contractors and possibly as many as 25 who take workers into North
Carolina.

A Problem of Disbelief

''People don't like to believe that slave camps exist in North Carolina,'' Mr.
Edlestein said. ''They don't want to believe that they are operating 45 miles
from the state capital in Raleigh, but they do.''

Lamar Armstrong, a lawyer for the two brothers in the North Carolina case,
Dennis and Richard Warren, who work with their father, Willie Warren Sr., out of
Orlando, Fla., said his clients had been falsely accused. ''They do not kidnap
people or shanghai them, nor do they abuse them or cheat them or steal from
them,'' Mr. Armstrong said. ''And if the worker wants to walk away from the
camp, nobody stops him.''

Forty-six complaints of worker abuse have been investigated by the Justice
Department nationwide since Jan. 1, 1980, under the Farm Labor Contractors
Registration Act. Passed in 1964, the law requires that migrant crew leaders
meet certain standards to obtain approval from the Labor Department and receive
Federal registration cards authorizing them to provide labor to farmers and
others.

Complaints in Southern States

The Justice Department received nine complaints from North Carolina, six from
South Carolina, four from Florida and two from New York, Those complaints are in
addition to those received by the Department of Labor for such violations as
improper recruitment of workers and failure to pay them the minimum wage.

Under the Federal antislavery statutes, involuntary servitude occurs when a
worker is compelled, by whatever means, to keep a job he does not want. If the
worker is prevented from leaving a job because a debt to his employer had not
been repaid, the offense is peonage.

In the case of peonage, it does not matter whether the debt is real or
imaginary, whether it is large or small. Nor does it matter whether the peon
initially agreed voluntarily to work or whether he was paid for his work.

Historically, criminal convictions were rarely obtained by the Justice
Department for violations of involuntary servitude laws. Two years ago the civil
rights division found that the problems of kidnapping and enslavement of migrant
workers were severe enough to warrant the appointment of an Involuntary
Servitude Coordinator.

Convictions in 10 Cases

Still, as an example of the scarcity of convictions, even with added emphasis on
prosecution of peonage and enslavement violations, the department has won
convictions in 10 cases involving six separate incidents across the nation in
the past two years. In 1979, the year before the department appointed an
Involuntary Servitude Coordinator, there was only one conviction. And not all
cases involved migrants.

One incident involved two crew leaders who removed a migrant worker from another
crew leader's bus at gunpoint in South Carolina and forced him to return to work
for them because he was unable to pay off a debt. Another involved a minister of
the Church of God and True Holiness and three others in North Carolina who
forced nine teenagers to work against their will but kept their money.

Although some migrant workers' advocates, such as Sister Catherine Flynn, of
West Hartford, Conn., who works in health services along the East Coast migrant
stream, complain that the Justice Department is insufficiently concerned about
the crimes against the workers, Mr. Rinzel of the Justice Department said, ''We
will prosecute any cases which meet the standard of guilt beyond a reasonable
doubt.''

The cases are ''difficult to prove,'' he said, because of several factors. Often
the migrant worker witnesses ''disappear,'' they are sometimes ''not effective''
on the stand, their testimony is often ''contradictory and unreliable,'' and
corroboration of their assertions is ''sometimes lacking.''

Inquiries in Six States

The kidnapping, slavery and peonage cases along the migrant stream involve more
blacks and whites than Hispanic people, and more often than not involve black
crew leaders persecuting black farm workers in more than one place. For example,
the four men charged in North Carolina also are under investigation by state and
Federal officials in at least six Eastern states.

And when a crew leader is indicted or convicted, signs civil consent decrees and
pays fines, or loses his Federal crew leader card, his relatives may quickly
take over for him in the field while he directs the business operations at home,
officials say.

In North Carolina, the migrant season generally begins in April with the cabbage
crop, which is followed by cucumbers, peppers, tobacco, apples and sweet
potatoes. The season ends about the first week of November, usually after the
first frost.

According to those familiar with the procurement of workers, crew leaders begin
recruiting laborers in Florida after the citrus season ends, telling them there
is plenty of work available in the Carolinas.

Recruiting in Many Areas

But the recruiting is not limited to Florida, and the workers, according to
Federal court affidavits, are not always accurately told where they will be
working.

Mr. Armstrong, the Warrens' lawyer, said the recruiting forays typically involve
a swing through such major cities as Atlanta and New York, with the labor
contractor making certain to visit halfway houses and mission shelters, seeking
men who are down and out.

''They usually go to the homes for feeding the poor and offer the people jobs,''
Mr. Armstrong said in a telephone interview. ''They tell the workers where
they're going, how much they will be paid and what's involved.''

However, Mr. Edelstein and Justice Department prosecutors provide conflicting
reports of what victims tell them takes place in the usual recruiting operation.


Conversations and Wine

''The crew leaders drive up to a mission for derelicts and alcoholics,'' Mr.
Edelstein said, ''and they get out among the men, engaging them in conversation,
sharing some wine or cigarettes. They tell them about work that's available for
the minimum wage of $3.35 an hour at some vague place. Often the place is said
to be just out of town. Whe the worker gets in the truck, often already drunk,
he is offered a bottle of wine and he wakes up in a sweet potato patch in North
Carolina.''

James W. Sosebee, executive director of Atlanta's privately financed Union
Mission, said the labor contractors rarely entered the building but conducted
their business on public property.

Of the 300 residents at his mission, Mr. Sosebee said, about 80 percent are
alcoholics and 20 percent have a history of mental problems. The vast majority
of them also are either physically or mentally handicapped, he added.

Once at the labor camp, Mr. Edelstein said, the recruit is ordered into the
fields and is threatened with bodily harm if he resists or tries to run away.

Meals Deducted from Pay

While at the camp, Mr. Edelstein said, the worker is provided minimum-standard
shelter, usually in a bunk house of an abandoned, ranshackle farm house. He is
provided meals, the costs of which are deducted from his pay.

''For $35 a week, or more likely $45 or $50,'' he said, ''the worker gets eggs
and grits for breakfast; sometimes a lunchmeat or peanut butter sandwich and a
cold drink at midday, and a dinner of rice and turkey necks or ox tails and
greens. Coffee costs extra. Our study shows that such food would cost the crew
leader between $14 and $21 a week.

''The cheap wine is provided at $6 or more a bottle, cigarettes at a dollar a
pack, soap chips at a dollar apiece, shaving cream for $5 a can. At the end of a
week's work, the worker probably will owe the crew leader money or he may come
out with $5 or $10 cash.''

Violence in Many Camps

According to a 1981 report prepared by two lawyers for the North Carolina
chapter of the National Lawyers Guild, violence by crew leaders against farm
workers ''occurs at from one-third to almost all of the labor camps in the
survey area'' of eastern North Carolina.  Yet less than one-third of the cases
of violence are reported, the report said, because of the workers' fear of
retaliation.

''Crew leaders have associates who typically drive the trucks, which haul the
workers to the fields, and monitor their performance on the job and perform a
double function as guards and thugs,'' the report said. Because of an
''invisible yet effective threat,'' the report went on, ''workers, when asked
about their condition stare at their feet and say everything is all right.''

Farmers who have perishable crops in the fields and large loans at the banks
often are desperate for workers to harvest their produce, quickly and
inexpensively, at a specific time. The farmers also insist that they depend on
the labor contractors to provide dependable hands and to supervise the workers.

Cecil Williams, for whose Nash County, N.C., farm operation the Warren brothers
had supplied the workers who alleged slavery, said he never saw a worker
mistreated and that he had never had a Warren worker come to him with a
complaint.

Farmer Is 'The Man'

''I suppose not,'' was Mr. Edelstein's retort. ''The farmer is The Man. All of
them are scared to complain to The Man.'' Cecil Williams Jr., who helps his
father run Rainbow Farms, said the workers ''tear up'' the decent showers and
toilets, mattresses, furniture and hot-water heaters provided for a decent
living standard; a visual inspection of the migrant living quarters bore him
out.

According to Joan Papert Preiss, a member of the National Farm Workers Ministry,
''despite all that has been written and shown about the migrant workers, all the
TV documentaries, the books, the investigative reports, photographic essays and
hearings, and despite all the concern that has been expressed, very little has
changed for them over the years.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Richard and Dennis Warren (page A29)

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              27 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 19, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AMERASIAN BOY PLEADS FOR EASED IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section C; Page 9, Column 3; Home Desk

LENGTH: 360 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Nov. 18


A teen-age boy who lived on the streets of Korea for much of his childhood has
pleaded with Congress to help other children left by American servicemen in Asia
become American citizens.

''My life is really happy now,'' said John F. Keller, whose Korean name was Cho
Jae Huyn, ''but I am here today to tell my own story because I don't want my
brothers and sisters who I had to leave behind to be forgotten, and to live with
people always calling them names.''

The young man, who estimates his age to be about 15 years, told Tuesday of
living inside a wooden box, begging and working in a movie house for two small
helpings of noodles a day. He and other witnesses before the House Judiciary
Committee's subcommittee on immigration, refugees and international law said
prejudice in Southeast Asia against children left by American servicemen
condemns them to lives of destitution and misery.

The youth escaped because he eventually wound up in St. Vincent's Home for
Amerasians in Seoul, an orphanage run by the Rev. Alfred V.  Keane. He came to
the United States two and a half years ago and lives with adoptive parents in
Georgia.

''For the Amerasian, those forgotten American children of Asia, life is just
misery,'' Father Keane testified. ''The harassment never seems to end. Sometimes
they are beaten, stoned, kicked and reduced to a subhuman status in ways I could
never begin to describe.''

The priest and the boy testified in support of legislation introduced by
Representative Stewart B. McKinney, Republican of Connecticut, which would
provide preferential admission into the United States for children of American
armed forces personnel.

Under the bill, an alien born in Korea, Vietnam, Laos or Thailand after 1950 who
was fathered by an American citizen on active duty with United States armed
forces would be given preferential admission status by the Immigration and
Naturalization Service. The alien would have to show proof of financial
sponsorship in the United States to be eligible.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              28 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             November 18, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN TO CHOOSE CALIFORNIAN TO RUN IMMIGRATION SERVICE

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 496 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Nov. 17


President Reagan announced today that he intended to nominate Alan C. Nelson, a
lawyer from California, to be Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization.

Mr. Nelson is now serving as deputy commissioner, a position to which he was
appointed by Attorney General William French Smith.  President Reagan's first
nominee to head the Immigration and Naturalization Service, Norman Braman,
withdrew last Thursday, saying that he wanted to devote himself to his
automobile business in Florida. Senate aides were still investigating Mr.
Braman's background in preparation for a public hearing on his qualifications
for the job.

Before coming to Washington in September, Mr. Nelson, 48 years old, was a lawyer
with the Pacific Telephone and Telegraph Company in San Francisco. He is a
friend of Edwin Meese 3d, counselor to the President, having worked with Mr.
Meese in the office of the District Attorney for Alameda County, Calif.

Mr. Nelson served in Mr. Reagan's Cabinet when Mr. Reagan was Governor of
California. From 1972 to 1975, Mr. Nelson was director of the California
Department of Rehabilitation, and from 1969 to 1972 he was assistant director of
the state's Department of Human Resources Development.

Post Vacant for Two Years

The immigration service has not had a Presidential appointee as Commissioner
since Leonel J. Castillo resigned in September 1979.  David W. Crosland and then
Doris M. Meissner have served as acting commissioners. Justice Department
officials have suggested that Mrs.  Meissner might stay on as deputy
commissioner if Mr. Nelson is confirmed by the Senate.

Mr. Nelson has made a favorable impression on members of Congress on several
occasions when he appeared as a witness to discuss immigration policy. Members
of the Senate Judiciary Committee staff have said that he could probably be
confirmed without difficulty.

Nevertheless, they said, there may be some delay because it usually takes the
White House several weeks to submit the papers for a nomination, and the
Judiciary Committee must then hold a hearing on Mr. Nelson.

Union Head Welcomes Choice

Michael G. Harpold, president of the National Immigration and Naturalization
Service Council, a union representing 6,000 agency employees, had predicted that
Mr. Nelson would be chosen for the job.

''I like the fact that he's wired into the White House,'' Mr.  Harpold said,
alluding to Mr. Nelson's friendship with Mr. Meese.  ''He will significantly
elevate the status of I.N.S.''

The immigration service is one of the few agencies for which Mr.  Reagan has
proposed an increase in money and staffing. The agency, faced with large numbers
of legal migrants and illegal aliens, plans to use the additional resources to
add patrols on the border with Mexico and to speed up deportation proceedings.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              29 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 13, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION POST LOSES ITS NOMINEE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 836 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Nov. 12


Norman Braman, President Reagan's nominee for Commissioner of Immigration and
Naturalization, withdrew his name from consideration today, saying that he
wanted to devote himself to his automobile business in Florida.

In a letter to Attorney General William French Smith, who recommended him for
the position last June, Mr. Braman said he had reached ''the regrettable
conclusion'' to withdraw in view of ''the current depressed market'' affecting
the auto industry.

Mr. Braman, a millionaire, owns a Cadillac dealership in Miami. He has described
it as the largest or second largest retail distributor of such cars in the
United States.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service has not had a Presidential appointee
in the Commissioner's office for more than two years. Members of Congress and
Congressional auditors have repeatedly said that the agency lacked the firm,
professional management needed to cope with a steady influx of legal and illegal
aliens.

Earlier Desire for Post

In their exchange of letters, neither Mr. Smith nor Mr. Braman gave any reason
for Mr. Braman's withdrawal other than his concern about his business. In an
interview in mid-October, Mr. Braman expressed no reservations about taking a
Government job. He expressed confidence that he would be confirmed by the Senate
and enthusiastically described his plans for improving the agency.

Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky who is chairman of the
House Judiciary Subcommittee on Immigration, said today that Mr. Braman's
withdrawal was ''a real disappointment for me and a setback for the agency in
its efforts to modernize.'' He suggested that Mr. Braman's ''extensive business
dealings in the past needed so much verification that it just went beyond the
time available.''

Senate aides investigating Mr. Braman's background said that they had not turned
up any problems but that they had not completed their work. Immigration
officials said that Mr. Braman had probably become frustrated by the delays.

An assistant to Mr. Braman in Miami said that he had left this morning on a
business trip to Europe and could not be reached for comment.

Job Rights Vote Delay

Meanwhile, at the request of the White House, the Senate Committee on Labor and
Human Resources delayed a vote today on the nomination of William M. Bell to be
chairman of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. There were indications
that Mr. Bell, a black businessman from Detroit, might not have won approval.

Major organizations representing blacks, women and Hispanic Americans have
opposed Mr. Bell on the ground that he lacked the experience to head the
Government's chief agency for enforcing laws against job discrimination. White
House officials said that President Reagan was standing by the nomination and
wanted additional time to lobby for it.

Asked if there was any thought of withdrawing the nomination, Edwin Meese 3d,
counselor to the President, said, ''No, absolutely not.'' At the immigration
service, there have been several acting commissioners since Leonel J. Castillo
resigned in September 1979.  President Carter nominated Matt W. Garcia, a Texas
state legislator, to succeed Mr. Castillo, but the nomination was never
confirmed by the Senate.

Deputy Commissioner Mentioned

Informed speculation about a new nominee focused today on Alan C.  Nelson, the
deputy commissioner, who is a friend of Mr. Meese. Mr.  Nelson said in an
interview that he was a possible candidate. He noted that he had worked in the
office of the District Attorney for Alameda County, Calif., with Mr. Meese and
D. Lowell Jensen, who is now Assistant Attorney General in charge of the
criminal division of the Justice Department.

In the interview last month, Mr. Braman said that he was qualified to head the
immigration service because of his proven success as an entrepreneur.

Senator Paula Hawkins, Republican of Florida, had recommended him for the job.
But when she first mentioned it, he recalled, ''I almost laughed - I mean,
immigration and naturalization.'' When his brother and his lawyer tried to
dissuade him from taking the job, he said, ''That intrigued me all the more.''

President Reagan announced on Sept. 28 that he intended to nominate Mr. Braman.
Before that, Republicans and Democrats in Congress had chided the President for
not selecting an immigration commissioner or a coordinator for refugee affairs.

Mr. Reagan later said that he was nominating H. Eugene Douglas to coordinate the
refugee activities of the Departments of Justice, State and Health and Human
Services. Mr. Douglas, a former executive of the Memorex Corporation, is a
specialist in Asian affairs on the policy planning staff of the State
Department. The Senate Foreign Relations Committee has not yet held a hearing on
Mr. Douglas.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Norman Braman

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              30 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 12, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

ARGENTINES FLOCK ABROAD AS DREAMS OF RICHES DIE

BYLINE: By EDWARD SCHUMACHER, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 2, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1107 words

DATELINE: BUENOS AIRES, Nov. 11


It was the promised land in South America, and for more than a century
immigrants from Europe flowed here just as they did to the United States.

But because of economic turmoil and political uncertainty, Argentina is today
losing people, with emigration draining the country of skilled workers,
technicians and professionals.

American officials report that immigration inquiries have risen 50 percent in
recent months to more than 200 a week. Inquiries about Canada, a new mecca for
Argentines, have increased by five times in just a year to a similar level,
Canadian officials said. The Spanish, Italian, Australian and Brazilian
embassies report that immigration applications are up dramatically, too.

Many simply leave on tourist visas, hoping to find work and join - legally or
illegally - the more than two million Argentines already living abroad.

A Search for Security

Almost all those seeking to leave are of European stock, and the failed promise
for many is seen in a family like the Bossos. The father is a second-generation
Italian; the mother came from southern Italy 25 years ago to marry him.

Recently, the oldest son, 19-year old Jorge Oscar Bosso, a hair stylist in a
poular salon here, boarded a plane for Milan, Italy, hoping to find security for
his own family.

''I suffer as a young person,'' he said at a small going-away party in the
modest family home, ''because it is such a rich country going nowhere.''

Argentina's problems have been festering for 40 years. Only one elected
government has finished its term in that time and there have been more than 30
economic ministers and a continual flip-flop of policies.

Argentina Falls Behind

Argentina once surpassed Australia in income and development and until World War
II was roughly equal to Canada. Today, it is far behind both despite similar
resources and size.

The common refrain here, despite the stagnation, was ''there is food,''
especially the thick steaks, crunchy French bread and mixed salads that are a
staple in a country that is one of the world's leading exporters of meat and
grains.

The refrain has a caustic ring now. The balloon of an overheated economy burst
early this year. Inflation is running at more than 100 percent; the peso is
worth less than one-fourth what it was in dollars at the beginning of the year,
and unemployment has risen to between 600,000 and 1.5 million people, depending
on who is doing the figuring.

After almost six years of military rule, the Government of President Roberto
Eduardo Viola is shaky as rumors persist of plots within the military and
civilian politicians clamor ever more loudly for elections, raising the
likelihood of a confrontation.

Nation Called Neurotic

Argentines have emigrated before, but mostly during revolutions.  Emigration
experts here say the present exodus is different and the largest yet.

''Now they are emigrating for physical subsistence,'' said Alberto Bonis, a
sociologist. ''The country has become neurotic, frightened by reality and
fearing the ghost of unemployment.''

Colleen Cupples, the Canadian consul, said the people trying to leave
''represent the entire range of Argentine society, from the lowliest baker to
the person who owns his own business''.

They include people like Miguel Angel Barboza, a cabinetmaker who has been
trying to place ''work wanted'' advertisements in New York City newspapers so he
can take his wife and three sons there. After working all day here, he teaches
at a technical school two hours away at night, arriving home at 1 A.M.

''I have labored all my life and have not progressed,'' he said.

Technical Jobs Are Few

They also include people like Oscar Ricardo Pons, a 27-year-old unmarried
electrical engineer who last week obtained a Canadian residence visa. He works
in a management job here because there is a shortage of the sort of technical
jobs and advanced training he wants. ''All engineers want to build and
develop,'' he said.

Professionals are among the hardest hit. Ten percent of the registered doctors
are reportedly not practicing. Of 50,000 registered engineers, 10,000 are out of
the country and 8 percent of those remaining are unemployed, according to the
Center of Argentine Engineers.

The Committee to Stimulate Argentine University Graduates and Students Abroad, a
private body that works with the Government to attract its citizens back, says
almost half of the expatriates are trained technicians or university educated.

''Its a great hurt to the country,'' Moises Margulis, president of the
committee, said. ''We cannot offer the work to keep them here.'' Yet Argentina
has one-third the land mass of the United States and only a little more than
one-tenth the people. Forty percent of the population lives in metropolitan
Buenos Aires. The country's history is one of huge empty spaces going
undeveloped.

Where the Emigrants Go

Tierra del Fuego in the far south abounds with fish and offshore oil. Natural
gas underlies the vast semiarid plains of Patagonia.  The Andes mountains that
line the western border are filled with barely tapped minerals.

Where have the Argentines gone? According to the advisory committee, some
800,000, or more than one third of the those who have left. are in the United
States. Spain follows with 270,000 and Canada with 200,000.

The United States is particularly attractive to professionals, whose skills can
get them by tough United States immigration quotas.  Among the 10,000 Argentine
professionals who arrived at New York City airports from 1968 to 1978, according
to a study by the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service, were
almost 1,500 doctors, some 1,400 engineers, and 400 chemists, biologists,
geologists and physicists. The rest included professors, accountants, lawyers,
architects and the like.

Paris is a haven for many of the country's writers, painters, dancers and
musicians, many of whom have been very successful there.  Many of the elderly go
to Spain, where they enjoy a common language and through reciprocal agreements
can receive their government retirement benefits.

For Nina Bosso it was a sad time as she served wine and sandwiches to her son's
close friends four hours before he was to fly to Italy.  But she understood, she
said. ''He's young, and he has to go forward.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Jorge Oscar Bosso

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              31 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 12, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

ROCKIES ADJUSTING TO A YOUTH BOOM

BYLINE: By WILLIAM E. SCHMIDT, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1185 words

DATELINE: DENVER, Nov. 11


The Rocky Mountain region, holding the promise of a booming job market and
unspoiled recreation, is riding the greatest wave of youthful immigration in the
country.

Even as the rest of the nation focuses on the gradual aging of the population,
people in their 20's and 30's are settling in this area in numbers that have
forced public services and markets to adjust to their needs.

Many young adults come to Denver to live near the mountains and then look for
work.  ''I had a friend who offered a place to stay, so I just moved here from
Chicago,'' said Karen Jarard, who is 24 years old. She says she is working
temporarily as a receptionist at an apartment and condominium complex in
suburban Denver while she looks for something better. ''Not only are there jobs
here,'' she observed, ''but you've got everything from skiing to a great night
life.''

'A High Spending Sector'

''The quality of population growth we are seeing in the area has widespread
economic implications,'' said Tucker Hart Adams, who is chief economist at the
United Banks of Colorado. ''People in these age groups are generally in their
most productive years. They are a high-spending sector of the population that
exhibits a strong demand for a wide range of goods, from refrigerators to baby
cribs.''

In the Denver metropolitan area, young and single homebuyers entering the
condominium market accounted for nearly 44 percent of all residential real
estate sales in 1979, according to statistics gathered by the United States
League of Savings Associations. And in Wyoming, a rising birth rate has
increased the demand for hospital obstetrical services and forced the state to
expand elementary classroom facilities. In some counties, grade school
enrollments have increased more than 20 percent since 1975.

Median Age Is 27.9

Because of the aging of the post-World War II baby generation, the median age in
the country as a whole climbed from 28.1 to 30 over the last decade. But the
median age in the eight-state Rocky Mountain region, which accounts for barely 5
percent of the total United States population, grew from 26 to 27.9. In Wyoming,
the median age actually declined over the past decade, from 27.2 to 27.1.

Demographers, economists and public officials in the region expect that as long
as demand for fossil fuels remains high, most of the Rocky Mountain States will
continue to grow at a rate in excess of the national population, as they did in
the last decade. One study by the United States Bureau of Economic Analysis
estimates that Wyoming, Utah, Montana, Colorado and Idaho will grow twice as
fast as the rest of the country from 1978 to 1990.

Dr. Michael Greenwood, an economist at the University of Colorado in Boulder,
said that such growth would have a ''double-barreled'' impact on the region,
since most of those moving into the Rocky Mountain States are in the prime of
their child-bearing years.

Twofold Impact Foreseen

''They are going to create a baby boom of their own which will have a secondary
impact on public services, particularly education programs,'' Dr. Greenwood
said.

He suggests that while the expansion of resource-based industries is one
important factor in the region's growth, recent studies similarly suggest that
increasing numbers of people, particularly younger ones, will be drawn to the
region by what he calls ''environmental amenities,'' such as a pleasant climate
and opportunities for skiing, backpacking and outdoor recreation.

Such trends in the region mark a sharp reversal of growth patterns recorded as
recently as the 1960's, when states like Montana, Idaho, Wyoming and New Mexico
grew at rates well below the nation's and younger people left the region,
presumably in search of better job opportunities in more densely settled parts
of the country.

But in the 1970's growth rates in Arizona, New Mexico, Colorado, Wyoming, Utah,
Nevada, Idaho and Montana, which make up what the Census Bureau refers to as the
Mountain Region, far exceeded the 11.5 percent increase calculated for the
nation as a whole. With the exception of Montana, which grew by 13.3 percent,
all the other states recorded population increases of more than 27 percent in
the past decade. And the census data show that the largest component of that
increase was people 20 to 39 years old.

Study on Migration Trends

A study by the Harvard-Massachusetts Institute of Technology Joint Center for
Urban Studies concluded that migration into the region accounted for more than
three-quarters of this growth. In the 1960's, less than one-fifth of the area's
growth came from immigration.

In Wyoming, for example, there were 116 percent more people 20 to 29 years old
counted in the 1980 census than in the 1970 census.  Analysts say most of the
immigrants were unmarried men seeking jobs in Wyoming's booming energy
industries. Over all, the state grew 41.6 percent in the last decade, as against
a growth rate of less than 1 percent in all of the 1960's.

Similarly, in Colorado, the number of people 30 to 39 years old grew 76.4
percent in the last decade, or at more than twice the state's overall growth
rate of 30.9 percent.

As a result, social scientists conclude that the region is serving as a magnet
not only for people in their 20's, usually the most mobile segment of the
population, but is also attracting migrants in their 30's.

Dr. George Masnick, a co-author of the Harvard-M.I.T. report, ''Regional
Diversity: Growth in the U.S., 1960-1990,'' said that census data from most of
the Rocky Mountain area showed this statistical ''bulge'' of people in their
mid-30's, suggesting that those in this age group ''not only were attracted to
the region but tend to stay on.''

Nature of Attraction

Dr. Masnick speculated that this trend might reflect people in their 30's who
were looking for job changes or a place to put down roots, and regarded the
region's peculiar mix of ways of life and employment opportunities as especially
attractive.

This point was underscored by Marjorie Fay, who is vice president of staff
relations at the First National Bank of Denver. Mrs. Fay said the bank recently
ran a one-day advertisement in The Wall Street Journal, seeking to fill a senior
banking position in western Colorado.

''We received about 90 resumes,'' said Mrs. Fay, who described the response as
overwhelming. ''Typically, these people would say they were dying to live in
Colorado. They were very anxious to move to this part of the country.''

Similarly, Mrs. Fay says the bank's personnel offices are regularly beseiged by
young business college graduates from the East and Middle West who ''just show
up on our doorstep and beg for work because they want to live here.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: charts

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              32 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 8, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICO'S REFUGEES FEAR CLAMPDOWN

BYLINE: By ALAN RIDING, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 19, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 956 words

DATELINE: MEXICO CITY, Nov. 4


The arrest of five Argentine leftist exiles on kidnapping charges here last week
has awakened fears of a general clampdown against the thousands of Latin
American political refugees who have sought asylum in Mexico in recent years.

After the arrest of the five, all said to be members of the Argentine
Revolutionary Workers' Party, at least 20 more Argentine and Uruguayan refugees,
including several children, were detained for ''investigation'' by immigration
authorities.

Argentine political groups here have been quick to dissociate themselves from
the kidnapping incident, taking out newspaper advertisements to reiterate their
appreciation for Mexico's ''hospitality'' and their respect for Mexican laws.
But exile sources said there was a mood of alarm among foreign refugees, who are
estimated to number more than 30,000.

Mexican leftist parties and liberal newspapers have also warned of the dangers
of a witch hunt against leftist exiles. ''In these situations, those who are
blinded by xenophobia should be reminded that there are also Mexican migrants in
other countries,'' the daily Uno Mas Uno noted in a clear allusion to the
millions of Mexicans living illegally in the United States.

Investigation of Exiles Urged

But conservative groups, which have long opposed Mexico's open-door policy
toward political refugees, have used the kidnapping to support their argument
that the country has been flooded with terrorists.

''Why do they choose Mexico and not Cuba?'' the rightist newspaper El Heraldo
asked in an editorial last Sunday. ''These exiles should be investigated and it
will be proved that a high percentage of them should be in the Caribbean island
because there they practice Communism, which is, without doubt, what appeals to
the majority of the red Chileans, Salvadorans and Nicaraguans who are exiled
here.''

Gen. Arturo Durazo Moreno, Mexico City's police chief, said last week that the
authorities ''must be permanently on the alert to prevent the illegal entry of
foreigners with criminal and subversive records who could provoke terrorist acts
such as occur in other countries.''

The kidnapping incident, which took place Oct. 23, involved Beatriz Madero
Graza, a 25-year-old niece of Pablo Emilio Madero, the candidate of the
conservative National Action Party in the presidential election next July. She
was freed unharmed four days later when one of her captors was seized by the
police while collecting a $1.6 million ransom.

Four Held as Accomplices

Miss Madero subsequently recognized two of her kidnappers among those arrested.
Three other people were arrested as accomplices, including a Mexican and Roberto
Guevara de la Serna, president of the Revolutionary Workers' Party and brother
of the late Argentine-born Cuban revolutionary Che Guevara.

If the charges are upheld in court, this will be the first crime attributable to
leftist exiles since large numbers of Latin American political refugees began to
arrive here after the military coup against Chile's President, Salvador Allende
Gossens, in September 1973.

Mexico's President at the time, Luis Echeverria Alvarez, warmly welcomed
thousands of Chilean leftists here, many of whom were given Government jobs.
Within a year, many hundreds of Argentine and Uruguayan academics, journalists
and politicians who were also fleeing military repression were allowed into
Mexico and many of them found work in universities and in the press and
broadcasting.

By 1976, though, conservative hostility toward the Echeverria administration
spilled over into a rightist press campaign against the exiles, principally the
Chileans, who were variously charged with taking jobs from Mexicans and with
responsibility for the Government's left-leaning foreign policy.

Refugees Slip Across Border

Under President Jose Lopez Portillo, who is completing his fifth year in office,
thousands of political refugees have continued to arrive here, but most have
been poor peasants and workers escaping civil wars, first in Nicaragua and, more
recently, in El Salvador and Guatemala.

While most of the Nicaraguans were given refugee status after having sought
asylum in the Mexian Embassy in Managua, Salvadoran and Guatemalan exiles have
generally slipped across the border into Mexico illegally and have received no
formal assistance from the Mexican Govvernment.

Even before last week's kidnapping incident, leftist and human rights groups
here had expressed concern at signs of a toughening of Mexico's refugee policy.
The decision this summer to return to Guatemala several Indian communities,
totaling some 3,000 people, that had fled to Mexico prompted a protest from the
regional office of the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees.

In his widely read column in Uno Mas Uno, Miguel-Angel Granados warned last
weekend of ''the risk that this grave kidnapping incident result in a rebirth of
the xenophobic tendencies that appear among us from time to time, above all when
it involves people born outside Mexico who are here for political reasons.''

But the Minister of the Interior, Enrique Olivares Santana, whose office is in
charge of immigration questions, has insisted that there has been no change in
Mexico's traditional policy of asylum. ''As a country of laws and institutions,
Mexico merely demands that the hospitality and security it offers be
corresponded by those to whom it gives a refuge and a roof,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              33 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 5, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

VIRGIN ISLANDS RESOUNDINGLY REJECT FOURTH DRAFT OF A CONSTITUTION

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 785 words

DATELINE: CHARLOTTE AMALIE, V.I., Nov. 4


The United States Virgin Islands, purchased from Denmark in 1917, have been a
territory in search of a constitution since 1964. Yesterday, a fourth draft went
before the voters with the strong backing of the Governor, legislators and civic
groups - and was rejected by a ratio of nearly 3 to 2.

Even as the constitution's victorious opponents were praising the voters'
astuteness and proponents were bemoaning their apathy, Gov.  Juan Luis said he
would ask the Legislature to take immediate steps toward a fifth attempt.

Virgin Islanders of divergent views agree, however, that the question of whether
the islands should remain an unincorporated territory, governed by the Revised
Organic Act of 1954, or choose some other status is likely to move to the fore.

''The Virgin Islands needs to get a clear understanding with the Federal
Government as to our relations,'' said Senator Ruby M. Rouss, president of the
territory's unicameral Legislature, a powerful opponent of the defeated
constitution. ''Whether we can control customs and immigration matters - these
are the things we need straightened out first.''

The territory, which consists of a group of islands that lie 40 miles east of
Puerto Rico, is administered by the Department of the Interior. Without a
constitution, any changes in the way the territory is governed has to be
approved by Congress.

Virgin Islanders first approved a constitution in 1964, but it was not approved
by Congress. The islanders approved another constitution in 1972, but the margin
of approval was so small that it was not submitted to Congress. A third attempt
to get a constitution was rejected in 1979.

In yesterday's effort, a single-issue ballot, only 47 percent of the territory's
registered voters turned out; 7,157 voted against the proposed constitution and
4,821 voted for it. In retrospect, the Governor concluded that it had been a
''terrible mistake'' to put the constitution to the voters in a non-election
year.

''Constitutions aren't sexy,'' said Judge Henry Feuerzeig, who helped write the
proposed constitution and then campaigned hard for its passage. ''You can't
identify with them as you can with a candidate.''

Other proponents said they believed that many voters did not understand the
constitution. ''The people who didn't understand didn't vote no,'' said Senator
Ruby Simmonds, first vice president of the constitutional convention. ''They
just stayed home.''

The constitutional debate, however, was both lively and heated. At one point, a
radio talk show had to be curtailed and the police called in to break up a
fight.

'A Community of Minorities'

The debate reflected many of the anxieties of a place that has grown so rapidly
it has become what Rupert W. Ross Jr., president of the constitutional
convention, called ''a community of minorities,'' with native-born islanders
competing for influence with large numbers of newcomers.

''A unique culture and history are being overwhelmed by outsiders,'' said John
Collins, himself a transplanted mainlander and one of the three delegates to the
constitutional convention who refused to join 27 others in signing the final
document.

''There are Puerto Ricans, down-islanders and continentals living here, and it
has created a schizophrenic atmosphere,'' Mr. Collins continued. ''We only have
100,000 people, and they all want their interests catered to. The rights and
privileges of the natives should be preeminent.''

A provision in the first draft of the constitution said that the Governor of the
territory must be a native of the Virgin Islands.  This was removed, making many
native-born islanders unhappy.

However, another provision left in to please them ended up making the newcomers
unhappy. It defined a Virgin Islander as a person either born here or with at
least one parent who was born here. Even though a Virgin Islander would have no
special privileges, the mere inclusion of the definition was an emotional issue
for many.

Adelbert M. Bryan, a St. Croix police captain and outspoken opponent of the
constitution, said he felt it should have addressed questions of immigrations
and customs.

''A U. S. citizen dosn't have to clear customs coming here,'' he said. ''Drugs
and guns are coming in, and the easiest way to bring them in is through an
American port.

''We have a population explosion and no control of who comes and goes,'' he
added, pointing to schools that are on double sessions.  ''It's cheating my
children out of a proper education.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              34 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              November 4, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN'S MOVE TO CONTROL IMMIGRATION;
News Analysis

BYLINE: By STUART TAYLOR Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 21, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1068 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Nov. 3


The Reagan Administration's plans to control illegal immigration include several
little-noticed legislative proposals designed to restrict the power of the
Federal courts in immigration and asylum cases.

Administration officials, and some members of both parties in Congress, have
promoted such measures as part of a program to simplify and expedite an
elaborate system of administrative and judicial appeals in immigration cases
that has become plagued by long delays.

They also complain that some Federal judges have been too willing to
second-guess the expert judgment of immigration officers on such issues as
whether an alien qualifies for political asylum.

But the proposals have generated opposition from lawyers and groups who say they
do not trust the Administration or the Immigration and Naturalization Service to
be fair in evaluating applications for asylum from Haitians, Cubans, Salvadorans
and others.

The proposals seek in particular to strip the courts of most or all of their
jurisdiction to review the executive branch's treatment of ''undocumented''
aliens, those with no visas or other papers giving them a right to enter the
United States, who are caught on or near the nation's coasts or borders.

Little or No Access to Lawyers

These include Haitians and Cubans who arrive in Florida in small boats, Mexicans
and Salvadorans who seek to cross the Mexican border, and other aliens caught in
seaports or airports.

Under the proposals, such aliens would have no right to administrative review of
immigration officials' decisions to deny them political asylum and deport them,
and little or no access to lawyers and the courts.

Aliens who got past the borders and established residence in the United States
illegally, on the other hand, would continue to have access to administrative
and judicial review to protect them against possible prejudice, abuse or error
by immigration officials.

Conform to High Court Actions

The proposals for more summary treatment of aliens caught at the borders appear
to be tailored to fit within constitutional rulings of the Supreme Court. The
Court has long held that aliens in the United States are constitutionally
entitled to ''due process of law'' in deportation proceedings even if they
entered illegally, but that Congress has a free hand in setting procedures to
exclude those who seek to enter.

The proposed legislation would also limit judicial review of Administration
decisions to jail Cubans and Haitians while their applications for admission
were pending. It would also limit review, in an ''immigration emergency''
declared by the President, of decisions to jail undocumented aliens from
countries designated by the President.

These proposals, sent to Congress last month, follow a series of Federal court
rulings in which various judges have found treatment of Haitian and some Cuban
refugees by the Carter and Reagan Administrations to be unfair, inhumane and
illegal.

Attorney General William French Smith, in a letter to Congress last month,
complained that the present procedures allowed an illegal alien to remain in the
United States for long periods ''while his asylum request winds its way through
the labyrinth of administrative and judicial channels.''

Move for Mass Deportations Seen

However, critics, including the American Civil Liberties Union and lawyers who
represent aliens, say the Administration's apparent purpose is to clear the way
so that it can detain and deport Haitians and other unwanted aliens en masse,
without a fair hearing on claims for status as political refugees or other legal
bases for admission.

''What they want is uninhibited executive power,'' David Carliner, chairman of
an American Bar Association committee on immigration law, said today. ''It's in
line with Smith's approach the other day of trying to eliminate the role of the
courts in deciding very fundamental questions under the Constitution.''

He referred to a speech last week in which the Attorney General accused the
Federal courts of ''constitutionally dubious and unwise'' intrusions upon the
powers of the elected branches of Government, and vowed to urge the courts to
use greater restraint on a wide range of constitutional issues.

Steps Taken on Haitians

The Administration has already moved to cut off the access of Haitian refugees
to lawyers and judges in the United States by assigning the Coast Guard to
intercept their boats in international waters, and return them to Haiti as soon
as immigration officers have determined that they do not qualify for political
asylum.

Haitians and other ''undocumented'' aliens who have made it to the beaches and
borders of the United States would also, under the Administration's proposals,
be dealt with in brief, unrecorded oral interviews by immigration officials and
special ''asylum officers.''

''In most cases involving undocumented aliens, the examining officer would make
an immediate decision to exclude the alien,'' Mr.  Smith said in his letter to
Congress. ''The removal or return of the alien to his home country would be
accomplished as soon as possible.''

The proposed legislation states that, in cases involving undocumented aliens
caught near borders or beaches, ''the decision of the immigration officer shall
be final, and not subject to further agency review or to judicial review.''

Such aliens might still be constitutionally entitled to ask a Federal District
Court for a writ of habeas corpus, according to Justice Department officials.
But they said the proposed legislation would limit the courts' role to
determining whether immigation officials had complied with the procedures set by
Congress. Mr.  Carliner termed this ''an empty right to bring a lawsuit'' that
the alien would almost surely lose.

Among the court decisions involving Haitians and Cubans is one in July 1980 in
which Federal District Judge James Lawrence King of Miami found that the
Immigration Service had illegally engaged in ''a systematic program designed to
deport'' Haitians without regard to ''the merits of their asylum claims.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Analysis

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              35 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 3, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
Rabbi Kahane Arrested After Speech in Canada

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 5, Column 2; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 157 words

DATELINE: TORONTO, Nov. 2


Rabbi Meir Kahane, the founder and leader of the Jewish Defense League, was
released from custody today after his arrest for failing to obtain an entry
permit into Canada.

The 50-year-old militant was released on personal recognizance and ordered to
attend an immigration hearing in Toronto next Monday. He will be permitted to
leave the country before his hearing, an immigration official said.

He was arrested yesterday after delivering a speech to about 300 people at the
Shaarei Tefillah Synagogue and was held overnight at the Toronto West Detention
Center.

The rabbi, who was deported from Canada in 1971 for planning a demonstration
against a visit to Ottawa by Aleksei N. Kosygin, then the Soviet Prime Minister,
was arrested for not having obtained the entry permit required of people who
have been deported. He had spent the weekend in Montreal, also on a lecture
date.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              36 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 2, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AUSTRALIA, UNDER NEW POLICY, IS SEEKING SKILLED AMERICANS

BYLINE: By BARBARA CROSSETTE, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 479 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 30


Australia, under a new immigration policy due to go into effect next April, is
actively seeking more Americans with business and technical skills.

Advertisements had already begun to appear in the American press, drawing
attention to opportunities in Australia, before the announcement in Canberra of
the new national policy. The Australian Embassy in Washington has been sending
out newsletters to prospective immigrants for the last nine months, according to
Wayne R. Slater, the embassy's Counselor for Immigration.

Australia's new policy will limit immigration to people who have at least one of
three requirements: close family ties in Australia, a skill that will benefit
the country or the experience and assests to start a ''viable business
venture.''

Problem of Unemployment

Australia has faced increasing unemployment among the unskilled, Mr. Slater
said, and the new policy in part reflects public pressure to limit the entry of
people in unskilled categories.

According to Mr. Slater, the immigration policy is in line with the Government's
plans to increase population in the country, which has 15 million people in a
territory the size of the United States.  In the last Australian fiscal year,
ending June 30, 3,236 North Americans - from Canada and the United States
-immigrated to Australia, a 29 percent increase over the previous year.

In the same year, 25,000 Asians entered Australia, most of them Indochinese
refugees. According to Mr. Slater, one in every 305 Australians is ethnically
Indochinese. Australians say that the new plan will not alter the country's
policy of helping refugees, nor will it be racially discriminatory.

''The pattern of immigration has changed over the years,'' Mr.  Slater said.
''In the 50's they came from Northern Europe. Then the source began to move
toward Southern Europe, the Middle East and, more recently, Asia.''

More Britons Immigrating

''Now we see a return to European migration,'' Mr. Slater said.  Last year
31,600 Britons, faced with a declining economy, went to Australia, an increase
of 93 percent over the previous year.

Mr. Slater said that there were about 32,000 American-born Australians, many of
them successful in business and one of them a member of the state parliament in
Tasmania.

''Americans first ask themselves, 'Is there another place to live?' '' Mr.
Slater said. ''Then they see in us a free and open society, no poverty, an easy
living style. They look at Australia as a place where they will probably get
individual rewards for their contributions. Many of them come for environmental
or social reasons.

''There is more similarity between Australians and Americans, I think,'' Mr.
Slater said, ''than between any other two groups.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              37 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 1, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

DECIDING HOW TO STOP HAITIANS- AND WHY

BYLINE: By STUART TAYLOR Jr.

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1158 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


There was a wretched symmetry to it: While lifeless Haitian bodies washed up on
a Florida beach Monday morning, live Haitian bodies plucked from another
foundering boat by the United States Coast Guard were being hauled back to the
island they tried to flee.

The survivors of the tragedy in which 33 were drowned ended up in the Krome
North detention camp, where more than 1,000 other Haitian refugees have been
living behind barbed wire for months. Meanwhile, in Congressional hearings in
Washington and makeshift Florida courtrooms, Government officials and
immigration lawyers continued to dispute what the Haitians are running away
from, and what should be done with them.

The Haitians have been coming have been coming to the United States for more
than 10 years, risking their lives in leaky boats like the two that swamped last
week. Many give their fortunes to body smugglers who sometimes starve them, beat
them, or kill them after getting their money.

Tens of thousands have made it across 600 miles of open sea to Florida.
Immigration officials catch about 1,000 Haitians a month on Florida's beaches,
and they estimate that an equal number slip through their grasp. Nobody knows
how many more have found a watery grave on their way.

The Reagan Administration has vowed to stop the Haitians from coming, and to
deport those who have come this year and those who come in the future. The
Administration says it will make exceptions for those who may qualify for
political asylum. It seems more likely to achieve the second of these goals than
the first, notwithstanding its new policy of ''interdicting'' refugee vessels at
sea.
Limits of Generosity

''Haiti is a crummy place,'' a Justice Department official said last week. But,
he added, the United States can no longer afford to provide refuge for the
millions who flee the crummy places of the world every year.

The National Association for the Advancement of Colored People, the American
Civil Liberties Union, the National Council of Churches, the Congressional Black
Caucus and most other critics of Administration policies toward Haitians agree
with that assessment.  There the agreement ends.

Haiti has the Western Hemisphere's most grinding poverty, and, in the opinion of
many, its most corrupt and oppressive dictatorship.  The coincidence of these
two distinctions on one blighted half of an island gives rise to a legal
argument.

The Reagan Administration, like the Carter Administration before it, contends
that almost all the Haitians who risk everything to get to Florida are simply
poor people fleeing poverty, not political refugees. Officials point to an
estimate by the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees that only a
''small percentage'' of the illegally entering Haitians were political refugees
entitled to asylum under United States and international law.

Others disagree. They accuse the Government of a racially and politically biased
policy of dealing more harshly with Haitian refugees, who are black, than
refugees from any other country.  Critics say the Administration tries to send
back the Haitians en masse despite evidence that some returnees, in the words of
Federal District Judge James L. King of Miami, ''have been beaten, tortured and
left to die in Haitian prisons.''

Judge King tried a class-action suit brought on behalf of more than 4,000
Haitians seeking political asylum. In his opinion on the case, written last
year, he said the manner in which the Immigration and Naturalization Service
sought ''to ship all Haitians back to Haiti violated the Constitution, the
immigration statutes, international agreements, I.N.S. regulations and I.N.S.
operating procedures.''

''It must stop,'' he concluded.  Since then, the Reagan Administration has
instituted its policies of locking up Haitians who make it to Florida and
intercepting others at sea, where the immigration service can decide whether
they qualify for political asylum without being second-guessed by lawyers or
judges. According to the Administration, last week's interception by the Coast
Guard Cutter Chase of an unseaworthy 30-foot boat in the Windward Passage
between Haiti and Cuba saved 57 lives and demonstrated the effectiveness of the
interdiction policy.

Although the Haitians were promptly returned to Port-au-Prince, Alan C. Nelson,
Deputy Commissioner of the Immigration Service, assured the House Immigration
subcommittee that two ''well-trained'' and experienced immigration officers had
been and would be ''constantly watchful'' for any evidence that individual boat
people might qualify for an asylum hearing in the United States.

Haitian Officer Aboard

The interdiction regulations do not require officers to tell the Haitians, many
of whom are illiterate, what political asylum is, or ask them whether they seek
it. Officials said the immigration officers last week questioned each Haitian
picked up by the Chase for a few minutes, through translators, as to who they
were and whether there was any reason they could not go back to Haiti, before
deciding that none were political refugees. A Haitian naval officer was aboard
the Chase, in accordance with an executive agreement between his country and the
United States. Under the agreement, sailing vessels under the Haitian flag may
be boarded and searched for immigrants.  Mr. Nelson said the Haitian officer was
not present during last week's questioning, and that upon their return the
Haitians were received courteously and turned over to the International Red
Cross.

The N.A.A.C.P. characterizes the interdiction policy as a ''barbaric assault on
human freedom'' and a probable violation of United States obligations under a
United Nations agreement on asylum for political refugees.

Other critics, including the Civil Liberties Union and several immigration
lawyers, called quickie asylum proceedings on the high seas a mockery of
fairness and due process, guaranteed to return the Haitians to an uncertain fate
regardless of their reasons for fleeing.

In Florida, meanwhile, the process of separating political refugees from
economic refugees among the Haitians is swamped under a deluge of applications
for asylum and a morass of overlapping court proceedings.

Administration officials say the problems are caused by a few lawyers who take
more cases than they can handle and clog the works with delaying tactics.

Their solution: Congress should enact a law that strips aliens who arrive
illegally in the United States of any right to administrative review of
decisions, and to severely limiting judicial review.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of officials recovering bodies of dead Haitians
table of conditions in Haiti table of status of Haitians in U.S.

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              38 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               November 1, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Nonfiction in Brief

BYLINE: By Martha Bayles

SECTION: Section 7; Page 13, Column 1; Book Review Desk

LENGTH: 1360 words


TODAY'S IMMIGRANTS, THEIR STORIES A New Look at the Newest Americans.  By Thomas
Kessner and Betty Boyd Caroli.  317 pp. New York: Oxford University Press.
$16.95.

Newcomers to America from Europe are now outnumbered by those from other
continents, as the lifting of national-origin quotas has widened the stream of
immigration. And modern communication and transportation have enabled it to flow
around as well as through the legal gates. This book succeeds not only in
measuring the stream but in conveying its human texture.

Faced with the stories of hundreds of individual immigrants, the reader will
find it hard not to sympathize with their struggles, even to admire their
circumvention of the law as the latest manifestation of the enterprising spirit
of immigrants to America.  But the reader will also find it hard not to think,
for each story raises important moral, legal and sociological questions. Yet the
stories do not deal well with the ensuing tension between sympathy and thought.
They're not meant as prototypes, clearly explicating group characteristics. Nor
are they meant as case studies, deeply probing the complexities of individual
responses to life in America. They are too brief and too frequently interrupted
for the sake of discussion that is itself brief, and interrupted in turn for new
and different stories. The authors also engage in extreme and sometimes bizarre
compression: the reduction of entire cultural histories to what would fit on a
T-shirt or occupy conversation between two subway stops.

The authors are both historians living in New York, and their book is focused
exclusively on New York. They do not reach any conclusions, and in the absence
of any definite statement on the part of the authors, the book leaves the
impression that all roads lead to Manhattan, there to be reconciled. Such is the
result of using no method beyond ''oral testimony'' - which is really ''human
interest,'' the journalistic device of adding color to black-andwhite fact.
Perfectly acceptable in small doses, it can be frustrating in a book.

LADIES OF THE LEISURE CLASS The Bourgeoises of Northern France in the 19th
Century.  By Bonnie G. Smith.  Illustrated. 303 pp. New Jersey: Princeton
University Press.  Cloth, $22.50. Paper, $9.95.

In the early 19th century, the bourgeois women of northern France took an
active, sometimes dominant part in their home-based family businesses. With
industrialization, however, home and business became separate, and a new
generation of women adopted the purely domestic role considered traditional
today.  Bonnie Smith contends that although social historians disagree on the
significance of this role, they agree that it was the product of forces beyond
the control of the women themselves. The purpose of her book is to refute such
determinism, in particular the feminist view of domesticity as simple
oppression: the exploitation of women by men under capitalism.

Using archival sources, especially the debates over the secularization of
educational and charitable institutions, Miss Smith portrays the struggle to
modernize French society as having occurred largely between men who believed in
reason, Republic and the individual, and women who believed in religion,
monarchy and the family. She further introduces anecdotes, letters and
photographs, obtained through personal contact with several families of the
Nord, to reinforce her argument that for many of these women domesticity was not
a fate but a cause - the basis of a principled and politically organized
opposition to the dismantling of the ancien regime.

Yet having successfully refuted one feminist idea, Miss Smith allows her work to
be distorted by another: the notion of an autonomous ''women's culture,''
radically distinct from its socialhistorical context. She tries to find a unique
and systematic ''female symbolism'' in such varied phenomena as truffles and
bustles, the worship of Mary, and sentimental novels, and embroiders her text
with terms from anthropology, linguistics and psychoanalysis. This part of the
discussion is ingenious, but unless the reader is already persuaded that
19th-century women were a premodern people encapsulated in male civilization, it
may seem like so much frippery added to sensible cloth.

CHRISTINA ROSSETTI A Divided Life.  By Georgina Battiscombe.  Illustrated. 233
pp. New York: Holt, Rinehart & Winston. $16.95.

Readers attracted by this title are likely to be somewhat disappointed, because
although it suggests deep divisions in the life of the great English poet
Christina Rossetti, the book does not plumb them. Recoiling from an earlier,
more speculative biography by L.M.  Packer, Mrs. Battiscombe makes a point of
fastidiously observing the limits of the existing evidence - notably with regard
to Mrs.  Packer's hypothesis that in order to have written certain of her early
poems, Rossetti must have been in love with the painter William Bell Scott.

Quite rightly, Mrs. Battiscombe objects to ''this method of deducing fact from
poetical references.'' And in the same spirit, she rejects critical
interpretations by Mrs. Packer and others that would reduce the religious
meaning of many poems to a mere function of sexual frustration. She does
Rossetti the honor of taking her work at its lucid, extraordinary word.

Yet the story of the Rossettis does give rise to speculation, especially in the
area that seems at first to be Mrs. Battiscombe's main concern: the divisions
felt by Christina as the child of an Italian family living in England. It would
seem of psychological importance that the daughter of a highly demonstrative
father would grow up to encounter courtship in the distant Victorian style, and
even more of artistic importance that a poet of Rossetti's stature would inherit
two linguistic and literary traditions.

These issues are suggested by the title, and exquisitely raised in Chapter 1,
but beyond a superficial discussion of ''Italian blood'' and ''cultural
streams,'' they're not addressed. The focus of the book keeps shifting back to
the matter of Mrs. Packer's hypothesis.  It is too bad that the effort to
discredit someone else's speculation leads Mrs. Battiscombe to neglect the more
interesting possibilities of her own approach.

TERRAINS OF THE HEART AND OTHER ESSAYS ON HOME By Willie Morris.  265 pp.
Oxford, Miss.: The Yoknapatawpha Press. $12.95.

A native of Mississippi, Willie Morris has made a distinguished career of
conjuring and defending its spirit to the rest of the country. This book
includes some of his writings on the subject, as well as other essays meant to
conjure the spirit of other homes - for he has spent much of his life outside
Mississippi. The non-Mississippi essays have some strength, particularly when a
person or place comes into sustained focus. But they are limited by Mr.
Morris's reluctance to look beyond the obvious fact that Texas, New York and
Washington, D.C., are not Mississippi. And when he does, he tends to see only
the commonplace: the impersonality of commuter trains, loose morals on Capitol
Hill, black crime as a legacy of racism, and suburban Long Island's aversion to
New Jersey license plates.

Elsewhere, Mr. Morris has articulated his hope that Mississippi will achieve
racial justice before the North, because it possesses both a cultural heritage
shared by blacks and whites and a tradition of moderation that has survived
extreme conflicts. Elsewhere, he has rejected the ''homogeneity'' of the new
South as a threat to the mythic land he loves in memory and literature.
Elsewhere, he has described the down-to-earth accommodations of schoolchildren
in the desegregated schools of his hometown, Yazoo.

But these central concerns do not appear in the present volume.  Perhaps because
it is organized around the theme of ''home,'' the book describes his comings and
goings - meetings with friends, football games -in a self-absorbed manner far
less complex and passionate than the vision of his home state conveyed by his
earlier works. A bit too long on rhetoric and short on perception, it draws an
imperfect map of this heart's true terrain.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: review

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              39 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 30, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

EXCERPTS FROM ATTORNEY GENERAL'S REMARKS ON PLANS OF JUSTICE DEPARTMENT

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1810 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 29


Following are excerpts from the remarks of Attorney General William French Smith
to the Federal Legal Council in Reston, Va., today:

Simply put, consistent with the Constitution and the laws of the United States,
the Department of Justice intends to play an active role in effecting the
principles upon which Ronald Reagan campaigned.

Already, there have been many significant changes. We have proposed a
comprehensive crime package of more than 150 administrative and legislative
initiatives that would help to redress the imbalance between the forces of law
and the forces of lawlessness. We have proposed a new approach to immigration
and refugee policy designed to reassert control over our own borders.

We have brought the Government's antitrust policies back to the real economic
world by focusing upon truly anticompetitive activities rather than outmoded and
exotic theories. We have firmly enforced the law that forbids Federal employees
from striking. We have opposed the distortion of the meaning of equal protection
by courts that mandate counterproductive busing and quotas. We have helped to
select appointees to the Federal bench who understand the meaning of judicial
restraint.

As significant as all these changes are, however, they represent only a
beginning. Today, I will discuss the next stage in this process. We intend, in a
comprehensive way, to identify those principles that we will urge upon the
Federal courts. And we intend to identify the cases in which to make our
arguments - all the way to the Supreme Court. We believe that the groundswell of
conservatism evidenced by the 1980 election makes this an especially appropriate
time to urge upon the courts more principled bases that would diminish judicial
activism.

Policy Making by High Court

It is clear that between Allgeyer v. Louisiana in 1897 and Nebbia v. New York in
1934 the Supreme Court engaged in, and fostered, judicial policy-making under
the guise of substantive due process.  During this period, the Court weighted
the balance in favor of individual interests against the decisions of state and
Federal legislatures. Using the due process clauses, unelected judges
substituted their own policy preferences for the determinations of the public's
elected representatives.

In recent decades, at the behest of private litigants and even the executive
branch itself, Federal courts have engaged in a similar kind of judicial
policy-making. In the future, the Justice Department will focus upon the
doctrines that have led to the courts' activism.  We will attempt to reverse
this unhealthy flow of power from state and Federal legislatures to Federal
courts, and the concomitant flow of power from state and local governments to
the Federal level.

Three areas of judicial policy-making are of particular concern.  First, the
erosion of restraint in considerations of justiciability.  Second, some of the
standards by which state and Federal statutes have been declared
unconstitutional - and, in particular, some of the analysis of so-called
''fundamental rights'' and ''suspect classifications.'' And third, the
extravagant use of mandatory injunctions and remedial decrees.

Article III of the Constitution limits the jurisdiction of the Federal courts to
the consideration of cases or controversies properly brought before them.
Nevertheless, in recent years, a weakening of the courts' resolve to abide by
the case or controversy requirement has allowed them greater power of review
over Government action. Often, the Federal Government itself has in the past
moved courts to show less deference to the boundaries of justiciability - in
particular, in environmental litigation.

Deferring to Elected Branches

The Justice Department will henceforth show a more responsible concern for such
questions. We will assert the doctrine in those situations that involve any of
its four elements - standing, ripeness, mootness, and presence of a political
question. Vindicating the principle of justiciability would help return the
courts to a more principled deference to the actions of the elected branches.

Just as courts have sometimes overstepped the proper bounds of justiciability,
their analyses of equal protection issues have often trespassed upon
responsibilities our constitutional system entrusted to legislatures. Through
their determination of so-called ''fundamental rights'' and ''suspect
classifications,'' courts have sometimes succeeded in weighting the balance
against proper legislative action.

In the 1942 case of Skinner v. Oklahoma, the Supreme Court first emphasized the
concept of fundamental rights that invites courts to undertake a stricter
scrutiny of the inherently legislative task of line-drawing. In the nearly 40
years since then, the number of rights labeled ''fundamental'' by the courts has
multiplied. They now include the First Amendment rights and the right to vote in
most elections -rights mentioned in the Constitution.

In addition, however, they include rights that, though deemed fundamental, were
held to be only implied by the Constitution. The latter group, which has become
a real base for expanding Federal court activity, includes the right to marry,
the right to procreate, the right of interstate travel, and the right of sexual
privacy that, among other things, may have spawned a right, with certain
limitations, to have an abortion.

We do not disagree with the results in all of these cases. We do, however,
believe that the application of these principles has led to some
constitutionally dubious and unwise intrusions upon the legislative domain. The
very arbitrariness with which some rights have been discerned and preferred,
while others have not, reveals a process of subjective judicial policy-making as
opposed to reasoned legal interpretation.

A Shift on Strict Scrutiny

At the very least, this multiplication of implied constitutional rights, and the
unbounded strict scrutiny they produce, has gone far enough. We will resist
expansion. And, in some cases, we will seek to modify the use of these
categories as a touchstone that almost inevitably results in the invalidation of
legislative determinations. We will seek to modify especially the application of
a strict scrutiny to issues whose very nature requires the resources of a
legislature to resolve.

The extent to which the Federal courts have inappropriately entered legislative
terrain can be seen most clearly, and felt, in their use of mandatory
injunctions and attempts to fashion for perceived violations.

Throughout history, the equitable powers of courts have normally reached only
those situations a court can effectively remedy.  Implicit within that
historical limitation is the recognition that some kinds of remedial efforts
require resources and expertise beyond those of a Federal court, even one aided
by special masters.

Nevertheless, Federal courts have attempted to restructure entire school systems
in desegregation cases and to maintain continuing review over basic
administrative decisions. They have asserted similar control over entire prison
systems and public housing projects. They have restructured the employment
criteria to be used by American business and government, even to the extent of
mandating numerical results based upon race or gender. No area seems immune from
judicial administration. At least one Federal judge had even attempted to
administer a local sewer system.

Budget Limitations Seen Ignored

In the area of equitable remedies, it seems clear that Federal courts have gone
far beyond their abilities. In so doing, they have forced major reallocations of
governmental resources, often with no concern for budgetary limits and the
dislocations that inevitably result from the limited judicial perspective.

In many of these cases, the department will also seek to insure better responses
to the problems at issue by the more appropriate levels and branches of
government. We have already begun that process in the case of busing and quotas,
both of which have largely failed as judicial remedies.

The Constitution directs the President to insure the faithful execution of the
laws, which forms the basis of the Attorney General's litigating authority for
the Government as a whole. That constitutional command also requires the
executive branch to defend measures duly enacted by the Congress, even those
with which the Administration does not agree.

Statutes with which we disagree are nevertheless the law of the land. As such,
they must be defended against attack in the courts.  They must also be fully
enforced by the executive branch when their validity and meaning are clear. Some
have suggested that this Administration intends to do less. Others have
suggested that this Administraton should do less.

Following the Constitution

In fact, the Department of Justice intends to do exactly what the Constitution
requires - to enforce the laws duly and constitutionally enacted by the
Congress. If we were to do less, we would ourselves be guilty of the same kind
of transgressions that I have pledged we would combat on the part of the
judiciary.

Under the Constitution, the executive cannot unilaterally alter the clear
enactments of Congress any more than the courts can. When it disagrees with a
law, the executive branch can urge and support changes by the Congress.

In the case of laws that are clearly and indefensibly unconstitutional, the
executive can refuse to enforce them and urge invalidation by the courts. When
reasonable defenses are available, we will defend a statute that does not
intrude upon the powers of the executive branch. That is our responsibility
under the Constitution irrespective of our views on substantive policy.

In the case of ambiguous laws, the executive can in good faith urge and pursue
those interpretations that seem most consistent with the intentions of the
Congress, the policies of the Administration and the other laws of the land. The
executive can do all of these things, but it can constitutionally do no more.

No one should doubt that this Administration's adherence to the constitutional
principle of separation of powers will exact from us the same degree of
obedience and moderation that we will urge upon the courts.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of William French Smith

TYPE: text

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              40 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 29, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

INTERDICTION POLICY DEFENDED

BYLINE: Special to The New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 208 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 28


An officials of the Reagan Administration today defended its policy of
intercepting would-be Haitian immigrants at sea and returning them to Haiti
without any administrative or judicial review.

"Interdiction at sea is an appropriate and necessary means" of keeping illegal
aliens out of the United States, Alan C. Nelson, Deputy Commissioner of the
Immigration and Naturalization Service, told the House immigration subcommittee.

He said that multiple layers of review of decisions to deny Haitians asylum as
political refugees had "bogged the whole thing down" and prevented or delayed
expulsion of thousands of Haitians who have landed illegally in Florida.

But John Shattuck, head of the American Civil Liberties Union's Washington
office, testified that "many bona fide refugees are unlikely to be returned to
Haiti for persecution, imprisonment without charge and even death" under the
policy, which was also strong criticism from immigration lawyers who testified.

The Administration has had a Coast Guard cutter on patrol in international
waters near Haiti since Oct. 9 under an agreement with Haiti.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              41 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 27, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

33 HAITIANS DROWN AS BOAT CAPSIZES OFF FLORIDA

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 689 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Oct. 26


Thirty-three Haitians drowned this morning in choppy waters just north of here
after their jerry-built 30-foot boat capsized less than a mile from shore.
Thirty-four others from the overloaded vessel swam to shore and were taken, many
of them in tears, to a Federal detention facility for illegal aliens.

Immigration authorities said it was the worst such accident recorded since waves
of immigrants from the impoverished Caribbean country began heading for the
United States 10 years ago. Gov. Bob Graham of Florida called it ''a human
tragedy which has been waiting to happen,'' and said he would press the Federal
Government to work with Haiti to stop the flight to these shores.

Two months ago the Reagan Administration ordered the Coast Guard to interdict
Haitian boats loaded with illegal aliens on the high seas and return them to
Port-au-Prince, the Haitian capital. The first interdiction came last night, 123
miles northwest of Port-au-Prince, when the cutter Chase intercepted a leaky
30-foot boat filled with 57 passengers.

2d Boat Sinks After Transfer

That boat, too, sank in rough seas shortly after the Haitians were transferred
to the Chase. It was the first seizure of Haitians the Coast Guard had made
since it began patrolling the Windward Passage off Haiti's northwest coast on
Oct. 11.

In Miami, a Coast Guard spokesman said of the drownings, ''It's just such a
tragedy,'' adding, ''It's what we were hoping to avoid'' by intercepting
vessels.

The boat apparently struck a reef and split apart in a four-foot chop before
dawn today. As the lights began to go off from the expensive condominiums along
Highway A1A in Hillsboro Beach, a Broward County village 10 miles north of Fort
Lauderdale, the bodies began to wash ashore.

19 Men and 14 Women

By midday, rescue workers had recovered the bodies of 19 men and 14 women, one
of whom was pregnant. The surf had ripped the clothes off many of them.

(Autopsies indicated that the victims had been loaded into their small boat from
a mother ship about an hour before they died because they had eaten a variety of
refrigerated, ship-type meals, according to an Associate Press telephone
interview with Dr. Ronald K. Wright, the Broward County medical examiner.

(The Authorities have in the past expressed suspicion that some wooden sailboats
filled with refugees were dropped off by freighters not far from land. Police
Chief Ralph Dunn noted that refugee boats were usually waterproofed on the
inside with pitch, but said that this boat frame ws coated only with mud,
possibly indicating that it was not intended for a long journey.)

Sgt. Daniel Hynes of the Hillsboro police said that survivors had said that the
boat's captain, identified as Charles Joseph, and three mates had made it to
shore and fled.

Leonard E. Rowland, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service,
said the survivors had told the authorities that they left Haiti Aug. 26 and
spent a month ''bouncing around'' the Bahamas. Their last landfall was an
unidentified Bahama island on Oct. 18, according to Mr. Rowland.

Residents concerned about crime and low-paid workers fearful that job-hungry
immigrants could be a threat have been stridently vocal about stopping the tide,
but this morning the word from most quarters was sympathy.

''It is a human tragedy,'' Governor Graham emphasized, adding at one point that
''probably this has already happened and went undetected.''

The bodies were taken to the Broward County morgue. A spokesman for the Medical
Examiner's Office there said that autopsies would be performed and that attempts
would be made to identify them. ''Then,'' said the spokesman, ''the bodies will
have to be disposed of in some respectable and tasteful fashion.

56 Haitians Returned Home

PORT-AU-PRINCE, Haiti, Oct. 26 (AP) - Fifty-six Haitians were returned here
today aboard the Coast Guard cutter Chase, which picked them up 75 miles
northwest of Cuba a few minutes before their boat capsized, the Coast Guard
said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Coast Guard helicopter flying over bodies (page
A26) photo of Haitians who swam to shore (page A26) map of Florida (page A26)
photo of officer examining the 30-foot boat photo of officers recovering body of
one of the victims

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              42 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 26, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

Mr. Reagan's Immigration Music

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 571 words


Give the Reagan Administration, and especially Attorney General Smith, credit:
they have now devised and sent to Congress a detailed program for modernizing
the creaky immigration laws. It took a long time; we disagree with some parts;
and there are even parts we detest. But it is a careful and coherent program -
one which, however modified, can finally put the country back in charge of its
own borders. That is more than any President has offered since Lyndon Johnson,
and even if it does no more than focus national debate, the Reagan package can
provide the basis for new laws that can and should be enforced.

But there's a catch. Who will enforce them?  To know the Immigration and
Naturalization Service is to know the truth of Senator Alan Simpson's sad
verdict: ''It's in tatters.'' There's little point to drafting new laws if there
aren't enough personnel to enforce the old ones. It doesn't do much good to
fine-tune immigration policy if the violin at hand has three broken strings.

The Administration's 10-part immigration package responds to two pressing
problems: refugees from Haiti in the Southeast and jobseekers from Mexico in the
Southwest. The idea concerning the Haitians is to deter those who are not
genuine political refugees, with tougher enforcement to bar the borders and
blunter legal treatment for those who manage to get in anyway. The idea
concerning the Mexicans is at least to begin getting more serious about
controlling illegal entrants.

On the whole, the proposals for the Southeast seem excessively harsh while those
for the Southwest do not seem harsh enough, but the specific measures proposed
warrant detailed appraisal in future editorials. What is most striking at the
moment about the package just sent to Congress is that it contains more new work
than new help for the starved Immigration Service.

The service's plight has been documented by Representative Roman Mazzoli, the
House Immigration subcommittee chairman. A big Border Patrol station in
California has two helicopters able to operate at night. They are flown only 10
to 15 hours a week; there's no fuel for more. When the Defense Department
offered six more helicopters, the answer was, thanks but no thanks: we can't
afford to pay any more pilots.

A generation into the computer era, the service is still in the era of Bob
Cratchit, handling, and often mishandling, millions of pieces of paper.
Nationwide, airport inspections in the last several years have gone up 40
percent - and the number of inspectors has gone up 17 percent. It has been two
years-plus since the service has even had more than an acting director.

The Reagan Administration's initial response to the Immigration Service's needs
was astonishingly brutal: cut another 1,400 people.  Common sense has since
taken over and the agency has, almost uniquely, been allowed to ask Congress for
a budget increase, of 30 percent.

But even with that raise, it is utopian to pile on new burdens until more
personnel are in place, until records are computerized and until the service is
managed. It is welcome news that someone has finally written new music for the
immigration orchestra; but first there must be instruments.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              43 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 25, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

INDEX

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 2, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 512 words


INTERNATIONAL Award for Timerman protested by previous Argentine winners 4
Argentine emigration now exceeds immigration 5 Around the World 6 Saudis could
prevent the U.S. from monitoring Awacs planes 8 Sadat-Nimeiry parallels are
drawn 9 Egypt reports arresting 350 for plotting assassination and coup 10 South
African rightist vows to stop any accord on Namibia 11 Burma signs U.S. farm aid
accord 13 Chinese peasants' profits create unfilled consumer demand 15
Gravel-making machines competing with archaeologists 17 New conservative party
leader in Sweden faces tough road 20 Dutch spending $2 billion for equivalent of
finger in the dike 22 Antwerp's Jewish diamond dealers clean up after blast 23
GOVERNMENT/POLITICS Gallup Poll finds 64% favor expanding President's veto power
29 Trade expansion attracts U.S. law firm to China 30 Presidential hopefuls are
already scouting New Hampshire 32 Prosecutors denounce ruling of misconduct in
Goody trial 43 Ads reflect rough tone of Stein-Dinkins contest 50 Four
challengers tilt at Brooklyn Borough President 51 Mrs. Codd's views on city
schools 51 Support is sought for state job Development Authority 54 Koch aide,
retiring, reflects on record 55 U.S. Pine Barrens bill urged to protect L.I.
water supply 56 Court backs leasing of state land tract to Mohawks 57 State's
wetlands given another legal shelter 57
GENERAL Around the Nation 24 Drug disclosures shake Presley fans at trial 28 11
years after deaths on Kent campus, R.O.T.C. is thriving 34 Six
apartment-referral companies accused of fraud 44 11 die in a Hoboken fire
believed set by arsonist 45
INDUSTRY/LABOR New kind of law firm keeping labor at bay 53
RELIGION Mormons offer example of a self-help welfare system 37
ARTS/ENTERTAINMENT Karpov defeats Korchnoi to take 4-1 lead in chess
championship 36 "Quartet," movie based on Rhys novel 62 Book's on raid on
Chinese atomic laboratory denied by Marines 64 Joffrey premiere of Cranko's
"Shrew" 64
OBITUARIES Adm. Walter Anderson, served 43 years in Navy 44

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              44 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 24, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION REFORM

BYLINE: By William French Smith

SECTION: Section 1; Page 23, Column 2; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 648 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


The Administration this week submitted to Congress a comprehensive package of
legislation to reform our nation's immigration laws. Reform of some kind, all
would agree, is long overdue. Earlier policies and practices were unrealistic,
and have failed.

The Administration's recently announced policy would permit the United States to
assert control over its borders. We propose to increase the law-enforcement
resources of the Immigration and Naturalization Service; to reform and expedite
our procedures to return persons who come here illegally; to penalize those who
knowingly hire illegal aliens; and to deal realistically and humanely with
illegal aliens who are now here, by granting them a legal status.

It is timely then to clear up certain misconceptions that have muddied the
waters.  No question has been more muddied than the role of identification cards
in enforcing the immigration laws.  The immigration problem, at bottom, is how
to stop illegal aliens from coming to the United States. It is commonly and
correctly assumed that illegal aliens come here to work. It is for this reason
that the Administration has proposed that it be made unlawful for them to do so
and for employers to hire them.

This proposed law is the centerprice of the program, and without it illegal
immigration will not be stopped or even slowed. To enforce this prohibition
simply and without discrimination against Americans, employers need a means of
distinguishing illegal aliens from persons authorized to work. Hence, the
identification-card controversy.

Americans already have I.D. cards. We have Social Security cards, driver's
licenses, birth certificates, Selective Service cards, and on and on. These
documents, used for various purposes, could be shown to employers as evidence of
legal residence by persons who could be hired under the new law. This is
precisely what the Administration proposes.

Some critics think that we need to create yet another I.D. card.  The new card
would be given to persons here legally and would, it is said, be
''counterfeit-resistant.'' The critics' point is that some illegal aliens have
or could obtain fraudulent identification cards of the existing varieties. Thus,
at least one critic has applauded the intention of the Agriculture Department to
issue identification cards bearing photos to between two million and three
million foodstamp recipients in selected large cities where fraud in that
program is rife.

If these critics have not mixed apples and oranges, they have at least mixed
apples and orchards. Take their favorite alternative - reissuing a ''more
secure'' Social Security card to all Americans.  This would cost taxpayers, it
is estimated, between $800 million and $2 billion - more than 100 times the
price tag of the food-stamp identification-card program.

It is not likely that such new cards could be made secure against counterfeiting
and fraud. How would a person get one? By showing an old Security Security card,
driver's license, birth certificate, and on and on. Billions should not be spent
so lightly these days.

The Congress and the American people must grapple with a large and complicated
problem that demands a vigorous, comprehensive response.  The Administration has
submitted its legislative proposals, and they are comprehensive.

Preoccupation with this single mechanical detail only serves to divert attention
from proposals designed to solve a very serious problem. It would be regrettable
to miss the forest for the I.D.'s.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
William French Smith is Attorney General of the United States.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: op-ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              45 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 23, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SMITH SEES IMMIGRATION PLAN AS A MEANS TO AVERT BOATLIFTS

BYLINE: By STUART TAYLOR Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 922 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 22


Attorney General William French Smith defended the Reagan Administration's new
request for sweeping emergency immigration control powers today, calling them
''possibly the only way'' to prevent another influx like the 1980 Cuban
boatlift.

Stressing the costs and disruption caused by the arrival of more than 100,000
Cubans last year, Mr. Smith said, ''It is very important to take whatever steps
are necessary to prevent a recurrence.''

The legislation would authorize the Administration, in an ''immigration
emergency,'' to use the armed forces to seize American or foreign vessels
suspected of carrying illegal immigrants on the high seas and to close ports and
roads in the United States. It would drastically restrict judicial review of
decisions to imprison, exclude or deport aliens from designated countries, among
other things.

Dismay Among Rights Lawyers

The emergency powers provisions of the comprehensive immigration control
legislation proposals sent by Mr. Smith to Congress this week also appear broad
enough to be invoked to stem the continuing migration of thousands of Haitians.

They also raise significant constitutional questions and, by the Justice
Department's own admission, may be challenged as ''inconsistent with
international law'' in some respects.

The complex emergency proposals, copies of which are just beginning to circulate
in Washington, have already provoked dismay among civil rights lawyers who have
seen them.

''These proposals represent a stunning rejection of American immigration
tradition, Congressional prerogatives and the rule of law,'' Dale Frederick
Swartz, an immigration law expert, said today.

''They present grave international implications,'' he said. ''The President, in
effect, is seeking power to ring the country with the military to keep others
out, to deny U.S. citizens and corporations the right to international travel
and commerce which they have long enjoyed.''

Serious Issues Seen

Mr. Swartz added that ''by denying the courts jurisdiction to hear challenges,
the President is seeking authority to act above the law,'' raising ''serious
constitutional issues.''

Mr. Smith said in remarks at the National Press Club today that ''in all of
these procedures the necessary steps are being taken to make sure that the
rights of individuals are appropriately protected.'' He discussed the
immigration proposals in response to a question, after making a speech reviewing
the Administration's program to combat crime.

Under the immigration proposals, if the President determined that ''a
substantial number'' of illegal aliens had embarked for the United States or
were about to, he could declare an ''immigration emergency'' with respect to the
nation or nations of origin and authorize

- ''The closing or sealing of any harbor, port, airport, road or any other
place'' that might be used as a ''point of departure'' to pick up aliens and the
interception of vessels, aircraft or vehicles that have already departed as well
asthe stopping, boarding and seizure of American or foreign flag vessels
suspected of carrying illegal immigrants, without the consent of any other
country, and the return of the vessels to the foreign nation or some other place
and ''constraints on domestic travel'' in connection with the sealing of harbors
and closing of roads.

- The use of ''any component of the Department of Defense, including the Army,
Navy and Air Force'' to stop, board and search vessels or aircraft and make
arrests or seizures, despite a centuryold law that bars such law enforcement
activities by the armed forces.

- The detention, in Federal and state prisons and special camps, of aliens
arrested on suspicion of illegal entry or attempting illegal entry, in the sole
discretion of the Attorney General, with severe restrictions on access to the
courts, and without regard to violations of environmental laws at the camps.

- The elimination of hearings before special immigration judges and of Federal
court review in exclusion and asylum proceedings, which could be held on the
high seas. Judicial review would be restricted, but not eliminated, in
deportation proceedings involving aliens arrested after their arrival in the
United States.

To Discourage From the Outset

Mr. Smith said today that detention of aliens seeking asylum was necessary to
discourage people like the Haitians from setting sail in the first place.

Thousands of Haitians have landed in small boats in Florida in recent years, and
the Government contends that most are seeking economic rather than political
freedom. The Administration has recently sent Coast Guard cutters to intercept
and turn them back in Haitian and international waters, under an executive
agreement with Haiti.

The Justice Department analysis of the emergency provisions, which was
transmitted to Congress, said that it would ''be inconsistent with international
law'' to stop and board foreign flag vessels without the approval of the foreign
Government. But a spokesman for Mr. Smith today repudiated this statement,
stressing that although ''a question might be raised,'' it was ''our view that
it would not be a violation.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Attorney General William French Smith

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              46 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 22, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Ex-Fort Chaffee Guards To Be Retried in Assault

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 176 words

DATELINE: FORT SMITH, Ark., Oct. 21


Five former guards at Fort Chaffee who have been accused of mistreating Cuban
refugees will be retried on 14 assault charges in Federal court before the end
of the year, officials said today.

The guards, employed by the Immigration and Naturalization Service, were found
not guilty Oct. 2 on 13 of 27 charges filed against them. A mistrial was
declared on the remaining 14 charges after four days of jury deliberations.

United States Attorney Larry McCord of Fort Smith said that the retrial must be
held before Dec. 11 to comply with a law that requires a retrial to begin within
70 days of the jury verdict.  Federal District Judge Oren Harris has not set a
trial date.

Mr. McCord said the decision to retry the former guards was made by the civil
rights division of the Department of Justice. The department contends that Cuban
refugees being detained at Fort Chaffee pending release to sponsors were
systematically and routinely assaulted by the immigration officers.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              47 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 22, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN TO REQUEST NEW ALIEN CURBS

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 527 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 21


The Reagan Administration has sent Congress a package of proposals for
immigration bills that would grant the President broad emergency powers to keep
unwanted aliens out of the country.

The legislative proposals, which are circulating among members of the House and
Senate judiciary committees this week, were designed to solve legal problems
discovered after the boatlift of more than 125,000 Cubans from the port of
Mariel to Florida last year.

But Congressional aides said tonight that the Administration proposals would go
considerably beyond the measures outlined last summer by Attorney General
William French Smith.

Emergency Sealing of Ports

One bill, they said, would grant the President the power to seal off ports,
harbors and airports to prevent aliens from entering the United States if the
President declared an immigration emergency.

Another proposal would sharply curtail the power of Federal courts to review the
administrative actions denying requests for asylum. At present, if an officer of
the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service denies such a request
and moves to deport an alien, the alien may appeal to a Federal judge for
relief.

Under the Refugee Act of 1980, an alien may obtain asylum in the United States
if he can demonstrate a ''well-founded fear of persecution'' in his homeland.

The Immigration Service has a backlog of thousands of asylum applications from
Haitians, Iranians, Salvadorans, Nicaraguans and other aliens seeking refuge in
the United States. The number of asylum applications has increased sharply in
recent years.

Powers to Be Held in Reserve

Justice Department officials emphasized that President Reagan had no immediate
plans to invoke the emergency powers sought from Congress. They said that he
wanted to have the authority available in the event of another great influx of
aliens.

The bills drafted by the Administration had not yet been formally introduced by
a member of Congress, and they would be subject to extensive hearings and debate
before they could become law.

The Administration is also requesting the power to seize boats or to board
vessels used for bringing aliens without visas or travel documents to the United
States. Attorney General Smith had already said that the Administration wanted
to build detention facilities in which to hold illegal aliens who arrived
without the necessary travel documents.

In addition, the Administration is proposing to exclude aliens from eligibility
for many of the social welfare and benefit programs to which they now have
access. Immigration lawyers said that this proposal, if adopted, could have
major financial implications for state and local governments, which would
probably have to assist many of the aliens.

Other bills would establish a procedure for legalizing the status of illegal
aliens, authorize the admission of ''guest workers'' from Mexico and specify the
legal penalties for employers who hire illegal aliens.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              48 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 15, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
U.S. Starts New Efforts To Return Haitians

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 100 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Oct. 14


Immigration officials today announced plans to speed up deportation proceedings
and asked a Federal court to allow the repatriation of Haitians who want to
return home.

The Government, which contends that hundreds of refugees want to go back,
requested a hearing on the repatriation motion for tomorrow.  It also said it
would begin exclusionary hearings at a camp near here whether or not the
Haitians' attorneys were present. That reverses a policy in effect since early
summer when a Federal judge preliminarily barred hearings for Haitians without
attorneys.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              49 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              October 14, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Two Pieces of I.D.

SECTION: Section A; Page 30, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 391 words


Will the person who knows the real Reagan position on identification cards
please stand up?

Is it Attorney General Smith? He has tenaciously opposed requiring employers to
ask for I.D. from job applicants even though that would, finally, permit
effective Federal action against illegal immigration. He does not object out of
a civil libertarian concern about police statism but because he thinks such
cards could be too easily forged.

Or is it Secretary of Agriculture Block? To combat fraud, his department will
now require plastic photo identification cards from the 2.84 million people who
pick up food stamps for their families in 17 cities. The value of spending $8
million for cards to discourage fraudulent use of stamps is obvious. The typical
food stamp family receives benefits worth $1,068 a year.

Common sense, if not consistency, points toward the position of the Secretary of
Agriculture.  The Reagan Administration says, commendably, that it wants the
United States to get control of its own borders. And Attorney General Smith
ac-knowledges that there can be no effective enforcement unless employers who
hire illegal immigrants are made liable to punishment.

But the only way that will work is if they know the people they are hiring are
illegal. That means requiring job applicants to show identification - like a
Social Security card. That is already necessary, but the card is easy to
counterfeit. It could, like the food stamp card, be made much harder to forge.

Mr. Smith thinks even that would not be forgery-resistant enough: if it's not
possible to produce a counterfeit-proof $20 bill, an identity card could not be
safe. His logic eludes us. Sure, people are always trying to counterfeit $20, or
$100, bills. But the Secretary of the Treasury does not therefore order his
department to stop printing them.

It is easy to see the overriding value of currency to society. It is easy to see
the value of holding down fraud in the food stamp program. What is hard to see
is why the Attorney General is so reluctant to acknowledge the value of
enforcing the immigration policy this Administration professes to desire.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              50 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               October 6, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

POWER OF CONGRESS TO VETO ACTION OF EXECUTIVE BRANCH FACES STUDY

BYLINE: By LINDA GREENHOUSE, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 23, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 540 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Oct. 5


The Supreme Court agreed today to settle a dispute that has hurt relations
between the White House and Congress for nearly 50 years: whether Congress has
the constitutional authority to block executive branch action by exercising the
socalled legislative veto.

While the case the Court accepted today involves immigration policy, the
eventual decision is likely to determine whether Congress can use a legislative
veto to block foreign arms sales like President Reagan's proposed sale of five
radar-bearing Airborne Warning and Control System planes to Saudi Arabia. The
Awacs issue itself, however, will most probably be resolved one way or the other
by the time the Court rules on the immigration matter in the spring.

Today's case, Immigration and Naturalization Service v. Chadha, No. 80-1832,
involves the legislative veto provision of the Immigration and Nationality Act
of 1952. Under this provision, either house of Congress can overrule a decision
by the Attorney General to cancel deportation proceedings against an alien.

The United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit struck down the
provision last year in a challenge brought by a native of Kenya, Jagdish Rai
Chadha. Mr. Chadha had overstayed his student visa and was eligible for
deportation, but the proceedings were suspended after he persuaded an
immigration official that he would face ''extreme hardship'' if he had to return
to Kenya.

Resolution Against Suspension

The House of Representatives passed a resolution of disapproval, in effect
canceling the suspension, and Mr. Chadha was ordered deported. He then brought
suit directly in the appeals court on the ground that the Congressional action
violated the constitutional principle of separation of powers, and the court
agreed.

Both the House of Representatives and the Senate appealed that decision to the
Supreme Court. The Justice Department also asked the Court to review the
decision. The department agreed with the appeals court opinion and sought not a
reversal but a definitive constitutional ruling from the High Court.

Urging the Justices to take the case, the department said that the issues raised
by the legislative veto ''go to the very heart of the assignment of powers under
our constitutional system.''

The department said that the framers of the Constitution intended Congress to
pass the laws and the executive branch to carry them out. The result of
upholding a legislative veto, the Justice Department's brief said, ''would be to
strip the executive branch of the independence intended by the Framers and to
transfer the ultimate decision-making authority in executing the laws to the
legislative branch.

'Necessary and Proper Clause'

Lawyers for Congress told the Court that authority for the legislative veto
derived from the so-called ''necessary and proper clause'' of Article I of the
Constitution, which gives Congress the power to ''make all laws which shall be
necessary and proper for carrying into execution'' the powers given by the
Constitution to the Federal Government.

Congress has added legislative veto provisions to some 150 laws beginning in
1932. Some provide for a one-house veto, while others require disapproval by
both houses of Congress.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              51 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                October 5, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

Fewer Jews Leaving Soviet

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 54 words

DATELINE: JERUSALEM, Oct. 4


Jewish emigration from the Soviet Union is running at its lowest level in many
years, Israeli immigration officials said today. Yehuda Domonitz, the director
of the Jewish Agency's immigration department, said there had been a decline in
the number of exit visas issued in the last few months.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              52 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                October 5, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

'BRACERO PROGRAM NO. 3

BYLINE: By Tom Miller

SECTION: Section A; Page 21, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 767 words

DATELINE: T UCSON, Ariz.


President Reagan's new immigration proposal is certain to be a topic of
conversation for the 10 United States and Mexican border-state governors who
meet in El Paso, Tex. today and tomorrow,

The Reagan proposal, scheduled for hearings this fall in the House and the
Senate, is packaged to appeal to the widest audience.  It calls for
strengthening the Border Patrol and fining employers who knowingly hire workers
who enter the United States illegally.  This will please 65 percent of the
public, who, according to an Associated Press-NBC News poll last August, want
tougher restrictions on immigration. It offers an opportunity to foreigners here
without residency papers to remain and eventually enter mainstream America,
which sounds humanitarian. It lacks the much discussed national worker
identification card, which satisfies civil libertarians. And it calls for an
experimental program to import 50,000 ''guest workers'' from Mexico, which gives
the impression of regulating the south-to-north traffic in humans.

The Reagan program, however, fails to address the problems that plagued the last
two bracero programs, from 1917 to 1922 and 1942 to 1964: abuse of the imported
worker.

For the first four years of the second program, the Mexican Government
blacklisted the state of Texas, refusing to allow campesinos (''field workers'')
to contract for work there ''because of the number of cases of extreme,
intolerable racial discrimination.'' Even today, when brutality against Mexican
field workers anywhere in the United States is discussed in Mexico, it is called
sadismo texano - ''Texas-style sadism.''

The migratory patterns of workers coming up from Mexico's interior to pick crops
in the United States Southwest dates from before the mid-19th century, when the
land was all Mexico and, before that, New Spain. The patterns continued through
the mid-1920's when the border was first patrolled, and despite efforts to stop
migration these patterns are still as natural as the eddies in the Rio Grande
and ''dust devils'' in the Sonoran Desert, along the border. To double law
enforcement on the border will not significantly reduce migration; conversely, a
sizable cutback in border patrolmen will not noticeably increase the numbers.

Historically, braceros - ''contract workers'' - have been used to break strikes
and to maintain poor working conditions and low wages for all agricultural
workers. In both earlier bracero programs, Government enforcement of the wage
scale was so lax that employers established virtually whatever pay they wanted.
The Reagan plan contains no guarantees that this will not be repeated.

The Carter Administration, without a comprehensive policy of its own toward
newcomers, created a commission to study immigration and refugee problems. Mr.
Carter's people lacked an understanding of the situation as a whole, despite
their concern for the plight of Mexican farm workers in the United Sta tes.

The Reagan Administration, on the other hand, shows great compassion for those
who own and manage the great agribusiness holdings in California and elsewhere.
They want their fields tilled and their crops harvested by the most efficient
and least expensive equipment, whether mechanical or human. In this free-market
approach to labor, the new program benefits them by furnishing a cheap, steady
source of nonunion field workers.

The new bracero program will almost certainly encourage new illegal migration.
Tens of thousands of workers will be attracted to the border to take part; most
of those who don't become ''guest workers'' will enter on their own. Coupled
with the declining value of the peso - now worth less than 4 cents - and general
patterns of unemployment, migration to the United States will increase, and
border towns will bulge still further.

The Reagan plan fails to take into acount the forces that compel Mexicans to
temporarily leave their honeland and travel north. It institutionalizes current
patterns in migration but neglects the source. As such, it can do no better than
equal the fate of the previous bracero programs.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
Tom Miller is author of ''On the Border: Portraits Of America's Southwestern
Frontier.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Cartoon

TYPE: Op-Ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              53 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 29, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN TO NOMINATE FLORIDA AUTO DEALER TO IMMIGRATION POST

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 369 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 28


President Reagan said today that he would nominate Norman Braman, a wealthy
Miami Beach businessman, to be Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization.

If confirmed by the Senate, Mr. Braman, 49 years old, would succeed Doris
Meissner, Acting Commissioner.  Mr. Braman is head of an automobile sales and
leasing organization in Florida that is among the largest in the United States.
Automobile sales of Braman companies are now near the $160 million mark.

Mr. Braman, a native of West Chester, Pa., now lives with his wife and two
children in Miami Beach.  In an interview, Mr. Braman said he was ''excited,
thrilled'' by the opportuity.

'Doing My Homework'

''I look forward to the job,'' he said. ''I've been doing my homework since the
middle of June. I'm convinced the job is do-able.  ''I think we can change the
situation in this country. I think we can restore and bring back a quality of
life. The President is committed to bringing sanity back.''

Mr. Reagan has not yet formally submitted his immigration policy to Congress,
but Mr. Braman said he was happy with the President's general philosophy and
called it ''a great step forward.''

He said he believed he would be able to help formulate the Administration's
immigration policy and predicted that ''the final recommendations will be very
satisfactory.''

He said he had been assured he would be permitted ''a major reorganization'' of
the agency. Asked whether that meant closing borders, he replied: ''I think we
have to have control our own borders. We're going to be committed to upholding
the laws of the country.''

The greater Miami area has a heavy concentration of refugees from Latin America
and South America.  ''I think that I am fortunate that Ihave a feel f or it,
being that I am from here,'' Mr. Braman said.

Justice Department officials have described him as a manager and an organizer
who could ''really take hold of something and make it work.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              54 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 23, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIAN REFUGEES STILL LANGUISHING AT FACILITY NEAR EVERGLADES

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1326 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Sept. 21


Summer is the time when the sea between here and Haiti is calmest, and so most
fit for crossing. Two or three thousand Haitians took advantage of the season
and the flat sea this year, packing themselves 60 and 90 and sometimes 120 into
a 30-foot boat that a seasoned captain would not trust in a cattle pond.
Steering for freedom, they went straight to jail.

There are now 1,062 Haitians detained here at a former missile base on the edge
of the Everglades. The base, called Krome North, for the name of a former
landowner, has a ''design capacity'' of 530, which means the Haitians do not
have much more space than they had on their boats.

The overcrowding has forced the United States Immigration and Naturalization
Service to shift 800 to a former naval base, Fort Allen, in Puerto Rico. Smaller
groups have been sent to Federal facilities in Lake Placid, N.Y.; Otisville,
N.Y.; Brooklyn; Morgantown, W.@Va.; Lexington, Ky.; and Big Springs, N.Y. From
the look of them, they are miserable.

A Summer of Litigation

Nothing, it would se em, would please the Go vernment or greater Miami more than
for all the Haitians to go h ome voluntarily.  The summer just ending has been a
loud one here, with civil libertarians proclaiming the refugees' rights, the
refugee s themselves rioting at Krome and this city growing more acrimonious
over unwelcome guests competing for scarce jobs.

This was the summer of a sold-out bumper sticker that asked the ''last
American'' leaving Miami to ''please bring the flag.'' It was also the summer
that a bogus poster, based on a tourism advertisement urging Miami's visitors to
''see it like a native,'' showed a fetching beachcomber armed to the teeth over
the legend, ''siege it like a native.'' The poster became a collectors' item.

Some say the feelings are part of the general mood of the country after the 1980
boatlift from Mariel brought 125,000 Cubans, many viewed as thugs, to South
Florida. Some others criticize a national immigration policy that appears kind
to people fleeing Communism, but unkind to those fleeing countries friendly to
the United States. For whatever reason, the Government has been tougher on
Haitian arrivals than at any time in nine years, in which time 44,000 Haitians
are known to have arrived.

Aliens or 'Refugees'?

''What I keep in mind,'' said Mike Trominski, a spokesman for the naturalization
service, ''is that these are illegal aliens, just like Germans or French or any
other nationality would be if they tried to enter this country without the
proper documents. I think this has been lost sight of.''

The Immigration and Naturalization Service has been careful not to use the word
''refugee'' in this, one of Miami's more litigious summers. Lawsuits,
injunctions and temporary restraining orders were emitted like bullets from the
legal sector this year.

The cornerstone has been which Haitians came to find jobs and which to seek
political asylum. By late May there were enough boats on the horizon to resemble
an oncoming squall line. By late June there were near brawls in the Federal
Courthouse.

''The Government seemed bent on a new policy of taking care of them rather
rapidly, one guesses to discourage others from leaving Haiti,'' said Bruce
Winick, a University of Miami law professor who has sued to s low things down.
''The refugees were double-timed up backstairs to avoid public hearings. I mean
it was just lunacy. Therewere mistrans lations. They understood asylum to mean
insane asylum.  The I.N.S. wa s quick to infer a waiver of their rights when in
fact the refugees had no idea what was going on.''

An Exclusion Process Used

In July, the Government began ''exclusion'' hearings at Krome. It contends that
the Haitians, most having been picked up at sea, never technically entered this
country, and can thus be excluded, a process much swifter and simpler than
deportation.

Attorneys for the Haitians argued unsuccessfully that Krome, a 45-minute drive
from downtown Miami, was too far away to hold hearings. ''We said Krome is
Nome,'' said Mr. Winick. ''It's like Nome, Alaska. If you're going to have the
hearings out there, the private bar will not make the trip. This has pretty much
been the case.''

But one lawyer who made the trip was Steve Forrester. ''They scheduled us
regularly to be in two or three courtrooms at the same time,'' he recalls. ''On
Aug. 4, I had 29 hearings going on in three courts. I had four people deported
because I couldn't get there. I was literally running between courtrooms. I'd
ask for a continuance of 10 days and not get it. I'd ask for two hours. No. Ten
minutes?'' He said that one judge ''gave me 10 minutes; the other two gave me 'a
brief moment.' ''

Disorders Broke Out at Krome

On Sept. 3, about 600 of the Haitians at Krome started chanting ''liberty or
death,'' ''Miami is our country'' and ''set us free.'' They threw stones at
guards; the guards threw tear gas cannisters at them. Ninety-eight escaped but
were caught quickly. The next day, 120 were transferred to the Federal
Correctional Institute at Otisville, N.Y.

Early this month the Haitians won a victory when Federal District Judge Alcee
Hastings issued a temporary restraining order barring exclusion hearings or
deportations of Haitians not represented by attorneys.

One of the witnesses in the case was a Puerto Rican lawyer, Carlos Garcia
Gutierrez. He said that he had 140 clients at Fort Allen and was the only lawyer
trying to represent the 800 Haitians there.

The most recent developments in the Haitian story were the Government's refusal
to parole detainees to sponsors or family, and a proposal to reopen an abandoned
Air Force Base in Glasgow, Mont., for up to 2,000 illegal aliens. The Government
says it has been the policy since last Oct. 10 not to ''sponsor out'' Haitians
awaiting hearings. But the rule was relaxed until early this summer to relieve
the over crowding at Krome.

The Southern Christian Leadership Conference has asked a Federal court to be
allowed to enter the camp to offer legal and social services.

In New York, Ira Gollobin, a National Council of Churches lawyer speaking for
the Haitians, said last week that he had submitted sponsorship papers for 60 of
the 76 held at a former Navy prison in Brooklyn. Of these, he went on: ''We said
clearly they wouldn't abscond and they are not subversive. We haven't heard a
peep from the I.N.S. Here they are supposed to be economizing the dollar,
they're cutting essential services, and we've got over 2,500 Haitians in the
pokey, costing hundreds of thousands of dollars. It doesn't make sense.''
Move Planned to Cold Climate

The proposal to move the bulk of the Haitians to Montana has been heavily
criticized, mainly because of the climate and a lack of legal counsel. The
I.N.S. says that no decision has been made. The Missoulian, a daily newspaper in
the region, has editorialized that the move would be ''brutal'' to the Haitians.

Nick Proffitt, owner of a ranch west of Glasgow, described it as ''high
plains,'' adding, ''It's where the wind starts at the North Pole and doesn't
stop until it knocks you down.''

In Miami, meanwhile, the chop is getting rougher out beyond the bay, but two
more boats made it to shore last week. One bore 66 passengers who were in good
shape because they had only come from the Bahamas. The other boat had been 21
days at sea from Haiti, and as its 113 passengers gained the beach, one dropped
dead from dehydration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Haitian refugee

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              55 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 23, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Index

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1022 words


INTERNATIONAL Mitterrand fashioning a new French policy toward Africa A3 At
least 26 die as Turkish jet crashes in NATO exercise area A4 New book on Mrs.
Meir says she met 10 times with King Hussein A6 Egypt and Israel set to resume
talks on Palestinians A7 Saudis believed to accept U.S. tactical principles for
Awacs A8 House votes citizenship for Swede who aided Jews A9 Excerpts from
Gromyko speech to the U.N.  A14
GOVERNMENT/POLITICS Hostage compensation plan excludes coast businessman A10
Mayor Byrne's fortunes and funds on increase A19 Ex-C.I.A. official doubtful on
foreign-business curbs A22 Administration seeks additional cuts in food stamp
benefits A23 Agency postpones decision on rescinding rules for handicapped A25
Decision on postal rate rise putoff A26 Jersey State Senator is accused of
misconduct and tax evasion B2 Judge orders new Democratic primary for Mayor in
Hartford B2 Former immigration aide gets 4 years in Abscam case B3 Goldin wins
renomination in race for City Comptroller B4
WASHINGTON TALK Briefing A28 Senator Domenici urges Reagan to stick with budget
plan A28 Koch says friendship with Reagan helps city A28 Sheriff visits
Senators, but doesn't bring her gun A28
OBITUARIES Richard M. Dorson, a historian and folklorist D22 David Kidd,
designer of women's coats and suits D22
LIVING SECTION Food British food: In defense of a tradition C1 Fish with an
image problem C1 Federal feeding program may be cut C7 Living Personal Health:
What belongs in a medicine cabinet C1 Metropolitan Diary C2 Kitchen Equipment C2
60-Minute Gourmet C3 House specialty?  You name it C3 Best Buys C8 Cosmetic unit
aids research C12 Wine Talk C14 Discoveries C15 New Yorkers, etc.  C20
Disposable collars, a fashionable option C20 Cooking for 1,500: Secrets of a
caterer C20
GENERAL Around the Nation A16 Haitian refugees still languishing in Florida camp
A16 G.M. offers cars as inducements to home buyers A18 Judge refuses to dismiss
spy charges against missile officer A21
ARTS/ENTERTAINMENT Neil simon's "Only When I Laugh" on local screens C23 A
restages "Norma" opens Met Opera season C23 Tharp dance company opens with "The
Catherine Wheel" C24 Bewitching vocal textures on Lene Lovich's new record C26
Rock-and-roll groups recording overtly sexual lyrics C26 Reissue of Herbert
Read's "English Prose Style" is reviewed C29 Drama about alcoholic parents on
"Afterschool Special" C31 Brinkley signs four-year pact with ABC News C32
SPORTS George Vecsey on Coghlan and the Fifth Avenue Mile B6 Thompson's 3-run
homer l eads Pirates past Mets, 5-3 B7 Yanks lose 4th in a row B7 Last-place
Indians in search for respect B7 Islanders' complete squad gathers for f irst
time since Cup B7 Rangers beat Swedes, 7-1, but still ha ve problem at center
B10
FEATURES/NOTES Man in the news: George Price, Belize's leader A3 About New York
B5 Sports People B6 Notes on People B24
NEWS ANALYSIS Michael Quint discusses Federal Reserve's monetary policy D1
EDITORIALS/LETTERS/OP-ED Editorials A30 Don't deflate auto safety "Belize Is
Ours!" Will labels outlast life? Letters A30 Tom Wicker: blood, sweat and shame
A31 James Reston: the ideal United Nations diplomat A31 Russell Baker: all
chickened out in Washington A31 Marsha ll I. Goldman: the Kremlin's grain
disaster A31

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              56 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 23, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

EX-FEDERAL AIDE GETS FOUR YEARS IN ABSCAM CASE

BYLINE: By JOSEPH P. FRIED

SECTION: Section B; Page 3, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 422 words


A former Federal immigration investigator from Long Island was sentenced to four
years in prison yesterday for his bribery conviction stemming from the
Government's Abscam inquiry into official corruption.

The term was imposed on 32-year-old Alexander A. Alexandro Jr. of Commack, after
a Justice Department prosecutor contended in Federal District Court in Brooklyn
that Mr. Alexandro knew of ''corrupt acts'' by other employees of the
Immigration and Naturalization Service.

The prosecutor, John H. Jacobs, implied to Judge Mark A.  Costantino, that the
prospect of a ''stiff sentence'' might induce Mr. Alexandro to tell the
authorities what he knew in the hope that his sentence would be lightened.

Outside the courtroom, Mr. Jacobs confirmed that prosecutors wanted to bring Mr.
Alexandro before a grand jury and question him further about state me nts he had
made to Federal undercover agents indicating corrupt behav ior by others in the
immigration agency.

Mr. Alexandro's 1979 meetings with the undercover men - from whom he took a
$2,000 payoff in an immigration deal - were surreptitiously videotaped.

Calls Term 'Pretty Harsh'

Mr. Alexandro later called the term ''pretty harsh.'' His lawyer, Joel Winograd,
termed it ''coercive.'' Mr. Alexandro faced up to 15 years. He remained free
pending the outcome of his appeal.

Mr. Jacobs reaffirmed earlier statements that the Government wanted to bring
before a grand jury a Long Island businessman convicted of conspiring with Mr.
Alexandro. Mr. Jacobs said that prosecutors wanted to investigate statements
that the businessman, Alfred Carpentier, had made to the Abscam agents about
what was said to have been corruption or potential corruption involving
political figures whom Mr. Jacobs declined to name.

The sentencing of Mr. Carpentier, a 56-year-old East Meadow man, was postponed
until Oct. 13. Mr. Jacobs said the Justice Department might ask that a hearing
scheduled in connection with the sentencing be closed to the public because of
the ''nature of the allegations'' that Mr. Carpentier had made.

Mr. Carpentier's lawyer, James A. Pascarella, said his client had simply been
name-dropping in discussing the political figures with the undercover men.

Mr. Carpentier faces up to five years for his conviction in the immigration
case.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              57 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

             September 23, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

MUSIC: MERKIN HALL GALA

BYLINE: By EDWARD ROTHSTEIN

SECTION: Section C; Page 21, Column 3; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 620 words


DURING the last 100 years, the waves of Jewish immigration to New York have
changed our musical life -not just with the influx of talented performers, but
also with the development of cultural centers such as the 92d Street Y. On
Sunday night at the Abraham Goodman House - the city's most recently built
Jewish center, on West 67th Street, housing the 29-year-old Hebrew Arts School -
another significant development was celebrated.

In a Gala Dedication Concert, the 457-seat concert hall in the Goodman House
became the Merkin Concert Hall, endowed by Ursula and Hermann Merkin. A new
lobby has been built, an entrance is being finished and programming changes are
being instituted; but the change in name will not change much in the hall itself
- it has already become the finest hall in the city for chamber music. A
performer can look out from the stage and see his audience clearly and
individually, a sensation that affects the listener as well. The acoustics,
engineered by Peter George, are no less i ntimate.

Jan Peerce was at the intimate center of this gala concert. He still combines,
after 50 years of musical life, both the tradition of the Jewish folk musician
and the opposite ambitions of the immigrant child who shaped a place for himself
in European palaces of high art, directing folk ene rgies and sensibilities tow
ard a revivification of the performing tradition.

So did Mr. Peerce sing Sunday, with a range, firmness, energy and presence that
gave the operatic selections by Donizetti, Legrenzi, Puccini and Cilea the same
earnest immediacy that graced the Yiddish songs.

But the entire program was a miniature portrait of Jewish musical life, ranging
from a composition in cantorial style - Pinchos Jassinowsky's ''The Prophecy of
Isaiah,'' sung by Joseph Malovany - to performances by the violinist Albert
Markov, a representative of the most recent wave in Jewish immigration.

The Hebrew Arts Concert Choir also gave refined performances under the direction
of Matthew Lazar, including works by Salomone Rossi, the Jewish Renaissance
composer; Marc Lavry, Tzvi Avni and the anomalous William Byrd. Rossi was also
represented in an elegant performance of a Trio Sonata, played by Deborah Merkin
Gerber on the recorder; Ruth Guideri, cellist; Hadassah Guttman, harpsichordist,
and Suny Choi, violinist. Zalmen Mlotek provided eminently vocal piano
accompaniments for Mr. Peerce and Mr. Malovany; Dmitry Cogan was Mr. Markov's
piano accompanist.

There were also, of course, short talks in honor of the occasion, singing
well-deserved praises of music and the hall - given by Philip Esterman,
president of the Hebrew Arts School; Benjamin William Mehlman; a trustee;
Naphtali Lavie, Consul General of Israel, and Mr. Merkin.

But it was when Mr. Peerce gave his encore performance of ''Rozhenkes mit
Mandlen'' - ''Raisins and Almonds'' - that the hall's dedication became most
resonant. Mr. Peerce introduced the folk song and its history, sung to
generations of Jewish children in cradles; the luxurious fruit and nuts were
promises for the future. There were damp eyes by the time Mr. Peerce finished
singing.

The music, it was clear, was a commemoration, like the hall; and the concert was
a celebration by a community, of itself, done with the sort of hope that Mr.
Peerce must also have felt -along with generations of immigrants - a
half-century ago, when he was Jacob Pincus Perelmuth, before he became an opera
singer.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: review

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              58 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 20, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

SECTION: Section 10; Page 26, Column 5; Travel Desk

LENGTH: 178 words


Clearing Customs To the Editor: The Practical Traveler column (''Clearing
Customs: Still a Hurdle,'' Travel Section, Aug. 23) covered a wide range of
problems one encounters when going through customs in the United States. I would
like to add that as a resident alien residing in New York, I frequently travel
to London to visit my family, and my return to New York is always marred by the
terrible hassle of going through immigration at Kennedy International Airport.
The lines are extremely long because the immigration officer must check each
visa number manually in a book he has in front of him.

It would seem that in this age of computer technology the Immigration Service
could introduce a more efficient method of handling this par ticular aspect of
internatio nal travel.  ROSALIND J. HERSTEIN Nanuet, N.Y.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              59 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 15, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION CASE TAKING ODD TWIST

BYLINE: By WILLIAM ROBBINS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 27, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1014 words

DATELINE: PHILADELPHIA, Sept. 14


Ernest J. Hupp, an Immigration Court judge, has trouble maintaining a cool,
judicial demeanor when he is reminded of the two Federal agents who followed him
in a black automobile last May 22, so intimidating him, he said later, that he
withdrew from a deportation case he was hearing.

Judge Hupp said in a telephone interview that he did not know at the time that
the seemingly sinister automobile was being driven by agents of his own
Immigration and Naturalization Service. He was so upset, he said, that he
required medical care.

But the most serious victim of that Federal surveillance, two lawyers here have
charged, is the imprisoned man whose case Judge Hupp was hearing and who will
now have to begin again before a new judge.

Charging governmental misconduct as part of their argument in a habeas corpus
proceeding, they are asking Federal District Judge Morris E. Lasker in Manhattan
to free Michael O'Rourke, a former weapons and explosives specialist with the
Irish Republican Army, the guerrilla movement of Irish nationalists. Mr.
O'Rourke was the subject of a widely publicized arrest here two years ago and
has been imprisoned without bail ever since.
Judge Withdraws From Case

Briefs seeking a hearing on the pleas are now being prepared and will be filed
this week, the lawyers, Willard Myers and Charles Glackin, said. Among documents
in their possession for use in the case is an ''order of recusation'' written by
Judge Hupp removing himself from the deportation case after he learned that the
men following him were immigration agents and expressing his belief that he had
been ''unjustly harassed and intimidated because of presiding in this case.''

Mr. O'Rourke, convicted in Ireland and sentenced to six years for possession of
unregistered weapons and ammunition, had escaped from a Dublin prison and fled
to this country under the name of Patrick Mannion and had been living here since
February 1978. After his arrest in October 1979, according to his attorneys, he
was investigated on suspicion of involvement in the slaying of Lord Mountbatten
and of a plot against the life of Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher of Britain,
but no confirmation of such suspicions was ever found.

Charged now with overstaying his visa, Mr. O'Rourke is being held in a maximum
security wing of the Federal Metropolitan Correctional Center in Manhattan,
where he has been for the last 23 months. Mr.  O'Rourke's attorneys contend that
a recent reassignment of Mr.  O'Rourke's case, which was nearing completion
under Judge Hupp, unjustly extends his incarceration. They are asking the court
to grant bail and to order an end to the Government's proceedings against him.

The Government is seeking to deport Mr. O'Rourke to Ireland and has insisted on
keeping him in jail on the ground that he would be a poor bail risk. In an
affidavit filed with the Board of Immigration Appeals, a State Department
official has also argued that ''a favorable decision on Mr. O'Rourke's petition
for bail would have serious consequences'' for United States foreign policy and
efforts to combat international terrorism.

Argument Is Challenged

Mr. O'Rourke's attorneys contend that the prisoner has divorced himself from the
Irish revolutionary movement, and they question the propriety of introducing
political considerations into the bail issue.

For its part, the Immigration and Naturalization Service sa ys thereis no
connect ion between the surveillance of Judge Hupp and the O'Rourke case . The
judge was under investigation on an anonymous complaint, ac cording to Verne
Jervis, a spokesman for the agency, who declined to discuss either the nature or
the source of that complaint.

Reached at a West Virginia prison where he is conducting hearings on unrelated
cases, Judge Hupp said he had been given an explanation that only raised a
question as to why his superiors would waste Government money investigating a
judge with an ''unblemished record'' in 40 years of service.

''I am pleased to inform you,'' says a letter he received, signed by Doris M.
Meissner, his agency's acting commissioner, ''that a thorough inquiry was
conducted concerning an allegation that you were leaving your official duty
station without charging any appropriate leave. The inquiry did not sustain the
allegation, and no further action is contemplated.''

In his order announcing that he was stepping down from the case, Mr. Hupp said,
''I sincerely believe that the complaint was filed be cause I have been involved
in the O'Rourke case.''

Fears About Pursuers

Originally, the judge said, he thought he was being followed by agents of the
Irish Republican Army.  According to an affidavit from a Government attorney in
the case, the immigration agency acknowledged its surveillance to him and
disclosed it at his insistence to Judge Hupp after the attorney learned of the
judge's fears and the apparent effects on his health.

What has never been explained, said Judge Hupp, is why the agents thought it
necessary to follow him to his hometown in Millersville, Md., a distance of 125
miles, if their purpose was merely to determine whether he had left his office
without properly signing out. All that was necessary, he said, was to check the
time log that he keeps in his desk. It clearly showed, he said, that he had
appropriately charged his departure on Friday, May 22, against leave time.

The district director of the agency here declined to discuss the case, and the
director of its Office of Professional Responsibility, based in Washington,
which has acknowledged conducting the inquiry, has not responded to a telephone
call seeking a clarification.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              60 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 13, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

UNTOLD STORY OF COAST IMMIGRATION CENTER UNFOLDS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 84, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 804 words

DATELINE: ANGEL ISLAND STATE PARK, Calif., Sept. 12


Paul Chow vividly recalls his father's admonition of ''Angel Island. Shhh!'' ''I
heard that so much, it's almost like one word,'' he says.  From 1910 to 1940,
about 175,000 Chinese came to the United States. Most, including the elder Chow,
awaited entry to Gam Saan, the Golden Mountain, as they called California, at
the Federal Immigration Station on Angel Island.

Like the better-known Ellis Island in New York Harbor, which was the first stop
for European immigrants to the United States, Angel Island was entry point for
Asian immigrants.

But many recall their stay on the island with only bitterness.  They were locked
up like criminals. They slept stacked on steel bunks six high. If thet rebelled
they were put into a bare, windowless closet.

For decades this shabby chapter in American history lay virtually unexamined.
Humiliated Chinese-Americans -nearly all of those who entered at Angel Island
were Chinese - would not speak of it.

False Papers Used for Entry

Many had entered with false papers and were called ''paper sons'' because their
forged documents made them sons of merchants, teachers and United States
citizens. Those were the privileged, exempted under the Chinese Exclusion Act of
1882, the first Federal law to deny entry to a specific ethnic group.

Now the unpleasant story is being told, led by Mr. Chow, whose Angel Island
Immigration Station Historical Advisory Committee wants a museum created in the
decaying barracks last used in 1940.

Felicia Lowe, a Chinese-American filmmaker from San Francisco, is interviewing
former detainees for a television documentary.  Mr. Chow, a transportation
engineer with the state, stood in what was the men's dormitory on the island,
whose hilly paths and secluded coves in the middle of San Francisco Bay now draw
cyclists, hikers and boaters.
Poems Written on the Walls

On the peeling walls of the dormitory are poems in Chinese, written by
immigrants to express outrage and anguish. One of them, by an anonymous author,
reads:

''There are tens of thousands of poems composed on these walls; They are all
cries of complaint and sadness. The day I am rid of this prison and attain
success, I must remember that this chapter once existed.''

The immigrants called this place ''The Island.'' The name ''Angel'' seems to
mock memories such as those of Howard Tom.  Mr. Tom was 14 years old when he
arrived on the island in 1922. His father was a naturalized American citizen who
had returned to China to get his wife, Howard and a baby son.

His family was ''separated within two hours,'' Mr. Tom said, adding, ''We didn't
have a chance to say goodbye.'' He recalled lying on his bunk in the locked
dormitory, daydreaming of friends in China.

Questions From Official

Through an interpreter, an immigration official questioned him and his parents
separately, seeking to determine if they were really a family.

''How far from your house to your neighbor's?'' they each were asked.  ''The
three of us all gave the wrong answer,'' Mr. Tom said. ''I stretched my hand out
to represent so many feet. I didn't tell the interpreter how many feet each arm
length represented.''

The family was detained for two weeks before being released after a Chinese
minister in San Francisco vouched for them.  ''After 40 some odd years,'' Mr.
Tom said , he visited the island aspart of a spe cial tour. ''I was really
upset.'' There are s ome Chinese who say the period is too painful to
relive.Genny Lim, wh o wrote a history of the era, says a ''prominent, older''
Chine se-American woman was horrified by the idea of tourists visiting the
island, calling it ''exploitation.''

Other detainees recount suicides not mentioned in official records. They said
that modest Chinese women, shocked by the lack of privacy in the toilets, would
cover their heads with bags.

Ranger Gets Scholar's Interest

The history of the island began to unfold in 1970, when Alan Weiss, then a
ranger on the island, noticed characters carved on the walls and showed them to
superiors.

''No one was interested,'' Mr. Weiss said on a recent tour with Mr. Chow's
group. So he invited a scholar who determined that they were poems written by
Chinese immigrants. Enthusiastic Asian-American college students then began to
pry loose the island's history.

Restoration work is going slowly. A state grant of $322,000 is exhausted, and
Mr. Chow estimated that $1 million more was needed.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Paul and Hing Gai Chow

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              61 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 11, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Eight More Cuban Refugees Are Freed From U.S. Prison

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 15, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 143 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, Sept. 10


Eight more Cuban refugees were released yesterday from the Federal penitentiary
here, bringing to 75 the number of detainees from freed in the last three weeks.

Leland Lagow of the Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service said the
eight left for Michigan and New York, where they have sponsors.

About 1,800 Cubans who came to the United States by sea in 1980 had been
detained here because of reports they had criminal records in Cuba.

Three weeks ago, Federal District Judge Marvin Shoob ordered 381 of the
detainees released, later changing the order to exclude 77 with records of
violent crime. He also ordered the Justice Department to review the cases of 226
more refugees.

In July, Judge Shoob expessed concern that many of those being held were
detained only because they lacked visas.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              62 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 11, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION AGENCY DELAYS HAITIAN DEPORTATION ACTION

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 601 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Sept. 10


The Immigration and Naturalization Service said today that it had temporarily
stopped all deportation proceedings against Haitians not represented by
attorneys.

The action followed the issuing of a temporary restraining order last night by
Federal District Judge Alcee L. Hastings in Florida that suspended deportation
hearings for several hundred Haitians who have been detained at Fort Allen,
P.R.; Big Springs, Tex.; Morgantown, W.Va., and Lexington, Ky.

The order, which is effective for 10 days, can be extended. It directly affects
700 to 800 Haitians, according to Ira J. Kurzban, a Miami lawyer who represents
some of the Haitians and has sought access to others.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the immigration agency, said that Government
lawyers here had not yet received a copy of Judge Hastings's order. ''In the
meantime,'' he said, ''we are not holding hearings on Haitians who do not have
attorneys representing them.''

2,235 Haitians Detained

Until now, Mr. Jervis said, the Government has been holding deportation hearings
for Haitians who waived their right to an attorney. These proceedings have been
suspended so that immigration lawyers can study the Hastings order, he said.

In late May, the immigration agency began detaining Haitians who arrived in the
United States without visas or travel documents.  There are now 2,235 Haitians
being held at seven places, including Federal installations in Brooklyn and at
Lake Placid and Otisville, N.Y.

The Reagan Administration has proposed to make the detention of illegal aliens a
major element of its immigration policy. Attorney General William French Smith
said on July 30 that the Administration would seek $35 million to build
permanent detention facilities where aliens could be held pending deportation or
the granting of asylum.

Mr. Kurzban, who is affiliated with a group called the National Emergency Civil
Liberties Committee, said that Judge Hastings had issued the order last night to
''preserve his jurisdiction'' in the case. In the absence of such an order, Mr.
Kurzban said, it was possible that some of the aliens might be returned to
Haiti, where they would be beyond the reach of United Sta tes courts.

Lack of Creole Interpreters

Mr. Kurzban and Dale Frederick Swatz, a lawyer here who has represented Haitians
in prior litigation, contend that the Government has purposely dispersed the
Haitians in places where they could not easily obtain legal help.

Even where lawyers are available, they said, there may not be enough Creole
interpreters to help the Haitians understand the proceedings.

Under the Refugee Act of 1980, an alien must demonstrate a wellfounded fear of
persecution in his own country to qualify for asylum in the United States. The
Reagan Administration, like the Carter Administration, contends that most of the
Haitians left their homeland for economic reasons rather than political reasons
and therefore cannot qualify for asylum.

An alien making an asylum claim has the right to be represented by a lawyer, and
40 Haitains at the Federal prison near Lake Placid have requested attorneys. But
the Haitians cannot afford to pay, and there are no lawyers in the Lake Placid
area to represent them without charge, according to an immigration service
official in Buffalo.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              63 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               September 6, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

OFFICE FIRE PUTS MARSHALL ISLES IN 'A REAL MESS'

BYLINE: By ROBERT TRUMBULL, Speci al to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 19, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 507 words

DATELINE: HONOLULU, Sept. 5


The two-year-old government of the Marshall Islands, an American-administered
trust territory about 2,000 miles southwest of Hawaii, lost its operational
center and irreplaceable financial, legal and other records in a predawn fire
Aug. 24, according to the government's liaison office here.

The blaze destroyed the Administration Building, which housed the offices of the
chief secretary, the attorney general and the auditor general, the departments
of finance, immigration and social security and the Marshall Islands credit
union. Also destroyed were two government warehouses containing valuable
equipment parts and other materials.

The fire has left the Marshalls government in ''a real mess,'' said Robert Law,
the head of the liaison office. Mr. Law, a former district administrator or
governor of the Marshalls, was preparing to send to Majuro, the capital, an
emergency shipment of office supplies, inc luding rubber stamps, to replace
those lost.
No One Is Injured

While the functions of the Marshalls government are directed from the offices of
the President, Amata Kabua, and other executives in the new Legislative Building
several miles from the scene of the fire, most records were kept in the
Administration Building.

No one was injured in the fire, discovered by an official who was in his office
working late on a new budget. The cause of the blaze is under investigation.

The Administration Building, from which American officials had run Marshallese
affairs until the islands became self-governing two years ago, was originally a
wartime Quonset hut erected on the shore of the Majuro Lagoon just after World
War II, when Majuro was a Navy base. It had received additions over the years.

The unsightly structure of rusted metal sides and a tattered tarpaper roof had
been regarded by critics of the American administration as a symbol of
Washington's neglect of the trust territory, which also includes the Caroline a
nd Mariana archipelagos.

Occupied by U.S. in War

The islands, formerly ruled by Japan, were occupied by American forces as a
result of World War II and in 1947 were made a United Nations trusteeship, the
Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands.

Known collectively as Micronesia, they have been divided into the self-governing
entities of the Marshall Islands, the Palau Islands and the Federated States of
Micronesia, which comprises the Truk, Yap, Ponape and Kosrae (formerly Kusaie)
groups. A fourth unit, the Northern Mariana Islands, voted to become a
commonwealth of the United States, like Puerto Rico.

An agreement to leave the islands independent in internal affairs, while
retaining permanent military links with the United States, is under review by
the Reagan Administration. The Carter Administration had hoped to end the
trusteeship this year.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              64 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               September 6, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CENSUS TOTALS SHOW NATION IS DIVERSE AS NEVER BEFORE

BYLINE: By JOHN HERBERS

SECTION: Section 4; Page 5, Column 2; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1026 words


WASHINGTON DURING much of its history, the United States has had an official
policy of admitting immigrants of white European stock while barring those from
Asian, African and Latin nations. In recent years, however, all that has
changed. The inscription on the Statue of Liberty, unveiled in 1886, shortly
after passage of the Chinese Exclusion Act and inviting ''your huddled masses
yearning to breathe free,'' no longer has a hollow ring to people whose skin is
black, brown or yellow.

Not that the lamp has always been lifted in hospitality. There has been strong
opposition to many of the recent immigrants. But new statistics provided by the
1980 census and the Immigration and Naturalization Service show that they have
come in great numbers and have spread throughout the nation, although not
evenly. Many have been assimilated into the economy and society.

As a percentage of the population, the white majority has been diminished
somewhat by the tide of Mexicans, Cubans, Puerto Ricans, Asians, South
Americans, Africans and others. How much so since 1970 is unknown because 1980
census figures on race and national origin are not wholly comparable to 1970
figures. That in itself testifies to the strength of new immigrants who were
able to bring political pressure to force the Census Bureau to add more racial
groups to its forms and to stop counting some non-Negro groups with black or
brown skin as whites.

Provisional 1980 census figures show breakdowns by rough numbers and as a
percentage of the population: Whites, 188.3 million, 83.2 percent; Blacks, 26.5
million, 11.7 percent; American Indians, Eskimos and Aleutians, 1.5 million, .6
percent; Chinese, Filipinos, Japanese,

Asian India ns, Koreans, Vietnamese, Hawaiians, Samoans and Guamanians, 3 .5
million, 1.5 percent. Others, including other Asians,Mexicans, Pue rto Ricans,
Cubans, Africans and many other categories not listed on the census form
accounted for 6.7 million or 3 percent.

In a separate question, residents were asked if they were of Spanish origin.
Those who answered affirmatively totaled 14.6 million, 6.4 percent. Hispanic
people, of course, can be black or white. The vast majority in this country have
been shown by surveys to be Mexican, Puerto Rican and Cuban.

Illegal aliens, who did not respond to the census, make up an additional layer
of population. Nobody knows how many there were, but not many are believed to be
white Europeans. Furthermore, the Census Bureau concedes it could not count all
residents; its undercount was presumably greatest among blacks and browns.

Diversity Helpful to Miami

But immigration statistics for those who entered legally underscore dramatic
gains by people of non-European origin. During the 1960's, 1.3 million people
emigrated from Europe. For the decade ending last Sept. 30, European immigration
totaled only 842,000. But during the same periods, Asian immigration jumped from
362,000 to 1.5 million, African from 33,000 to 87,000, South American from
219,000 to 266,000. While Canadian immigration dropped from 304,000 to 115,000,
that from Mexico increased from 432,000 to 624,000.

Changes in the immigration laws became fully effective in 1968, lifting strict
quotas that had been in effect for decades against Asians and others of
different color and tradition than the majority of white Americans. Enacted in
1965, at the height of the civil rights movement, the new law reflected changing
racial attitudes. In addition, countries that had furnished millions of
immigrants earlier in the century became more prosperous and stable, while
people from the third world became the ''huddled masses'' knocking at the
American door. United States involvement in the Vietnam War later made it
imperative to open the door wider to refugees from Indochina. In two years
ending Sept. 30, 111,000 Vietnamese arrived, adding to a total now above one
quarter million. In Los Angeles a few weeks ago, nearly 10,000 aliens, most of
them Indochinese, were sworn in en masse as American citizens.

There are signs that the new immigrants cannot be as easily assimilated as the
Germans, Italians, Irish, Poles and other Europeans who came by the millions for
many d ecades. Struggles continue over where to place the Cuban and Ha itian
boat people who landed in Florida in 1979 and 1980. Illegal e ntry - difficult
to control in an era of international trade and travel - has thrown the
Immigration and Naturalization Service into d isarray. California officials have
been complaining about Asian r efugees overloading state welfare rolls.
Controversies rage over the proposed reimposition of restrictive quotas.

But the United States always has thrived on diversity and the new immigrants in
many respects are adding new dimensions to American life. Many who have come are
entrepreneurs and professionals who in Miami, for example, have prospered and
added to the city's wealth. In New York, scores of newly arrived ethnic groups
are restoring deteriorated neighborhoods and otherwise contributing to the
city's economy.

Asian Indians, Chinese, Filipinos and Japanese now total more than 3 million.
While they live mostly in the West and in the big Eastern and Northern cities,
they are sufficiently spread out to bring cultural diversity to many communities
that had little in the past.  Immigrants from Mexico, long a part of the
Southwest, are settling in small Middle Western towns that had been almost
totally whites of European extraction.

This kind of diversity has been increasing in every region.  Officials say there
is every indication it will continue to grow and America's experience as a
melting pot may lie more in the future than in the past.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: table of 1980 census data on racial groups

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              65 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 5, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICO, THE LATIN PIVO T;
WASHINGTON - Once again, Central America and the Caribbean are back in the
headlines, but this time the Administration response is so muted that the public
may well be puzzled.

BYLINE: By Charles Maechling Jr.

SECTION: Section 1; Page 19, Column 2; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 940 words


Was the charge by Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig Jr. in February that the
Communists had a ''hit list'' of Central American target countries as overblown
as recent analysis of the State Department White Paper would suggest? Is the
Secretary of State still under wraps for diverting attention from the
President's domestic program? Or is there a more important reason - belated
recognition that no credible American policy for the area is possible unless it
takes into account the key element of the equation, Mexico.

President Reagan may not be an expert in foreign affairs but he does know
Mexico. Privately, he regards it as the most delicate problem confronting
American diplomacy - more so than the Soviet Union. Not only do we share a
formidable range of issues along the thousand-mile border - from illegal
immigration and drug smuggling to fisheries and natural gas pricing - but also
Mexico's new oil wealth and emerging role as third-world spokesman add global
dimensions to the former patronizing American relationship with Mexico. And
ticking away south of the border is a demographic time bomb whose fuse runs
through Washington.

Mexico's population is already 70 million with 11 million in the capital alone.
The labor force increases by 800,000 annually yet is still below 25 million,
with underemployment averaging 45 percent. The only safety valve is extensive
emigration to the United States, 95 percent of it illegal.  Twenty-one percent
of the population depends in some degree on a family member in the United
States, and remittances to Mexico are more than $3 billion a year.

Mexico's dilemma of how to support the burgeoning masses while providing
capitalist incentives to fuel the private sector is shared by other developing
countries. Peculiar to Mexico is the national myth that the revolution of 1910
to 28, which tore the country apart, is still going on. The revolutionary ethic
perpetuated by Mexico's dominant Institutional Revolutionary Party constantly
gets in the way of economic modernization, especially in agriculture.  Mexico
now spends $2.2 billion on grain imports without arresting the drift of farm
labor to the cities.

Oil is what keeps the economy viable. Since discovery of huge deposits in the
70's, production has climbed steadily to the present level of 2.3 million
barrels a day with hydrocarbon reserves of more than 70 billion barrels. Mexico
is now the fifth largest petroleum exporter - including a large commitment f or
the United States strategic res erve - and its $14 billion annual hydrocarbon
exports enable it to pay for grain and interest on a foreign debt of $34
billion. Even so, the peso's value falls by 30 percent a year.

The revolutionary ethic also permeates Mexican foreign policy, in part as a
political trade-off for a free market economy and substantial rewards for the
ruling party. President Jose Lopez Portillo has surpassed his predecessors in
dismissing the American perception of leftist insurgencies and a Soviet-Cuban
threat. He regularly caps his meetings with American Presidents - including the
cordial ones with President Reagan - by reaffirming solidarity with Cuba. He not
only continues to support the Sandinist Government of Nicaragua, but in
conjunction with France has just granted status as a ''representative political
force'' to the guerrillas of El Salvador.

Of greater significance is Mexico's emerging leadership in the Western
Hemisphere and the third world. By joining with Venezuela in selling oil to
Central American and Caribbean countries with a 30 percent rebate regardless of
their political coloration and by insisting on similar nondiscrimination in the
Caribbean development plan just floated by the United

States, it has neutralized the only American strategic initiative for the area
to date. When Mr. Lopez Portillo is host for the the 22-nation summit meeting
next month at Cancun - after obtaining the attendance of Mr. Reagan at the
expense of Fidel Castro's -Mexico's leverage should be further enhanced.

In a 1977 interview, Mr. Lopez Portillo said that in relations with the United
States, ''There are no isolated problems; everything is part of everything
else.'' The same is true in reverse. Difficult for American policy makers to
comprehend is that Mexico is now the dominant actor in its region and without
Mexican cooperation American policy initiatives will run aground. Any misguided
counterpressures will only inflame the situation and push the Mexican Government
further to the left, especially if they throw more unemployable people back into
the economy. The last thing a United States Administration needs is a revival of
the Mexican revolution, this time with Marxist overtones.

Mexico is sending us a signal and we had better listen. Either we acknowledge
Mexico's equal standing in the common backya rd or obstruction will continue -
regardless of wha t hostile forces may profit. It is a tribute to President
Reagan's political sensitivity that he recognizes these realities.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
Charles Maechling Jr. is a resident associate at the Carnegie Endowment for
International Peace.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: op-ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              66 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              September 5, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. TRANSFERS 120 HAITIANS TO PRISON IN NEW YORK STATE

BYLINE: By RAYMOND BONNER

SECTION: Section 2; Page 22, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 762 words


More than 120 Haitians were transferred yesterday from a Federal refugee camp
near Miami to a prison in Otisville, N.Y., following a demonstration against
conditions at the refugee camp.

The Haitians, all men, were sent to the Federal prison in Otisville, about 50
miles northwest of New York City. The demonstration, in which food and rocks
were thrown, was in protest of conditions and the prolonged detention of the
Haitians at the Krome Avenue Detention Center in Miami.

Among the group taken to Otisville were 25 to 30 ''instigators of the
disturbance,'' according to Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service in Washington. The others, he said, had escaped during
the demonstration and were later recaptured.

Otisville, a medium-security prison, was selected by officials from the Bureau
of Prisons, he said.  Most of the 300 inmates at Otisville were convicted of
Federal drug offenses and bank robbery, according to Roger Rose, public
information officer at the prison.

Will Be Held at Least 2 Weeks

To keep them separate from the inmates, the Haitians will be detained inside
their cell block, and thus will not have access to the recreation area or
gymnasium, Mr. Rose said.

The Haitians will be detained at Otisville ''a minimum of two weeks,'' according
to Mr. Rose.  ''They have been cooperative despite a lang uage problem, and we
do not anticipate any difficulties,'' he added.  The Haitians, who speak Creole
patois, had been detained in Krome since arriving without visas in late June and
early July, according to Mr. Jervis. In July, 86 Haitians were tran sferred to a
former Navyprison in Brooklyn and 40 to Ray Brook Federa l prison near Lake
Placid.

A Justice Department official said recently that the policy of detaining aliens
seeking asylum is a discretionary one being applied currently only to Haitians.

Release of Haitians Sought

Church leaders and lawyers who have found families willing to house and care for
the Haitians detained in Brooklyn met with immigration officials in New York
this week to ask for their release. According to Ira Gollobin, spokesman for the
private groups, the Government officials said they would consider individual
cases upon receipt of an affidavit that the alien has a ''substantial basis''
for his asylum claim.

Mr. Gollobin, an immigration attorney with the National Council of Churches,
said that this presented the Haitians with an ''undue burden'' that is not
applied to other aliens. He cited an opinion of the United States Supreme Court
that said that detention of aliens seeking asylum ''is generally employed only
as to security risks or those likely to abscond.''

Government officials have said that the Haitians would not present a danger to
the community if released.  Mr. Jervis, the Immigration Service spokesman in
Washington, said yesterday that ''the real test'' of whether an alien should be
released ''is, will this person show up for the proceeding.'' When there is
doubt, he said, a bond is required. He added, however, that it is ''di scr
etionary within the district director to require what hewants'' befor e
releasing an individual.

Disturbance at Krome Recounted

Before yesterday's transfer, of the 1,060 refugees and undocumented aliens at
Krome, about 1,000 were Haitians, according to Mr. Jervis.  Michael Posner,
director of the Lawyers Committee for International Human Rights, said the
disturbance at Krome began after Immigration Service officials had entered the
camp to take away the leaders of a hunger strike that had been going on for
several days. At that point, he said, the Haitians began throwing food and rocks
and escaping through a hole cut in the chain-link, barbed-wire-topped fence.

There have been previous hunger strikes and demonstrations at Krome, but ''the
unusual thing this time was that everyone appeared to be involved, including the
women,'' Mr. Jervis said. ''The situation had been building for some time,'' he
added.

Using tear gas, immigration officials and ''contract guards,'' quelled the
demonstration in about three hours, according to Mr.  Jervis.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of one of the Haitians in the Federal prison in
Otisville

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              67 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 31, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. SEEKS TO DEPORT 40 HAITIANS WHO LACK LEGAL REPRESENTATION

BYLINE: By RAYMOND BONNER

SECTION: Section B; Page 2, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 783 words


The Immigration and Naturalization Service has begun deportation proceedings
against 40 Haitians who are without individual legal assistance and are being
held in a Federal prison near Lake Placid, N.Y.

An alien making an asylum claim has the right to be represented by a lawyer, and
all the Haitians in the prison, at Ray Brook, have requested one. But they
cannot afford to pay, and there are no lawyers in the Lake Placid area to
represent them without charge, according to James Grable, chief legal officer
for the Immigration Service in Buffalo.

Stanley Mailman, a New York City lawyer whose firm is representing several
Haitian refugees being held in a former Navy prison in Brooklyn, has asked the
immigration judge in Buffalo to transfer the cases against the Ray Brook
prisoners to an urban area where immigration lawyers are available. The judge,
Gordon Sacks, has adjourned the proceedings against the Haitians until he rules
on Mr.  Mailman's motion.

Grounds for Gaining Asylum

To establish the right to political asylum, an alien must show that there is
political repression in his country and that he would be persecuted if he
returned.

Last year, a Federal judge in Florida, ruling in another case involving Haitian
refugees, said that on the basis of information from a State Department
official, ''Haiti has been accurately described as 'the most oppressive regime
in the hemisphere.' '' The judge, James Lawrence King of Federal District Court,
ruled in favor of a group of Haitians in a case that accused the Government of
discrimination against them.

Establishing the right to political asylum has been almost impossible for
Haitians. Judge King found that during a nine-month period in 1978 and 1979, the
Immigration Service denied all 589 asylum claims filed by Haitians.

The service has opposed the transfer requested by Mr. Mailman for the Haitians
at Ray Brook. The service says that such a transfer would be an infringement on
its ''exclusive parole authority,'' according to papers that Mr. Grable has
filed with Judge Sacks.

The Need for Witnesses

Mr. Grable also said that there was no evidence that the Haitians ''would be
deprived of access to witnesses or evidence if the hearings are conducted at Ray
Brook.''

However, in a sworn statement filed with Judge Sacks, Mr. Mailman said that
''despite comprehensive efforts,'' a Roman Catholic priest who had been working
on behalf of the Haitians at Ray Brook ''has been unable to locate potential
witnesses who would be able to testify about the current political conditions in
Haiti, or the likelihood that the detainees would be singled out for persecution
upon return to Haiti.''

Those witnesses are primarily among Haitians living in Miami, Mr.  Mailman said
last week.  In mid-July, about 300 Haitians were transferred out of a Federal
refugee camp near Miami. The 40 who are being held at Ray Brook came from there,
as did 83 others who are now in the former Navy prison in Brooklyn. Others are
confined in Federal prisons in Big Spring, Tex., and Morgantown, W. Va. The
policy of imprisoning aliens who arrive without documents is a discretionary one
currently applied only to Haitians, a Justice Department spokesman said last
week.

Dispute Over Transfers

Michael Posner, director of the Lawyers Committee for International Human
Rights, said in an interview last week that the Haitians were transferred out of
Florida because experienced immigration lawyers there were making it difficult
for the Government to carry out its deportation efforts.

Charles Sava, director of the Immigration Service office in New York, said last
week that he did not know why the Haitians had been transferred. Other officials
in the Reagan Administration have said it was because of overcrowding at the
Florida refugee camp.

One of those detained at Ray Brook, 29-year-old Bernard Elsinord, said in an
interview at the prison last week that he and the others there were unable to
pursue their asylum claims effectively while they were imprisoned.

Immigration officials at the prison have helped some of the refugees fill out
their asylum applications. Jane Berger, an attorney with the Lawyers Committee
for International Justice, said that while this assistance was ''well-meaning,''
it was not in the best interests of the refugees because the Immigration
Service's objective was to deport them.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of Haitians detained at Ray Brook Federal prison

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              68 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 30, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

13 INDICTED FOR SMUGGLING 4,000 ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 14, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 413 words

DATELINE: CHICAGO, Aug. 29


Agents of the Immigration and Naturalization Service announced today that they
had broken a smuggling operation that they said had transported 4,000 illegal
aliens from Tijuana and Baja California, Mexico.

Brian R. Perryman, who coordinated the undercover operation, said that late
yesterday a Federal grand jury indicted 13 people in the ring, which, he said,
helped aliens cross the border and stop in Southern California before continuing
on to Chicago.

''We found out about the operation and actually had an undercover agent smuggled
from Tijuana to Chicago,'' Mr. Perryman said.  The 13 were charged with
conspiracy to smuggle, transport and harbor about 4,000 illegal aliens into the
United States from Oct. 6, 1976, to Aug. 6, 1981. Federal District Judge Frank
McGarr issued bench warrants and set bonds ranging from $10,000 to $1 million.

Couple Charged as Leaders

The indictment charged Agustin Castillo, 50 years old, of Los Angeles, and his
wife, Carmen Valencia de Castillo, 50, with setting up the operation. The
Castillos were accused of using their daughter, Maria Carmen Castillo de Gudino,
27, and her husband, Nicolas, of Chicago, to coordinate the settling of aliens
in Chicago and the collection of money.

The smugglers charged $550 to transport an adult and $350 to transport a child,
the authorities said.  ''To ensure the aliens' successful illegal entry into the
U.S.,'' Mr. Perryman said, ''the Castillos employed guides in Mexico who would
lead the aliens across the border, take them to safehouses in Oceanside, Calif.,
and then move them through the Marine Corps base at Camp Pendleton, Calif., by
using Marine Cpl. Santiago Arana, base resident Grace Ochaoa and others to
transport the illegals.''

Checkpoint Avoided

By going through the base, the illegal aliens avoided the immigration checkpoint
at San Clemente, Calif., he said.  ''Once past the checkpoint, they were taken
by other runners to the Castillo residence in Los Angeles,'' he said. ''After
staying there, they would be taken by the Castillos to the Amtrak station and
put on a train bound for Chicago.''

The aliens got off the train at either Joliet or Streator, Ill., where they were
met by members of the ring sent by the Castillos' daughter and son-in-law, Mr.
Perryman said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              69 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 30, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

40 HAITIANS ARE HELD UPSTATE UNDER RIGID CONTROL

BYLINE: By RAYMOND BONNER

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 35, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 669 words

DATELINE: RAY BROOK, N.Y., Aug. 29


Forty Haitians, confined in the Federal prison here are subject to more
stringent controls than those imposed on the convicted inmates, according to the
prison warden. In addition, two of the Haitians have been held in solitary
confinement.

Homes for all the teen-age Haitians, as well as some of the older men, have been
found with families in Rochester but the Federal Immigration and Naturalization
Service has refused to release them, according to John S. Walker, a Baptist
minister and executive secretary of the Black Ministers of Rochester.

The warden of Ray Brook Prison, George Rodgers, said in an interview yesterday
that the Haitians did not have the ''freedom of movement'' of the inmates, most
of whom he said are convicted drug dealers and bank robbers.

The convicted felons are free to play softball, jog or just stroll around the 55
grassy acres when not confined to their rooms. The Haitians are restricted to
their dormitory and a fenced-in blacktop area where they play soccer, although
it is only half the size of a regular soccer field.

The Haitians at this prison in Essex County, near Lake Placid, are men between
the ages of 17 and 59. They were among several hundred transferred in mid-July
from a Federal detention camp near Miami, where they had been detained after
arriving in the country without visas. None have been charged with committing
crimes.

The policy of imprisoning aliens awaiting hearings on their asylum claims is a
discretionary one being applied so far only to Haitians, a spokesman for the
Justice Department said.

Two of the Haitians here were placed in solitary confinement - called
''adminstrative detention'' by prison officials - after one of them, Nicolas
Joseph, 44 years old, last week lay down in front of a truck bringing food. Mr.
Joseph was said to have told other Haitians that he did it to try to get
information about when he was going to be released.

Mr. Rodgers said he would not discuss the incident ''with the news media
present.'' Religious leaders and lawyers at Ray Brook said yesterday that they
had learned that Mr. Joseph had been hospitalized after fainting several times.
Mr. Rodgers would not allow anyone to talk with Mr. Joseph, who he said would be
returned to solitary after treatment.

A reporter visiting the prison yesterday was not allowed to listen as church
leaders talked to the Haitians about their legal rights and listened to their
concerns. He was allowed to talk with only one Haitian, using a government
interpreter.

John L. Niewieroski, the Immigration Service official in charge of the Haitians
at the prison, stood a few feet away during the interview with the other man who
had been placed in ''administrative detention,'' 29-year-old Bernavil Elisnord.

Mr. Elisnord was placed in solitary confinement, he said, because an interpreter
incorrectly told the prison guards that he was encouraging the Haitians to start
a hunger strike.

During his eight days in isolation, Mr. Elisnord said he was allowed outside of
his room only on two days for exercise periods of about 15 minutes, and twice to
shower.

Mr. Elisnord said that several of the Haitians here had wives, brothers and
cousins being detained in Federal facilities in West Virginia and Florida. He
added that the Haitians were upset because they have not received any mail or
visitors.

''What we all want here is to get out of here,'' Mr. Elisnord said. ''If they
could let us out temporarily or transfer us to another area so we could get a
lawyer.''

An Immigration Service lawyer has acknowledged that ''there are no attorneys in
the Buffalo District'' to provide free legal representation for the Haitians.
Because of that, immigration officials have been assisting them in filling out
their applications for asylum.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              70 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 28, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION SERVICE REFUSES TO FREE 83 HAITIANS IN A FORMER NAVY PRISON IN
BROOKLYN

BYLINE: By RAYMOND BONNER

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1112 words


The Immigration and Naturalization Service has refused to release 83 Haitians
from a former Navy prison in Brooklyn where they have been held for more than a
month pending hearings on their requests for political asylum.

Church groups and lawyers seeking the release of the Haitians have found
sponsoring families willing to take responsibility for them, and they criticize
the Government's decision to detain them.

''I don't know of any parallel where people coming to the United States for
asylum have been treated so harshly, have been detained as a group when sponsors
are available,'' said Ira Gollobin, a lawyer representing the National Council
of Churches in behalf of the Haitians.

Goal Is to Reduce Influx

Until recently, ''boat people'' arriving without visas have been released into
the community and given work permits while waiting for action on their asylum
claims. But last month, as part of a program to reduce the influx of illegal
aliens, Attorney General William French Smith recommended that ''the
Administration detain rather than release illegals pending exclusion hearings.''

Among hundreds of boat people who fled Haiti over a period of time, and were
detained in a Federal camp near Miami, the 83 Haitians were transferred to New
York City in mid-July.

Families willing to house and care for them have been found by the National
Council of Churches, the United States Catholic Conference and the Lawyers
Committee for International Human Rights. Earlier this month, lawyers delivered
by hand to the New York District office of the Immigration Service written
requests for the Haitians' release.

Charles Sava, director of the district office, said that the requests were being
handled by his staff and that he did not know when any decisions would be made.
He said the Haitians should not be called ''refugees'' because they were illegal
aliens who had entered the United States without documentation.

1958 Supreme Court Ruling

Lawyers acting for the Haitians cite a 1958 ruling in which the United States
Supreme Court held that detention of aliens seeking asylum was ''the exception,
not the rule, and is generally employed only as to security risks or those
likely to abscond.'' Such a policy, Justice Tom C. Clark wrote in the majority
opinion, ''reflects the humane qualities of an enlightened civilization.''

Michael Posner, director of the Lawyers Committee for International Human
Rights, who is coordinating the efforts of the volunteer lawyers for the
Haitians, called the physical detention ''an example of the new get-tough policy
toward refugees, to discourage others from coming.''

Mr. Gollobin said that tens of thousands of refugees, including Colombians,
Cubans and the Nicaraguans who fled after the 1979 Sandanist victory, had
customarily been released into the community unless they had criminal records. A
spokesman for the Justice Department, Tom Stewart, said yesterday that the
detention policy was ''discretionary'' and that ''at this moment'' it was only
being applied to Haitians.

Besides the 83 Haitians in Brooklyn, 40 are being held at the Federal prison at
the former Olympic Village in Lake Placid, N.Y., and others are in Federal
correctional facilities in West Virginia and Texas.

A Broken Television Set

The 49 Haitian men and 34 women in Brooklyn sleep in bunk beds along the walls
of narrow cell blocks behind black iron bars. For each group, there is a
recreation room with a Ping-Pong table, pay telephones, vending machines behind
a metal fence and a broken television set.

''There's nothing for these people to do,'' said Leonard Gordon, the chief
detention officer at the Brooklyn center.  The primary staples are small amounts
of rice and beans, with chicken on Sunday, the Haitians said. When asked what
they were fed, one group of refugees, speaking Creole patois among themselves,
said finally through their interpreter, ''Leaves.''

It was the only word they could find to describe vegetables that are alien to
their diet. The primary problem with the meals, Mr.  Gordon said, is that the
Haitians are not accustomed to the type of food.

Many Were Farmers

For the Haitians, most of whom are in their 20's and 30's, the fact of
confinement is the main source of anguish. Many were farmers in Haiti. Now, they
are not allowed to go outdoors.

One 23-year-old former farmer, who has a relative living in Brooklyn, said that
in order to see the sun, he stretched to reach the high windows that open only
partially. After more than a month's incarceration the brightness now gives him
headaches, he said.

Last year, the New York Civil Liberties Union filed a lawsuit to close the
Brooklyn detention center on the grounds that it was ''too decrepit, too old and
too filthy,'' said Richard Emery, a lawyer handling the suit. Mr. Emery said
conditions at the facility had since improved, but that it was still
''uninhabitable, even by criminals, which these people are not.''

The Brooklyn facility ''meets the guidelines for short-term detention
facilities,'' said Mr. Sava, the district director.''Beyond that I have no
comment.''

Not Considered Dangerous

The Haitians being held in Brooklyn are ''not considered dangerous,'' Mr.
Gordon, the facility's chief detention officer, said at the facility this week.
''Maybe one out of a hundred'' will cause problems, he said.

Holding the Haitians in prison is an effective means of encouraging them to
return instead of pursuing their asylum claims, Mr. Posner of the lawyers'
committee said. Often in the past, even those who fled Haiti for economic
reasons were considered to be anti-Government and consequently imprisoned upon
their return. But despite fear of what would happen to them, some of the
Haitians are talking about going back to Haiti to escape their confinement in
the United States.

Church leaders and lawyers are to meet with Mr. Sava next week to discuss again
the possibilities of the Haitians being released to the community.

''Leaving aside humanitarianism, why should Government funds be spent at a time
that we're talking about budget cuts, when these people have sponsors,'' said
Mr. Gollobin, the lawyer for the National Council of Churches.

If they are unsuccessful in obtaining the Haitians' release, Mr.  Posner said,
the groups are considering filing a lawsuit.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Haitians in Navy prison in Brooklyn

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              71 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              August 26, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. AND ISRAEL DISAGREE ON GIVING SOVIET CHOICE WHERE TO SETTLE

BYLINE: By BERNARD GWERTZMAN, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1089 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 25


The State Department and a leading American Jewish refugee organization said
today that they opposed an Israeli plan to curtail the flow of Soviet Jews to
countries other than Israel.

The statements, by the State Department and United Hias Service, the immigrant
aid group, reflect a dispute over the growing number of Jews from the Soviet
Union who decide to move to the United States.

Emigration Seen Jeopardized

The Israelis contend that the refusal of many Soviet Jews to settle in Israel
jeopardizes the emigration of others, and Israel has therefore decided to put
pressure on emigres by not helping them go elsewhere unless they have close
family ties in other countries.

State Department officials assert that Israel's new policy derives from its
traditional effort to foster immigration and its frustration at seeing so many
Soviet Jews reject settlement in Israel.

The refusal of the United States Government and Hias to go along with the
Israeli policy will probably offset its impact, a Hias official said, since Jews
would still be able to come to the United States against Israel's wishes.

Israeli and Hias officials said about 85 percent now chose to go from Vienna,
the transit stop, to places other than Israel. Most of them end up in the United
States, and a few in Australia, Canada, New Zealand and Western Europe.

The United States Government is involved because it pays most of the costs
associated with the resettlement of Soviet Jews. It pays Israel, via the United
Israel Appeal, $25 million yearly. It also spends about $1,000 per emigrant
going to countries other than Israel. This came to $15 million last year,
a State Department official said, for a total of $40 million.  Arye Dulzin,
co-chairman of the Jewish Agency, which handles immigration for Israel, said
Thursday that no assistance would be given to Soviet Jews wishing to go anywhere
but Israel. The only exceptions, he said, where those with close relatives
elsewhere,

Before going to Austria, Mr. Dulzin had informed Hias and other Jewish groups
privately of the new policy.  Ambassador Ephraim Evron of Israel conveyed the
same information to Walter J. Stoessel, the Under Secretary of State for
Political Affairs.

Emigration is generally restricted for all Soviet citizens, and Jews have been
in the unusual position of getting permission to leave in substantial numbers.
Some ethnic Germans and Armenians have also been allowed to emigrate.

The Israelis contend that the Soviet Union is allowing Jews to leave on the
ground that they are being reunited with relatives in Israel. As a matter of
administrative practice, Soviet travel documents issued to emigrating Jews list
Israel as their destination. According to the Israeli view, the flow of emigres
to the United States and other countries may deprive the Soviet authorities of
the family reunification rationale and induce them to curtail emigration.

Until last week, Soviet Jews arriving by train in Vienna were met by
representatives of the Jewish Agency. Those expressing a preference for
countries other than Israel were referred to Hias and the American Joint
Distribution Committee, another aid group.

Hias took care of the paperwork involved in travel to the United States or some
other third country. The Joint Distribution Committee handled the living
problems of the emigres, who were usually transferred to Rome to await
processing, a matter of about five weeks.

Edwin Shapiro, president of Hias, said the group had decided that it ''is not
prepared to refuse its services to Soviet Jewish emigrants who have not been
specifically referred by the Jewish Agency.''

The State Department said Israel had not consulted the United States in advance
of announcing the new policy. It said that American policy ''has always been and
will continue to be that Soviet Jewish refugees arriving in Vienna should have
freedom of choice with regard to where they wish to resettle.''

''Once the Soviet refugees have arrived in Vienna, we see no reason why they
should be obliged to go to Israel if other countries are willing to offer
refuge,'' the State Department said.

The following table shows the numbers of Soviet Jews who emigrated and the
percentages of them who went somewhere other than Israel in each of the last 10
years: 1971 13,000 0.4% 1972 31,000 0.7% 1973 34,000 4.1% 1974 20,000 19 % 1975
13,000 37 % 1976 14,000 49 % 1977 16,000 50 % 1978 28,000 58 % 1979 51,000 66 %
1980 21,000 65.4%

Jewish emigration from the Soviet Union has been a major political issue
involving Israel, the United States and the Soviet Union. Limits on the flow
have produced restrictions on United States trade with the Soviet Union, and the
numbers of emigres seem to have been an indicator of the state of
Soviet-American relations.According Leonard Seidenman, Hias executive vice
president, Jewish emigration from the Soviet Union is now running at the lowest
rate since it began in significant numbers in 1971. Up to the middle of August,
7,800 Jews have left the Soviet Union this year, he said.  Mr.  Seidenman said
many reasons were being given for this trend, one being the snowballing effect
of large numbers of immigrants attracting others to the United States.
Furthermore, people first going to Israel find it difficult later to get
permission to emigrate. People coming first to the United States, on the other
hand, can always change their mind, Mr. Seidenman said. Other reasons given deal
with job opportunities and economic conditions in the two countries.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              72 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              August 26, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Jail for Ex-Immigration Aide

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 66 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 25


A former Immigration and Naturalization Service official was sentenced today to
at least six months in prison for tax evasion and for accepting payoffs to help
foreigners, many of them Iranians, file fraudulent immigration papers. Federal
Judge Thomas A. Flannery imposed the sentence on Maron Sheehi, 55 years old, of
Alexandria, Va.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              73 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 23, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CALIFORNIA BECOMES MELTING POT OF 1980'S

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 1, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1742 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, Aug. 21


Over the last decade, California has all but supplanted New York as the
principal ethnic melting pot of America, according to data from the 1980 census.

In a tide of immigration that is reshaping the social, economic and political
life of the nation's most populous state, California has become the port of
entry for tens of thousands of refugees from economic and political troubles
abroad.

''California,'' says Dr. Bertram Brown, a psychiatrist and population researcher
for the Rand Corporation, ''has become the Ellis Island of the 1980's.''

As New York's Ellis Island was the gateway for the great trans-Atlantic tide of
immigration 80 years ago, California's proximity to Latin America and the
Pacific has made it the gateway for the immigrants of the 1980's.

European Immigration Recalled

According to demographers, not since the turn of the century, when millions of
immigrants from southern and eastern Europe flocked to America and settled in
New York and other cities along the East Coast, have so many alien immigrants
from so many countries gravitated to a single region of the country.

There are refugees from Southeast Asia, Cuba, Ethiopia and the Soviet Union, as
well as Taiwanese, Samoans, Koreans, Cubans and uncounted legal and illegal
aliens from Latin America and elsewhere, all shouting, figuratively,
''California or bust,'' as the immigrants from ''back East'' did a hundred years
ago.

Because much of the immigration is illegal, no one knows how many newcomers are
arriving here from abroad. Based on data from the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, however, the legal migration to California from abroad last year is
believed to have ranged from 150,000 to 200,000, including about 50,000
Southeast Asians. The state's total population growth was about 450,000.

Decline in White Proportion

Pat Johnson, a Census Bureau analyst, says that one of the most significant
elements measured by the 1980 census regarding California's population was the
emergence of its polyglot character.

From 1970 to 1980, according to the bureau's figures, the proportion of
California residents who are ''Anglos,'' that is, those whose ethnic roots are
predominately in Western Europe, declined to 76 percent from 89 percent. The
proportion of virtually every other ethnic category increased substantially.

Asians and Pacific Islanders, for example, formed the category that grew most
rapidly, increasing 140 percent, to 1.25 million. The number of Californians
with Hispanic roots, the fastest-growing category in terms of total numbers,
increased 92 percent, to 4.5 million. The state's overall population increased
18.5 percent, to 23.7 million, in the 1970's.

In the same decade California recorded a 30 percent increase in blacks, to 1.8
million, and a 118 percent increase in American Indians, bringing the total to
198,000, more than any other state.

Diverse Cultural Textures

The new wave of immigrants to California is adding diverse cultural textures to
the fabric of life here, providing labor for many industries, affecting and
sometimes overloading social services and public schools, and adding a new, if
uncertain, dimension to the state's political life.

Elected officials have been wondering for years when Hispanic Americans, who now
make up 19 percent of California's population, would be able to transfer this
strength to the ballot box. So far, the state's few Hispanic leaders have not
been very successful in broadening their influence, but politicians here say
they expect them to have at least limited success in current negotiatons over
Congressional redistricting efforts as a result of the census.

The immigration has had a variety of effects on life in California. In places
like Beverly Hills and Marin County, north of San Francisco, money brought by
immigrants from Korea and Hong Kong has been cited as one reason for
California's hyperinflated real estate market over the last six years.

In other areas, those that attract the far larger proportion of immigrants who
come without much money, officials say that tensions are rising between
different ethnic groups because of competition for jobs and housing.

Tensions Likely to Increase

Some officials expect the tensions between people at the lowest rung of the
economic ladder to increase as the size of the minority population grows.

''It's like a keg of dynamite with a one-inch fuse,'' said Fred Koch, a deputy
superintendent of schools in Los Angeles County, who sees tensions mounting,
especially among blacks, Hispanic Americans and Indochinese refugees.

Many of the new immigrants, like their predecessors of 80 years ago, have
settled in California's big cities, and they are creating distinctive ethnic
neighborhoods.

Whole areas of San Francisco look as if they had been transferred from Southeast
Asia. Here in Los Angeles, a city long noted for its freeway-oriented blandness,
local schools now teach students with more than 70 different native tongues. The
city's increased cosmopolitanism has brought an appealing diversity in
restaurants and neighborhoods that are reminiscent of New York.

Much of downtown Los Angeles is now the principal shopping district of its large
population of Mexican immigrants. Along Olympic Boulevard are dozens of shops
and restaurants that cater to a population of Koreans estimated at more than
100,000.

Influx of Indochinese

In the suburb of Monterey Park more than one-third of its residents are Chinese.
More than 10,000 Samoans live in and near the suburb of Carson.

Near San Diego, the semi-rural suburb of Linda Vista has seen its population
increase by almost 50 percent since 1975 because of an influx of more than 7,000
Indochinese refugees.

In Orange County south of here, officials estimate that there are more than
50,000 Indochinese. Some local residents have dubbed the community of
Westminister ''Little Saigon;'' about 6,000 of its 71,000 people are Vietnamese.

Lois Wax, the Orange County refugee coordinator, said the county's public
schools had nearly 10,000 Indochinese children, ''many of whom speak little or
no English.''

America's 'Third-World State'

Representative Mervyn M. Dymally said three years ago, when he was California's
Lieutenant Governor, that the state was on its way to becoming the nation's
first ''third-world state,'' in which a majority of the population would be
members of American racial minority groups.

His prediction has not been fulfilled yet, but population trends are moving in
that direction.  To a large extent, what is happening in California mirrors a
national trend. The 1980 census showed that in the 1970's the proportion of
Americans classified as belonging to racial minorities - essentially, blacks,
Hispanic Americans, Asians, Pacific Islanders and American Indians - increased
to 16.8 percent of the population from 12.5 percent.

In California, the census showed that Asians accounted for 5.3 percent of the
total population. The proportion has undoubtedly grown this year, says Dorothy
Hoag, a state demographer, because of the continuing influx of Indochinese
refugees, who now total almost 200,000.

From 3,000 to 4,000 Indochinese refugees are still being resettled in California
each month, she said, and at least 1,000 a month are moving here on their own
after being resettled in other states.

Rise in Hispanic Population

In terms of net population growth, the number of Hispanic Americans is
increasing even faster; the 1980 census found that they comprised 19.2 percent
of the total population, or about 4.5 million, and blacks comprised almost 8
percent of the total, about 1.8 million.

Statistical trends seem to indicate that these patterns will continue and may
accelerate, demographers say.  As a group, they say, ethnic minorities have a
significantly higher birth rate than the Anglo population; thus, their
proportion of the population is likely to grow at a faster rate than that of
whites.

In 1979, the last year for which figures are available, members of minority
groups made up 40 percent of the students enrolled in the state's public
schools, up from 36.5 percent two years earlier.

Isabel Hambright, a demographer for the State Department of Finance, predicts
that the percentage of minority students will continue to increase. The
proportion of minority children in the population, she said, ''is like a very
broad pyramid,'' with the youngest at the bottom. While Hispanic Americans make
up 19 percent of the state's population, she said, they account for 25 to 30
percent of children under the age of 5.

Larger Share of Immigrants

Besides the natural growth in population, researchers say California is likely
to continue getting more than its share of immigrants; last year the state, with
about 10 percent of the nation's population, accepted at least 20 percent of the
total legal immigration.

Some were Europeans and Canadians. But they were dwarfed statistically by the
much larger tide of immigrants from Latin America and Asia. Indeed, there were
more permanent legal aliens living in California last year from one Asian
country alone, the Philippines, than from all of the nations of Europe.

Dr. Brown, the Rand researcher, said, ''It's like Brighton Beach or Coney Island
in the 20's and 30's,'' a melting pot with a diverse texture of peoples from
different countries and speaking different languages. But in California, he
added, ''they're not European.''

However, Doyce Nunis, a professor of history at the University of Southern
California, said that so far the state's new immigrants are ''more ghettoized''
than ''melted together.''

About 85 languages are now spoken in California, he said. ''What do you do when
there are Vietnamese who don't read or write even their own language? There's no
way to melt them together.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photos of vietnamese students receiving and oral exam

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              74 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 23, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION;
Judge Orders;
Cubans Freed

BYLINE: By Caroline Rand Herron

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 236 words


The fate of Cuban refugees last week came down to the case of a Federal district
judge vs. the Immigration and Naturalization Service. It has been holding 1,800
Cubans in Atlanta's Federal prison for more than a year, during which Carter
policy became Reagan policy and Reagan policy was delayed pending review.

Declaring the formation of a new panel to examine each case starting Sept. 1 ''a
good tune'' that's ''been played too long,'' Judge Marvin H. Shoob ordered 381
of the refugees released - the first 17 left prison yesterday - and issued a
temporary restraining order against deportation of the rest.

The 1,800 refugees are the last to be detained of the 125,000 who arrived on
successive waves of fishing boats and pleasure craft that made up the ''Freedom
Flotilla.'' According to the immigration service, they are being held because of
their criminal records.  According to a classification into 12 subgroups,
ordered last month by Judge Shoob and made public last week, 350 of the refugees
- those ordered freed as soon as sponsors pick them up - are in prison because
they lacked entry papers when they landed in Florida; a number had apparently
been encouraged to report that they had committed crimes in Cuba, to set
appropriately anti-Castro examples for other refugees.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              75 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 23, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

The Last of Castro's Castoffs

SECTION: Section 4; Page 20, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 488 words


No problem arising from last year's ''boatlift'' of 125,000 Cuban refugees is
more vexing than that created by the 1,900 ruled excludable by United States
immigration officials. Normally, aliens with criminal records are promptly
shipped back home, but in this case Cuban President Fidel Castro won't hear of
it. So for more than a year, the 1,900 have remained in a strange limbo. In law,
they have not yet been admitted to the United States. In fact, they are doing
time, hard time, at the Federal penitentiary in Atlanta.

Immigration officials have been unable so far to figure out what else to do with
them, even though a year has passed. All the more reason to praise United States
District Judge Marvin Shoob for the initiative he took this week in Atlanta.
Government handling of the matter is a disgrace, he says. ''You can't hold
people in prison as an alternative to deportation ... it's patently unfair.''

To force the issue, he is insisting that the 1,900 inmates be sorted out. He
wants to release those who pose no danger. But even by relatively lenient
standards, that may only be a few hundred. What about the rest?

Another hundred or so are mentally ill or have been charged with crimes
committed in the United States. They could legitimately be dealt with in
American courts and institutions. That would still leave a thousand or more who
admit to committing serious crimes in Cuba or who give immigration offi-cials
other reasons to believe they came from Cuban prisons. What about them?

The minimally decent answer is for Cuba to take them back. And it is
Washington's policy to try to negotiate just that with Fidel Castro. But he was
evidently unembarrassed to send them - and the rest of the 125,000 - in the
first place. If he keeps on saying no, then what?

Leaving the thousand in prisons indefinitely would raise serious legal and moral
questions, not to mention costing American taxpayers about $15 million a year.
But simply releasing them might create a wholly understandabale storm of protest
in Florida, and other states where Cuban emigres are likely to congregate.

There is a middle way. Washington could create a special probation program for
the inmates it feels reluctant to release. They could be made subject to strict
conditions and close supervision, perhaps in halfway houses in several cities,
with access to social services.  Those who do well in the outside world would
eventually be released and given resident status. Those who violate conditions
of probation could legitimately be returned to custody.

Such a program would require special legislation and supplemental funding. But
it would likely be cheaper than leaving the Cubans in prison. And it would
reflect Judge Shoob's main motive: In contrast to Fidel Castro's callous
conduct, it would be the right thing to do.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              76 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 23, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Practical Traveler;
CLEARING CUSTOMS: STILL A HURDLE

BYLINE: By PAUL GRIMES

SECTION: Section 10; Page 5, Column 1; Travel Desk

LENGTH: 2077 words


If, when international flights are operating normally, you enter the United
States at Kennedy International Airport in New York, you may be walking out of
the arrivals terminal less than half an hour after your plane parks at the
arrival gate. But you stand an equal chance of being delayed two hours or
longer. You may spend perhaps 45 minutes of that time in the parked plane
because a lot of wide-bodied jetliners have landed within a few minutes of each
other and the terminal facilities are jammed.

These estimates come from a variety of sources: Federal and trade surveys,
customs and immigration reports and the observations of airline executives
stationed at Kennedy. According to the latest figures of the United States
Customs Service office in New York, the average time it takes to clear all
formalities at Kennedy, including the claiming of baggage, is 45.5 minutes.

All sources agree that delays are most likely to be encountered in late
afternoon and early evening, when most planes from Europe arrive. The busiest
time of the year is right now, when international travel is normally at its
peak. Despite increased inspection staffs, delays are often ''tremendous,'' in
the words of Donald Burns, manager of public services at Kennedy for the Port
Authority of New York and New Jersey.

Federal authorities are, however, trying to speed up the customs and immigration
procedures at Kennedy, as well as at other major gateway airports. A system
intended to speed immigration procedures for U.S. citizens has already been put
into effect at Kennedy, and an experimental program in which one inspector does
both customs and immigration clearances is being tried in Miami and Los Angeles.
Other improvements, like adding more airports to those - such as those serving
Toronto and Bermuda -where customs and immigration procedures are completed
before boarding the plane, are being studied.

Earlier this year the Federal Office of Management and Budget had proposed deep
cuts in the budget for customs and immigrations inspections. Following protests
by the airline and tourism industries the Customs Service was permitted to have
its normal 176-inspector summertime complement at Kennedy, and the immigration
staff was increased from the usual 150-inspector complement to 170.

While the short-term prospect is for attempts to be made to improve the system
as it now exists, more sweeping changes may be on the way. Last June David A.
Stockman, director of the Office of Management and Budget, wrote to Attorney
General William F. Smith to say, ''The time is ripe for an overhaul of the
inspection process.''

Jacobus J. Dekker, vice president and general manager for the United States for
KLM Royal Dutch Airlines, is chairman of a group called European North Atlantic
Carriers, representing 13 airlines that fly to and from this country. In this
capacity, he recalled to a House subcommittee in June that many of the present
immigration and customs rules and procedures were established in steamship days
when intercontinental travel was leisurely and relatively rare.

''Travel to the United States,'' he said, ''was typified by a few businessmen,
well-to-do vacationers and the great masses sometimes referred to as the
'wretched refuse' from those 'teaming shores' overseas. In those days, customs
and later immigration procedures could develop leisurely approaches to the
problem. Today, however, wide-bodied aircraft bring more passengers into the
United States in a few hours than came in over months by steamship.''

Mr. Dekker's committee - in fact, virtually everyone I questioned except United
States officials - favored what insiders call the ''red door/green door''
inspection system. According to a list provided by the International Air
Transport Association, it is used at international airports in 41 countries,
ranging from underdeveloped New Caledonia in the Pacific to
super-security-minded Israel to virtually all countries in Western Europe.

Under this system a passenger with something to declare is directed by red signs
to a declaration area, where the appropriate duties are collected. A passenger
with nothing to declare walks under a green sign labeled ''nothing to declare.''
He proceeds through a series of gates and aisles, past observing customs
officials who, based on their training, pick out individuals here and there for
spot checks.

Mr. Dekker says that after the system was adopted in Amsterdam, customs revenues
there surged at a rate 28 percent higher than they had been before and that
''substantial increases'' under the system had also been reported elsewhere. The
gains, he said, ''have been attributed by some to the fact that individuals tend
to feel a greater sense of responsibility when customs responsibilities are
placed directly on them.''

Mr. Dekker added, ''It would seem that previously in Europe, when every
passenger had to privately confront a customs official, as they still do in the
United States, some passengers apparently took the position that it was the
customs official's responsibility to find that extra bottle of liquor or that
bologna sandwich. The red door/ green door system relies on the passenger's
desire to avoid the more public embarrassment of being found with the extra
bottle of liquor while standing under the green sign.''

The main United States objection to red door/green door is based on our rigid
agricultural and narcotics laws, under which customs officials feel that at
least some contact between a passenger and an inspector is essential. James R.
Gorson, director of facilitation for the Air Transport Association, an
organization of the American airline industry, says that while his group favors
red door/green door, it recognizes that the United States ''has a $5 billion
agricultural resource to protect.''

A high European airline official, who declined to be quoted by name, retorted
that many other countries have heavy dependence on agriculture and very strict
health controls. He said baggage checks at airports did little to deter the
spread of agricultural disease or narcotics. ''Most crackdowns against drug
traffickers,'' he said, ''come from tipoffs and international police
cooperation, not from inspecting luggage.''

The six-month test program that began Aug. 4 in Miami and Los Angeles (and was
soon impaired by the air controllers' strike) is a sort of compromise between
red door/green door and rigid American procedures. As described by Sidney Reyes,
director of the passenger processing division at United States Customs Service
headquarters in Washington, the program, which bears the name ASIST - the
acronym for ''accelerated special inspection system test,'' works this way:

Certain immigration and customs inspectors are trained to do each other's job.
When a passenger leaves a plane, he is first interviewed by one or the other,
and all hand baggage is inspected thoroughly for agricultural problems. The
interview determines what happens next: Most travelers pay any assessed customs
duty, then are cleared to pick up their checked baggage and head for the exit; a
few are asked to undergo further inspection. Everyone who has been cleared,
however, must pause briefly at the exit gate, and those without a clearance card
or who have aroused suspicion may be turned back.

The anticipated saving in time lies in the fact that the arrival interview takes
place before delivery of checked baggage. The onus is on the airline, therefore,
not the Government, if baggage is not available when the interview ends. A few
days after the test began, however, George Spofford, deputy director of the Dade
County (Fla.) Aviation Department, complained in an interview that inspection of
hand luggage was so much more rigorous in Miami than earlier that new delays
were occurring.

While the experimental programs in Miami and Los Angeles were just getting under
way when the air controller's strike began, the socalled ''citizens' bypass''
program has been in effect at Kennedy for about a year. Airport officials say,
however, that the the Kennedy program has had very little effect. Under the
''citizens' bypass'' procedure, United States nationals have been exempted from
the immigration procedures imposed on foreigners. Baggage, however, has to be
picked up before customs clearance, and delays at claim areas often mean that
foreign passengers frequently catch up with Americans by the time checked
baggage is available. This severely taxed customs inspection and creates delays
for all. According to a Customs Service survey, it takes arriving foreigners an
average of only 3.6 minutes longer than Americans to clear all formalities at
Kennedy.

As one way to speed arrivals in the United States, the Air Tranport Association
is advocating preclearance operations such as those under which, by
international agreement, travelers go through American immigration and customs
procedures at airports in Canada, Bermuda and Freeport and Nassau in the
Bahamas. Mr. Gorson cited Tokyo as a departure gateway where American
preclearance might be feasible, since flights leave there for Guam, Honolulu,
Los Angeles, Seattle, San Francisco, Anchorage, Chicago and New York.

Mr. Dekker of KLM cautions, however, that an American traveler making connecting
flights to return home from Europe would, under a preclearance system, ''have to
request his luggage be unloaded at his last European stop, wait for the luggage
to come down the carousel, stand in a customs line, then load his baggage once
again.'' He sees this as a waste of time and effort by the passenger and a
substantial cost to airlines.

While Government agencies study procedures to speed up the inspection and
clearance process, committees made up of industry, government and airport
officials have been formed to improve procedures generally, notably the
unloading of baggage and its ground transport, two procedures that frequently
cause long delays.

A particularly nettlesome problem, in these days of wide-bodied jets and
computerized ticketing, is the shortage of shopping carts.  Innumerable
passengers, in letters to newspapers and complaints reported by Federal
agencies, have told of frequent scarcities of shopping carts in the
International Arrivals Building at Kennedy, where passengers must claim their
baggage themselves and carry it through customs; porters are not permitted
inside the inspection area. ''It isn't a case that physically we don't have
enough carts,'' said Mr. Burns, the public services manager. ''It's a problem of
having them in the right place at the right time.'' He said it often was a
problem of getting carts from the customs-inspection area, where passengers
abandon them, back to the baggage-claim area, where newly arrived travelers need
them.

Until some improvements in the customs and immigration clearance system are
firmly installed, Mr. Gorson says, passengers should do as much as possible to
help themselves. He urges travelers to:

- Be alert to the requirements of each country they visit, including their own.

- Be aware that they can speed up American formalities considerably if they do
not carry fruits or, say, ''a tasty sausage from Italy,'' which could serve as a
trigger to customs inspectors to search their belongings thoroughly.

- Be sure that foreign-made cameras that they take from home are registered with
customs before they leave. The registration slip will prove that the cameras are
not dutiable upon one's return home.

- Keep a list of purchases abroad, including prices paid. Receipts also may be
helpful.  For detailed tips there is nothing better than the periodically
updated Customs Service leaflet ''Know Before You Go.'' You can get a free copy
by asking for it by name on a 12-cent postcard addressed to the United States
Customs Service, P.O. Box 7118, Washington, D.C.  20044.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              77 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 22, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

17 CUBANS LACKING PAPERS RELEASED AFTER YEAR IN JAIL

BYLINE: By REGINALD STUART, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 766 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, Aug. 21


Freedom became a reality today for 17 Cuban refugees who were detained at the
Federal prison here for more than a year because they did not have proper entry
papers when they came to the United States by sea with more than 124,000 Cuban
refugees.

The Cubans, 13 of whom left by plane for destinations around the country, were
the first of 381 whom a Federal district judge ordered freed Wednesday. Four of
the refugees will live in Atlanta.

In a compromise with the Government today, Judge Marvin H. Shoob modified his
order to give the authorities time to screen those who might be dangerous,

The 17 were among an initial group of 155 whose release was previously cleared
by the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

Fear of Flight Cancellations

There were a few tense moments for several of those who left the city today
because prison officials originally scheduled them on flights that were canceled
because of the air traffic controllers' strike.

The terms for release of the 226 others were worked out in a compromise between
the Government and Judge Shoob.  This morning the judge denied a Government
request that he stay their release pending an administrative review of their
files by Sept. 8.

Instead, the judge agreed to modify his order, allowing the Government to
conduct its reviews in the same amount of time but requiring it to report to him
every three days on which refugees' release had been cleared. That way, he said,
he could be assured that his goal of speeding up the review and release process
would not be frustrated. The process of freeing refugees thus would be able to
continue at a steady pace, he said.

Hearing Scheduled Sept. 9

In his modified order, filed late this afternoon, Judge Shoob set Sept. 9 as the
hearing date for discussion about those in the 226-member group to whom the
Government has objections.

''I'd like to keep this moving in some orderly fashion,'' he told attorneys for
the Government and the refugees at the hearing in his chambers. ''I don't want
to take over the executive function of the Government, but the ones who
shouldn't stay out there ought to be let out.''

Government attorneys advised the judge that they saw no problem with his plan,
although they told reporters later that they were uncertain if it would win the
approval of their superiors in Washington. Those authorities have differed with
Judge Shoob's approach to resolving the refugee cases.

Deborah Ebel, a member of the legal team representing the Cubans, said she had
no objections to the compromise. She said it would keep intact the team's
objective of speeding up the Government process of determining who should be
freed. She said she expected the Government to object to the release of only a
handful of the remaining group, based on the experience this week in screening
those released today.

Deadline for Remaining Cubans

Judge Shoob also gave the Government until Sept. 3 to tell him how quickly it
could complete the reviews of about 1,500 other Cubans detained here. The court
has set up eight subclasses to determine the seriousness of each refufee's
offense. A hearing on these determinations is scheduled Sept. 21.

The Government is expected to maintain that about 400 of the remaining
individuals should not be freed, although the criteria it is using differ from
those being used by the court. Those difference are likely to form the basis of
another round of legal battles.

Once the classifications are made, however, Judge Shoob has said, four
magistrates will join in hearing all of the cases until each has been disposed
of by the court.

Deportations Temporarily Barred

Meanwhile, a temporary restraining order barring the Government from deporting
any of the refugees here remains in effect.  The Government attorneys told Judge
Shoob that two panels of three members each, representing the immigration agency
and the criminal division and Parole Commission of the Justice Department, would
begin reviewing the refugees' files in an attempt to meet his deadlines.

The judge implied that those deadlines could be flexible, as long as the
Government appeared to be moving with dispatch. However, he suggested that the
attorneys advise their superiors in Washington that he thought three panels or
possibly four might be more appropriate.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Jorge Carillo (pg.1)

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              78 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 22, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION WORKERS PICKET TO URGE MORE AID AND STAFF

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 698 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 21


Several hundred employees of the Immigration and Naturalization Service held
protests across the nation today, distributing leaflets or picketing outside
their offices to urge more money and manpower for the agency.

Michael G. Harpold, president of the Immigration and Naturalization Service
Council, which represents more than 5,000 of the 10,000 immigration service
employees, said the protests were meant to ''focus attention on the problems
created by uncontrolled immigration and the Reagan Administration's failure to
properly direct the agency and its employees.''

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the agency, said protests were held in many large
cities where the immigration service has district offices, including Washington,
Chicago, San Diego and Los Angeles. In New York, about 100 protesters held a
peaceful demonstration on Liberty Island near the Statue of Liberty, where they
marched and listened to speakers for about an hour. Mr. Jervis said none of the
protests disrupted Government work.

Leaders of the union, which is affiliated with the American Federation of
Government Employees, said they were not attempting to conduct a work stoppage
and that workers who took part in the demonstrations were on vaction time or
scheduled days off.

Lack of Leadership Assailed

Mr. Harpold said employees were disappointed that President Reagan had not yet
nominated anyone to serve as commissioner of the immigration service. The agency
has been under the direction of acting commissioners since Leonel J. Castillo
left office in September 1979. The current acting commissioner is Doris M.
Meissner.

In early June, Attorney General William French Smith asked Mr.  Reagan to
nominate Norman Braman, a Miami businessman, to be commissioner. Thomas P.
DeCair, a Justice Department spokesman, said today that announcement of Mr.
Braman's nomination was ''imminent.''

Union leaders also said they felt the agency's enforcement divisions were
understaffed and underfunded.

Reagan Requested Extra Funds

President Reagan announced a comprehensive immigration policy July 30. He asked
Congress to appropriate $110 million for the immigration service in the 1982
fiscal year: $40 million for enforcement, $35 million for the detention of
illegal aliens and $35 million for the construction of permanent detention
facilities. This would be in addition to the $363 million budget he had earlier
proposed for the agency.

The Reagan Administration's original budget proposals last March called for a
net reduction of $8 million in the immigration service budget for the next
fiscal year, which begins Oct. 1.

Union officials asserted that there was no guarantee that the additional money
would be approved by Congress, and that most of the proposed additional funds
would go toward detention of illegal aliens, not on border enforcement.
Moreover, they said, there would still be a net reduction of personnel even
under the new proposals.

Charles C. Pappas, a union official in Boston, said that employees there had
presented a petition to the state's Congressional delegation today, asserting
that the agency was ''grossly understaffed and underfunded.''

''Quotas have been elasticized without limit and legal definitions perverted to
suit special interests,'' the petition said. ''We have been ordered to overlook
violations and rubber-stamp approval of immigration benefits.''

The petition urged Congress to set an annual limit of 350,000 on the total
number of legal immigrants and refugees who could be admitted to the United
States. Senator Walter D. Huddleston, Democrat of Kentucky, has made a similar
proposal. Legal immigration to the United States exceeded 800,000 last year.

Mr. Pappas and several other immigration service employees said they feared that
President Reagan's proposals to establish a ''guest worker'' program for Mexican
laborers and to grant a limited amnesty to illegal aliens would compound the
problem of illegal immigration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              79 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 22, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

Haitians Land in Puerto Rico As Expulsion Hearings Start

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 111 words

DATELINE: JUANA DIAZ, P.R., Aug. 21


A fifth planeload of Haitian refugees, including three children, arrived from
Miami today as immigration officials began hearings that may send the refugees
back to their impoverished homeland.

An Air Florida jet arrived at Ponce's Mercedita airport from Miami carrying 96
single men and women and three children who were accompanied by the their
parents.

Immigration and Naturalization Service judges began exclusion hearings today for
28 of the more than 500 Haitian refugees who have arrived in Puerto Rico from
Miami's Krome North camp since Aug.  12.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              80 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 20, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Study Says 510,528 Israelis Emigrated in 10-Year Period

BYLINE: Reuters

SECTION: Section A; Page 8, Column 6; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 61 words

DATELINE: JERUSALEM, Aug. 19


More than a half million Israelis emigrated during the 10 years between 1969 and
1979, and dwindling Jewish immigration failed to fill the gap, according to an
official study quoted today by the Israeli press.

The survey by the Ministry of Labor and Social Welfare said that while 510,528
people emigrated, only 384,000 immigrated to Israel.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              81 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 20, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AGREEMENT REACHED TO FREE IRANIANS FROM UPSTATE PRISON

BYLINE: By LENA WILLIAMS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 2, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 491 words

DATELINE: OTISVILLE, N.Y., Aug. 19


Federal officials agreed to an arrangement late today under which 58 Iranians
who have been held in Federal prison here since Aug. 7 could be released.

The Iranians, who have refused to provide authorities with documentation showing
whether they are in this country legally, agreed to present such evidence, or
face deportation hearings.

Under the arrangement, the Iranians in the group who are found to be legal
residents will be released as early as tomorrow evening, an immigration official
said. Those who do not present evidence of their legal status will have to post
a $1,000 bond pending a hearing.

Refused to Show Evidence

The Iranians were among 67 arrested by immigration officials early this month in
Englewood, N.J., after they refused to show officials evidence that they were in
the country legally.

Government spokesmen have said that the Iranians, who describe themselves as
opponents of the regime of Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini, were arrested in an
apartment in Englewood after neighbors complained.

The Iranians had taken part in demonstrations outside the United Nations and had
been on a hunger strike.  Since their arrest and imprisonment at the Federal
prison in this Orange County village, the Iranians have resumed the hunger
strike, prison officials said. They did not indicate whether they would end the
strike as a result of tonight's agreement.

Claudia Stavisky, one of three lawyers for the Iranians, said that the men -
many of whom say they have relatives in Iran - face ''execution if they return''
to that country.

The arrangement for the Iranians' release, made after discussions between
officials of the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Iranians'
lawyers, was agreed on during a recess of a deportation hearing held today at
the prison.

As part of the arrangement, Federal officials agreed to delay the deportation
scheduled for tonight of an Iranian who had been ordered to leave the country
two years ago but had not done so. He is currently in a Federal jail in New York
City.

Identified as Esmaiel Asadi, 27 years old, the prisoner was given seven days to
get a visa that would allow him to be deported to a country other than Iran.

Miss Stavisky said that the Government's reluctance to defer postponement of Mr.
Asadi's deportation was one of the factors that led to a breakdown of a similar
agreement reached last week with Federal officials. That agreement would have
allowed unconditional releases for many of the 58 men or their release on a $500
bond.

In the only deportation hearing held here today, Judge Nathan Gordon of the
Immigration Service ordered one of the Iranians, who refused to identify
himself, to be deported to France. He has 10 days to appeal the decision.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              82 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              August 19, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

INDIANS GRANTED DELAY ON OUSTER

BYLINE: By WILLIAM ROBBINS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 566 words

DATELINE: BERWYN, Pa., Aug. 18


Shailesh K. Patel seemed stunned. He had just learned that, instead of facing
deportation Sunday, he and his family had 60 more days before an expulsion order
issued by the Immigration and Naturalization Service would go into effect.

Besides that, he was told today, there was a chance for a permanent stay.  ''I
guess I can sleep tonight,'' said Mr. Patel, pausing between chores at his
gasoline station here, where he services automobiles of his Main Line customers.

Mr. Patel, 34 years old, entered the country on a student visa 16 years ago and
has been fighting a legal battle to stay here almost ever since his graduation
from Villanova University. Having exhausted all his appeals, he had been almost
certain that he, his wife and their three children, who are American citizens,
would finally have to go to India.

Many of his customers and neighbors had reacted to the family's plight by
helping pursue last-minute efforts for help.

Specter Announced Relief

The family had already begun to pack up, Mr. Patel said, when word of the
temporary relief, granted by the immigration agency, was announced in Washington
today by Senator Arlen Specter, Republican of Pennsylvania. The Senator had
protested what he termed ''the unconsionable hardship'' for the Patels and had
filed a plea with the agency for reconsideration of its order. Thus far, his
office said, the Senator has had no reply to that appeal except the temporary
postponement of the deportation.

Mr. Specter said he would visit Mr. Patel at the service station and talk with
the family in their home in West Goshen Township in suburban Chester County
tomorrow to determine the degree of hardship and to prepare for possible
introduction of a private bill to gain permanent relief for them in the event
that no other solution could be gained.

President Reagan has proposed an amendment to the immigration law that would
grant amnesty to most aliens now living in the United States, even those who had
entered the country illegally. However, Mr. Specter said today, ''I am concerned
that this extension will not allow sufficient time for passage of the
Administration's proposal.'' For that reason, he added, ''My introduction of a
private bill may be necessary.''

Married in Bombay

Mr. Patel, who holds a degree in mechanical engineering, returned to his native
Bombay after graduation and married, then brought his wife, Premlata, here.

Although the Patels' children were born in the United States, they face possible
forced immigration with their parents to a land whose language they hardly
understand.

Mr. Patel and his wife have been fighting a legal battle to stay, primarily on
the ground that his investment in a service station had met a special-preference
provision of immigration law that was then in effect but has since been
eliminated.

An appeal from an adverse ruling by the immigration agency has been rejected
without a hearing by the United States Court of Appeals for the Third Circuit in
Philadelphia.

''Oh, that is good news!'' exclaimed Mrs. Patel in her home as she heard word by
telephone of the temporary relief.  Now, she said, she could stop packing, at
least for a while.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              83 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 17, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. SET TO START HEARINGS FOR 1,800 JAILED CUBANS

BYLINE: By REGINALD STUART, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 11, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 647 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, Aug. 16


Federal District Judge Marvin Shoob has scheduled a series of hearings, the
first tomorrow morning, for hundreds of Cuban refugees held in United States
prisons since they came to this country more than a year ago with the ''freedom
flotilla.''

The hearings at Federal Court here will consider the cases of about 1,800 Cuban
refugees that the Immigration and Naturalization Service has ruled not
admissible to this country because of their criminal records. The refugees are
the only Cubans still in Federal custody out of 124,789 who came here in the
mass exodus.

Attorneys for the imprisoned Cubans say they hope many will be ordered released
by Judge Shoob soon, possibly several hundred this week. Their optimism is
partly based on recent opinions from Federal judges in several districts. The
judges ordered the release of several Cubans who had been imprisoned for reasons
similar to those that have kept many refugees detained at the Federal
penitentiary here.

2 Refugees Recently Released

The refugees' lawyers also cite two recent orders here, one by Judge Richard
Freeman and the other by Judge Shoob. The orders freed two refugees deemed not
admissible to this country because they did not have proper entry papers, which
few, if any, refugees had at the time of the mass boatlift.

''There are some who have never been convicted of a crime in either Cuba or the
United States,'' said Dale Schwartz, an immigration lawyer whom Judge Shoob has
designated as the refugees' legal counsel.

Last month, in an attempt to expedite resolution of the immigration service's
findings against the refugees, Judge Shoob ordered the Government to divide the
detainees into 12 subgroups based on the crimes they had admitted committing in
Cuba and on charges against them in this country.

The judge's move, viewed by the refugees' lawyers as a major step toward the
Cubans' freedom, resulted in a breakdown that showed a wide variation in the
magnitude of the offenses for which the refugees were being detained.

309 Lacked Entry Papers

For example, the immigration service ruled 309 refugees as not admissible, it
was found, because they did not have entry papers. In light of recent rulings by
Federal judges, this group could be ordered freed by tomorrow night.

The most serious offenses include violent crimes, such as murder and rape, but
the Government does not have a figure for refugees involved in such crimes. In
addition, 100 to 200 refugees have been declared not admissible on grounds they
are criminally insane.

Those accused of the most serious crimes may not be freed as soon as the others,
Mr. Schwartz said, but they may be ordered sent to mental institutions or other
types of prisons as opposed to being held at the aging, crowded prison here.

In January, President Carter proposed the establishment of a three-member panel
to screen each detained refugee and to review the ruling by the immigration
officers who initially determined whether an individual should be admitted or
excluded. Exclusion presents a problem, however, because Cuba has refused to
accept any returned refugees.

Only a handful of detained refugees had been released before President Reagan
delayed the panel's creation last March, pending a review of immigration policy
by an interagency panel.

When the new Administration's immigration policy was unveiled a few weeks ago,
it called for formation of the panel, which is to meet on or before Sept. 1 and
review each refugee's case separately.

Upon hearing of the Reagan Administration's intention to pursue Mr. Carter's
strategy, Judge Shoob said the plan was ''a good tune, but it's been played too
long.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              84 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 16, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

FOLLOW UP ON THE NEWS;
Counting Iranians

BYLINE: By Richard Haitch

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 49, Column 5; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 200 words


Six days after Iranian students seized the United States Embassy in Teheran and
took its occupants hostage, President Jimmy Carter ordered a crackdown on
Iranian students in this country. Four days later, Nov. 14,

1979, the Immigration and Naturalization Service began to examine the
credentials of all such students, with a view to deporting any who were here
illegally. No one knew exactly how many Iranians students were in the United
States; the Government thought perhaps 50,500.

The screening has ended, and 64,328 Iranians have been counted, says Janet
Graham, an Immigration Service public-information specialist. Of the total, she
says, 2,751 have been ejected, 6,274 have left voluntarily and 100 have not been
located.

Meanwhile 3,695 Iranian students have entered legally since Nov.  14, 1979, Miss
Graham notes. The net result, she says, is that there are ''60,000-plus''
Iranian students in the country today - or about 10,000 more than the Carter
Administration believed were here when it began the ''crackdown.'' Richard
Haitch

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              85 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 16, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

DEPORTATION HEARING IS SET FOR JAILED IRANIANS

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 55, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 534 words

DATELINE: OTISVILLE, N.Y., Aug. 15


A tentative agreement that would have allowed 59 jailed Iranians to be released
from a Federal prison here fell through yesterday, and deportation hearings were
scheduled for Monday.

Warden Michael Quinlan had said earlier that attorneys for the Iranians had
reached an agreement Thursday with Federal immigration authorities to release
those with legal student or resident status unconditionally and to release those
whose status was in doubt on $500 bail.

But at the Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service regional office in
Newark, a spokesman, John Gaffney, said the agreement was held up by a dispute
over the status of one of the men.

Immigration authorities were insisting on deporting 27-year-old Esmaiel Asadi,
whose deportation had been ordered in December 1979, Mr. Gaffney said, when
immigration officials in Houston found he had violated his status as a college
student by transferring without approval of authorities.

The deportation order was extended until July 1, 1981. Because Mr.  Asadi had
not turned himself over for deportation, immigration officials were refusing to
release him with the others, Mr. Gaffney said.

Bail Cut From $20,000

As part of the tentative agreement reached Thursday, attorneys for the jailed
men were assured they would be allowed to leave in a group, with bail for those
under investigation reduced from the current $20,000 to $500, Mr. Gaffney said.
But he said yesterday that Mr. Asadi would have to be an exception.

''We're back to square one,'' Warden Quinlan said. He said an administrative law
judge was to begin deportation hearings at the prison Monday morning.

The Iranians, who had been fasting since July 29 as part of a protest against
the Government of Ayatollah Khomeini, had refused to identify themselves to
authorities since they were taken into custody Aug. 5. But they began giving
their names Thursday night, after their attorneys reached the agreement with
immigration authorities, Mr. Quinlan said.

''As far as I know, they're still eating,'' the warden said yesterday afternoon.
Their first full meal was breakfast early yesterday, he said.

Complaints From Neighbors

The 59 were among 67 arrested in Englewood, N.J., on Aug. 5 after neighbors
complained the Iranians, who said they were students, were living in a single
house and sleeping in cars in a parking lot. They were taken into custody when
they refused to produce passports or other identification. Those who provided
sufficient information were released, and the rest were brought to the Federal
prison in this Orange County town on Aug. 7.

On Thursday, attorneys for the detained people filed suit in Federal District
Court in Manhattan seeking their release, on the ground that they were
imprisoned without due process, pending individual deportation hearings. The
suit also asked for compensatory and punitive damages, asserting that the police
entered the New Jersey apartment while the Iranians were sleeping, without a
warrant or probable cause.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              86 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 14, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

INQUIRY IS ASKED IN SEIZURES OF 3 AS POLISH ALIENS

BYLINE: By MATTHEW L. WALD, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 3, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 633 words

DATELINE: HARTFORD, Aug. 13


Senator Christopher J. Dodd said today that he had asked the Immmigration and
Naturalization Service to investigate ''claims of excessive force and hostile
behavior'' by its agents in arresting persons suspected of being Polish aliens.

Senator Dodd, in a letter to the Connecticut district director of the service,
cited three recent instances in which violence accompanied arrests of Polish
aliens or of an American citizen of Polish extraction, including one incident in
which agents chased a van in New Britain, Conn., while trying to shoot out its
tires.

Mr. Dodd's letter was supported by correspondence from an immigration lawyer
detailing allegations of harassment.  Reports of the local police on all three
incidents are sketchy. The immigration service denied allegations that excessive
force was used.

Suit Charges Harassment

The Senator's letter follows the filing of a lawsuit against the immigration
service by Polish aliens, Americans of Polish origin and the Connecticut Civil
Liberties Union. The suit, pending in Federal District Court here, charges
harassment of Polish aliens and naturalized Poles in incidents involving
brutality and warrantless searches.

The court action was taken after a series of raids around the state in the last
two years directed at rounding up Poles who enter the country on tourist visas
and then find work, often staying beyond the visa's expiration.

The letter by Mr. Dodd, a Democrat and a member of the Foreign Relations
Committee, was accompanied by material from an immigration lawyer, Ryszard S.
Mrotek of Hartford, detailing allegations of illegal conduct by immigration
agents in raids on Bongiorno's Supermarket in Stamford on June 18 and Moore's
Tool and Die Company in Stratford on July 24, and in a chase through the north
end of New Britain resulting in an arrest on Aug. 3.

In the Bongiorno Supermarket raid, agents entered the store without a warrant,
according to its manager, Maurice Nizzardo. In a telephone interview, Mr.
Nizzardo said: ''They were grabbing anyone that they thought was of Polish
descent. They more or less randomly went around choosing people.''

Handcuffed and Led Out

Those with little knowledge of English who did not have identification proving
their status as permanent residents were handcuffed behind the back and led out
of the store, Mr. Nizzardo said.

''I myself didn't see the need of these people being handcuffed,'' the manager
sgid. ''They never retaliated against the officers - they were crying.'' He said
several women were among them.

A spokesman for the immigration service denied charges of excessive force in
apprehending Poles, but added, ''There's more force used by Poles generally to
resist their arrest.'' The spokesman, John Weiss, assistant district director,
said he had ''not the foggiest idea'' why this was so.

Working on a tourist visa or overstaying a visa are not criminal charges,
immigration lawyers note, but violations of rules. Under rulings by the United
States Supreme Court, aliens who enter the country legally are entitled to the
constitutional rights of due process.

In the Moore's Tool and Die incident, a part-owner of the company driving to
work with several illegal aliens was apprehended, apparently on suspicion of
being an alien. The police report says that the man, Zenon Mocarski, a
naturalized American citizen, was taken to Bridgeport Hospital for treatment of
injuries sustained in a scuffle with immigration agents.

The agents charged him with assaulting a Federal officer, but the charges were
dropped today in Federal District Court in Bridgeport.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              87 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 11, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Judge Refuses to Block Haitian Ouster Hearings

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 96 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Aug. 10


A Federal judge today rejected an effort to block United States immigration
officials from holding deportation hearings for Haitian refugees scheduled to be
sent to a camp in Puerto Rico.

However, Judge Alcee Hastings gave Federal officials until 5 P.M.  tomorrow to
present a detailed set of guidelines for deportation hearings for Haitians.

Judge Hastings declined a motion for a temporary restraining order to bar
deportation hearings for Haitians sent to Fort Allen in Puerto Rico.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              88 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 9, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. IS FINDING THAT NO ONE WANTS TO ACCEPT LAST CUBAN REFUGEES

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 26, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 932 words

DATELINE: SAN DIEGO, Aug. 5


Federal officials say it is virtually impossible to find a community anywhere in
the country that is willing to accept the final group of 720 Cuban refugees who
emigrated to this country a year ago.

More than 124,000 refugees came to the United States from Cuba last year under
special immigration quotas authorized by the Carter Administration. The vast
majority of the refugees, according to resettlement specialists in the
Department of Health and Human Services, have started new lives in Florida or
were resettled elsewhere around the country

There are now 720 refugees left at Fort Chaffee, Ark., most of them classified
as ''antisocial,'' and, according to Federal officials, no one wants them.

In recent weeks, proposals by voluntary groups and private entrepreneurs to
place the remaining refugees have been blocked in more than a dozen communities
around the country, and the officials say they are running out of towns in which
to consider resettling them.

Uproar Over 20 Cubans

In the suburb of Spring Valley near this pleasant city at the southwestern tip
of the country, for example, a proposal to resettle 20 of the ''antisocial''
Cubans recently touched off an uproar and precipitated a resolution by the San
Diego County Board of Supervisors saying that they were not wanted here.

In New York City this week, Representative Benjamin S. Rosenthal, Democrat of
Queens, protested plans by the department to locate 20 of the ''antisocial''
group in what he called an ''otherwise tranquil and orderly neighborhood'' in
the Corona section and said he wanted the plan stopped.

In Glasgow, Mont., six directors of a publicly owned industrial park, once an
Air Force base, were dismissed by the County Commissioners after it was learned
that the directors had agreed to use the 5,000-acre facility as a resettlement
center for 450 of the Cubans. Residents in Tucson, Kansas City, Rochester and
other cities have similarly moved to block resettlement programs.

Because of the difficulties in resettling the refugees, the Reagan
Administration did not meet its own deadline, set in a promise made to Arkansas
officials, to have all of the Cubans removed from Fort Chaffee by Aug. 1. An
earlier deadline, June 1, had been extended.

Proposal for Air Base

Officials in the department's Office of Refugee Resettlement say they are
continuing to explore the possibility of establishing a permanent detention
center for the most difficult to place refugees.

This week the agency made a new appeal to officials in Glasgow to allow the use
of the former military base there as a permanent detention center. Still,
officials in the agency say they are not optimistic about relocating all of the
remaining Cubans very soon.

''There's no village or hamlet in the country willing to accept the people in
this group,'' an agency official said. ''I guess the public has had it with
refugees.''

A spokesman for the resettlement office said that none of the Cubans classified
as antisocial had serious criminal records and none were mentally ill. But he
said many had been in minor trouble with the law in Cuba, some might be retarded
and most had had chronic difficulty getting along with other people.

Some critics have accused the agency of acting irresponsibly in issuing grants
for resettlement centers without informing community leaders, and a few have
said it was so consciously so that establishment of the resettlement facilities
would be an accomplished fact before people could complain.

Were Not Consulted

In his protest this week calling on Richard S. Schweiker, the Secretary of
Health and Human Services, to withdraw the award of a $189,000 grant for a
resettlement center in Queens, Representative Rosenthal complained that neither
he nor community leaders had been consulted before the grant was made.

Adriann Kivelson, an aide to Mr. Rosenthal in Queens, said: ''When people heard
about it, they were very upset. They heard that these people were hard-core
Cuban refugees, paranoid and antisocial. We got a couple of dozen calls, and
they were all angry.''

Officials elsewhere described similar reactions from the public.  ''People just
went to war over it,'' said Jim Holmes, one of the six officials who lost their
job over the relocation center proposal in Montana. One group, he said, made it
sound as if the refugees were all murderers and rapists and warned that it would
not be safe to walk the streets of Glasgow. ''I guess some people just got
scared,'' he said.

Emotional Issue on Coast

Here in San Diego County, the question of refugee resettlement was an emotional
one in some quarters even before plans were announced in mid-July that a
resident of Spring Valley had applied for a $140,000 grant from the resettlement
office to set up a center for 20 of the antisocial Cubans.

In the last five years, county officials estimate that at least 25,000
Indochinese have moved into the region, with more than 7,000 settling in one
community alone, Linda Visa, increasing its population by almost 50 percent.

Some officials, such as Jim Bates, a county supervisor, complained that the
community was being required to accept a disproportionate share of refugees and
they were beginning to add substantially to social welfare and public education
costs in the community.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              89 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 7, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

THE REGION;
Iranians in Protest Face Deportation

SECTION: Section B; Page 14, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 130 words


NEWARK (UPI) - Deportation proceedings were begun yesterday against 60 Iranian
hunger strikers arrested at an Englewood apartment for failing to identify
themselves to Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service officials.

The 60 men, who took part in a hunger strike from July 30 until Wednesday in New
York in protest against the regime of Ayatollah Ruhollah Khomeini, were arrested
Wednesday. They were charged with failing to show the date, place and manner of
their entry into the country, according to a Government official.

As the deportation proceedings began before immigration judges in Newark, three
dozen Iranian men, women and children demonstrated peacefully outside the Peter
Rodino Federal Building.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              90 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 6, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

UKRAINIAN BOY SEEKS PERMANENT U.S. RESIDENCY

BYLINE: By NATHANIEL SHEPPARD Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 857 words

DATELINE: CHICAGO, Aug. 5


The year-old custody battle between the State of Illinois and the parents of
Walter Polovchak, a 13-year-old Ukrainian boy who does not want to return with
them to the Soviet Union, has taken a new turn with the boy's request for
permanent residency in the Untied States.

The legal dispute has already captured international attention because of the
boy's age and because of the political and diplomatic questions the dispute
raises about the rights of one country to take custody of a child from another
country with differing political and social conditions.

Federal officials have tried to remain in the background of the dispute by
denying any direct involvement, but Federal intervention began two days after
the boy ran away from home, when the Immigration and Naturalization Service
granted him religious asylum.

State Department's Role

Asylum was granted ''on the strength of a State Department request,'' according
to Lloyd Bishop, the agency's acting director here. ''The State Department was
contacted immediately after he applied for asylum,'' Mr. Bishop added, ''and the
decision was made after high-level consultations.''

Spokesmen for the department have maintained since last February that it ''has
taken no direct role in the Polovchak case, which is properly a matter for the
Illinois courts.''

''It is rare that a child of this immaturity would be granted asylum,'' Mr.
Bishop said, adding that although Walter signed his application for asylum,
responses to questions on it appeared to have been printed by someone else.

The application for asylum lists six categories under which aslyum may be
requested, including race, religion, nationality, political opinion and
membership in certain groups.

On the boy's application, the religion and nationality categories were
specified. One question asked: ''If you base your claim for asylum on current
conditions in your country, do these affect your freedom more than the rest of
the country's population?'' Walter's response was, ''Yes, believe freedom of
worship would be denied.''

Another question asked: ''What do you think would happen to you if you
returned?'' The response was, ''Prevented from receiving higher education,
considered suspect, restricted mobility.''

The grant of religious asylum became part of a series of unusual legal actions
that removed Walter and his 18-year-old sister, Natalie, from the custody of
their parents, Anna and Michael Polovchak.

In January 1980, the Polovchak family immigrated to the United States in search
of a better life. Within six months, however, the Polovchaks became
disillusioned with life in America and decided to return to the Soviet Union.

After Mr. Polovchak had indicated his intentions, a nephew who was then living
with them on Chicago's West Side rented an apartment that he offered to share
with the boy and his sister.

Walter and Natalie accepted the offer and ran away from home. The parents
reported them missing and the police found them the next day. However, when the
parents went to pick up their children, Julian E.  Kulas, a Ukranian-born
Chicago lawyer, showed up at the police station and said that the children had
run away to avoid returning to the Soviet Union.

Instead of turning Walter and Natalie over to their parents, the police prepared
a ''minor in need of supervision'' petition and continued to hold them. State
officials filed the petition in juvenile court and, after several days of
hearings, Judge Joseph C.  Mooney of Cook County Juvenile Court placed the
children in the temporary custody of the state. They were later placed with
foster children.

Court testimony verifed that the children had fled because they did not want to
return to the Ukraine. There was no documentation that they were not being
properly cared for by their parents.

Illinois law allows children to be taken from their parents when the child's
''welfare or safety or the protection of the public cannot be adequately
safeguarded without removal.''

A second phase of the juvenile court proceedings will determine the disposition
of the case; that is, who will be given custody of Walter.

The parents have said that they would not fight Natalie's decision to remain in
the United States but they insisted that Walter was too young to make such a
decision. The Polovchaks have another son, who is 7 years old, but no efforts
have been made to remove him from their custody.

Walter has given no direct exposition of his views because attorneys on both
sides have refused to allow him to do so. His parents have insisted that their
son has been ''kidnapped'' by the United States for propaganda purposes.

Mr. Bishop, the immigration official, said that Walter's application for
permanent residency would not receive special treatment except that no final
decision would be made until after the courts had decided on custody.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Walter Polovchak

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              91 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 6, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION OFFICE WORKERS TO RALLY AGAINST U.S. POLICY

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section B; Page 7, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 479 words

DATELINE: EL PASO, Aug. 5


Employees of the United States Immigration and Naturalization Service will hold
a national day of protest Aug.  21 to demonstrate against President Reagan's
approach toward immigration, a Federal union officer said today.

The employees will also protest the agency's financial shortages and Mr.
Reagan's failure to appoint a national director of the agency, said Mike
Harpold, president of the I.N.S. Council of the American Federation of
Government Employees.

''This will be our first nationwide thing, but it may not be our last,'' said
Mr. Harpold, who traveled from San Francisco to El Paso to organize the
demonstration.

He said that the demonstration would not be a strike, but that employees would
set up informational picket lines.

'Important People Functions'

Mr. Harpold said the 9,400 agency employees in the union were concerned that a
lack of leadership and proper policy would lead to inadequate application of
immigration laws.

''These are important people functions that, if done wrong, would be a real
black mark on the United States,'' he said. ''I'm not making a threat. I'm
simply stating a reality that if things go further, the country runs a real risk
of having mistreatment, abuse of rights and internal corruption. That is why we
are acting now.''

Mr. Reagan's proposals for changing immigration policies, especially toward
Mexico, are a matter for extreme concern, Mr.  Harpold said.

The President is publicizing the proposed policy ''as a commitment to enforcing
the border,'' he said. ''But there has been a failure to go forward with any
real immigration policy. Some of the programs will create problems in the areas
where they are supposed to be solving them.''

'Thumbing Their Noses'

Mr. Harpold called the President's recommendation to allow illegal aliens to
become citizens after they have lived in the country for 10 years an
''administrative nightmare.''

He went on, ''We're not prepared to accept something that's not going to work.
What we'll have is people who are here illegally thumbing their noses at people
who try to do it right.''

Mr. Harpold said the union also disagreed with Mr. Reagan's ''guest worker''
proposal that would allow Mexican workers to enter the country for specific
jobs.

''The Administration would like to have a goal of a cheap labor pool in the
United States,'' he said. ''But the Administration is having difficulty squaring
that with what the Select Commission recommended.''

The union favors the recommendations made by the Select Commission on
Immigration and Refugee Policy, which urged stronger border enforcement, more
funding for the I.N.S. and the adoption of sanctions against people who employ
illegal aliens.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              92 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 5, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

ADVISER IN MEXICAN GOVERNMENT ASSAILS REAGAN IMMIGRATION PLAN

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 677 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Aug. 4


Mexico's leading expert on migration, Jorge Bustamante, criticized President
Reagan's immigration proposals today, saying they served the interests of United
States employers and would institutionalize the inferior status of Mexican
workers in this country.

The proposal for a guest worker program, combined with a new legal status for
some of the Mexicans already here without visas, would ''insure employers the
availability of cheap labor,'' Dr.  Bustamante, director of the border studies
program at El Colegio de Mexico, a respected research institute in Mexico City,
said at a news conference here.

The Mexican Government has not officially commented on the Reagan proposals,
which were announced last week. Dr. Bustamante, a sociologist who sometimes
advises the Mexican Government, said that the Reagan Administration policy would
perpetuate a ''subclass of workers'' and would establish a ''reserve army of
labor that will be at the disposal of employers.''

The Administration proposed to admit 50,000 Mexicans a year as temporary workers
in a two-year experimental program. Illegal aliens wishing to regularize their
status could apply to become permanent residents after living here 10 years. In
the waiting period, they would pay Social Security and income taxes but could
not bring their spouses or young children and would not have access to welfare,
food stamps or unemployment insurance.

Plan Is Defended

Attorney General William French Smith said today that he did not pay much heed
to criticism of the Administration's program because it was all directed at
individual elements and because the critics rarely offered a comprehensive
alternative.

Mr. Smith said that the program was designed to deter illegal immigration while
modestly expanding opportunities for legal employment of aliens in the United
States.

However, Dr. Bustamante said: ''All parts of the program are conducive to an
increase in the flow. The announcement of a guest worker program will increase
expectations on the part of Mexican would-be migrants. These persons would come
in larger numbers. This will increase competition and diminish wages.''

For more than 100 years, Dr. Bustamante said, ''Mexican labor has been defined
and conceived by many employers as a natural resource of the Southwest.'' But
''Mexican labor is not cheap by nature,'' he said. ''It is made cheap by the
laws of the United States and the practices of employers.''

'Safety Valve' Theory

The labor market in the Southwestern United States has often been described as a
''safety valve'' for the Mexican economy. But such a view, according to Dr.
Bustamante, ignores the value of the foreign workers to businesses in this
country.

''The United States needs the migrants as it needs energy,'' he said. ''But
undocumented persons are not the same as barrels of oil.  They are human beings,
they have rights.''

Dr. Bustamante said that ''employers of the Southwest would go into bankruptcy
in less than a week'' if the border was closed and all undocumented workers were
sent back to Mexico.

As an alternative, he recommended that ''organized labor in Mexico get together
with organized labor in the United States to define the dimension of the real
demand for migrant workers'' in this country.  Labor leaders, in turn, could
negotiate wages and working conditions with groups of employers in various
industries, he said.

Dr. Bustamante, who holds a Ph.D. from the University of Notre Dame, spoke at a
news conference sponsored by the Council on Hemispheric Affairs, a private,
nonprofit group with a liberal political orientation.

He criticized the Administration's proposal to double the quota for legal
immigration from Mexico on the ground that most of the additional visas would go
to skilled and semiskilled workers of the very type most needed in Mexico.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              93 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 5, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Index;
International

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1190 words


Vietnamese continue to flee despite perils at sea A2
Mrs. Kirkpatrick is outspoken on Latin American tour A3
Torrijos funeral in Panama City draws thousands A3
Mrs. Thatcher's economic plan causes grumbles from Tories A4
Islamic party leader named Prime Minister A4
Around the World A5

Government/Politics
Reporter's Notebook: insulating Reagan from unpopularity A12
Reagan immigration plan assailed by adviser to Mexico A18
Brooklyn Republicans hope to move out of the background B2
Barbaro and Esposito gives views on sanitation issue B3
A Brooklyn Congressman runs afoul of rental authorities B3

General
Around the Nation A10
The Region B2
280 Broadway: a glorious past and an uncertain future B2
The City B3

Industry/Labor
City workers end two-week strike in Providence, R.I.  A10

Health/Science
Physicians say Brady's series of seizures ends A10

Obituaries
Richard Johnston, war corre- spondent and magazine editor A21
500 attend service for Paddy Chayefsky A21

News Analysis
Steven V. Roberts on the issues that await Congress A12
Stuart Taylor Jr. on legal implications of air controllers' strike A14

The Living Section
Food From super sleuths, great meals to die by C1

Dining in Chicago: a metamorphosis C1

Kitchen Equipment C2

Americans in Paris who cook to live C3

60-Minute Gourmet C3

Best Buys C8

Blackberries, gooseberries and currants: treats of summer C9

Wine Talk: A tasting of 27 cabernet sauvignons C14
Living Who's on first? Jim from inventory C1

Metropolitan Diary C2

Personal Health: Dentures that don't fit can cause problems C10

Adri offers resort fashions C10

Discoveries C12

Pets join the summer street circus C13

New Yorkers, etc.  C16

Arts/Entertainment
Yoko Ono discusses her ''Season of Glass'' album C17
''California U.S.A.'' album recreates fun-in-the-sun sound C17
Brooks Jones stages Brecht's ''Man Is Man'' at Summerfare C19
Hawkins company dances ''Parson Weems'' at Summerfare C19
Faulkner signatures on series of letters called fabrications C21
Two-man show, ''The Laundry Hour,'' opens at the Public C21
Audrey Lavine brings a cabaret act to Freddy's C21
English pop quintet, Squeeze, at Dr Pepper Festival C22
Alice Thomas Ellis's ''The Birds of the Air'' is reviewed C22
Berkshire Festival of Contemporary Music visits 1912 C23
Heinz Holliger plays Mozart oboe concerto C23
Adler tries to make philosophy accessible to man in street C24

Sports
Lendl and Clerc win at U.S. clay court championships B4
26 trotters named for Hambleto- nian; field to be split B4
Yankees confident they'll be ready for resumption of play B5
Torre of Mets surveys a shaky pitching staff B5
Marion giving Kelley competition for Giants linebacker spot B5
Fortune finally smiles for Nelson, now with Patriots B5
Baseball players begin contract ratification process B6
Fields back in top form for Jets B6
Red Smith on Robert Moses, the empire builder B7

Features/Notes
Man in the News: Ariel Sharon, new Israeli Defense Minister A6
About New York B3
Going Out Guide C18
Notes on People 183

Editorials/Letters/Op-Ed
Editorials A22

How to wreck low-rent housing A little poverty law Management behind bars
Letters A22
James Reston: The Evening Star - an obituary A23
Russell Baker: Sunday School it's not A23
Howard Metzenbaum, Herman Schwartz: merger madness A23
Stephen Rosen: drugs plus sun equals trouble A23
Niaz A. Naik: the case for Pakistan A23

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              94 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 2, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Other National Events;
Joyless Task on Immigration

BYLINE: By Michael Wright

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 2; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 164 words


After six months of mulling, and with the air of doing its duty, the Reagan
Administration last week produced its immigration policy.  The mulling was
because the problem is enormous. The dutifulness could have come from the
realization that some of the proposals have entrenched and intense opposition.
The Administration wants to outlaw employing illegal aliens and to fine
employers of more than three workers who do; to admit 100,000 Mexican ''guest
workers'' to this country for two years, and to grant amnesty to several million
foreigners now living in the United States illegally. Some analysts doubted that
the package could be enacted as a whole. House bills to sanction employment of
aliens have twice died under pressure from business interests. Hispanic American
and labor leaders fear the guest worker program may displace their constituents.
- Michael Wright

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              95 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                August 2, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

'We've Lost Control of Our Borders'

SECTION: Section 4; Page 20, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 599 words


After several false starts, President Reagan has finally proposed his
immigration reform. But the package is so disappointing one wonders what took so
long. Key features are seriously flawed, almost ludicrously in the matter of
regulating immigrant labor. Congress will not find it helpful in drafting
legislation. And it displays an Administration so irresolute that it raises
doubts about whether whatever Congress enacts will be fairly and vigorously
enforced.

Some facts are faced squarely. We have, as Attorney General Smith concedes,
''lost control of our borders.'' Uncounted millions cross our porous borders in
search of a better life. Like prior immigrants, many enrich our land with
industry. But their numbers are so great that they also strain community
resources and threaten the jobs and well-being of those who preceded them.

Another bow to reality is Mr. Smith's concession that millions of illegals are
here to stay and that some system has to be found to legitimize and integrate
them.

But if the borders can't be closed, the key to control is jobs. A law that
prohibits the employment of illegal aliens is a recognized necessity. But it
will be a new mockery if Congress, like the Administration, flees from
sufficient punishment for violators and from a realistic, fair way to detect
violations.

Employers cannot be held accountable for whom they hire without a reliable way
of verifying the immigration status - whether that be a forgery-proof Social
Security card or some less expensive tool. An expert immigration commission
recognized that fact, as did a White House task force. But for diverse reasons,
including a misplaced concern over this extra measure of business regulation,
the

Reagan Cabinet rejected the idea.  The emptiness of the proposed sanctions
against employers is further betrayed by the proposed maximum penalty of $1,000
for each illegal hire - a mild cost of acquiring workers at many thousands below
scale. Moreover, Mr. Smith would let employers avoid penalty altogether if they
merely ask for such easily forged instruments as a driver's license and paper
Social Security card.
By posing a costly and ominous-sounding ''national identity card'' as the only
alternative, the Administration stacks the deck. Less expensive techniques are
available, including a computer system of telephone verification. The
President's concern for

''our values of individual privacy and freedom'' is welcome, but out of context.
Forgery-proof identification need not invade privacy; but the lack of it could
cost legal aliens their livelihoods.  Cynical employers can easily mask their
discrimination against

Hispanics and other minorities by claiming uncertainty about immigration status.
Some sympathy is warranted for anyone who must wrestle with this vexing problem.
All the issues - the nature and strength of border patrols, the intercepting of
unwanted immigrants at sea, the standards for choosing refugees, the utility of
an ''experiment'' in temporary guest worker employment - are mined with
controversy and expense.

But it is hard to sympathize with an effort that failed so clearly on a central
point. And if a dozen Cabinet officials can't reach accord on sound
recom-mendations, what hope for 500 members of Congress?

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              96 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 1, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

ACRIMONY CONTINUES OVER HAITIAN REFUGEES' FATE

BYLINE: By GREGORY JAYNES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1171 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, July 31


Last week, just after the Government moved 286 Haitians from an overcrowded
detention facility here to similar quarters in New York, West Virginia and
Texas, and just after Florida's Governor sued the Justice Department to
alleviate the overcrowding, and just after attorneys representing the Haitians
brought suit to keep them here within reach of legal counsel, and just before
another group of boats bearing 463 more Haitians washed up on south Florida
shores, the Kiwanis Club of Miami held a meeting.

''Naval blockade!'' yelled an overheated member of the audience.  ''A moratorium
on all immigration!'' The member was among 150 who attended the meeting to give
their opinions to officials of the United States Immigration and Naturalization
Service. Four and a half hours later, the immigration officials said they shared
the residents' concerns but said little more.

Yesterday the Reagan Administration said a great deal more when it announced its
immigration policy in Washington. Included in the policy, parts of which must be
approved by Congress, was a plan to have the Coast Guard intercept boats at sea,
hold on-the-spot hearings and see to the prompt return of the refugees, who, in
the case of the Haitians, have been coming in at the rate of about 15,000 a
year. Civil libertarians expressed outrage.

A statement from the Haitian Refugee Center Inc., a nonprofit advocacy agency
aiding the refugees, said, ''This proposition, while being in violation of
international laws and sovereigntiy of vessels on the high seas, is reminiscent
of the ships of Jews that were refused landing permits during World War II, and
is contrary to the policies which have been encouraged by the U.S. to
Indochinese refugees seeking a country of first asylum.''

Miamians Express Relief

Many Miamians, however, some of whom make a weekend pastime of watching the
rickety, overloaded craft arrive, telephoned radio talk shows to express their
relief.

''It's about time our problem was recognized,'' said Paul T.  Beeman, an editor
with a technical magazine here. ''What would be comparable? Well, say, 12,000
Eskimos turned up in Buffalo. You can bet Buffalo would want the nation to give
a hand.''

The only local quarter that was silent, it seemed, was the 13-acre detention
camp on the edge of the Everglades where 1,338 haitians spent the day as they
have many days past - doing nothing.

Meantime, the Federal Government announced late today that it would transfer 200
more refugees from the camp Sunday morning, sending these to the Federal prison
in Lexington, Ky.

The Krome Avenue camp, named out of convenience for the nearest thoroughfare, is
a former antiaircraft missile base. Designed to accommodate 530 detainees with
an ''emergency'' capacity of 859, it is bursting with humanity and shot through
with acrimony.

Haitians Remain Unaware

The asperity, however, is usually between lawyers and immigration officials,
rarely between aliens and the authorities. This is because the Haitians, who
from all appearances seem to be happy just to have arrived in Miami alive, are
not aware of what is going on, according to their attorneys.

''Oh, I doubt if any one of them has any idea what was said in Washington,''
said Steve Forrester, one of two attorneys handling cases here for the non
Haitian Refugee Center.

At the camp, what was going on were expulsion hearings. Since the
Administration's aim is apparently to provide amnesty for the refugees who
arrived before Jan. 1, and since all the refugees at Krome arrived after that,
these people could be headed back to Haiti shortly. So could 8,500 others who
were ''pardoned'' out of Krome in 1981 to church or family sponsors while the
United States came up with a policy on their status. They remain subject to the
same deportations hearings.

''The official attitude of Krome is that you don't tell people what's going
on,'' said Vera Weiz, the other lawyer from the refugee center. ''If you do,
you're going to have 1,300 unhappy people on your hands. We look at them and we
tell them immigration is going to deport you and they look at you like, 'Huh?' I
mean, somebody has to tell them.''

Few Lawyers Aiding Haitians

The expulsion hearings, at the rate of about thirty people a day, began last
week. They were being held Wednesday in three courtrooms, with three immigration
judges and one lawyer, Mr. Forrester. He filed so many motions that at one point
Judge William F. Nail Jr. told him, ''You're going to motion me to death.''
Among the motions denied was one to move the hearings downtown, where other
lawyers, put off by the hour-long drive to and from the Krome camp, could find
time to represent the Haitians.

''They're overwhelming us,'' said Mr. Forrester, a young, hardworking, earnest
man who comes to his job rumpled; his shirt looks like it was pressed with a
hammer. ''One judge on Monday gave me a week before the second hearing. Another
judge gave me two days for 10 cases. It's impossible and he knows it. It's a
little bit hairy.''

The hearings always end up with an attorney requesting political asylum for his
client.  But the Federal Government contends that the Haitians are not fleeing
political oppression but economic oppression. Therefore, unlike the case up to
now with Cuban refugees, political asylum has been barred to the the Haitians.

Most of the Haitians do not seem to understand the distinction. One young man,
lying on his bunk in a sea of bunks in a hangar at Krome, said through a
Creole-speaking interpreter: ''I don't understand why the question is asked of
us. We are here because we are poor. Our families are poor. We are here to
work.'' Then he went back to playing with the steel casters he had removed from
the feet of his bed, a major source of recreation for young men in the hangar.

In the Krome camp administration building, Sam Brown, an immigration service
officer, was processing new arrivals, typing over and over, ''I came here to
work,'' or some variation, as told to him through an interpreter. Mr. Brown said
he had heard that three more Haitian boats had been sighted off the coast, and
then put his hands together as if to pray it was not so. To the immigration
service, it all seems clear cut: the Haitians entered the country illegally, for
the sole purpose of finding jobs.

Advocates for the Haitians say the refugees also came to escape the repression
of the President for Life, Jean-Claude Duvalier, a fact that usually becomes
known only after the Haitians talk to a lawyer. Unfortunately, the lawyers say,
it comes a little late, because the Haitians are already down on record with the
immigration service as only seeking employment.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 2 photos of Haitian refugees

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              97 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 1, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

CRITICS ATTACK REAGAN ON IMMIGRATION REFORM

BYLINE: By JOHN M. CREWDSON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 852 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, July 31


The Reagan Administration's proposed reforms of the nation's immigration policy
came under attack today from a broad spectrum of critics. They asserted that
elements of the plan were either too large in scope or too small, were unfair to
illegal aliens and native Americans alike, and contained both too little
provision for enforcement and too much.

There were indications today that opposition to the Administration's plan would
come mainly from Hispanic rights and farmworker organizations.

But the attitude among officials of the Immigration and Naturalization Service
was cautiously hopeful.  At the Immigration Counseling Center here, a private
organization that provides assistance to undocumented aliens, ''the phones have
been ringing off the walls,'' according to Rose Lopez,

New York City officials generally praised the proposed immigration policy, but
city groups aiding illegal aliens said the proposals fell far short of a general
amnesty. Page 27.
the center's director. ''Everybody wants to know if they can apply for residence
now. They say they've been here five years, seven years, 10 years. All we can
tell them is to hold on, that it has to be passed into law.''

'Intense' Backlash Predicted

''There's going to be a very intense backlash against the program on all
grounds,'' said Tim Barker, a lawyer with the National Center for Immigrants'
Rights in Los Angeles.

Tony Bonilla, president of the League of United Latin American Citizens, the
nation's largest Hispanic American group, called the requirement that most
immigrants live here 10 years before becoming permanent residents ''tantamount
to establishing serfdom.'' The 3 million to 5 million aliens who may become
eligible for amnesty would be required to pay taxes but denied most forms of
public assistance.

Debate over the temporary worker program centered on its size.  Senator Edward
M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, a member of the Judiciary Committee,
questioned the justification for admitting tens of thousands of Mexican workers
when even larger numbers of Americans were unemployed.

But Senator Harrison Schmitt, Republican of New Mexico, asserted that there were
at least a million jobs that Americans could or would not fill.

Program Seen as Hindering Unions

Mr. Barker and others involved in migrant rights also expressed the concern that
the President's proposed temporary worker program might be used by growers,
particularly in Texas and Arizona, to thwart union organizing efforts.

Several immigration officials along the Mexican border and in Washington
expressed cautious enthusiasm about the Reagan plan.  The officials welcomed in
particular the Administration's proposal to spend some $35 million for a new
holding center for illegal aliens. But some suggested that the proposed addition
of 230 Border Patrol agents might be offset by increased responsibilities that
might arise if a new law were to prohibit most employers from hiring illegal
aliens.

Roger Conner, executive director of the Federation for American Immigration
Reform, who is one of the most vocal critics of the program, pointed out that
the extra guards did not represent a net increase but only restored the
positions cut by the Carter Administration last year.

May Compel New Hiring Policies

Other immigration officials said they would welcome the hiring provision as
likely to give them a legal ''lever'' over those businesses, of which there are
many in the Southwest, that habitually employ illegal aliens.

One executive of a major canning company that employs up to 1,200 unskilled
laborers in certain months of the year said he did not think his operation would
be hampered if employers were held responsible for determining that a worker was
in the country legally.

The proposed law would exempt businesses with fewer than five employees from
civil responsibility. Critics noted that many of these could be the small farms,
restaurants, shops, and janitorial painting contractors that have customarily
employed illegal aliens.

The Reagan Administration has suggested how employers might meet their
responsibilities under the proposed law. It said they could examine any two
pieces of identification offered by a applicant, including a Social Security
card, a driver's license, a birth certificate or a draft registration
certificate. To this, counterfeiters on the Mexican side of the border have
reacted quickly.

''We just arrested a guy yesterday coming across the bridge with 900 phony
Social Security cards,'' said a senior Border Patrol official in south Texas.
''In Chula Vista, it's drivers' licenses.  They're all geared up for it.''
Packages of documents, including an American driver's license, birth certificate
and Social Security card, were selling for $200 in Mexico, he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              98 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               August 1, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

OFFICIALS IN CITY GENERALLY BACK POLICY ON ALIENS

BYLINE: By RONALD SMOTHERS

SECTION: Section 2; Page 27, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 532 words


New York City officials generally praised yesterday portions of President
Reagan's proposed immigration policy, which would establish a legal status and a
waiting period for full citizenship for many of the city's 750,000 undocumented
aliens.

But they said that they would have to study the proposal further to see if it
addressed the peculiarities of the city's illegal-alien problem.

Groups in the city who aid illegal aliens criticized the proposals as falling
far short of a general amnesty. They predicted that few would accept the
restrictions of the ''second-class status'' that they said was implied by the
five-and 10-year waiting periods for full citizenship for those who would be
registered under the President's plan.

Auxiliary Bishop Anthony J. Bevilacqua of the Diocese of Brooklyn, the director
of the diocese's migration and refugee office, called the restrictions
''unrealistic and inhumane.'' Among other things, he said, they would prevent
aliens from bringing their families to this country during the waiting period.

Union Official Is Critical

''In a country that concerns itself with the sanctity of the family,'' said Jay
Mazur, an official of a Chinatown local of the International Ladies Garment
Workers Union, ''this provides no provision for family reunification.''

Mayor Koch praised the proposed new status for the illegal aliens as an
improvement over their present situation, which he said forces them to live in
an atmosphere of fear and ''underground.'' The proposal would allow them to come
''above ground and pay taxes for the services they receive,'' he said. He
pointed out that many now do not seek needed medical care or send their children
to school for fear of discovery.

Koch Concerned About Costs

The Mayor has said repeatedly that any change in Federal policy that affects the
cost of providing services for the aliens should be accompanied by Federal
financing, to cover the increased cost. Aides said that they would study the
prohibition of welfare, housing, food stamps and unemployment assistance for
those awaiting full citizenship, to determine the effect on the city budget.

''I would hope that if the Federal Government regularizes their status, they
will make it possible for the locality to pay for the services they are entitled
to,'' the Mayor said. ''But if they don't, we will provide the services
anyway.''

Employer groups were also concerned about how the proposals addressed the
''economic realities'' of New York, said Kurt Barnard, executive director of the
Federated Apparel Manufacturers, and about proposed civil fines against
employers hiring illegal immigrants. Mr. Barnard said that the legal admission
of foreigners for jobs would not be advisable in New York, where unemployment is
high. He also said that the provision to fine employers who hired illegal
aliens, and the requirement that employers verify the status of job applicants,
was unworkable ''without a foolproof'' identification system.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              99 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 31, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

WHITE HOUSE ASKS A LAW TO BAR JOBS FOR ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 1219 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 30


The Reagan Administration announced its long-awaited immigration policy today,
asking Congress to outlaw the employment of illegal aliens and fine employers
for violations, and suggesting an experimental program admitting ''guest
workers'' from Mexico.

President Reagan and Attorney General William French Smith said that the
admission of 50,000 Mexicans a year in a

Statement by Reagan, page A12.
two-year experiment would not exacerbate unemployment in this country if the
aliens were guided into states and industries where their labor was needed.

At the same time, the Administration vowed to halt the waves of Haitian refugees
arriving in Florida.

'Lost Control of Borders'

''We have lost control of our borders,'' Mr. Smith declared. ''We have pursued
unrealistic policies. We have failed to enforce our laws effectively.''

The heart of the Administration's program is a request for a new law that would
prohibit employers from knowingly hiring illegal aliens. The statute would
impose civil fines of $500 to $1,000 for each illegal alien hired. The Justice
Department could seek court injunctions against employers who showed a ''pattern
or practice'' of hiring illegal aliens.

The proposed penalties, known as employer sanctions, are designed to neutralize
the magnet that attracts so many illegal migrants to this country. Under
President Reagan's proposals, the penalties would not apply to businesses with
three or fewer employees.

Legal Status as Aliens

The Administration also asked Congress to ''recognize reality'' and grant legal
status to some of the estimated three million to six million illegal aliens
living in the United States before Jan. 1, 1980. But there would be two highly
restrictive conditions: All aliens except Haitians and Cubans would have to
reside here 10 years before attaining permanent resident status and during that
period they could not bring their spouses or children under the age of 18 to
this country. For Haitians and Cubans the waiting period would be five years.
Under existing law, Cubans can apply after a one-year waiting period. Permanent
residents are eligible to apply for citizenship after living here five years.

''Last year,'' Mr. Smith said, ''the number of immigrants legally and illegally
entering the United States reached a total possibly greater than any year in our
history.'' The total was more than 800,000. Government statistics show that
immigration exceeded a million in several years early in the century, when laws
were less restrictive.

The Administration has been searching for ways to deal with the immigration
problem since President Reagan took office six months ago. But not wanting to
divert attention from its economic recovery program, the Administration delayed
on announcement of its immigration policy.

The new policy also includes these elements:

- Mr. Smith said that the Coast Guard would soon begin intercepting boats full
of Haitians on the open seas so they could be returned to Haiti. He said there
were ''no fixed procedures'' for ruling on the Haitians' asylum claims.

- The Administration wants Congress to approve $40 million for new enforcement
measures, including additional Border Patrol agents, and $35 million for the
construction of detention facilities where the Federal Government could detain
aliens arriving without visas.

- The Administration wants Congress to double the quota for legal immigration
from Mexico and Canada. The quota is now 20,000 per country. But Canada does not
use all of its current allotment. The effective ceiling for Mexico would
probably rise to 60,000 because Mexicans could use the visas unclaimed by
Canadians.

- The Administration wants to create an expedited procedure for deciding whether
illegal aliens should be expelled or given asylum.  Mr. Smith said there had
been a sharp increase in asylum applications, from 3,800 in 1978 to 19,500 last
year. That does not include 140,000 applications from Cubans and Haitians, he
said.

'Identity Card' Ruled Out

In a statement issued by the White House, President Reagan said today that any
steps taken to deter illegal migration must be ''consistent with our values of
individual privacy and freedom.'' Accordingly, Mr. Smith said, ''The
Administration is explicitly opposed to the creation of a national identity
card.''

The chief problem with the use of employer sanctions has always been finding a
reliable method by which employers could distinguish illegal aliens from
citizens and legal aliens.

The Administration said that employers could meet their legal responsibility in
this respect by examining any two of the following documents: a birth
certificate, a driver's license, a Social Security card or a draft registration
certificate issued by the Selective Service System.

In addition, the new employee would have to sign a form certifying that he was
either a citizen, a lawful permanent resident alien or a foreign worker
participating in an authorized program. The employer would have to certify, in
writing, that he had no reason to doubt the employee's representations.

No 'Discriminatory Judgments'

''Since employers may rely on existing documents and will not be required to
make judgments about the authenticity of the documents,'' the Attorney General
said, ''they would have no occasion to make subjective and possibly
discriminatory judgments about persons who may appear to be foreign.''

Hispanic-American groups criticized the proposal for a 10-year waiting period
for Mexicans and most other aliens now in the country to gain legal status. Tony
Bonilla, national president of the League of United Latin American Citizens,
said it was tantamount to ''Government-sanctioned serfdom'' for the affected
aliens. Vilma Martinez, president of the Mexican American Legal Defense and
Educational Fund, said it was ''the most disturbing and repressive feature'' of
the Administration program.

Under the Reagan proposal, aliens waiting for legalization would pay Social
Security, income and other taxes but would not have access to welfare, federally
assisted housing, food stamps or unemployment insurance.

Illegal aliens are subject to deportation if they are caught. They often lead
shadowy, clandestine lives and are sometimes exploited by employers who know
they are afraid to demand improvements in wages or working conditions.

Congressional Reaction Varies

Members of Congress praised the Administration for tackling a tough issue, but
saw weaknesses in many of the specific proposals.  Representative Dan Lungren,
Republican of California, said, ''This is the first Administration that has had
the guts to come forward with a comprehensive plan, and for that I congratulate
you.''

Senator Walter D. Huddleston, Democrat of Kentucky, faulted the Administration
for not proposing a limit on total immigration. ''You marched right up to the
problem, turned around and marched away again,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              100 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 31, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

PLAN ON IMMIGRATION immigration policy;
News Analysis

BYLINE: By JOHN M. CREWDSON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1334 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, July 30


President Reagan's new immigration proposals would lead to three things:
citizenship for several million foreigners now living in this country illegally,
the admission of 100,000 Mexicans to this country over two years to work at jobs
for which domestic labor is in short supply, and the first Federal law
prohibiting the hiring of illegal aliens by all employers except for the very
smallest concerns.

But one element that is missing, and whose absence could be critical, is some
way by which future illegal aliens can be distinguished from citizens and legal
resident aliens. And some questions emerge about the ultimate viability of the
immigration proposals.

At the basis of the Administration proposals on employer sanctions, temporary
workers and stricter enforcement of the immigration laws is the widely shared
concern that illegal aliens who come here to work will take jobs from Americans
if they are allowed free access to the labor market.

Issue of Displacing Americans

To some degree they do. Last fall, illegal aliens were found to be earning
average salaries of $9,000 a year in some blue-collar suburbs of Chicago in
which unemployment was running at more than 10 percent. But such workers are in
the minority, and the Reagan plan appears to ignore two facts: workers, even
illegal ones, are also consumers and their demand for goods and services creates
more jobs than would otherwise exist, and many of the jobs now held by illegal
aliens would not otherwise exist, at least not at the wage offered.

The call for a new law containing employer sanctions also appears to ignore the
fact that a dozen states have had such laws on the books for years and that they
have proved ineffective. In one such state, California, there are probably more
illegal alien workers than in any other state in the country. Nor has there ever
been any serious attempt to enforce the existing Federal statute that makes it
illegal for farm labor contractors to hire illegal alien workers.

Although the Administration has given assurances that a new law is intended for
use only against concerns that employ significant numbers of illegal aliens, its
passage would put every employer, large and small, in the position of acting as
a kind of immigration officer.

How is an employer to determine whether a job applicant is in this country
legally or not? The Federal Government, by rejecting proposals for a national
worker identity card, or a Social Security card more difficult to counterfeit,
is seeking to impose the burden of the law on the employer without giving him
much assistance, critics accuse.

Problem of Counterfeit Documents

The Administration proposes that the applicant produce such documentation as a
birth certificate and a driver's license. But counterfeit versions of both are
easily obtained all along the Mexican border, and it could be argued that any
law satisfied by such docments would be no law at all.

Testifying Before a joint Congressional committee today, Attorney General
William French Smith said proposals for a national identity card had been
rejected, not out of any distaste for more Government regulation, but because
the cost might have reached $2 billion. The social cost of not developing a new
credential may prove to be even higher, since countless Hispanic and Asian
Americans are now threatened with being required to prove their citizenship to
each prospective employer.

The legal admission of foreign workers is not a new idea, and though the program
put forth by Mr. Reagan is severely limited in scope, there may be lessons for
the United States in the experience of other nations that have tried it. The
countries of Northern Europe began in the early 1960's to import badly needed
factory laborers from Italy, Spain, Algeria and other relatively poor countries
to the south. At the beginning the workers were welcomed as a cheap, highly
mobile labor force.

Now that they are no longer needed, however, it is proving difficult to persuade
them to return home. An estimated 12 million such workers are still in Northern
Europe, and many have clouded their immigration status by marrying local
residents. The lesson of that experience is that guests tend to overstay their
welcome.

Fears of Hispanic Americans

The idea of a temporary worker program angers Hispanic-American and labor
leaders, who fear some constituents may be displaced in the job market. Even
some of the President's supporters wonder whether the limited gains are worth
the political cost.

Though Mexico, where population and unemployment are straining against available
resources, endorses the guest-worker principle as a badly needed economic safety
valve, specialists in the field say the Administration program may prove too
timid in scope to make much real difference to either country.

Nor, they say, will the proposed increase in the number of legal immigrants from
Mexico from 20,000 a year to perhaps 70,000 do much to stem the flow of illegal
aliens. By the Administration's own estimate, two and a half million such aliens
are now entering this country each year, and half a million of them establish
residence here.

Problem at Borders

In his Congressional testimony today, Attorney General Smith acknowledged
something that Administrations have been reluctant to admit: that the United
States had lost control of its borders. He was referring principally to the
nation's southern border with Mexico, but the longer and even more sparsely
patrolled Canadian border is increasingly becoming an entry point for illegal
aliens from Hong Kong, the West Indies and some South American countries.

The cure proposed, at a time when the Administration is cutting the budgets of
many other Federal agencies, is to allocate $75 million more a year for the
Immigration and Naturalization Service and its subagency, the Border Patrol.

Whether more money can do much remains to be seen. It can be argued that more
troops should make some difference, since now there are only 350 Border Patrol
agents guarding the Mexican border at any one time, about the average number of
New York City transit police officers on duty at one time. But this question can
also be posed: Will more border guards not mean that the same illegal aliens are
apprehended more often before making a successful entry?

As some critics of immigration policy have pointed out, to make the Border
Patrol an effective deterrent would require about 2.5 million more officers,
enough to stand shoulder to shoulder in a 2,000-milelong line from Brownsville,
Tex., to San Ysidro, Calif. But in the end, the question of more border guards
and detention centers appears to ignore the evidence that half a million
foreigners a year enter this country legally with valid tourist, business, or
other visas, then stay on with little fear of detection.

The President's proposal for an amnesty that puts three to five million illegal
aliens on the long road to resident alien status and eventual United States
citizenship - five years for most Cubans and Haitians, 10 years for everybody
else - recognizes that it would be physically impossible, short of police-state
methods, to round up and deport the six to 10 million aliens here illegally.

It also takes account of the fact that many of those foreigners have made a
significant contribution to American society over the years, working and paying
taxes, putting their children through school, in some cases owning property and
even small businesses, and that they feel they have earned the right to a legal
share of the American dream.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of Attorney General William French Smith
announcing new

TYPE: Analysis

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              101 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 31, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN'S STATEMENT ON IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 722 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 30


Following is the text of a statement by President Reagan today on immigration:
Our nation is a nation of immigrants. More than any other country, our strength
comes from our own immigrant heritage and our capacity to welcome those from
other lands. No free and prosperous nation can by itself accommodate all those
who seek a better life or flee persecution. We must share this responsibility
with other countries.

The bipartisan select commission which reported this spring concluded that the
Cuban influx to Florida made the United States sharply aware of the need for
more effective immigation policies, and the need for legislation to support
those policies.

For these reasons, I asked the Attorney General last March to chair a task force
on immigration and refugee policy. We discussed the matter when President Lopez
Portillo visited me last month, and we have carefully considered the views of
our Mexican friends. In addition, the Attorney General has consulted with those
concerned in Congress, and in affected states and localities, and with
interested members of the public.

Proposal With Eight Principles

The Attorney General is undertaking administrative actions, and submitting to
Congress, on behalf of the Administration, a legislative package, based on eight
principles. These principles are designed to preserve our tradition of accepting
foreigners to our shores, but to accept them in a controlled and orderly
fashion:

- We shall continue America's tradition as a land that welcomes peoples from
other countries. We shall also, with other countries, continue to share in the
responsibility of welcoming and resettling those who flee oppression.

- At the same time, we must insure adequate legal authority to establish control
over immigration: to enable us, when sudden influxes of foreigners occur, to
decide to whom we grant the status of refugee or asylee; to improve our border
control; to expedite (consistent with fair procedures and our Constitution)
return of those coming here illegally; to strengthen enforcement of our fair
labor standards and laws; and to penalize those who would knowingly encourage
violation of our laws. The steps we take to further these objectives, however,
must also be consistent with our values of individual privacy and freedom.

Ties With Canada and Mexico

- We have a special relationship with our closest neighbors, Canada and Mexico.
Our immigration policy should reflect this relationship.

- We must also recognize that both the United States and Mexico have
historically benefited from Mexicans obtaining employment in the United States.
A number of our states have special labor needs, and we should take these into
account.

- Illegal immigrants in considerable numbers have become productive members of
our society and are a basic part of our work force. Those who have established
equities in the United States should be recognized and accorded legal status. At
the same time, in so doing, we must not encourage illegal immigration.

- We shall strive to distribute fairly, among the various localities of this
country, the impacts of our national immigration and refugee policy; and we
shall improve the capability of those agencies of the Federal Government which
deal with these matters.

- We shall seek new ways to integrate refugees into our society without
nurturing their dependence on welfare.

- Finally, we recognize that immigration and refugee problems require
international solutions; we will seek greater international cooperation in the
resettlement of refugees, and, in the Caribbean basin, international cooperation
to assist accelerated economic development to reduce motivations for illegal
immigration.

Immigration and refugee policy is an important part of our past and fundamental
to our national interest. With the help of the Congress and the American people,
we will work towards a new and realistic immigration policy, a policy that will
be fair to our own citizens while it opens the door of opportunity for those who
seek a new life in America.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Text

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              102 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 30, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

1980 CENSUS FINDS CHINESE SURPASSING JAPANESE AS NATION'S LARGEST ASIAN GROUP

BYLINE: By JOHN HERBERS

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 1025 words


The number of Chinese in the United States has grown so rapidly in recent years
that they now total more than 800,000 and have surpassed the Japanese as the
leading population of Asians in this country, according to 1980 census figures
announced yesterday.

The rapid increase in Chinese and in people from Japan, Korea, the Philippines,
India and Vietnam reflects a surge of immigration in the first decade after the
lifting of restrictive quotas on Asians in the late 1960's.

The people from those six countries make up the majority of the Asian population
in the United States. They have almost doubled since 1970 and now total more
than three million, as measured by the 1980 census.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service confirms the growth. It reported that
1.5 million Asians were legally admitted in the 10 years ended Sept. 30, 1980.

In the decade the number of Chinese increased 85 percent for a 1980 total of
806,000, according to the Bureau of the Census.  A decade earlier, Japanese were
the predominant Asians in America, with 591,000. They grew 19 percent in the
decade, to 701,000 in 1980, but were surpassed not only by Chinese but by
Filipinos. The Filipinos increased their numbers 126 percent, for a 1980
population of 775,000.

Koreans showed the most phenomenal growth, increasing from 69,000 in 1970 to
355,000 in 1980, a growth rate of 413 percent.  Asian Indians numbered 362,000
and Vietnamese 262,000 in 1980.  Neither had ever before been counted before by
the Census Bureau.  But immigration officials said the vast majorities of both
had come to the United States in recent years. Most of the Vietnamese were
refugees who came in under immigration quotas eased especially for those
displaced by the Vietnam War and other disruptions in Southeast Asia.

The increases were made more dramatic by the moderate increase shown by the
United States population as a whole in the 1970's: 11.4 percent. The Census
Bureau announced earlier that according to the count in April 1980, Asians and
Pacific islanders who designated their nation of origin numbered 3.5 million, or
1.5 percent of the population.

Some Groups Not on List

This, however, did not include Asians from certain countries, including
Thailand, Laos, Indonesia and Pakistan. Question 4 of the census form asked
residents to classify themselves as one of 14 designated groups or to check
''other'' and write in what classification they placed themselves in.  These
were the preliminary results: White 188,341,000. Black 26,488,000. American
Indian 1,362,000. Eskimo 42,000. Aleutian Islander 14,177. Chinese 806,000.
Filipino 775,000. Japanese 701,000. Asian Indian 362,000. Korean 355,000.
Vietnamese 262,000. Hawaiian 167,000. Samoan 42,000. Guamanian 32,000. Other
6,737,000.

Improved Methods a Factor

The bureau is to present a breakdown later on those in the ''other'' category.
But it is estimated that 40 percent of those who listed themselves in that
category were Hispanic Americans who consider themselves neither black nor white
but as belonging to a nationality not included on the census form. Many in the
''other'' column were Asians from various countries.

Some of the increase in the major groups was attributed to improved methods of
counting by the Census Bureau, but the census report said most of the increase
was due to ''a high-level immigration.''

For 40 years Asians and Africans were virtually excluded from entering this
country by numerical limitations first prescribed by the Quota Act of 1924,
which allocated entry on the basis of the national origin of the white
population.

Enactment of that law followed expression of fears by some white Americans of
being overrun by hordes of people of a different color, religion and customs. It
was repealed in 1965 and discriminatory quotas ended by 1968.

Current laws permit the entry of 270,000 persons a year, with each nation
limited to 20,000. Exceptions have been made, however, for refugee groups such
as those from Southeast Asia and Cuba, and the quotas do not include relatives
of immigrants who have come into the country legally. Also, there has been a
large increase in recent years in the number of illegal immigrants.

Changes Rule Out Precision

The result is that a much larger percentage of the population is now of Asian,
Latin American or African extraction, even though the Census Bureau's changes in
classifications between 1970 and 1980 prevent precise comparisons. Some persons
who listed themselves as Mexican or Puerto Rican, for example, were listed by
the bureau in 1970 as white.

Bureau officials said a large increase of American Indians, to 1,362,000 from
569,000 in 1970, was a result not only of high birth rates among Indians but
especially of improvements in census procedures in counting people on
reservations. The heaviest concentrations of American Indians were in
California, Oklahoma, Arizona, New Mexico and North Carolina.

Asians have tended to concentrate largely in the West, with California having
the largest number by far of Chinese, Japanese, Filipinos, Koreans and
Vietnamese. surpassing any other state.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: table on populations of five Asian ethnic groups in U.S.
in 1970 and

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              103 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 27, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

THE TWO KINDS OF 'FOREIGNERS' AMONG

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 408 words


USTo the Editor:

Gov. Richard D. Lamm of Colorado errs; he's fallen into the trap.  In his July
12 Op-Ed article, ''America Needs Fewer Immigrants,'' he eloquently sets forth
the frustration all of us have with the weaknesses in American immigration
policy and its implementation, but in his frustration he overgeneralizes and
clouds the issue.v.hile it is true that in local American communities immigrants
look like refugees who look like entrants who look like illegal aliens, there
are in fact important differences. Immigrants and refugees are here by our
choice and arrive in accordance with procedures set forth by our Government.
This is not true of entrants or illegal aliens.

We choose to admit immigrants and refugees for humanitarian reasons and because
it is in the best interests of the United States to do so. This is obviously not
true with entrants or illegal aliens.

There is one additional critical difference. The fact that immigrants and
refugees come here in accordance with our law makes their numbers eminently
controllable. It is, in Governor Lamm's frustration, easy for him to lump all
''foreigners'' into one pile, even though the numbers of legal arrivals
represent the smaller percentage of current total migration into the United
States.

Yes, it is important for the U.S. to rethink its immigration policy in today's
terms. Yes, there does need to be a relationship between conditions here in
America and the numbers of immigrants and refugees admitted each year. No, these
principles do not mean that this country needs to compromise its historic
commitment to a flexible and humane immigration policy or to being the major
haven of those who are truly persecuted.

These issues are too important -life or death for some - for simple answers. Let
us rethink our immigration policy and then enforce compliance with the choices
we've made. But let us be sure that our policy continues to provide a flexible
receptivity to those who would come here in compliance with our laws,
particularly refugees, for whom immigration means liberty.  ROGER P. WINTER
Director United States Committee for Refugees New York, July 15, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              104 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 25, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

EXCERPTS FROM RULING BY FEDERAL JUDGE UPHOLDING THE ABSCAM CONVICTIONS

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 2994 words


Following are excerpts from the ruling by District Judge George C.  Pratt in
which he upheld the convictions of seven Abscam defendants:

Entrapment as a Matter of Law

All defendants urge, as a primary contention, that the indictment should be
dismissed because the Abscam investigation did not uncover criminal conduct, but
instead created and instigated it. This argument challenges the essential nature
of the Government's ''sting'' operation, which presented to defendants a false
and fictitious but convincing ''scenario'' of a wealthy sheik willing to pay
cash for promises of assistance in his immigration to the United States.
Defendants argue that this scenario induced them to participate in criminal
events they otherwise would not have engaged in, simply because absent the
Government's actions they would not have had the opportunity to do so - at least
with this sheik.

The central defect in defendants' argument is that it simply does not represent
the law as established by the United States Supreme Court. Eloquent dissents
have urged that objective entrapment be adopted as a constitutional principle so
that whenever a Government agent provided the impetus for a crime, prosecution
would be barred.  If that were the law, clearly these convictions would have to
be dismissed; indeed, if that were the law, these prosecutions would never have
been brought. However, and as already noted, whenever the dissenting or
concurring Justices on the Supreme Court have urged objective entrapment as a
principle of consitutional law or as a basis for invoking the supervisory power,
the majority has rejected the concept. Thus, except for the possible
availability of an ''outrageous governmental conduct'' argument, discussed
below, defendants' entrapment claims in these cases are restricted to principles
of subjective entrapment, where the creative activity of the Government entraps
into criminal conduct a defendant who was not predisposed to commit the crime.
As already noted, the focus of this defense is upon whether the defendant was
predisposed to commit the crime.

Substantial parts of the memoranda submitted by the Myers defendants focus upon
why this court should apply the principles of objective entrapment. But in view
of the consistent position taken by the United States Supreme Court against the
arguments of its dissenters, it would be improper for this court to decide these
cases by adopting objective entrapment. Presumably, the Supreme Court could
overrule its clear precedents to the contrary and impose such a fundamental
change on our criminal justice system. Similarly, it is within the province of
Congress to define the entrapment defense in objective terms, and the fact that
a number of states have done so might be persuasive argument to a legislator.
But the argument is unpersuasive to this district judge in light of the clear
Federal precedents that reject objective entrapment.

'Outrageous' Government Conduct

Even if objective entrapment is not to be the standard, defendants argue, these
indictments should be dismissed because the Government's handling of the
investigation was ''so outrageous that due process principles would absolutely
bar the Government from invoking judicial processes to obtain a conviction.''
This argument stems from Russell, where Justice Rehnquist, speaking for the
majority, acknowledged that such a situation of ''outrageous'' conduct ''may
some day be presented.'' Justice Rehnquist repeated that, though, in Hampton.

It is important to recognize, however, that in neither Russell nor Hampton was
the questioned governmental conduct held to be ''outrageous.'' Nor has any other
decision of the Supreme Court found lawenforcement officers' conduct to be so
''outrageous'' as to require dismissal of an indictment. Thus, even though the
Supreme Court has yet to be confronted with or to offer a description of
circumstances sufficiently outrageous to warrant dismissal, the governing
principle remains that in some case, under some circumstances, the conduct of
law-enforcement officials may some day bar prosecution. Defendants argue that
those cases, those circumstances, and that conduct have arrived with Abscam.

Clearly, the Government agents created the opportunity for criminal conduct by
offering the bribes. But their involvement falls far short of being
''outrageous'' for two reasons. In the first place, each of the legislators
could simply have said ''no'' to the offer. Three other legislators faced with
identical offers, Senator Pressler, Congressman Patten and Congressman Murtha
did precisely that, as shown by the videotapes in evidence. Second, the extent
of governmental involvement here is far less than that in Hampton, where the
Government not only supplied heroin for the defendant to sell, but also produced
an undercover agent to buy it from him. Even under those circumstances, where
the Government was active in both sides of a narcotics sale, the Supreme Court
did not consider the agents' conduct to be ''outrageous.'' A fortiori here,
where the agents acted only on one side, by offering money to Congressmen in
return for favors, the involvement of the undercover agents was not
''outrageous.''

Selection of 'Targets'

Defendants argue that Abscam was ''outrageous'' because its selection of
Congressional targets was arbitrary and unprincipled.  Early in the first due
process hearing, this court stated that in the absence of evidence to the
contrary it would assume that there was no ''probable cause'' or even
''reasonable suspicion'' which might be used as a predicate for making a bribe
offer to any of the defendant Congressmen. No evidence is before the court that
any of the defendant Congressmen committed any prior similar violations or
engaged in any course of conduct or other circumstances that would warrant
suspicions of criminality in the conduct of their legislative affairs.

Under these circumstances, defendants argue, to permit targets to be selected by
middlemen violated due process because it did not provide sufficient protection
to the innocent. Both legally and factually, the argument fails. On the legal
side, Judge Newman noted on the earlier appeal in Myers that the Constitution
does not require reasonable suspicion before a Congressman may be made the
subject of an undercover sting.

Factually, too, the argument is undercut by what happened with Representative
Patten and Senator Pressler, who had been brought to the undercover agents by
middleman Silvestri. Neither one apparently knew he had been brought before the
sheik's representatives to be offered money in return for a promise of favorable
legislative action. However, neither one was overwhelmed by the circumstances,
and each declined the offer. Pressler, particularly, acted as citizens have a
right to expect their elected representatives to act. He showed a clear
awareness of the line between proper and improper conduct, and despite his
confessed need for campaign money, and despite the additional attractiveness to
him of the payment offered, he nevertheless refused to cross into impropriety.

The court is convinced that the defendant Congressmen appeared through a
''self-selecting'' procedure that involved the other defendants as well. The
agents did not set out to offer bribes to any particular Congressman. They set
no standards, established no criteria. Instead, the middlemen, Errichetti,
Criden and Silvestri, carried the word that money was there for the taking by
any Congressman who would promise to give legislative aid to the sheik's need
for asylum in the United States. Weinberg's description of Abscam accurately
characterizes what happened: ''We put out the word that money was available, we
had a honey pot and the flies came.''

In short, on this record it is clear that those defendants who appeared and
accepted bribes were not ''targets'' in the sense that any Government agent
selected them for some sort of ''honesty test''; instead, each was a willing
volunteer seeking illegal and corrupt payments.

Size of Inducements

All defendants argue that the inducements offered to the Congressmen were
overwhelming, designed to overpower their otherwise adequate resistance and to
induce honest and innocent people to commit a crime they would normally avoid.
Congressmen Myers, Lederer, Thompson and Murphy were each given $50,000. In
addition, each was told that the sheik would invest money in the Congressman's
district. The inducements were clearly improper in the case of the cash
payments, although arguably proper in the case of promised investments.

While there may be ''inducements'' that are ''overwhelming,'' such as a threat
against the life of a loved one, when the inducement is nothing but money or
other personal gain, this court does not believe that the size of the inducement
should be a determinative factor in whether a public official can be prosecuted
for accepting it. No matter how much money is offered to a Government official
as a bribe or gratuity, he should be punished if he accepts. It may be true, as
has been suggested to the court, that ''every man has his price''; but when that
price is money only, the public official should be required to pay the penalty
when he gets caught. In short, as a matter of law, the amount of the financial
inducements here could not render the agents' conduct outrageous or
unconstitutional.

But even if the size of the inducements were relevant, on the facts here they do
not approach ''overwhelming.'' The undercover agents were dealing with members
of Congress, sophisticated people who function at the highest level of our
Government. In these inflationary times, $50,000 is simply not an overpowering
sum of money.

Moreover, there were several participants in each of these transactions, so the
amount of bribe money each Congressman could expect to actually receive varied
from between $5,000 and $20,000.  Furthermore, it is evident that the
inducements offered were not so great as to cause every official who appeared
before the cameras to agree to commit a crime, because Senator Pressler,
Congressman Patten and Congressman Murtha all refused. Taken together, all these
factors make it clear that the inducements offered were not overwhelming.  The
difference between those public officials who took bribes and those who refused
cannot be found by examining the inducements offered. Honest Congressmen would
refuse a bribe offer; dishonest ones took the money.

Need for the Investigative Tactic

A vital factor in evaluating the Government's conduct is whether there was any
particular need for the kind of investigative tactic employed. The Supreme Court
has recognized with drug-related offenses that undercover activities by
Governmental agents is necessary for proper law enforcement.

Although discovered and prosecuted less frequently than drug trafficking,
political corruption through bribery is regrettably found among public
officials, not only in this country but abroad.  While this court is not
prepared to characterize the bribery of public officials as ''a continuing,
though illegal, business enterprise,'' clearly it is not simply a ''sporadic,
isolated criminal incident.'' Like drug offenses, bribery is difficult to
detect. Both are ''victimless crimes'' in the sense that no one with knowledge
of the usual transactions has a motive to report the illegality to law
enforcement officials.

Moreover, with bribery, nothing more is required than the quick passing of money
in return for a promise of performance by the public official of an act that
appears to be an appropriate part of his public duties. With drug deals, at
least one part of the transaction is clearly illegal - the contraband. With
bribery, both parts of the transaction are apparently legitimate: (1) money and
(2) actions by public officials. Detecting bribery, therefore, is probably even
more difficult than detecting drug offenses.

This court believes that the great majority of Government officials, including
those in Congress, are honest, hard-working, dedicated and sincere. However, the
Government needs to have available the weapons of undercover operations,
infiltration of bribery schemes, and ''sting'' operations such as Abscam in
order to expose those officials who are corrupt, to deter others who might be
tempted to be corrupt, and, perhaps most importantly, to praise by negative
example those who are honest and square-dealing. Without the availability of
such tactics, only rarely would the Government be able to expose and prosecute
bribery and other forms of political corruption.

Lack of Reliability

One of the central notions running through the concepts of entrapment,
governmental over-involvement in crime, and due process violations for
''outrageousness'' is a deep judicial concern that juries' convictions be
reliable measures of defendants' culpability.  Courts must intervene when
conduct by a Government agent, or for that matter by any other person, creates a
substantial risk that the ''guilty'' verdict is not a reliable evaluation of
what a defendant did.

With these Abscam verdicts, reliability is high. In each of these cases the
essence of the Goverment's case was found on the videotapes. The full meetings
with Congressmen were recorded from start to finish, with no editing of the
tapes either during or after the meetings. A more reliable basis for conviction
can hardly be imnagined. Through the videotapes, the juries were permitted to
see the actual crimes committed. Compared to the ordinary trial where oral
testimony can at best only partially recreate an event, the reliability of the
Abscam evidence was increased many times over. Not only was there no question of
the actual words used by the participants, but the jury could also perceive the
added dimensions of tone of voice, timing of comments, and even the defendants'
gestures and mannerisms. The issue of ''credibility,'' determining whether the
events occurred as the Government contends, an issue that dominates so many
criminal trials, was virtually eliminated from these trials. Thus, there is
absent from the reliability calculus one of the major hazards to truth and
justice that is present when only oral testimony recreates the events.

Finally, review of the tapes in each case confirms that the jury was not only
authorized, but virtually compelled to find each of the Congressional defendants
guilty.

Conclusion

In these three cases, the Congressional defendants were caught on videotape in
flagrante delicto, accepting money in relation to their official conduct as
public servants. By overwhelming evidence the other defendants were proven
guilty of aiding and abetting the Myers bribery. None of the defendants was a
''deprived'' citizen. All of them occupied honored, well-rewarded, and highly
respected positions in our society. Four of them sat in the highest legislative
body of the country. Another, a former state prosecutor, was a respected lawyer
in a well-known law firm, serving in an ancient and honorable profession. Still
another combined a legal career in the same firm with a political career in
Philadelphia's local government. The seventh occupied a dual position of public
trust as mayor of a large city and State Senator of New Jersey. Despite their
respected and trusted positions, defendants' crass conduct here reveals only
greed, dishonesty and corruption. Their major defense has been that they were
tricked into committing the crime on videotape.

The Government's need to unmask such conduct more than justifies the
investigative techniques employed in these cases. Without question, these
convictions were reliable, and no constitutional right of any defendant has been
infringed. While the Government's conduct of the investigation was not flawless,
the overall work of the F.B.I., of the Eastern District Strike Force and of
their superiors in the Department of Justice reflects a moderate, fair, careful
approach to an undercover investigation which suddenly and expepectedly proved
effective in uncovering corruption in Congress.

After careful consideration of the many problems raised about Abscam over the
course of these cases, which have now covered approximately one year, this court
is satisfied that all of the defendants were proved guilty beyond a reasonable
doubt, that the trials accorded to them were fair, that the arguments advanced
for setting aside the convictions and dismissing the indictments on ''due
process'' grounds are without merit, and that there are no circumstances
requiring a new trial for any of the defendants.

Accordingly, all of defendants' motions directed to the verdicts and to the
indictments are denied. Defendants Myers, Criden, Errichetti, Johanson,
Thompson, Murphy and Lederer are directed to appear before this court in the
ceremonial courtroom of the United States Courthouse, 225 Cadman Plaza East,
Brooklyn, New York, for sentencing on Aug. 13, 1981, at 10 A.M.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Frank Thompson Jr. photo of John M. Murphy
photo of Michael J. Myers photo of Raymond F. Lederer

TYPE: text

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              105 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 25, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

KENNEDY AIRPORT SEEKS TO CUT INSPECTION LINES

BYLINE: By DOROTHY J. GAITER

SECTION: Section 2; Page 26, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1021 words


Federal officials at Kennedy International Airport are trying to cut the long
waits in inspection lines this summer with the addition of more temporary
inspectors, but their hopes for a more permanent solution to the seasonal
logjams rest on an abbreviated inspection system to be tested at two other major
airports.

On July 1, the Immigration and Naturalization Service added the first of 70
additional inspectors, 20 more than last summer, to its lines at the
International Arrivals Building at Kennedy and at the Trans World, Pan American,
American Airlines and British Airways terminals there.

The extra workers brought the total number of inspectors to about 165 -''more
inspectors than at any other time in the history of this service at the
airport,'' said Thomas M. Roland, assistant officer in charge of the Immigration
Service at Kennedy.

''We're hopeful,'' he said, ''that with the addition of these extra people we
can demonstrate that we can handle the problem ourselves.''

Customs Service Augmented

The Customs Service has added 100 temporary employees, the same number as last
summer, to augment its regular work force of 146 cargo inspectors and 125
passenger inspectors.

The agencies that handle international travelers and the industries that benefit
financially from them are concerned that tourists irked by long lines and missed
connections may not return to the New York area.

The delays also have a ripple effect: High-value freight shipments are held up
by the slow-moving lines, as are airplanes that only make money in the air.

''The additional inspectors have to provide some relief, but how much we don't
really know,'' said Jack K. Gartner, assistant manager of the public service
division of the Port Authority of New York and New Jersey, which operates the
airport.

''This is a temporary quick fix,'' he said, ''just for this summer as far as we
know.''

A 'Disaster' Last Summer

''Last summer was a disaster for Kennedy Airport,'' Mr. Gartner added. He said a
total of 236 aircraft had to be held on the ground during the summer,
''inconveniencing 70,000 passengers.''

This, he said, occurred because inadequately staffed inspection lines inside the
International Arrivals Building, which processes half of the passengers from
international flights, were jammed with tourists and their baggage.

It took some passengers as long as three hours to get through as inspectors
struggled to check thoroughly for illegal drugs and disease-bearing foods or
plants as well as foreign visitors who were considered likely to overstay their
visas.

Port Authority staff members have been participating in the state's ''I Love New
York'' promotional campaign for the travel industry in South America, Britain
and several major European cities. ''The single biggest complaint heard at these
seminars,'' Mr. Gartner said, ''was about the extensive delays and the
inconvenience of the Federal inspection process.''

A Change in Travel Market

The long delays began a few years ago when the devaluation of the dollar
reversed the traditional composition of the travel market - to 60 percent
foreign travelers and 40 percent Americans - and the hiring of inspectors did
not keep up with the growing number of noncitizen travelers.

While there seems to be universal agreement about the need to do something to
eliminate the delays, there is continuing discussion locally and nationally over
how to maintain inspection standards while reducing the lines.

Some favor adding more permanent inspectors, which runs counter to the Reagan
Administration's plan to economize by trimming the Federal work force. Others
support a streamlined inspection system proposed by the General Accounting
Office, which some say might make it easier for contraband to be brought into
the United States.

Kennedy Airport officials had hoped that it would be one of at least two
airports permitted to test the accelerated inspection system this summer. Last
year, it handled 6.3 million arrivals, or 31 percent of all international
passengers arriving in the United States by air. But despite an intense lobbying
effort in Washington, Kennedy lost to Miami International Airport, which handled
4.3 million international arrivals last year, and to Los Angeles International
Airport, which processed 2.8 million.

'Could Be Disastrous'

''New York was on the list to be considered, as were other major airports, but
was ruled out because of the problems we could have,'' said Sidney Reyes,
director of the passenger processing division of the Customs Service's Office of
Inspection in Washington. ''It is such a large airport that anything untested
could be disastrous if it didn't work.''

''If the tests prove to be a success,'' he said, ''then steps will be taken to
consider implementing it at J.F.K.'' The test system provides for a one-stop
procedure for all passengers at a primary inspection line staffed by inspectors
who are ''crosstrained'' to screen for the Immigration Service, the Customs
Service and the Agriculture Department.

At that line, the declaration statement filled out by each passenger would be
reviewed and their carry-on baggage would be inspected.

Those requiring additional inspection would be sent to a second inspection line,
while others could pick up their checked baggage and leave. Secondary
inspections would be based on pre-established passenger profiles, the origin of
the flight and sampling or random selection.

Mr. Gartner estimated that more than 90 percent of the passengers would be free
to leave after the first inspection.  ''We can't stick our head in the sand and
say we're just going to continue things the way they've been for umpteen
years,'' said Dennis H. Murphy, a spokesman for the Customs Service. ''We're
putting our heads together and trying to be innovative.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of Kennedy Airport

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              106 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 23, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

OUR MULTIPURPOSE LADY IN THE HARBOR

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 387 words


To the Editor:

In his July 12 Op-Ed article ''America Needs Fewer Immigrants,'' Gov. Richard D.
Lamm of Colorado makes an argument nearly as old as the Republic: Some Americans
have always wanted to pull the ladder up after them.

But in the course of his article he appeals to ''the Lady in the Harbor'' (his
cozy phrase for the Statue of Liberty), saying that, after all, ''she symbolizes
liberty, not immigration.''

She does and she doesn't. Her creator, the sculptor Frederic Auguste Bartholdi,
and his mentor, the French historian and liberal pamphleteer Edouard de
Laboulaye, intended her as a centennial gift to the United States, a handsome
way of rekindling French-American amity strained by French imperial adventures
in Mexico and flirtations with the Confederacy during the Civil War.

But, then as now, fund-raising proved slower than anyone had initially believed,
and the statue was not dedicated until 1886, fully 10 years after the first
target date. Already there was confusion as to just what she stood for.

At the unveiling, President Grover Cleveland said she represented Liberty - but
three years earlier Emma Lazarus had set forth her role as a welcoming beacon to
the earth's ''huddled masses yearning to breathe free.'' The poet James Russell
Lowell saw the power of this imagery instantly: ''Your sonnet,'' he wrote to
Miss Lazarus, ''gave its subject a raison d'etre which it wanted before....''

As the ''Mother of Immigrants,'' she welcomed millions to New York and America.
During World Wars I and II she took on still another role - as a symbol of
national mobilization, standing vigilant watch over American boys as they went
overseas to fight.

As the architectural historian Marvin Trachtenberg has written, what Bartholdi
had ''unwittingly wrought'' was the ''Statue of America.'' At any given time she
means what we mean, and if we mean to turn away ''that worthy individual from a
poverty-stricken country who just wants to do a little better,'' as the Governor
seems to want us to do, I suppose the statue can be made to mean that, too.

It is true, as Governor Lamm writes, that Abraham Lincoln urged us to
''disenthrall ourselves'' from old myths. But he also warned us that ''we cannot
escape history.''
GEOFFREY C. WARD, Editor, American Heritage, New York, July 13, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Drawing

TYPE: Letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              107 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 23, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

NOTES ON PEOPLE;
A Brand-New 99-Year-Old Nephew for Uncle Sam

BYLINE: By Albin Krebs and Robert McG. Thomas Jr.

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 186 words


He knows only four English phrases and can name only three American Presidents,
and that, said the Immigration and Naturalization Service, meant that Gabriel
Isahar Isaharov could not become an American citizen.

But Mr. Isaharov, a 99-year-old Russian immigrant who had dreamed of coming to
the United States for 65 years and finally made it in 1975, is not one to give
up.

So yesterday, aided by an interpreter, he pleaded his case in United States
District Court in Brooklyn, arguing that he should be exempted from the literacy
requirement because of his advanced age.

Unfortunately, argued Howard Baum, a Government lawyer, the law makes no such
provision.  In this case, ruled Judge Henry Bramwell, it does.

''Thank you very much and God bless America,'' said Mr. Isaharov, who was
promptly sworn in as a citizen.

And why had Mr. Isaharov been so determined to become a citizen?  ''Because I
was born free,'' he said, ''and I want to die free as a citizen of this great
country.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Gabriel Isahar Isahaov

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              108 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 21, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

Bad Advice on Immigration

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 489 words


The Cabinet has muffed President Reagan's assignment to help him shape a
comprehensive immigration policy. No system for deciding which aliens enter and
stay in the United States can be cohesive, or even coherent, that fails to
address the question of worker identification.

Unless employers have a sure way of knowing which applicants are legally
eligible to work in the United States, they cannot reasonably be held
accountable for hiring illegal aliens. And if employers cannot be required to
police the effort, there is no reasonable hope of controlling illegal
immigration. It just won't matter how many migrants the Government decides it
wants to admit; without job controls, the nation will be burdened by hundreds of
thousands more than the law allows.

This simple proposition has eluded the Cabinet. It wants the President to
recommend penalties for anyone hiring illegals but to leave the identification
issue up in the air. If Mr. Reagan forwards these incomplete ideas to Congress,
he simply cannot expect to be taken seriously.

This is not, alas, the first evasion of the issue. The Select Commission on
Immigration studied the problem for two years but only a slender majority of its
members faced up to the need for foolproof identification techniques.

Fortunately, the key legislators are familiar with the commission's best
thinking. Senator Alan Simpson, who heads the Senate's immigration subcommittee,
served on the commission and has seen the value of a secure,
counterfeit-resistant permit for all workers. A worthy alternative would be a
labor force communications system by which employers could quickly check the
eligibility of applicants.

Exaggerated concern about privacy adds to the problem. Some fear that a
foolproof identification document would become an all-purpose domestic passport.
That would indeed be unfortunate. But all that is needed is a Social Security
card that cannot be forged.

What frightens the Reagan Cabinet, apparently, is another red herring - the
possibility of excessive Government surveillance of employers. But with a
reliable identification system, Government could enforce the law with minimal
intrusion; it need only inquire whether the employer demanded satisfactory proof
of a worker's eligibility.

The Cabinet's half-measure is actually the most dangerous possible approach. To
make employers culpable for hiring illegals without giving them a reliable means
of checking would encourage them to turn away deserving applicants on a hunch.
Some would shun Hispanics and other minorities altogether. And some would use
concern about identification as a pretext for discrimination.

Mr. Reagan should not endorse, and Congress should not approve, a program so
flawed at the core.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              109 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 21, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

THE DOORS OF ISRAEL MUST REMAIN OPEN FOR ALL JEWS

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 5; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 313 words


To the Editor:

It is difficult to imagine a more deceptive statement than the closing paragraph
of Rabbi Menachem Lubinsky's letter: ''As to the doors of immigration, they
would be as open to them (Jews whose conversions were performed by non-Orthodox
rabbis) as to anyone else.'' abbi Lubinsky knows that Israel's doors are not
open to ''anyone else'' (other than special refugee cases, such as the
Vietnamese boat people, whom Israel has welcomed warmly). They are open to Jews,
as is proper, for Israel was created as a homeland and a haven for Jews, where
they may live as Jews in a Jewish state. That is why the Law of Return was
enacted - to give Jews the automatic right to immigrate to Israel with automatic
citizenship upon their immigration.

In the case of Jews by choice, Rabbi Lubinsky's political party in Israel would
restrict that right to those whose conversions have been performed by Orthodox
rabbis. Thus, at the very gates of Jerusalem, Agudath Israel would set up a
selection process that divides Jews into two classes, those eligible to enter as
Jews and those who, as he put it, ''would have the recourse of going through a
religiously authentic procedure.''

In America and elsewhere, the Reform and Conservative movements have created a
vital framework for preserving Jews and Judaism; in many communities they
constitute the only permanent source of Jewish education, observance and
identification. The vast majority of religious functions, including marriage and
conversion, are performed by non-Orthodox rabbis.

How are the interests of Judaism and of Israel served by declaring thousands of
non-Orthodox converts and their progeny non-Jews?  This is the real issue, and
this the Orthodox movement has refused to confront and failed to answer.
ALBERT VORSPAN, Vice President, Union of American Hebrew Congregations, New
York, July 15, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              110 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 20, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION POLICY MAY OMIT A WORKER-IDENTIFICATION CARD

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 916 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 19


The announcement of a comprehensive immigration policy, delayed by disagreements
among President Reagan's advisers, is expected this week. But the plan may not
include a suggested national identity card.

The announcement is likely, according to Administration officials, to contain
other elements recommended by an 11-member advisory committee headed by Attorney
General William French Smith. But the officials said that some disputed elements
of the report have been diluted.

The committee, for example, had recommended use of a ''more secure Social
Security card'' - a document that could not easily be counterfeited - as
identification for citizens and aliens

Officials began moving Haitians to detention centers around the country,

including two in New York. Page A18.
seeking work in the United States. Administration officials said that the
Cabinet, which reviewed the panel's proposals, then decided that Mr. Reagan
should leave the question of identity cards open, subject to negotiation with
Congress.

Decisions Expected This Week

The full Cabinet did, however, urge that employers be subjected to fines and
other penalties for hiring illegal aliens. What is unclear is whether employers
could be prosecuted for such hiring in the absence of a foolproof method of
verifying the citizenship or immigration status of applicants.

''The Cabinet has finished its work,'' said Thomas P. DeCair, a spokesman for
Attorney General Smith. ''The President has not made any final decisions.'' He
said that the decisions and announcement would come soon after Mr. Reagan
returns from the summit meeting in Canada. He is due back Tuesday.

In reviewing the Smith committee proposals, White House staff members appear to
have stiffened the conditions under which illegal entrants could legitimize
their status. Thus, fewer could qualify soon for status as permanent residents.

A majority of the committee had recommended that illegal aliens who have been
here at least five years should be allowed to apply for permanent resident
status. But in a July 10 ''memorandum for the Cabinet,'' Craig L. Fuller,
director of the Office of Cabinet Administration, and other White House aides
suggested a new option, not in the committee's report. They proposed that aliens
who had entered the country illegally before Jan. 1, 1980, wait 10 years in a
''transient'' status before becoming permanent residents.

Aliens may apply for citizenship after five years as lawful permanent residents.
The memorandum said that the longer waiting period for illegal aliens would
avoid the ''potentally massive demographic and financial impact'' of creating
several million permanent resident aliens.

During the 10-year wait, aliens would not be allowed to bring in spouses or
children, according to the proposal. They would have access to medical services,
but not to welfare, food stamps or unemployment insurance.

In committee meetings, officials of the Departments of State, Justice,
Education, Labor, the Treasury, and Health and Human Services supported a
legalization program, employer sanctions and an experiment in admitting Mexicans
as temporary workers. So did Frank S.M. Hodsoll, deputy assistant to the
President.

''Employer sanctions@ (with a new I.D. card) is the only effective technique''
to stem the flow of illegal migrants, the agencies' statement said. The guest
worker program should include 50,000 Mexicans a year for two years, they said.

Two Oppose the Sanctions

But employer sanctions were opposed by the Office of Management and Budget, the
Transportation Department and Martin Anderson, President Reagan's domestic
policy adviser, who was not technically a member of the committee. They favored
a more limited legalization program and a large temporary worker program,
authorizing jobs for as many as 600,000 Mexicans, including 300,000 already
here.

The committee report said this option ''would not prohibit employers from hiring
illegal aliens.'' The temporary worker program, it said, ''could be a principal
element of expanded bilateral relations,'' even though ''recent discussions with
the Mexicans do not indicate great interest in such a program.'' The committee's
other members were the Secretary of Defense and the director of the Federal
Emergency Management Agency.

Administration officials said that the Cabinet had urged the President to pursue
a strategy of ''selective interdiction,'' to intercept boats carrying Haitians
and other aliens to the United States without visas. This effort, estimated to
cost $10 million a year, would not divert significant Coast Guard resources from
drug enforcement or rescue, according to the Cabinet memorandum.

The advisory committee proposed Federal ''holding centers'' for detaining
illegal aliens as they arrive in the United States. The Cabinet endorsed this,
but said it might create political problems around the camps.

The Cabinet also urged that the President propose legislation to speed up
proceedings for expelling certain newly arrived aliens. The proceedings are slow
and ''completely unworkable'' in the event of a mass influx of aliens, Mr.
Smith's committee said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              111 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 20, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIANS ARRIVE IN BROOKLYN AND LAKE PLACID

BYLINE: By EDWARD A. GARGAN

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 692 words


Federal officials over the weekend began moving several hundred Haitians to
detention centers around the country, including an immigration center in
Brooklyn and a Federal prison near Lake Placid, N.Y., in an effort to ease
serious overcrowding at a Miami camp.

The Haitians, illegal aliens who have been fleeing their country in boats for
several years, are being relocated to Federal prisons and to detention centers
run by the Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service, a spokesman for the
Justice Department said.

Fifty men and 36 women were taken Saturday to a decrepit, fivestory red brick
building across from the Brooklyn Navy Yard in a rundown section of Fort Greene.
Private security guards who were armed supplemented Immigration and
Naturalization officers, none of whom would permit reporters to visit the
Haitians.

''We have an emergency condition here with the overcrowding,'' said Michael
Trominski, an immigration officer at the Krome Avenue North Refugee Camp, west
of Miami. A former Army missile base, the makeshift tent and barrack encampment
with a capacity for 550 people now houses nearly 1,200 refugees, Mr. Trominski
said.

10 More to Lake Placid

Immigration officials transferred 90 Haitians from the overcrowded Miami camp
yesterday, sending 50 refugees to a Federal facility in West Virginia and 40
more to a new Federal prison in Lake Placid.  Twenty more Haitians will be flown
out today, 10 to Texas and 10 to Lake Placid.

In addition to the 86 Haitians who were brought to Brooklyn on Saturday, 176
were flown to a minimum security Federal prison camp in Big Spring, Tex. Last
week, 58 children who escaped to this country from Haiti without their parents
were taken to Dutchess County in upstate New York for adoption.

The transfers of the Haitians, which according to Mr. Trominski were ordered by
William French Smith, the United States Attorney General, came on the heels of a
suit filed by Bob Graham, the Governor of Florida, who is seeking to force the
Federal Government to reduce the refugee population at the Krome Avenue camp by
1,000 by Friday. The Justice Department is continuing its search for space in
Federal detention facilities but there are no firm plans for future transfers,
Mr. Trominski said.

Mr. Trominski also said that the Governor of Puerto Rico had endorsed a plan by
Federal officials to use an empty Navy facility there to house Haitian refugees.
Puerto Rican officials had been opposed to the use of the facility until now.

Deportation Hearings Halted

Deportations of Haitians were halted last month following charges by attorneys
for the refugees that the Haitians were being denied due process of law. They
said deportation hearings were held in locked courtrooms, from which private
lawyers and spectators were barred.  The Immigration and Naturalization Service
suspended deportation proceedings pending a review of its procedures.

Severe overcrowding at the Miami camp has caused serious sanitation problems,
including the contamination of the camp's drinking water, Mr. Trominski said.

Between 1,000 and 1,500 Haitians arrive by boat every month, said Thomas M.
Stewart, a spokesman for the Justice Department.  ''It's an enormous
bureaucratic problem keeping tabs on all of them,'' Mr. Stewart said. ''There
are more than 15,000 who are in exclusion or deportation proceedings right
now.'' Many of the Haitians not held at the camp have been sponsored by
voluntary agencies in Miami communities, and are being taken care of by private
families.

During the transfers, 50 riot-equipped Border Patrol officers flown in from
Texas to Miami surrounded the buses carrying the refugees to the airport. But
the Haitians filed quietly onto the chartered passenger jet.

At the Federal prison facilities in Texas, West Virginia and Lake Placid, the
refugees will be segregated from the general prison population, Mr. Stewart
said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              112 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 16, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

THE HAITIANS AND WALRUS COURTS

SECTION: Section A; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 592 words


How can America continue to be a haven for refugees fleeing genuine persecution
without also inviting a flood of illegal aliens looking for better jobs?

This refugee quandary beset the Carter Administration; any day now, the Reagan
Administration will disclose its answer. The Cabinet, which has met four times
on this and other immigration questions, is said to be ready to propose several
steps. Some are astounding - like the creation of what sound like kangaroo
courts - and would risk making America an embarrassing spectacle. But there is
also a much more important proposal: to make it harder for illegals to find
jobs. There may yet be hope that the Administration will abandon the ludicrous
and concentrate on the essential.

The law says that people with a well-founded fear of persecution are admissible
as refugees; people seeking economic opportunity who enter without papers are
excludable as illegal aliens. Historically, it has not been hard to distinguish
the two. But recently, the question has come to a much sharper point. Consider
the Haitians.

Some 15,000 a year are pouring into south Florida, fleeing a land of legendary
political oppression. But Haiti's poverty is also legendary. A 23-year-old
tailor who can earn only $35 in a good month needs no other motivation to leave.
But he may also be genuinely afraid of persecution. How should American
authorities determine that? And how can they deter the gate-crashers, those
whose only motivation is economic?

Probably the only fair way to determine refugee status is with individual
hearings. But to some in the Administration, that provides insufficient
deter-rence. No more half-measures like mass hearings, they say. Let's do it
right. First, order the Coast Guard to intercept the Haitians out at sea. To
pacify the queasy, hold a kind of preliminary hearing on board to detect illegal
migrants.  Second, round up the Haitians who make it to shore and put them in
detention camps pending their hearings, even if that takes months. At least that
will take some burden off south Florida.

The interdiction idea sounds impractical. Worse, it invites ridicule and
disgust. (Is the nautical equivalent of a kangaroo court a walrus court?) It may
send some small deterrent message back to Haiti, but it would send another
message resonating around the world: behold America, land of liberty, trying to
persuade Asian countries not to push away the boat people - and look what it's
doing at home.  Detention camps are even more repugnant, especially because a
much more effective solution is at hand. It is called ''employer sanctions.''

The aim of discouraging migrants who come here illegally to work is valid. The
key is work. If job applicants had to prove their legal status, with, say, a
forgery-resistant Social Security card, employers could be made culpable if they
hired illegals. That would obviously make it much harder for illegals to get
jobs - and would quickly broadcast the right message, not just to Haitians but
to potential illegal migrants everywhere.

We don't share the qualms some people have about such cards; the only right it
would obviously diminish is the right to use a forgery. But even those with
qualms should now recognize the alternatives that the refugee quandary has
driven Government to consider. Detention camps. Walrus courts.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              113 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 12, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

AMERICA NEEDS FEWER IMMIGRANTS

BYLINE: By Richard D. Lamm

SECTION: Section 4; Page 21, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 832 words

DATELINE: DENVER


One of the major problems in making public policy is that politicians, like von
Clausewitz's generals, always tend to fight the last war. It is deceptively
simple to define the future in terms of our past. Abraham Lincoln said it so
well: ''As our case is new, so we must think and act anew. We must disenthrall
ourselves.''

Few issues facing the United States are as important as the question of
immigration and in no other issue are we so blinded by our past myths.

As children and grandchildren of immigrants, we have made immigration such a
part of our mythology and folklore that it is immensely difficult to come to
grips with the new realities that face us.

But history plays strange tricks on civilizations. Yesterday's solutions becomes
today's problems. The historian Arnold Toynbee said that the same elements that
build up an institution eventually lead to its downfall. When the United States
was an empty frontier, it needed immigrants to people an empty continent. Those
days are gone, never to return, yet the myth lingers on.

Frontier America is gone, replaced by an America of 7.6 percent unemployment,
with dramatically higher unemployment in many industries and appallingly high
unemployment among youth who are minority-group members. Our increasingly scarce
resources, our own severe economic problems, and our own social fabric demand a
rational immigration policy.

Immigration is already at the highest level in our history: 808,000 legal
immigrants in 1980 - including the special status given to the Cubans and
Haitians. That is twice the number of immigrants accepted by all the rest of the
world combined.

In addition to these legal immigrants, illegal immigration is at a high, though
not a quantifiable, level. We do know that we had more than one million
apprehensions of illegal immigrants in the last few years - 10 times the level
of apprehensions in the early 1960's with the same level of enforcement.

It is usually not recognized but the nation's largest number of immigrants came
not in 1911 or 1893 but in 1980. Legal and illegal immigration accounts for half
the United States' population-growth rate and a rising percentage of its crime
and welfare statistics.

When Jimmy Carter ordered the Immigration and Naturalization Service to deport
Iranians who had entered this country to study and then dropped out of school,
the agency had to admit it had no idea how many Iranian students were in the
United States, or who or where they were.

Whatever the pressures are now, they will soon grow dramatically worse. The
demographers tell us we will add one billion people to the world's population in
the next 11 years.

The population of Mexico has nearly tripled since 1945 and is expected to double
within the next 20 years. Mexico has a labor force of 19 million people - of
whom 50 percent are unemployed or seriously underemployed. And by the year 2000,
it will be 45 million. Considering the great discrepancy between per-capita
income in Mexico and in this country, the pull is tremendous.

We have to get our hearts in line with our heads and our myths in line with
reality. We know we cannot accept all the people who want to come to the United
States. We know our immigration policy has to be designed in the interest of the
United States.

We hate to say ''no'' to that worthy individual from the povertystricken country
who just wants to do a little better. It seems selfish to us to set limits. The
Lady in the harbor would not understand. However, I believe dramatic reform is
necessary and inevitable, and that the sooner we recognize this, the better off
we will be.

As others have observed, every year the United States is importing a new poverty
class.  This year, with the bipartisan cooperation of Senator Alan K.  Simpson,
Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L.  Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky, who are chairmen of subcommittees studying immigration reform, it is
possible to amend our immigration laws to achieve realistic limits on legal
immigration and realistic powers to curtail illegal entry.

America owes its first duty to our own disadvantaged, unemployed, and poor to
maintain the strength of the United States.  We can only meet our commitments by
placing realistic limits on immigration. The Lady in the harbor symbolizes
iberty, not immigration. We must, like Abraham Lincoln, ''disenthrall
ourselves'' from our past myths and deal with the realities of the ''stormy
present'' - which means not overwhelming the Lady in the harbor with more
immigrants than she can absorb.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
Richard D. Lamm, a Democrat, is Governor of Colorado.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: op-ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              114 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 9, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. STOPS AIDE TO MOON SECT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 18, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 367 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 8


The immigration authorities stopped Pak Bo Hi, a key official in the Rev. Sun
Myung Moon's Unification Church, as he tried to enter the United States today.
They said they wanted to question him in detail about the means by which he had
become a permanent resident of the United States.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said
that Mr. Pak and his wife, Ki Sook Pak, were stopped at Kennedy International
Airport in New York City when they arrived from Buenos Aires. They were told to
report to the agency's New York office next week for questioning.

Justice Department officials said that Mr. Pak and other members of the church,
including Mr. Moon, had been under investigation on suspicion of possible fraud
in the way they had obtained status as permanent residents. A Justice Department
official said last month that the Government would probably begin deportation
proceedings against Mr. Moon this summer.

Permanent Resident in 1966

Mr. Pak, a former lieutenant colonel in the South Korean Army, was assistant
military attache at the Korean Embassy here from 1961 to 1965. He became a
permanent resident of the United States in 1966. In recent years, he has been
special assistant to Mr. Moon and president of the Korean Cultural and Freedom
Foundation.

A two-year Congressional investigation of Korean-American relations concluded in
1978 that Mr. Pak was one of the ''assets'' used by the Korean Central
Intelligence Agency in its efforts to gain influence in the United States.
However, Mr. Pak denied that he had ever been ''linked with or employed by the
Korean C.I.A.''

People familiar with the activities of the church said that Mr.  Pak had
supervised its day-to-day operations while Mr. Moon served as its spiritual
leader.

David Carliner, an immigration lawyer here who plans to represent Mr. Pak, said
his client had become a permanent resident ''properly and lawfully,'' and added
that he found it strange that the immigration authorities would challenge Mr.
Pak's status 15 years after granting him permanent residence.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              115 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 8, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Around the World;
U.S. Accepts 1,100 Poles Who Stayed in Austria

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 5, Column 2; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 124 words

DATELINE: VIENNA, July 7


The United States has accepted some 1,100 Polish emigres in the last 10 months
and may allocate more money to help refugees resettle in the West, an American
diplomat said today.

The diplomat, Randolph M. Bell, who is the State Department's coordinator for
refugees, said the United States ''was doing everything possible within the
framework of its immigration laws to ease the troubled refugee situation in this
small neutral country.''

He referred to an appeal by Interior Minister Erwin Lanc of Austria, who asked
the United States, Canada and Australia to increase their immigration quotas
because of the influx of emigres from Poland.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              116 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 7, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. SET TO GIVE 85 HAITIANS NEW IMMIGRATION HEARINGS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 647 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 6


The Justice Department, in a change of policy, said today that it was willing to
hold new hearings for 85 Haitians who had been ordered deported in proceedings
allegedly flawed by violations of the aliens' rights.

The Government had previously defended the decisions of immigration judges who
ordered expulsion of the Haitians on the ground that the aliens did not have
visas or other documents necessary to enter the United States.

However, an assistant United States attorney in Miami, Richard A.  Marshall Jr.,
said today, ''We concluded that it's appropriate to redo the hearings, based on
our independent analysis of the record.'' Mr. Marshall disclosed the
Government's decision when he appeared before Judge Alcee L. Hastings of the
Federal District Court in Miami.

Mr. Marshall did not say precisely why the Justice Department now favored new
hearings. Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, said that new hearings would ''remove any appearance of unfairness'' in
the original proceedings, but he did not elaborate.

Translation Problems

Other Justice Department officials said that there appeared to have been some
mistakes made in translation of the original proceedings from English to the
Creole patois spoken by most Haitians.

For example, according to attorneys for the Haitians, an immigration judge asked
at one point whether the aliens wanted to appeal to a higher court, and this was
translated as being a question whether the Haitians wanted to move to a bigger
courtroom.

While correct translations might not have produced any different results, the
Justice Department officials said, it would have taken much time and effort for
the Government to correct the record for later litigation

Ira J. Kurzban, an attorney for the Haitians, said, ''We are delighted that the
Government has, in effect, admitted wrongdoing in regard to these 85
individuals, but we are concerned about the rights of all other Haitians in the
Krome Avenue detention camp,'' outside Miami. There are about 1,150 Haitians in
the camp, according to Mr.  Jervis.

Mr. Marshall did not explicitly admit wrongdoing by the Government, but he and
other Justice Department lawyers said that they wanted the proceedings to be
seen as fair.

Criticism on Proceedings

Mr. Kurzban said that attorneys for the Haitians wanted to be sure they would
have access to their clients in the Krome Avenue camp. In addition, he said,
they want the deportation proceedings held in regular Federal courtrooms, not at
the camp, and they want the cases to be handled one at a time. At some hearings
early last month, Haitians appeared in groups of 25 or more.

The Government has built a courtroom at the Krome Avenue camp so that hearings
can be held there.  The debate over the Haitians comes as the Reagan
Administration is trying to formulate a general policy on immigration. The fate
of the Cubans still being held at Fort Chaffee, Ark., may be discussed at a
Cabinet meeting tomorrow, but the Cabinet is not expected to make final
recommendations on other aspects of immigration policy until its meeting next
week, probably on Tuesday.

Several agencies that could be deeply involved in new immigration programs are
resisting some of the policies recommended by an interagency study group under
Attorney General William French Smith.  One such proposal is to use the Social
Security card as an identity card for workers.

For example, in an interview today, John A. Svahn, the Commissioner of Social
Security, said: ''We oppose using the Social Security card as an identifier, and
it would cost a small fortune, perhaps $860 million, to make it forgery-proof.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              117 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 July 6, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

225 Haitians Land in Florida

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 67 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, July 5


As many as 225 Haitian refugees came ashore in south Florida today, the
authorities said.  A Dade County police spokesman said about 25 refugees arrived
at Haulover Beach and about 200 more landed on Key Biscayne. Immigration and
Naturalization Service officials arrived with buses to take the Haitians to a
processing center.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              118 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 2, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

CROAT ACCUSED OF WAR CRIMES IS ORDERED DEPORTED

BYLINE: By CHARLES MOHR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 9, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 659 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 1


A Department of Justice official said today that the Government would move
quickly to deport a person who as Interior Minister of the Nazi German puppet
state of Croatia in World War II purportedly ordered the deaths of hundreds of
thousands of people.

An order of the Board of Immigration Appeals overturned a stay of deportation
granted to the former Croatian official, Andrija Artukovic, in 1959 on the
ground that he would be subject to ''political persecution'' if returned to
Yugoslavia. Mr. Artukovic, 8l years old, lives in southern California and has
successfully resisted deportation and extradition for 30 years.

Allan A. Ryan, Jr., the director of the Office of Special Investigations of the
Justice Department, said that the Immigration and Naturalization Service, in a
letter delivered today, had directed Mr. Artukovic to report to its regional
office in Los Angeles by next Wednesday to be handed a deportation order.

He could legally be deported within 72 hours of his appearance at the regional
office, but he may file a petition requesting a review of the order by the
United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Judicial Circuit, which includes
California. Such a petition would automatically stay the deportation order.

Mr. Ryan expressed the opinion that Mr. Artukovic would have ''only very narrow
legal grounds'' for an appeal. A 1953 decision by the immigration board
determined that Mr. Artukovic ''was a leading Nazi criminal during the Second
World War'' and a 1978 law says that Nazi war criminals cannot claim deportation
stays on the ground that they would be subject to persecution.

A spokesman for the Yugoslav Embassy said today his Government regarded Mr.
Artukovic as a ''war criminal'' and he would be tried if deported.

Justice Department officials said the action in the Artukovic case had nothing
to do with the indictment last month of a group of eight Croatian nationalists.
Mr. Artukovic, who came to the United States in 1948 under a false name and with
an Irish passport, was a leading figure in the Ustashi movement, which has long
been struggling for the independence of Croatia from Yugoslavia.

When Hitler dismembered Yugoslavia in 1941, Ante Pavelic, the Ustashi leader,
formed a Croatian state under German tutelage and made Mr. Artukovic the
Interior Minister.

Croatia proclaimed a policy of persecution against various ethnic groups, mainly
Serbs, Jews and Gypsies. Journalistic and historical accounts say that more than
300,000 people, including 30,000 Jews, were executed.

The 1953 decision of the Board of Immigration Appeals, which was in effect
affirmed today, said: ''There appears to be little doubt that the new Croatian
state, at least on paper, pursued a genocidal policy in Croatia with regard to
Jews and Serbs; that Artukovic helped execute this policy in that, as Minister
of Interior, he had authority and control over the entire system of public
security and internal administration.''

A witness at the 1961 trial in Israel of Adolf Eichmann, the Nazi who oversaw
the German effort to exterminate European Jews, testified that Mr. Artukovic was
''recognized by the Nazis as a leader in the anti-Jewish pogroms.''

Mr. Pavelic and Mr. Artukovic vanished when the Croatian state collapsed at the
end of World War II in 1945. Mr. Pavelic reached Argentina, where he was wounded
in an apparent assassination attempt in 1957. He disappeared again when
Argentina agreed later that year to consider a Yugoslav extradition request and
he was reported to have gone to Paraguay. Subsequently he moved to Madrid, where
he died in December 1959 at the age of 70.

Mr. Artukovic worked, until retirement, as a bookkeeper and resides in Surfside,
Calif., south of Long Beach.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              119 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                July 2, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

REAGAN ADVISED TO ADMIT MEXICANS AS GUEST WORKERS

BYLINE: By HOWELL RAINES, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section D; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 729 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, July 1


The Task Force on Immigration and Refugee Policy today advised President Reagan
to let 50,000 Mexican aliens come to the United States each year as temporary
workers and to grant permanent resident status to as many as 170,000 Cuban and
Haitian refugees already settled in the country, according to Administration
officials.

The change in status would apply to those refugees who arrived before Oct. 10,
1980. Immigration officials said that included about 125,000 Cubans and 30,000
to 45,000 Haitians.

The task force, led by Attorney General William French Smith and including seven
other Cabinet members, also urged Mr. Reagan to authorize a tough ''interdiction
at sea'' policy to allow the American authorities to turn boats bearing illegal
immigrants back to Cuba and Haiti, the officials said.

The group also recommended that the approximately 4,000 Cubans now detained in
Atlanta and Fort Chaffee, Ark., remain in custody until they can be repatriated
to Cuba as undesirables. But Mr. Smith's study group was ordered after today's
Cabinet meeting to come up with further options for the handling of these
refugees, who have been involved in a variety of social and legal problems since
they were evicted from Cuban jails and asylums and shipped to the United States
by President Fidel Castro last year.

The group further recommended a program of general amnesty for about one million
other illegal aliens who can prove that they have been in this country since
1979.

The 'Whole Range of Problems'

Officials said the recommendations were substantially the same as those made in
preliminary reports by the task force.  Mr. Smith and White House spokesmen
declined to provide details of the discussions in today's Cabinet meeting. Mr.
Smith said that the recommendations of the task force, which was formed on March
6, covered the ''whole range of problems and potential solutions.'' The Attorney
General said he expected Mr. Reagan to reach a decision within a week to 10 days
on which of the recommendations he will adopt as Administration policy.

But other sources familiar with today's meetings said there would be additional
discussions at a Cabinet meeting next week, possibly on Tuesday, and that Mr.
Reagan's decision could come speedily after that.

Today, these officials said, there was disagreement within the Cabinet on the
Mexican ''guest worker'' recommendations. The White House is attempting to solve
the problem of illegal Mexican aliens crossing the border to work in the United
States by adopting on a trial basis a policy in line with Mr. Reagan's campaign
promise to admit Mexican workers in an orderly fashion on temporary work visas.

Some of those in today's Cabinet meeting were quoted as arguing that the 50,000
figure was too low, although that figure was ''heavily recommended'' by the task
force. Some Cabinet members were said to prefer admitting 100,000 guest workers
annually and to lower the sanctions against American employers who hire illegal
aliens.

Cubans' Repatriation in Doubt

There was also disagreement on the task force recommendation to continue holding
the 4,000 Cubans in custody until Cuba could be forced to take them back. One
objection raised was that although many of them have records of criminal
activity or mental instability, it is unclear whether they can be held in the
United States for offenses in Cuba.

Cuba has so far refused to repatriate the refugees, but the task force
recommendation to the President was based on the presumption that any thawing of
relations with Cuba would require that nation to do so as a ''necessary first
step.''

As for the estimated 125,000 Cubans and Haitians who have settled in various
sections of the United States, the task force recommended that the President
approve a plan to allow them to apply for permanent resident status after living
in the United States for two years.

But this was tied to a proposal to limit the numbers of such immigrants in the
future through a tougher interdiction policy that would allow ''boat people'' to
be turned away before reaching American shores.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of President Reagan meeting with county executives

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              120 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 28, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CANADIANS HONOR 2 FROM MISSION IN IRAN

BYLINE: By HENRY GINIGER, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 5, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 619 words

DATELINE: OTTAWA, June 27


Starting in early November 1979, two wives of Canadian Embassy officials endured
almost three months of constant tension in Teheran while they cared for six
American diplomats who had escaped the seizure of the United States Embassy and
had taken refuge in their homes. This week, almost 18 months after the
successful rescue of the Americans, the wives were honored by the Canadian
Government.

Patricia Taylor, wife of Kenneth Taylor, the Canadian Ambassador in Teheran at
the time of the rescue and now Consul General in New York, and Zena Sheardown,
wife of John Sheardown, the immigration officer at the embassy in Teheran, were
both given the Order of Canada, the country's highest civilian award.

Mrs. Sheardown, who was born in Guyana, was given only honorary membership in
the order because she is still a British subject, according to an announcement
by Prime Minister Pierre Elliott Trudeau, who stressed the ''unique''
circumstances of an award that is ordinarily reserved for citizens.

Unmentioned in the statements by Mr. Trudeau and Governor General Edward R.
Schreyer was the long and somewhat bitter campaign carried on by Mr. Sheardown
on behalf of his wife.

Complained of Neglect

At the end of last year, Mr. Sheardown, who now works for the immigration
department in Ottawa, broke the silence civil servants are expected to maintain
to complain of the neglect accorded his wife in the midst of the public
congratulations showered on himself and on Mr. Taylor.

High officials were reportedly nettled by Mr. Sheardown's outburst, but it bore
fruit in January when the House of Commons approved a resolution recommending
both Mrs. Sheardown and Mrs. Taylor for the Order of Canada. In New York, Mr.
Taylor said that the recommendation was ''appropriate'' and that ''it was
unfortunate that they were not recognized at the time.''

A year ago, Mr. Taylor, Mr. Sheardown and six other men received the Order of
Canada for what has become known as the Canadian caper.  For Mr. Sheardown and
his wife, life in their home in the Teheran suburbs was anything but a caper. In
an interview just after the Commons acted, he spoke of the stress that his wife
had been under while caring for four of the six Americans. The two others were
in Mr. Taylor's residence a half a mile away.

'A 24-Hour Responsibility'

''The men went to the office every day,'' Mr. Sheardown said. ''The wives had a
24-hour responsibility.'' Mrs. Taylor and Mrs. Sheardown were the only Canadian
Embassy wives left in Teheran, and although they could have departed at any
time, Mr. Sheardown said, they chose to stay.

''What we did was a normal extension of our functions,'' he said.  ''What they
did was extraordinary.'' They had to take care of the Americans' daily needs,
provide entertainment, compose menus, do the shopping and answer the telephone
and the door while constantly making sure the guests were kept from detection.

The Sheardowns' four-bedroom house was built around a courtyard On the street,
it bore the number 7, but for some reason another house had the same number.
There were constant callers mistaking one house for the other. One night they
had an unexpected visit from an Iranian friend.

''I went into the street and pretended to be interested in his automobile,'' Mr.
Sheardown recounted. ''This gave my wife time to get the Americans upstairs and
remove all trace of their presence from the downstairs area where the friend
eventually had to be admitted.''

Through it all, Mr. Sheardown said, she stood up to the strain, only afterward
showing signs that it had told on her. This was aggravated by the disappointment
he said she had felt when only the men received official honors.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              121 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 28, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIANS' PLIGHT FRUSTRATING TO ALL SIDES

BYLINE: By JO THOMAS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 22, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 1060 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 27


As the boatloads of Haitian refugees stream across the summer calm of the
Florida Straits and the crowding increases in the Federal holding camp near the
Florida Everglades, immigration officials, resettlement workers and community
activists share a common sense of futility, of trying to trap water in sand.

It is, perhaps, the only sentiment they share as they struggle to cope with a
crisis that Senator Paula Hawkins, Republican of Florida, has called chaotic and
mismanaged and that Senator Lawton Chiles, Democrat of Florida, has called
inhumane and unconscionable.

Earlier this week, 432 persons were put out of the camp, and some of them ended
up waiting in the middle of the night in a Liberty City parking lot for sponsors
who never showed up.

But even as these refugees left the blistering heat of the Krome Avenue
detention camp, where many have been living in tents, 351 more Haitians arrived
to take their places. That brought the total number of Haitians at the camp to
1,247. Officials say the camp's capacity should be 525.

Suit to Fight Deportation

On Monday morning, Federal District Judge Alcee Hastings is scheduled to hear
more testimony in a suit filed to stop the Immigration and Naturalization
Service from carrying out its solution to the problem, which is to send the new
arrivals straight back to Haiti after mass, closed-door hearings from which even
lawyers have been barred.

The Federal Government contends that Haitians, unlike the Cuban refugees that
came here by boat last year, are not fleeing political oppression, and therefore
as a group are not entitled to political asylum.

The suit, filed by attorneys for the Haitian Refugee Center Inc.  and the
American Civil Liberties Union on behalf of 85 Haitians who were subjected to
the hearings June 1-5, and those still facing them, contends that the agency's
procedures are unconstitutional.

Assistant United States Attorney Richard A. Marshall told the court at the
hearings that the Haitians had waived their rights to an attorney knowingly and
had said they did not want to appeal.

Last week, however, expert witnesses testified that tapes and transcripts of the
hearings revealed bad translations, inaccuracies and omissions in the
procedings.

Problems in Translation

Jocelyne Legrand, a language instructor at Miami Dade Community College and the
University of Miami, testified that very little of the upper class Creole
vocabulary used by court translaters was understood by the refugees, most of
whom are from poor backgrounds.

She said that words such as ''expired visas,'' ''hearings,'' ''citizen,'' and
''political asylum'' were either translated into French, which most Haitians do
not understand, or not translated at all. The word ''asylum'' is understood by
many of the Haitians to mean a mental hospital, she said.

When the immigration judge asked the refugees if they wanted to appeal his
deportation ruling to a ''higher court,'' she said, the translator asked the
Haitians if they wanted to go to a ''larger courtroom.''

Haitian Changed Response

Lucien Louis, a 21-year-old refugee, testified that the immigration judge had
asked him if he was afraid to go home.  ''When I said I was afraid to go back,''
he said, ''the interpreter got mad. I changed my mind. I said to the judge that
if I had to go back, I would resign myself. But I knew it was my death.''

''Whether it's politics or economics, if they don't get out of Haiti, they'll
die,'' said Leticia Godoy, director of the Lutheran Immigration and Refugee
Service.

''It's inhumane,'' she said. We can't send these people to die. The United
States is not known for being inhumane.''

Sponsors Fail to Show

At ll P.M. Tuesday, two buses filled with refugees from the camp arrived at a
parking lot near an immigration agency office in the Liberty City section of
Miami, but many relatives and sponsors who were to meet the Haitians there did
not arrive. About 30 of those left wandering around spent the night at the
Haitian Refugee Center, evoking charges that the Haitians were ''dumped,'' a
characterization that Verne Jervis, an immigration agency spokesman, called
''absolutely inaccurate.''

At a meeting with voluntary resettlement agencies the following day, William F.
Alexander, administrator of the Krome Avenue camp ''said they would get rid of
100 a day by whatever means necessary,'' according to Don Flachmeier, director
of the Cuba-Haitian Ministry for the Lutheran Ministries of Florida. Mr.
Alexander did not return telephone calls seeking to corroborate Mr.
Flachmeier's account of the meeting.

There is a backlog of 6,000 cases of Haitians who have arrived in the United
States since Oct. 10, when a special legal status allowing recent Cuban and
Haitian arrivals to remain here was revoked by the Carter Administration.

Meeting Doesn't End Concerns

Representatives from the National Association for the Advancement of Colored
People, the Southern Christian Leadership Conference, the A.C.L.U., the National
Lawyers Guild, the American Friends Service Committee and several other civil
rights groups tried to raise their concerns with the immigration agency's
actions at a meeting with agency officials in Miami June 11, but came away
unsatisfied.

''They felt they were the implementers of policy decisions made in Washington,''
said Peggy Demon, director of urban affairs for the N.A.A.C.P. ''They felt
political pressures needed to be applied at a higher level than the staff level
of I.N.S.''

''We have all kinds of refugees in Miami,'' Mrs. Demon said.  ''Cubans, Soviet
Jews. It seems the Haitian refugees, more than any group, has experienced the
worst treatment. We feel it's the color of their skin.''

In Washington, eight members of the Florida Congressional delegation met
yesterday with Doris Meissner, acting commissioner of the immigration agency,
and with a Justice Department representative to discuss the Haitian refugees'
problems.

Senator Chiles and Senator Hawkins were able to garner support on the Senate
floor Thursday night to restore $71 million in proposed cuts in assistance to
Cuban and Haitian refugees and then went on to add $12 million for educational
assistance.

At yesterday's meeting they were assured that immigration problems would be a
key item on the agenda for next week's Cabinet meeting.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Haitian refugees awaiting immigration officials
in Florida

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              122 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 28, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

The National Archives

SECTION: Section 10; Page 30, Column 5; Travel Desk

LENGTH: 220 words


To the Editor: In the article by Seth S. King entitled ''Seeking Family History
on a Visit to the National Archives'' (Travel Section, June 7), there is a
misleading statement regarding ships' passenger lists. Mr. King says there is a
gap in them for the Port of New York from 1847 until 1896.

In a booklet entitled ''Genealogical Records in the National Archives,''
published by the General Services Administration, it clearly states that
''Customs Passenger Lists are available for the Port of New York for 1820 to
1897; Immigration Passenger Lists for 1897 to 1942.''

With very little trouble I was able to locate the ships' records on microfilm,
listing my mother's family (1882), my paternal grandfather's family (1867) and
my paternal grandmother's family (1865). I now know the names of the ships on
which they arrived and the exact dates that they arrived at the Port of New
York. All came from Sweden by way of England.  DOROTHY G. LEEDS Key Biscayne,
Fla.

A National Archives spokesman replies: While the National Archives has the
ships' passenger lists for the years 1847-96 for the port of New York, it does
not have an index to these lists. Thus, unless the researcher knows the name of
the ship or date of arrival, it is extremely time-consuming to find the
information sought on specific persons.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              123 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 27, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

ACTION TO DEPORT SUN MYUNG MOON CALLED LIKELY BY JUSTICE DEPT. AIDE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 1, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 923 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 26


A Justice Department official said today that the Government would probably
begin deportation proceedings this summer against the Rev. Sun Myung Moon, the
founder of the Unification Church, on the basis of an investigation suggesting
that he and his wife, Hak Ja Han, had violated Federal immigration rules.

The immigration authorities said that many members of Mr. Moon's church had also
apparently violated the rules by coming to the United States on visitors' visas
when they actually intended to stay permanently. The Immigration and
Naturalization Service also contends that many members of the church are in this
country illegally because they have remained longer than authorized.

David Carliner, an immigration lawyer here who represents Mr. Moon, said that
the immigration service had been investigating the Koreanborn evangelist and
other church members since the early 1970's. However, the lawyer said that he
thought the investigation had ended several years ago and that he knew of no
immediate plans for deportation proceedings against Mr. Moon.

Church Assails Reports

In New York, Dr. Mose Durst, president of the church, issued a statement today
saying that reports about imminent deportation proceedings were ''part of an
orchestrated attempt to assassinate the character of Reverend Moon, discredit
the church and defame its members.'' The church says that it has four million
members around the world, including 30,000 in the United States.

The Justice Department official who said that deportation proceedings against
Mr. Moon were likely to begin in the next few weeks insisted on speaking
anonymously because, he said, ''11th-hour developments might persuade the
Government'' to change its plans.

Another official, David W. Crosland, general counsel of the immigration service,
confirmed the existence of the investigation but would not say whether
deportation efforts were likely.

Mr. Crosland said that Mr. Moon became a permanent resident alien in 1973. Mr.
Moon entered the United States on a visitor's visa in 1972, according to a
Federal Bureau of Investigation report. Copies of the report were released today
by the Unification Church.

Charges by Congressional Panel

A Congressional subcommittee that in 1977 and 1978 investigated Korean-American
relations and possible legal violations by the church, said that Mr. Moon had
apparently flouted the immigration service's regulations ''with impunity.''

In its final report, issued in late 1978, the subcommittee said that Mr. Moon
had obtained his ''green card,'' the certificate of permanent resident status,
on the basis of his wife's having previously established residence in this
country.

''She in turn achieved her status,'' the report said, ''by being listed as an
employee of the Korean Cultural and Freedom Foundation, which was controlled and
used by the Moon organization.'' The investigation was conducted by a
subcommittee of the panel then known as the House Committee on International
Relations.

The report said that Mr. Moon's organization had exploited or ignored United
States immigration laws so that church members could come to the United States,
raise funds and ''move large amounts of cash across international boundaries.''
The report alleged that these activities circumvented or violated restrictions
on the international movement of currency.

Process Could Be Long

''Although many of the goals and activities of the Moon organization were
legitimate and lawful,'' the report said, ''there was evidence that it had
systematically violated U.S. tax, immigration, banking, currency and Foreign
Agents Registration Act laws,'' as well as state and local laws relating to
charity fraud.  The church has repeatedly denied the allegations.

If immigration service officials decided to move against Mr. Moon, they would
serve him with an ''order to show cause'' why he should not be deported. The
process could take a long time because after the initial proceeding before an
immigration judge, Mr. Moon, like any other alien, could ask for review by the
Board of Immigration appeals, the United States Court of Appeals and the Supreme
Court.

The immigration service has prevailed in the Court of Appeals here in at least
one case in which it took action against members of the Unification Church, also
known as the Holy Spirit Association for the Unification of World Christianity.
The Commissioner of Immigration had argued that aliens reportedly brought to the
United States for missionary training were actually soliciting funds for the
church.

Mr. Carliner, author of the American Civil Liberties Union's handbook on the
rights of aliens, said that the immigration service had a ''political bias''
against Unification Church members. He also asserted that the Congressional
investigation, led by former Representative Donald M. Fraser, Democrat of
Minnesota, had been ''politically motivated.''

The investigation concluded that Mr. Moon and his followers had sometimes been
acting ''in cooperation with or at the direction of'' the South Korean
Government when they attempted to influence United States foreign policy and to
gain control of businesses and other secular institutions in this country.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              124 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 26, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

SUN MYUNG MOON FOCUS OF MOON IMMIGRATION INQUIRY

BYLINE: By IRVIN MOLOTSKY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 687 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 25


The Immigration and Naturalization Service has been conducting an investigation
to determine whether the Rev.  Sun Myung Moon and hundreds of his followers in
the Unification Church acted improperly when they entered the United States, an
official said today.

The official, Glenn A. Bertness, the assistant commissioner in charge of
investigations, said that the agency was examining how Mr.  Moon, a native of
South Korea, and his followers had acquired status as permanent resident aliens.

ABC News reported tonight that the Justice Department would seek Mr. Moon's
deportation because of ''improperly obtained residency status,'' but Mr.
Bertness said that he could not confirm this.

Mr. Bertness said that one question at issue was whether Mr. Moon's followers
were ministers of his church or workers. The concern, he said, was that they had
received temporary visas as ministers although they may have intended to stay in
the United States permanently as workers.

Comment From Church Spokesman

At the church's headquarters in Tarrytown, N.Y., in Westchester County, a
spokesman said he had no idea of the status of the case.  According to United
Press International, a church spokesman in New York, Jeremiah Schnee, said: ''We
think it is grossly unfair that the first time we learned of this matter is
through news media. We do not know what the source of the information is, but if
it is indeed the Justice Department, we feel it to be an immoral and improper
leak.''

A spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service in New York said that
John Gafney, the acting district director, would have no comment on the matter
before tomorrow.

The Unification Church has been controversial both for its business dealings and
for the attraction it has had for many young people in the United States,
followers whose parents contend they have been improperly enticed into joining
the church. In many instances, the parents have resorted to snatching their
children away from the church and tried, through so-called deprogrammers to get
their children to leave the church and return home.

Litigation Over Tax Status

The church also has been a source of frequent litigation. It has resisted paying
property taxes, for example, on the ground that it deserved exemption as a
church.

Last month, the Appellate Division of the New York State Supreme Court in
Manhattan ruled that the ''primary purpose'' of the church was not religious and
therefore it was not entitled to the tax exemption.

The church also has been involved in suits overseas. It lost a major libel suit
against a newpaper March 31 in London after a fivemonth trial when a jury
accepted The Daily Mail's view of what the paper called brainwashing and
kidnapping techniques practiced by the church.

In addition to the properties in Manhattan and Queens that led to the New York
court case, the church also has large holdings in Westchester County. It bought
the old New Yorker Hotel at Eighth Avenue and 34th Street to use as housing for
its young followers, and it publishes a daily newspaper in New York, The
News-World.

It has expanded elsewhere in the United States, as well, sometimes meeting
protests from existing establishments when the church has entered businesses.

Fishermen in Montauk, L.I., Gloucester, Mass., and elsewhere asserted that the
church's fishing crews, made up of Mr. Moon's followers, were competing unfairly
because they gave most of their salaries back to the Unification Church. The
church denied the allegations.

In 1978, a House subcommittee investigating Korean-American relations said that
the Unification Church had systematically violated United States laws on taxes,
immigration, banking, currency and the registration of foreign agents.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Rev. Sun Myung

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              125 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 26, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Around the Nation;
Judge Rules Against Barring Homosexuals From U.S.

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 106 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, June 25


A Federal district judge ruled today that the Government could not exclude
people from entering the United States just because they were homosexuals.

In granting a preliminary injunction, Judge Robert Aguilar said that the
constitutional rights of the plaintiffs, Lesbian-Gay Freedom Day Committee Inc.
and others, had been threatened by an Immigration and Naturalization Service
policy of blocking homosexuals or those accused of being homosexual from
visiting the country.

The judge said that the injunction would result in ''no threat to the national
security or law enforcement.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              126 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 25, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Around the Nation;
Immigration Officials Deny Dumping Haitians in Miami

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 177 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 24


Immigration officials denied today that they had ''dumped'' a group of Haitian
refugees in a parking lot in northeast Miami.

The authorities, who are faced with large numbers of Haitians awaiting
deportation hearings, said that they had taken 118 of the refugees to a parking
lot to be met by friends and relatives, about 30 of whom never showed up.

Samuel Constant, director of the Haitian Refugee Center Inc., a privately
financed social service agency, said the refugees ''were dumped out late at
night,'' and 40 were left stranded.

Denying that the refugees were dumped, Richard Gullage, deputy district director
for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said that the agency had been in
contact with sponsors and had told them to meet the refugees yesterday at the
lot.

Those refugees who were released are still subject to deportation hearings, but
because of severe overcrowding at a refugee camp here, the immigration service
is releasing some who can provide the name and address of a relative with whom
they can live pending a hearing.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              127 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 24, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

JUDGE RULES AUTOWORKER MUST LOSE U.S. CITIZENSHIP FOR FALSIFYING PAST

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 484 words

DATELINE: CLEVELAND, June 23


A Federal district judge today ruled that John Demjanjuk, a Ukrainian-born
autoworker accused of covering up Nazi war atrocities, must be stripped of his
United States citizenship because he concealed his past from immigration
officials.

In issuing the order, Judge Frank Battisti also dismissed a defense request for
a new trial. The five-week civil trial ended March 11.  In a 44-page opinion,
Judge Battisti said: ''The defendant's certificate of naturalization must be
canceled as it was procured by concealment of a material fact or by willful
misrepresentation.''

Mr. Demjanjuk, 61 years old, was accused by the Government of concealing his
service in World War II as a guard in a Nazi death camp when he applied to enter
the United States.

Government prosecutors contended that Mr. Demjanjuk was really a notorious guard
who was called Ivan the Terrible who served at death camps at Treblinka and
Sobibor, Poland. Among the 13 prosecution witnesses were five survivors who
identified a 1952 picture of Mr.Demjanjuk as that of Ivan.

Says He Was a Prisoner Until '45

Mr. Demjanjuk testified that he was a Soviet soldier captured by the Germans in
1942 and held prisoner until 1945. He acknowledged being placed by the Nazis in
a military unit of captured Ukrainians but said he never fought for the Nazis or
helped them.

He said that he lied on his applications to enter the United States under the
Displaced Persons Act by saying he had been a farmer in Poland in the war
because, as a Ukranian, he feared being repatriated to the Soviet Union. The
Displaced Persons Act excluded Germans or Nazi collaborators.

The case is among 19 being prosecuted by the Justice Department's office of
special investigations, formed in 1979 to find and prosecute Nazi war criminals
in the United States for violating United States immigration laws.

One defendant, Feodor Fedorenko, faces deportation now that the United States
Supreme Court has upheld his denaturalization by a Federal judge in Florida. Mr.
Fedorenko, also a Ukrainian, served as a guard at Treblinka but there was no
testimony that he persecuted prisoners.

Spiros Gonakins, one of Mr. Demjanjuk's lawyers, said the ruling would be
appealed. There was no immediate comment from Mr. Demjanjuk or his family.

As the decision was released, 20 Cleveland Ukrainians gathered outside the
courthouse to protest the ruling. They contend that Mr.  Demjanjuk was a victim
of Soviet persecution of Ukrainians and other members of nationalist groups in
the Soviet Union. They protested at the trial that the prosecution used as
evidence a document from Soviet archives, an identification card issued to one
Iwan Demjanjuk at a Nazi training camp at Trawniki, Poland, in 1942.

''He hasn't been treated fairly because of the intervention of the Soviet
Union,'' said Zenon Krislaty, founder of the Committee Against Use of Soviet
Evidence.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: June 25, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
An Associated Press dispatch in The Times yesterday on a ruling that John
Demjanjuk, a former Nazi guard, be stripped of his citizenship, contained errors
regarding another former guard, Feodor Fedorenko. Mr. Fedorenko's deportation,
upheld by the United States Supreme Court, affirmed a ruling by the United
States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit. At his trial Mr. Fedorenko
contended that he had not persecuted prisoners, but death-camp survivors
testified that he had.

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of John Demjanjuk

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              128 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 23, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

9,700 GRANTED U.S. CITIZENSHIP IN LOS ANGELES naturalization ceremony in nation

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 396 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, June 22


Almost 10,000 immigrants, more than half of them from Asia and the Pacific,
became American citizens today in the largest naturalization ceremony in the
nation's history.

They took the oath of citizenship in the Los Angeles Memorial Coliseum in
ceremonies that provided vivid evidence of a surge of immigration that began in
the early 1970's and that immigration researchers say is continuing to bringing
more and more new residents each year.

Last year, according to the researchers, about 808,000 legal immigrants came to
this country - more than in any year in the nation's history. Immigration
specialists say the new wave of migration is primarily from Latin America and
Asia.

''It is great to be an American,'' said Hung Nguyen, who emigrated from Vietnam
in 1975 and now works as a data processing specialist for the General Telephone
and Electronics Corporation in a Los Angeles suburb. ''There is so much
opportunity here,'' he said.

His Country 'Too Crowded'

William Luk, who came from Hong Kong, said he, too, had come to America in
search of opportunity. ''The country I came from,'' he said, ''is too crowded.''

The Census Bureau reported recently that the number of Asians and Pacific
islanders in this country grew faster than any other ethnic category in the
1970's, to 3.5 million from 1.5 million. The number of Hispanic residents in the
United States grew by 61 percent, to about 14.6 million, the Bureau said.

The tide of Asian and Latin immigrants has been especially strong in California.
According to some estimates, for example, as many as 90,000 of the approximately
260,000 Vietnamese refugees in the country have settled in California.

Immigration officials attribute the influx to the state's location and climate.
One immigration official here said recently: ''They've been placed in other
states, Michigan, Illinois, Missouri, other places, but they come back to the
Coast because they like the weather or they have relatives here.''

Bicentennial Celebration

Immigration officials said they decided to naturalize more than 9,700 new
citizens at once in part to commemorate observance of the Los Angeles
Bicentennial, one of whose themes is celebration of the city's increasingly
ethnic diversity.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Jane Feldmeier ,in Los Angeles during the
largest

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              129 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 22, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. OFICIALS INVESTIGATING POSSIBLITY OF FRAUD IN IMMIGRATION OF KHOMEIMI
IRANIANS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1058 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 21


Federal officials are reviewing immigration records for hundreds of Iranians on
the suspicion that many got immigration benefits, including status as permanent
residents of the United States, through fraud or bribery.

The investigation focuses on the period after the seizure of the United States
Embassy in Teheran, which led President Carter to impose severe restrictions on
the issuance of visas and permanent resident alien identification cards,
commonly known as green cards, to Iranians.

Officials of the Immigration and Naturalization Service and the Federal Bureau
of Investigation said last week that Federal agents were reviewing the records
and interviewing Iranians to find out how hundreds had obtained visas and green
cards despite the restrictions.

Although the United States and Iran have no formal diplomatic relations,
Iranians streaming out of the Middle East through Europe continue to seek a
haven here. They include supporters of the late Shah, opponents of Ayatollah
Ruhollah Khomeini and members of many religious and ethnic minority groups.

Grand Jury Investigation

The officials said that a grand jury, to be convened here this summer, would
focus on two tactics tried by many Iranians: the use of counterfeit documents to
show a close family relationship to citizens or permanent residents of the
United States, and the incorporation of American businesses purporting to be
subsidiaries of Iranian companies.

Both tactics enabled Iranians to get green cards, which give foreigners many of
the rights of citizens. After living in this country for five years, permanent
resident aliens are eligible to become naturalized citizens.

Federal agents have been scrutinizing the activities of Shams Javid, a
47-year-old Iranian-American whom they described as a target of the
investigation. In a two-hour interview at a restaurant near his home in Falls
Church, Va., Mr. Javid said that Federal agents ''were constantly there at my
house'' and had interrogated many Iranians whom he had advised on immigration
matters.

Mr. Javid is not a lawyer, but said he had helped Iranians fill out immigration
forms. When asked how many of his countrymen had entered the United States with
his assistance, he smiled and said, ''God knows - thousands.''

Became Citizen in 1970

Mr. Javid said that he came to the United States in 1963, became a citizen in
1970 and worked at Iran's Embassy here as a purchasing officer in 1973 and 1974.

In the last year, he said, he offered his services as an immigration consultant
from the Falls Church office of the Sunshine Company of America Inc. The
company's articles of incorporation, on file with the Virginia State Corporation
Commission, show that it was formed in December 1979 as a subsidiary of an
Iranian company to engage in the export-import business.

It became virtually impossible for such companies to trade with Iran after
President Carter, on April 7, 1980, announced a break in diplomatic relations
with Teheran and prohibited exports from the United States to Iran.

Several immigration lawyers said that their Iranian clients had been interviewed
by immigration officers who wanted to know about Mr. Javid and his activities.

With the help of a grand jury, Federal agents also plan to investigate whether
immigration service employees helped Iranians in their efforts to get benefits
for themselves and their relatives.

Indirect Payments Suspected

Sources close to the investigation said the investigators believed that some
Iranians had paid immigration service employees indirectly, through
intermediaries who ''laundered'' the money.

The investigation to date has concentrated on the Washington district office of
the immigration service, which serves the District of Columbia and Virginia, but
it may be extended to other offices.

Investigators said that to obtain green cards, some Iranians had submitted
counterfeit birth certificates and marriage certificates to establish that they
were related to citizens or permanent resident aliens. In some cases, the
officials said, the documents were not birth or marriage records, but copies of
pages from law books written in Persian.

Immigration examiners are supposed to obtain translations of documents written
in a foreign language, but even so, Government lawyers said, it might be
difficult to prove criminal intent rather than negligence by immigration service
employees in such cases.

Fraud Said to Continue

Law-enforcement officials said that the fraud was apparently continuing, but
that the immigration service had put into effect controls to prevent the
issuance of green cards to ineligible applicants. So far, no employees have been
dismissed or reassigned.

The investigation of Iranian immigration cases overlaps, but is separate from,
the work of a Federal grand jury that has been investigating charges of
immigration fraud for the last 18 months.  According to reports published in
February 1980, the charges involved Mario T. Noto, a former Deputy Commissioner
of Immigration, and Maron J. Sheehi, an immigration inspector who retired last
month.

Mr. Javid said he had known Mr. Sheehi since his younger brother Samad Javid
bought a home from Mr. Sheehi in 1978. Property records show that the house was
sold for $69,500 in what appears to be a routine transaction.

Property records also show that last month Mr. Sheehi sold an adjacent lot for
$20,000 to a Virginia company called the Firm Corporation, which was formed last
March by four Iranians who had been military officers under the Shah.

One of the four Iranians said that he and his colleagues had applied for asylum
and that Mr. Sheehi had not had anything to do with their immigration cases.

Mr. Sheehi said that he would not answer any questions on the subject because
they related to matters pending before the grand jury.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Demonstrators , carried portraits of Ayatollah
Rubollah

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              130 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 22, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

NEW WAYS TO CURB ILLEGAL ALIENS ARE ADVANCED BY 2 CONGRESSMEN

BYLINE: By ROBERT LINDSEY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 988 words

DATELINE: SAN DIEGO, June 21


Senior Congressional leaders on immigration policy said here this weekend that a
consensus was emerging in both houses on the legislation needed to restrict the
flow of illegal immigrants into the United States.

Speaking at a national conference on immigration, Senator Alan K.  Simpson,
Republican of Wyoming, and Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of
Kentucky, chairmen of the subcommittees on immigration in their respective
legislative bodies, said that the package would probably include these measures:

- Establishment of some type of citizenship identity card, perhaps a redesigned
''counterfeit-proof'' Social Security card.

- Penalties against employers who hire illegal aliens.

- Expansion of the United States Border Patrol.

- A ''guest worker'' program allowing aliens to take jobs temporarily in this
country. It would be similar to the ''Bracero Program'' that was suspended in
1964, but it contains provisions to prevent exploitation of workers.

- Amnesty for many or all of the more than six million aliens believed to be
living in this country illegally.

Legislators Expect Opposition

A Reagan Administration group examining immigration policy is expected to
release a report shortly recommending many of the same provisions.

Senator Simpson and Representative Mazzoli, who appeared separately before the
conference, held by The City Club of San Diego, said that they expected
resistance to some proposals. They said that the ''guest worker'' program would
probably be opposed by organized labor and the Hispanic community; sanctions
against employers, by business, and the proposed national identity card, by
civil libertarians.

But they predicted that agreement could be reached on a workable plan, declaring
that all the provisions were needed to make the program effective and that
strong bipartisan support was developing in Congress to reduce the entry of
illegal aliens, as well as legally admitted refugees.

''The House and Senate committees both believe the time is now,'' Senator
Simpson said. ''The current flow of immigration is out of control; the United
States is taking in more legal immigrants for permanent residence than the rest
of the world combined.''

''People are not writing hate mail about this,'' he said, ''they are writing
frustrating mail; it boils down to, 'What are you boobs going to do?' ''

Divisions in Nation Predicted

Senator Simpson said that 85 percent of those who immigrate into this country
this year would be Spanish-speaking; that 80 percent of the babies born in Los
Angeles County hospitals would be delivered by mothers who were illegal aliens,
and that Spanish-speaking immigrants were assimilating into the mainstream of
society at a substantially slower rate than past groups of immigrants.

If these patterns continued, he contended, they could lead to a nation with two
cultures and two languages. This division, he said, could lead to serious
economic and social divisions.

The Senator said he believed that the country should reduce the total number of
legal immigrants (last year's total was about 808,000); set a limit for
refugees; maintain limits on total immigration from individual countries;
substantially limit the ability of legal immigrants to sponsor the entry of
large extended families from abroad, and develop a point system that gives
preference to applications for immigration based on such things as vocational
skills and the ability to speak English.

Law Called 'Unenforceable'

Representative Mazzoli said that ''today's immigration law is really no law at
all; it is unenforceable.'' Illegal aliens, he asserted, were already driving up
the taxes of American citizens to pay for social services and were taking jobs
that could be filled by citizens. But, he said, given the rate of migration and
the high birth rate of many immigrant groups, the most serious repercussions
from today's largely unrestricted immigration would be in the future.

Another speaker, Art Torres, a California State Assemblyman who is a
Mexican-American, denounced assertions that aliens were taking jobs away from
Americans and burdening social services and bitterly attacked most of the
proposals outlined by the Congressmen.

Proposals Are Assailed

Mr. Torres said that the ''guest worker'' program, sanctions against employers
and the proposed identity card would lead to discrimination against Hispanic
Americans.

He defended Spanish-English bilingual education and the efforts of Hispanic
migrants to retain their language and culture. America, he said, is a
''pluralistic culture'' that has always thrived on diversity.

Referring to immigrants from the third world, he said: ''People are still going
to come to this country because here is where dreams are made.''

Gov. Richard D. Lamm of Colorado said that his state was adding about 20,000
Southeast Asian refugees to its welfare rolls each month. He endorsed many of
the proposals in the consensus plan outlined by the two legislators.

''America cannot be the home of last resort for all of the dispossessed of the
world,'' he said. ''The single most effective thing that could be done to deal
with illegal immigration. is to make it illegal to hire an illegal immigrant.''

Michael Teitelbaum, a Ford Foundation demographer, said that the influx of
illegal aliens to America was now ''out of control'' and that the situation
could get worse unless action was taken.The third world's population, he said,
was expected to grow by 1.6 billion between now and the year 2000, and the
result would be mounting pressure on the industrialized world to accept
immigrants.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              131 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 21, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

A STORYTELLER'S STORY

SECTION: Section 7; Page 7, Column 1; Book Review Desk

LENGTH: 1642 words


LOST IN AMERICA By Isaac Bashevis Singer.  Illustrated by Raphael Soyer.  259
pp. New York: Doubleday & Co.  $17.95

By MARK HARRIS

At the heart of this memoir lie two principle actions or motions revealing the
central character - Isaac Bashevis Singer himself as he was and as he probably
remains in his characteristic relationship to the world of commercial efficiency
and human indifference.  During the first action he makes his perilous way from
doomed Warsaw, through Nazi Germany, to Seagate, his brother's home near Coney
Island.  During the second action he travels from New York to Canada in order to
re-enter the United States with immigration papers more secure than his Polish
documents.  Only Kafka could explain this.

Mr. Singer, age about 30, left Warsaw with two valises of clothing and
manuscripts.  Germany was "decorated with Nazi banners" celebrating Hitler's
47th birthday.  The season was also Passover.  From the train window he saw
incidents of anti-Semitic abuse, and while the train was stopped in Berlin "a
young man came into the car and called my name.  I became frightened.  Had they
come to arrest me?  It turned out that the young man worked for (or was
associated with) my travel agent and he brought some matzohs and a Passover
delicacy. . .  The other passengers looked on in amazement as I sat chewing the
matzoh."

On shipboards at last, "two valises stood in the dark cabin, silent witnesses
that I had lived nearly thirty years in Poland, which that day seemed to me more
remote than it does now. . . . I was what the cabala calls a naked soul - a soul
which has departed one body and awaits another." He ascends to the deck, but he
has forgotten the number of his cabin.  "I tried to locate my cabin without the
help of others (who could have helped me?) but I only strayed through the
passageways and climbed and down countless stairs . . .  I traveled in circles,
like a jackass around a millstone.  Every few minutes I saw the same faces.  The
passengers apparently divined my confusion, since they smiled and winked at each
other.  My demons had not abandoned me.  They were accompanying me to America."

He recalls the number of his cabin as "suddenly" as he had forgotten it, but in
the dining room a new problem arises.  Once more his strangeness, his
"confusion," is apparent to everyone else: He is assigned the only table for one
in the room.  "Abruptly now, I blurted, 'I am very sorry, but I'm a
vegetarian,'" for he has decided now to "act according to my convictions." And
this of course spells trouble.  "Immediately questions came at me from the
tables among which I was squeezed . . .  What was the reason for my
vegetarianism?  Was it on account of my health?  On doctors' orders?  Did it
have to do with religion?  The men appeared insulted that I had introduced a
sort of controversy into their presence.  They had come here to enjoy
themselves, not ot philosophize about the anguish of animals and fish.  I tried
in my mangled German to explain to them that my vegetarianism was based on no
religion but simply on the feeling that creature laced the right to rob another
creature of its life and devour it. I turned, momentarily and against my will,
propagandist."

Often his demons are the demons of impulse, and the stuff of great comedy.  When
he plans his trip from New York to Canada, he decides that he must take his
friend Zosia with him.  "Only after she consented did I realize how many
complications - financial, legal, psychological - this little venture would
bring about." In the hotel in Detroit, Singer was to meet "Mr. Smith," a furtive
man "wearing a little hat with a brush in it," who was to escort him illegally
across a bridge into Canada.  When the call came, Singer "went right out into
the corridor and began searching for the elevator, but it had vanished," like
his cabin on the ship.  Later he loses Zosia.  He finds her in a bus station.
She, not he, was detained at the border.  He had promised to assist her in
losing her virginity in Canada, but in spite of international experience in this
sort of thing, at the crucial moment he is suddenly helpless - "What I really
felt now was kind of negative erection, if one may use an expression like this."

At any rate, he believes he can now be assured of U.S. citizenship.  But on the
returning train, he is again terrified to hear his name called out. He is
removed form the train and taken to an elderly man, who tells him that "the
doctor at the consulate expressed some doubt about your eyes." Thus, in the
middle of the night, in the middle of nowhere, he struggles to read an eye
chart.  He is nervous.  He fails.  His hearing also fails him.  Even so, the
elderly man passes him on to the U.S.A.

This memoir seems to cover a period of three or four years, beginning in the mid
1930's, although Mr. Singer's age varies from one part of the book to another
and seldom agrees with the year of his birth, 1904. Neither here nor in his
fiction has he ever been compulsively specific, although there was a time when,
for $16 a week during his first year in New York, he wrote a column for the
Jewish Daily Forward "under the title 'It's Worthwhile Knowing' - 'facts' culled
from American Magazines: . . . How much did the heaviest specimen of a whale
weigh?  How large was the vocabularly of a Zulu?

Every week, when he delivered his column of facts to the Forward, he collected
his mail bringing news of old friends, family, lovers in Warsaw who, as history
knows, were soom to be swept by barbarism from the earth. In Warsaw, to escape
to America, he had told the American consul several lies.  The consul "shrugged
his shoulders and wished me a happy journey. Oddly, all the lies I told the
consul that day came true years later." One lie he had told the consul was that
he "was being invited to America to speak about literature.  I looked like a
frightened boy, not a lecturer."

And as history also knows, Mr. Singer became a renowned writer, laden with
honors.  Not every renowned writer is as confident as he is.  In this book he
does as he pleases - makes his own rules - choosing to isolate one short span of
his life and to revisit it in a form which will demand neither dramatic
invention, as in fiction, nor facts not always worth knowing, as in
autobiography.  "I consider this work no more than fiction set against a
background of truth.  I would call the whole work: contributions to an
autobiography I never intend to write."

Even so, this is Mr. Singer's third book of his kind of autobiography, following
"A Little Boy in Search of God" and "A Young Man in Search of Love." His father,
the author has told us in the earlier books, "lived like a saint and he died
like one." And Singer himself is a saint - or anyhow saintly - which may be the
reason why, to avoid speaking directly of his virtue, he evolves a form whose
narrative he clouds: "I had to distort facts . . .  dates . . .  places . . . in
order not to hurt those who were close to me."

His main intention is something larger than data.  His father, he says, was a
man "blessed with a faith in God, His Mercy, His Providence.  My lack of this
faith is actually the story I am about to tell." His faith resides partly in his
writing, in the idea that something good must come of it.

Merging memory and feeling, defying form when form will not serve, he has made
in the end this work of wisdom, regret and humor.  Perhaps when he sees his
brother he is also seeing himself.  "I came up to the house and spotted my
brother outlined within the illuminated window.  He sat at a narrow table with a
pen in one hand, a manuscript in the other.  I had never thought about my
borther's appearance, but this evening I considered him for the first time with
curiosity, as if I weren't his brother but some stranger.  Everyone I had
encountered in Seagate this day had been sunburned, but his long face was pale.
He read not only with his eyes but mouthed the words as he went along.  From
time to time, he arched his brows with an expression that seemed to ask, How
could I have written this? . . . I felt as if I could read his mind: It's all
vanity, this whole busine of writing, but since one does it, one must do it
right."

Mr. Singer's thinking begins to assume the form of negative speculations as we
approach the end of the period of his life told in this book.  "I was beginning
to ponder a religion of rebellion against God's indifference and the cruelty of
those whom He has created in His image." After a summer of "exteme sociability"
in the Catskills he returned to the city to be overcome by melancholy, thoughts
of suicide.  He seemed to be especially oppressed by butcher shops and fish
stores piled high with their dead wares: "How frivolously the Creator squandered
his powers!" Identifying with all diminished, mortal creatures, he remembers
shamefully a "ruthless act" he had committed as a boy, when he had trapped a fly
in a bottle left it to die: "Now I have become this fly myself, doomed to expire
in darkness, a victim of a power that played games with frail creatures."

Here, for the moment, the young man's quest ends.  Singer the man goes on, of
course.  If we are lucky we will have further volumes of this autobiography.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: drawing of Isaac Bashevis Singer

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              132 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 20, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

L.I. MAN ACCUSED AT TRIAL OF NAZI PAST

BYLINE: By JOHN T. McQUISTON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 21, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 682 words

DATELINE: WESTBURY, L.I., June 19


The United States Government is seeking to deport a 62-year-old Long Island man
who is said to have been an officer at a Nazi prison camp in Estonia. Some
12,000 Eastern Europeans, including 2,000 Jews, were executed at the camp in
World War II.

During a weeklong, nonjury trial in Federal District Court here before Judge
Jacob Mishler, the Government argued that the man - Karl Linnas, a draftsman who
lives in Greenlawn - had lied to immigration authorities in 1951 when he entered
the country as a displaced person from Germany. The Government said he had lied
again when he became a United States citizen in 1960, by saying that he had been
a student during World War II.

Using a series of television interviews taped in the Soviet Union three months
ago, and documents allegedly found in files at the prison camp, Federal lawyers
attempted to show that Mr. Linnas was an officer in an Estonian partisan group
that had collaborated with the German army and conducted executions of Jews and
Communists at the prison in Tartu, Estonia, in 1941.

The charges were denied by Mr. Linnas through his lawyer, Ivars Berzins, who
attempted to prove that any testimony or documents provided in the Soviet Union
were not trustworthy. Mr. Linnas did not appear in court during the proceedings,
and Mr. Berzins refused to talk with reporters.

Death Sentence in U.S.S.R.

Mr. Linnas was tried in absentia in the Soviet Union 20 years ago and sentenced
to death on charges of war crimes. The United States ignored a Soviet request in
1961 to extradite Mr. Linnas, who declared that the charges against him were
''Moscow propaganda.''

To support this contention, Mr. Berzins today called a former Soviet prosecutor
and member of the Moscow bar association as a witness. Speaking through an
interpreter, the witness, Frederick Nezansky, said the Soviet judicial system
did not hesitate to produce forged documents or perjured witnesses.

''What you have to say is very interesting, but what has this got to do with
this case?'' asked Judge Mishler. ''Can you show us that a document introduced
in this case is a forgery?''

''No,'' Mr. Nezansky responded.

Takes the Fifth 95 Times

Among the documents were notes that had supposedly been signed by Mr. Linnas
when he allegedly served as an officer in the prison camp.  Neal M. Sher, deputy
director of a special unit of the Justice Department that was created two years
ago to pursue the prosecution of Nazi war criminals, said that Mr. Linnas,
beyond giving his name, had refused to answer any questions during pretrial
proceedings and that he had invoked the Fifth Amendment against
self-incrimination 95 times.

In videotaped testimony taken in Estonia and with his image appearing on three
television screens, Elmar Puusepp, a 74-year-old Estonian, said he saw Mr.
Linnas herd a group of Jews, including a 5-year-old girl with a doll, aboard a
bus. About a half-hour later, Mr. Puusepp said, the bus returned to camp empty,
except for the doll, which a guard took to a warehouse. According to the
testimony, the bus riders had been taken to a site nearby and shot to death.

Another videotaped witness, Hans Laats, said he had seen Mr. Linnas order the
execution of several Communists. Mr. Laats, a 66-year-old forestry inspector,
was an administrator at the Tartu camp. He served 12 years of a 20-year sentence
for collaboration with the Nazis.

The videotapes were made in Tallinn, the Estonian capital. The witnesses were
cross-examined by Rodney Smith and Martha Talley, the two Justice Department
lawyers who prosecuted the case this week in Westbury.

Judge Mishler today reserved decision and told lawyers for both sides to submit
their final written arguments to him within two weeks. Government officials said
that should Mr. Linnas be found guilty, the appeals process and deportation
proceedings would take at least seven years.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              133 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 17, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Cuban Slain at Atlanta Prison

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 102 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA, June 16


A Cuban detainee at the Atlanta Federal Penitentiary was stabbed to death today.
Victor Robaina-Valdivia, 34 years old, was the third Cuban refugee to die in a
violent attack at the institution since the boatlift last year, said Jack
Hanberry, the warden. Neither a prison spokesman nor the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, which is conducting an inquiry, would elaborate on the stabbing.
Mr. Robaina-Valdivia, who had been imprisoned in Cuba, was being held here
pending an Immigration and Naturalization Service hearing to determine whether
he should be released.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              134 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 16, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

PHILIPPINES EXPELLING U.S. PRIEST, APPARENTLY BECAUSE OF TEACHINGS

BYLINE: By HENRY KAMM, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 542 words

DATELINE: MANILA, June 15


An American Roman Catholic priest on the southern island of Mindanao has been
denied an extension of his stay and ordered to leave the Philippines by
Saturday.

The priest, the Rev. Edward D. Shellito of the Maryknoll Fathers, was given no
explanation for the expulsion order by the Commission on Immigration and
Deportation. His superiors intend to request a stay of the order to ascertain
the charges against him and present a reply.

The case has come into the open while the Philippines awaits the first visit of
Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig Jr., who is due on Wednesday from Peking.

The deportation action appears to be based on a report to the chief of the
Philippine Constabulary from the provincial commander in Davao Norte, where
Father Shellito is an assistant parish priest. The commander, Col. Teofilo B.
Bulosan, recommends in the report, dated April 16, that deportation proceedings
be initiated on a charge that the missionary instigated people to rebel against
the Government.

The recommendation is based on a report by First Lieut. Porferio C. Corpuz, a
constabulary intelligence officer, that cites testimony by participants in a
seminar conducted in February by the 29-year-old priest, a native of Erie, Pa.

Businessman Gets Copy

The witnesses accused Father Shellito of having said that Jesus had been
considered a rebel in his time. He was also said to have contended that the
recent visit to Davao by Pope John Paul II had not been intended for the poor of
the region but for the Archbishop of Davao and Antonio Y. Floirendo, a wealthy
businessman with extensive commercial interests in Davao and elsewhere and a
confidant of President and Mrs. Ferdinand E. Marcos.

Colonel Bulosan's letter bears the notation ''Copy furnished: Mr.  Antonio
Floirendo.'' Mr. Floirendo is not known to hold a government position entitling
him to receive confidential military intelligence documents. He is, however, the
regional leader of President Marcos's New Society Party.

In an interview here, the priest denied the charges. Bishop Pedro R. Dean of
Tagum, under whom he works, has asserted in a testimonial that Father Shellito
carried out his priestly duties ''in accordance with the doctrine and teachings
of the Roman Catholic Church'' and that he knows of no disruptive political
activity by him.

The Davao region is a center of operations by the Communist New People's Army
and governmental military and paramilitary units.  Violent incidents are
frequent. Father Shellito said that shortly before the constabulary
investigation of his seminar teaching, he had been informed by parishioners of
the killing of two farmers, allegedly by government paramilitary forces, and had
made inquiries about it.

Since the imposition of martial law in 1972, two American Maryknoll missionaries
have been expelled from Davao and a third was refused permission to return from
leave in the United States. In an interview earlier this year, Mr. Floirendo
criticized the Maryknoll missionaries, charging that they were involved in
political agitation against the Government.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              135 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 15, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

MORE HAITIANS ARRIVE IN FLORIDA

BYLINE: Associated Press

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 39 words


Some of the nearly 100 Haitians who arrived Saturday in Key Biscayne wait to be
interviewed by immigration officials. Some area residents who were boating
nearby offered them food from picnic lunchboxes; others shouted ''Go home!''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              136 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 13, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

SMITH URGES MIAMI BUSINESSMEN AS HEAD OF IMMIGRATION SERVICE

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 10, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 681 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 12


Attorney General William French Smith has asked President Reagan to nominate
Norman Braman, a 48-year-old Miami businessman, to be Commissioner of
Immigration and Naturalization.

Justice Department officials said today that the choice of Mr.  Braman reflected
the Administration's conclusion that management expertise was the quality most
needed in the person who would direct the Immigration and Naturalization
Service. Members of Congress, Government auditors and immigration attorneys had
complained for years that the agency was mismanaged.

Mr. Braman started a chain of discount drug stores in Pennsylvania before moving
to Florida, where he is the head of an automobile sales and leasing
organization. He owns Braman Cadillac, which he has described as the largest
Cadillac retail dealership in the country.

Meanwhile, Justice Department officials said that President Reagan intended to
replace Peter B. Bensinger, the head of the Drug Enforcement Administration. Mr.
Bensinger was appointed by President Ford in 1975 and retained by President
Carter.

Budget Opposition Cited

A Reagan Administration official said that Mr. Bensinger was regarded as a poor
''team player'' because he had lobbied against budget cuts that the White House
had proposed for his agency.

John H. Langer, a spokesman for the drug agency, said that Mr.  Bensinger was on
a brief vacation, on a sailboat in the Chesapeake Bay, and could not be reached
for comment. Mr. Bensinger had apparently not been formally notified of the
President's plans to replace him.

At a meeting with reporters on May 14, Associate Attorney General Rudolph W.
Giuliani sharply criticized the drug enforcement agency, saying that the Federal
effort against narcotics had had ''abysmal'' results in the last four years.
Attorney General Smith said recently that ''drug enforcement simply was not a
priority of the previous Administration.'' However, neither Mr. Giuliani nor Mr.
Smith has publicly criticized Mr. Bensinger by name.

Mr. Smith has emphasized the control of illicit drug traffic as a means of
combating violent crime.

Interim Leadership Possible

Mr. Bensinger's deputy, Frederick A. Rody Jr., is scheduled to leave Washington
for another assignment at the end of next week. The agency may be run by interim
appointees for several months because no one has been selected to succeed either
Mr. Bensinger or Mr. Rody.

The immigration service has been under the direction of temporary appointees for
20 months, since Leonel J. Castillo left office at the end of September 1979.
David W. Crosland, the general counsel of the agency, served as acting
commissioner until last month, when the Attorney General named Doris M. Meissner
to serve in that capacity.

Mr. Braman described himself as ''the product of a good, sane immigration
policy,'' noting that his mother had come from Rumania and his father from
Poland.

Mr. Braman was a fund raiser for Mr. Reagan in last year's Presidential
campaign. He is vice president of the Greater Miami Jewish Federation and
chairman of the local United Jewish Appeal campaign.

----

Hearing on Haitians Postponed

Special to the New York Times

MIAMI, June 12 - A hearing to determine the legality and fairness of deportation
proceedings against undocumented Haitians was postponed today by a United States
District Court judge here.

Judge Alcee Hastings instructed the Immigration and Naturalization Service to
make transcripts of its June 1-5 Miami deportation hearings at which 76 Haitians
were ordered deported to their country. He indicated he might begin taking
testimony next Wednesday.

The judge ruled on a petition filed on behalf of the Haitians by the Haitian
Refugee Center Inc. and the American Civil Liberties Union. The disposition of
the case could affect more than 6,000 Haitians who might be deported as
undocumented aliens.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              137 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 10, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

MEXICO'S LEADER ENDS VISIT ON BRIGHT NOTE

BYLINE: By STEVEN R. WEISMAN, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 3, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 738 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 9


Reagan Administration officials said today that talks between President Reagan
and President Jose Lopez Portillo of Mexico had produced ''a great deal of
progress'' on the Administration's ''guest worker'' plan for Mexicans to work
legally in the United States.

Under a proposal outlined today by Attorney General William French Smith to
Mexican officials, 50,000 Mexicans would be permitted to enter the United States
to seek employment. The proposal is one of several prepared by a group of
specialists under Mr. Smith with the goal of curbing illegal immigration from
Mexico.

Mr. Smith also outlined proposals to grant amnesty to the 2.7 million Mexicans
who are thought to be living in the United States illegally and to permit them
to receive temporary worker status or become permanent resident aliens.

American officials, emphasizing that no final decisions had been made on these
proposals, would give no details of them today. The specifics were disclosed by
Mexican officials.

Talks End in Friendly Atmosphere

One indication of the continuing controversial nature of the proposals came when
eight labor, Hispanic, religious and civil rights groups held a news conference
this morning to say they opposed the idea of a guest worker program.

According to Mexican and American officials, Mr. Lopez Portillo and his aides
gave no reaction to the proposals. An Administration aide said the proposals
would be submitted to Congress soon.

The proposals were discussed as the two leaders ended a day and a half of talks
in a friendly, almost festive atmosphere. Mr. Lopez Portillo alluded to a tense
relationship between himself and President Carter, although he did not mention
Mr. Carter by name.  Relations in the Carter years were strained by disputes on
Mexican oil and natural gas exports, a subject that reportedly did not come up
this week.

''I confess for the first time now, I have felt totally relaxed,'' Mr. Lopez
Portillo said as Mr. Reagan looked on with a broad smile.  It had been Mr.
Reagan's intention to foster a personal friendship with Mr. Lopez Portillo to
ease Mexican-American strains.

Reagan Accepts Invitation

After spending the night at Camp David and having a state luncheon at the White
House today, Mr. Lopez Portillo met with Senator Edward M. Kennedy, the
Massachusetts Democrat, then left for Mexico City.

At the end of their talks, Mr. Reagan announced that, as expected, he had
accepted Mr. Lopez Portillo's invitation to attend the northsouth conference of
world leaders in Cancun, Mexico on Oct. 22 and 23. Cuba was not invited to the
conference and the Soviet Union decided not to attend, clearing the way for Mr.
Reagan's acceptance of the invitation.

The two Presidents also announced an agreement to set up joint panels to discuss
trade and political matters and disputes on fishing rights.

The Mexican Foreign Minister, Jorge Castaneda, told reporters this afternoon
that most of the discussions today and yesterday related to trade and the
problems of the Caribbean and Central America.  Yesterday, a senior Reagan aide
said that Mr. Lopez Portillo had agreed in principle to participate in a
proposed economic development plan for the area. Mr. Reagan's goal is to ease
poverty and counter what he sees as a threat of Communist-bloc influence.

Today Mr. Castaneda said that Mr. Lopez Portillo had imposed three conditions on
Mexican participation in such a plan and said the United States had accepted
them. He said the plan ''should not contain any military facet,'' it should not
be ''conceived of as a plan to fight the Soviet Union or Communism in the
region'' and no country should be excluded ''in principle'' from receiving help.

Mr. Castaneda's comments were a reiteration of a longstanding Mexican view that
the United States is overly concerned about Communist influence in the region
and not concerned enough about poverty and other conditions deemed to be the
main causes of revolution.

In a gesture to Mr. Lopez Portillo's position, Mr. Reagan said today that
economic development was ''the best way to assure the region's future
stability.'' But aides to the President maintained again that no details on the
economic plans had been worked out.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Pres. and Mrs. Reagan with Pres. and Mrs. Lopez
Portillo

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              138 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 10, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. PREPARES TO EXPEL 76 HAITIANS AFTER FINDING RIGHTS WERE HEEDED

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 28, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 380 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 9


The Immigration and Naturalization Service said today that it had reviewed last
week's hearings on 76 Haitians in this country and would expel them as soon as
travel documents were issued by the Haitian Government.

The agency said that the review showed that all 76 had been advised of their
rights to legal counsel on two occasions and of their right to a formal hearing
on the exclusion proceedings against them.

Attorneys for the Haitians had protested the conduct of the hearings in Miami,
particularly because the sessions were closed to the public and because the
Haitians were dealt with as a group rather than given individual hearings.

But the agency said today that all 76 were questioned individually by
immigration judges on whether they had documents permitting them to enter the
United States and they were each asked if they feared persecution if they
returned to Haiti. The agency said that all those who requested lawyers or
expressed fear of returning to Haiti were granted a continuance of their
proceedings.

11 Have Returned to Haiti

The agency reported that 136 hearings were held last week before immigration
judges. Twenty-six hearings were continued so that Haitians could obtain
attorneys; 14 were continued so that an asylum claim could be filed, and 96
Haitians were ordered expelled from the country. Of the 96, 11 were returned to
Haiti last Thursday and the immigration agency is completing documentation on
nine others.

The agency said that the 76 who are scheduled to return to Haiti had waived
their rights to a lawyer and said that they were not afraid to return to their
own country. As a result, they were ordered excluded. The agency said that they
were advised of their right to appeal the exclusion order and did not do so.

''We are satisfied that the rights of the Haitians who entered illegally without
documents were adequately protected and that they were fully aware of their
rights,'' said David Crosland, general counsel of the immigration service.
''They chose not to contest their expulsion.''

Officials said that exclusion hearings for Haitians illegally in this country
would soon be resumed.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              139 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               June 10, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

SALVADORAN REFUGEES PURSUING NEW LIVES

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 1; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 954 words


In the last year and a half, thousands of Salvadorans have settled in the New
York metropolitan area, most of them illegal aliens who consider themselves
political refugees from the violence of their native land.

The Federal Immigration and Naturalization Service does not know how many
Salvadorans are in New York, New Jersey and Connecticut, but community officials
and church groups estimate that between 24,000 and 70,000 have arrived since
January 1980.

Lydia Savoyka, supervisor of the Immigration Counseling Services of the United
States Catholic Conference, estimates that more than 3,500 Salvadorans arrive in
New York City each month. Others are settling in large numbers in Chicago, Los
Angeles, San Francisco, Miami and Washington.

Caution and Anonymity

Because of their illegal status, most live ''underground'' in Hispanic
communities, burying themselves as domestics or anonymous factory workers. When
asked their names by strangers, many give assumed names and say they are Puerto
Ricans, citizens of the United States.

They make few friends outside their inner circle of relatives. An illegal alien
with a lot of acquaintances, said a 19-year-old former Salvadoran student now
working as a part-time gardener in Stamford, Conn., has a lot of potential
betrayers.

While trying to adapt to life in the United States, their thoughts are with
their homeland. One woman who lives in the Bronx pretends that the clothes she
pleats and presses in a Manhattan garment factory are those of her daughter and
two sons, whom she left with their grandmother in El Salvador.

And Graciela Guadron, a 43-year-old widow living in the Bushwick section of
Brooklyn, cannot help remembering her four-bedroom house in San Salvador, with
its lush gardens and a three-car garage. She and her four children now share two
beds in a rundown tenement apartment with falling plaster in the bathroom and no
sink or showerhead. Their only possessions are the beds and a fake-fur loveseat;
the kitchen table was lent by relatives.

Her husband was shot to death before her eyes 10 months ago in their supermarket
in San Salvador, and the family has moved four times since then, dodging
assailants real and imagined, before obtaining visas six months ago and coming
to New York.

''Sometimes I cannot believe we are safe,'' she said softly. Her 8-year-old
daughter, Cleo, still cannot - she squeezes her eyes shut and dives to the floor
whenever a police or fire siren wails outside or there is a noise from the
apartment overhead.

Such reminders of home are everywhere - on the nightly television news, in the
crinkled photographs of loved ones dead or left behind.  Communications from
home detail each decapitation by machete, dismemberment by hand grenade, the
merciful shot in the dark.  Particularly dreaded are the phone calls - bad news,
the immigrants say, travels faster than good.

A Reminder of Slogans

The part-time gardener in Stamford said he felt ''terror'' when he first saw
graffiti-scarred buildings and subway cars because they reminded him of
political slogans scrawled by leftist guerrillas at home. He was amazed by the
congestion on the streets, the casual strolling, laughing, running.

''You have to be careful on the streets in San Salvador,'' he said. ''You cannot
run, or they will think you are a terrorist and shoot you.''

Salvadorans give three main reasons for emigrating: ''tranquilidad, seguridad,
protecion'' - peace, safety, protection.  ''Nothing is important to me,'' said a
19-year-old former secretarial student who now works in a cookie factory in
Union City, N.J. ''Only my life.''

Between 12,000 and 16,000 Salvadorans have been reported killed in the civil war
since January 1980, and it is the fear that they will be next that has propelled
the new wave of immigrants. Most bypass the neighboring Central American
countries, with their own varieties of political violence, and head straight for
the United States.

Many come by bus, either alone or with the aid of ''coyotes'' who smuggle them
in for $800 to $2,000 a head.  The few with temporary visas - either from an
American consulate or acquired through bribery - can leave El Salvador legally
and dare to bring luggage. The others just lock their front doors one day and
start walking to the nearest bus or border. Some reportedly have walked through
Central America and then crossed into Texas.

Once settled in New York, they live in constant fear of immigration
investigators. In the eight months that ended May 30, a total of 475 illegal
Salvadoran aliens were apprehended in New York City, 171 in New Jersey and fewer
than five in Connecticut.

Thousands have applied in vain for political asylum. The United States Catholic
Conference, for example, has received more than 6,000 such applications for
processing since January from the 100 to 250 Salvadorans who visit its Manhattan
office every Monday, Wednesday and Friday.

None has been granted. In mid-April, the State Department's Bureau of Human
Rights and Humanitarian Affairs advised against blanket amnesty for Salvadorans,
maintaining that the majority are motivated by economic deprivation rather than
the ''well-founded fear of persecution'' that is the legal prerequisite for
political asylum.

While their cases are being individually processed, the Salvadorans are in
limbo. One of them, Jorge Guadron, a 20-year-old former student, was told he
could not attend Hunter College until his case was decided.

''I was a student in my country, and here I am a busboy,'' he said in halting
English. ''My boss says that I am a very good worker. He said: 'God be willing,
you will be a waiter.' But I always wanted to be a professional, an engineer.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Gracieia Guadron photo of Gracieia Gaudron and
her children, william, Jorge, Alejandrina

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              140 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 9, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. DEPORTATIONS OF HAITIANS HALTED

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 387 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 8


The Immigration and Naturalization Service said today that it would suspend
deportation proceedings against Haitians pending a review of the procedures that
govern such hearings.

Lawyers trying to represent the Haitians complained last Friday that the aliens
had been denied due process of law because the preliminary hearings were held in
locked courtrooms from which private attorneys and spectators were barred.

The lawyers also complained that the Haitians were being brought before
immigration judges in groups of 17 or 18 rather than one by one.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the immigration service, said that for the last
four years the Government had been under a court order preventing the expulsion
of Haitians. The United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit, which
includes Florida, lifted the restrictions last December.

''I.N.S. is reviewing the legal and logistical problems inherent in resuming the
exclusion process after this long interruption,'' Mr.  Jervis said today in a
prepared statement. ''The Government fully intends to enforce the immigration
law consistent with proper legal and procedural protection of the aliens.''

Last week, at least 140 Haitians went through expulsion proceedings in Miami.
The immigration service contends that the refugees have no right to remain in
the United States because they failed to obtain visas or other travel documents
before entering.

Cases to Be Reviewed

''Haitians who have been found excludable or agreed to voluntarily depart within
the past week are having their cases reviewed before action is taken to remove
them from the country,'' Mr. Jervis said.

The suspension of proceedings, according to Mr. Jervis, will have no effect on
the 25 Haitians who were deported last week. Mr. Jervis said that the
immigration service had no plans to bring them back to the United States for
further hearings.

David W. Crosland, general counsel of the immigration service, said that he
expected the hearings to resume late this week.  Approximately 6,000 Haitians
have arrived in the United States since last October. Immigration officials have
said that they regard deportation proceedings as a way to discourage further
migration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              141 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 9, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

PUTTING IMMIGRATION INTO PROPER FOCUS

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 5; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 224 words


To the Editor:

In his June 1 news article ''Future Unclear for Reagan's Bold Immigration
Plan,'' John Crewdson says that the Administration's Interagency Task Force on
Immigration Policy is concerned that, with current rates of fertility and
immigration, by the year 2030 onefifth of the country's projected population of
300 million will be composed of immigrants who have arrived here since 1980, or
their descendants.

Your readers might be interested in knowing that eight other advanced industrial
countries (Australia, Switzerland, Canada, New Zealand, South Africa, France,
Sweden and Great Britain) currently have a higher percentage of foreign-born
than does the United States. Further, the percentage of foreign-born in this
country, counting those who are here legally, actually has gone down sharply,
despite recent increases in immigration and refugee admissions.

The cause of concern is clear. It is not the percentage of legal immigrants and
refugees out of the total population but the presence of large numbers of
persons who have come to the United States outside the law or who abuse their
non-immigrant visas that is alarming.

I applaud the Reagan Administration's efforts to cope with these problems.
(Rev.) THEODORE M. HESBURGH, Co-chairman, Citizens' Committee for Immigration
Reform, Washington, June 2, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: cartoon of immigrants

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              142 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 9, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

PUTTING IMMIGRATION INTO PROPER FOCUS;
* To the Editor:$


SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 190 words


Your May 27 editorial ''Multiple Choice on Immigration'' calls for swift action
to stop the flow of illegal immigrants across the Mexican border. You indicate
that our Border Patrol doesn't have the men or vehicles to function, and you
predict that new funds will not be forthcoming in this budget-cutting climate.

here is, of course, one simple way to respond to this crisis: use servicemen to
bolster the Border Patrol. One way might be to create several small
basic-training centers along the border and make border patrol part of recruit
training.

This, I suggest, would have many benefits: It would immediately end illegal
immigration across that border; it would not raise taxes; it would demonstrate
to all nations that our Federal laws are enforceable, and it would give many
Americans a feeling that this Administration is, at long last, capable of
responding to the national will and exercising the minimal requirement of
national sovereignty.  WILLIAM MULVIHILL Glen Cove, L.I., May 28, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              143 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 8, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. EXPECTING TALKS TO STRENGTHEN TIES WITH MEXICO

BYLINE: By STEVEN R. WEISMAN, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 656 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 7


The Reagan Administration hopes that the two days of talks with President Jose
Lopez Portillo of Mexico will strengthen communications between the United
States and Mexico at a time when several issues have been causing strains
between the two countries.

On his arrival at Andrews Air Force Base this evening, Mr. Lopez Portillo was
greeted by Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig Jr. and then traveled to Blair
House in downtown Washington. He was scheduled to arrive at the White House
tomorrow morning for a brief greeting ceremony and then leave for the
Presidential retreat at Camp David.

Administration officials said that among the principal items on the agenda of
Mr. Reagan and Mr. Lopez Portillo would be trade, immigration and differing
views of security problems in Central America.

'Guest Workers' Proposed

To deal with the problems posed by the illegal entry of Mexicans into the United
States, the Reagan Administration has been shaping a policy to double the annual
limit on legal immigration from Mexico and to establish an experimental ''guest
worker'' program that would permit 50,000 Mexicans a year to enter the United
States to seek employment.

Mexico has long pressed the United States to be more open to Mexicans seeking
job opportunities. In addition, Mexican officials are known to feel that any
''guest worker'' program should probably permit more than 50,000 Mexicans to
enter each year.

On trade, the United States has been eager to discuss its concerns about the
array of Mexican tax measures and other supports aimed at increasing Mexican
exports, particularly farm products that compete with American products.

Perhaps the greatest point of contention between the two Presidents is expected
to center on the Reagan Administration's new policies in Central America and the
Caribbean. President Reagan has approved, but not announced, a sweeping new
policy of economic and military assistance to ease poverty and counter what the
Administration maintains is Soviet and Cuban intervention in the area. The
President has already authorized limited military assistance to El Salvador to
help the Government there oppose leftist insurgents.

President Lopez Portillo opposes the Salvadoran Government and has had friendly
relations with both Cuba and the revolutionary Government of Nicaragua, a regime
the Reagan Administration has criticized.

Joint Statement Not Planned

In a briefing for reporters, a senior Administration official said there would
not be a joint statement at the end of the talks or any effort to ''align'' or
''adjust'' differing views, as there have been in some of Mr. Reagan's previous
talks with world leaders.

''It is not our position to have President Lopez Portillo leave this meeting
with a clear-cut understanding on every issue that has arisen, or will arise
between the United States and Mexico,'' the official said.

The two men first met in 1979 while Mr. Reagan was on a visit Mexico City. Last
Jan. 5, two weeks before his inauguration, Mr.  Reagan met the Mexican leader in
Ciudad Juarez, a border community across the Bridge of Friendship from El Paso,
Tex. They then pledged to establish a ''personal relationship'' to help ease
tensions between Mexico and the United States.

The schedule calls for senior aides to both leaders to travel to Camp David
tomorrow morning, remain there for the evening and return to the White House
Tuesday for a state luncheon. Despite the presence of the aides, the two leaders
are expected to spend at least some of the time alone.

The plan, for example, calls for them to take a long stroll in the woods
tomorrow afternoon, and an official said ''some form of recreation,'' possibly
including horseback riding, is in store.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of President Jose Lopez Portillo of Mexico , with
Ambassador John Gavin

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              144 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 8, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

DEPORTATION OF HAITIANS FROM MIAMI CENTER ON RISE

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 9, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 909 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 7


There is resigned stillness these days at the Immigration and Naturalization
Service's Krome Avenue Detention Center, which is home to some 800 refugees,
mostly Haitians.

A week and a half ago, all male Haitians were locked in the new concrete
two-story men's dormitory to keep them from escaping. Then, on Thursday and
Friday, a total of 25, the largest group of Haitians to have been deported since
early 1979, were put on planes back to Port-au-Prince after closed hearings at
the immigration service's downtown Miami headquaters.

The remaining male refugees were allowed out for meals and, as of Thursday, for
a 10-minute exercise period.  A month ago the immigration service added 25
guards to its 30-man force, put in a third 12-foot-high fence topped with barbed
wire, and assigned a patrol car to the camp.

Camp 'Like a Sieve'

Krome was ''like a sieve,'' in the words of one immigration service official,
who said inmates would take off to the local convenience store to supplement
their meager diets or to add new T-shirts to the minimal wardrobes issued them.
Others would disappear to Miami's rapidly growing ''Little Haiti'' about 35
miles to the east.

The 15-acre camp of scrubland on the eastern edge of the Everglades has been
split down the middle with a fence to keep the men and the women separate. They
even eat at different times.

The immigration service had been allowing five voluntary agencies to resettle
Haitian refugees pending their claims for political asylum. Then the service
decided not to release anyone who had arrived on a plane with forged visas after
Feb. 23. Of the 161 in this category, called the ''Boeing People,'' only 46 were
still at Krome when the security crackdown began. ''Boat people'' were not
allowed to leave if they arrived after May 20,

The Krome Avenue site, formerly used to store Nike missiles, was taken over by
the immigration service last summer to house Cubans who came from Mariel. But as
the influx of Cubans slowed to a trickle and the refugees were resettled, the
population of the plant shifted. Now the immigration service is bracing itself
for the seasonal influx of Haitians who take advantage of the summer-calm
Caribbean seas to make the crossing.

One-Quarter Detained

Only about one-quarter of the Haitian arrivals are caught before they have a
chance to disappear into Miami's Haitian community, according to United States
Representative Daniel Mica, a Democrat from West Palm Beach; those who are are
caught go to the Krome Avenue Detention Center.

Thus on Thursday and Friday, for example, while some of the Haitians were being
sent back to Port-au-Prince, 18 were sent to the center after they were arrested
while applying for work authorization papers. The immigration service will not
have an exact count of the number of refugees at the center until tomorrow.

Life for most Haitians is not easy, as it has not been for Samedy Philippe
Franklin. He is a slim, 23-year-old tailor from Cap-Haitien, one of the poorest
areas in a desperately poor country. In a good month he made about $35; some
months he made nothing. His relatives paid his $250 boat fare hoping that he
would find employment in this country and then help them. He left a wife and a
child behind.

On the overcrowded boat he lost his most valuable possession - addresses of
relatives in Miami who could help him. He has written back to Haiti for a copy
of the list but does not know how long he must wait to get an answer.

Complaints About Food

He and others have complained about the food. Sometimes it was rotten, Mr.
Franklin said, and other times there was not enough.  William Alexander, the
immigration service official in charge of Krome, conceded that they were having
trouble with both the quality and the quantity of the food served last month but
said there had been no recent complaints.

Dr. Richard Morgan, head of the Dade County Health Department, said that
conditions at Krome had improved greatly with the open of the new men's
building. He said he was worried, however, that the expected influx of new
refugees would force camp officials to use the tents again.

Getting in touch with the outside world is the Haitians' biggest problem. There
is only one phone in the compound to which the refugees have ready access. It is
this phone that refugees depend on to contact their relatives in Florida as well
as lawyers to represent them at their immigration service hearings. Those who
appear without a lawyer almost certainly will be found ''excludable,'' according
the Steven D. Forester, a lawyer with the Haitian Refugee Center.

Agencies Sharing One Phone

The five voluntary agencies that have been charged with relocating the Haitians
also have to share one phone, which increases the difficulties of getting in
touch with relatives and sponsors.

Along with the Federal Government's Office of Refugee Resettlement, the
volunteer agencies have been working six-day weeks to relocate as many refugees
as possible. ''These are good, hard-working people,'' said Tania Mary Dina,
Miami director of the U.S. Catholic Conference. ''They deserve a chance.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              145 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 7, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIAN REFUGEES IN MIAMI ARE WARNED OF IMMIGRATION ARREST THREAT

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 23, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 447 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 6


Community agency workers took to the streets with bullhorns here yesterday to
warn Haitian refugees that the Immigration and Naturalization Service had begun
arresting new arrivals who apply for work authorization papers.

Fourteen Haitians were arrested Thursday and four more were arrested yesterday
and taken to the Krome Avenue refugee processing center.

The immigration service's Acting Commissioner, Dorothy Meissner, said today that
although she had not specifically called for the arrests, they were in line with
a decision made by the agency in late April to hold exclusion hearings for the
most recent Haitian arrivals first.

There is a backlog of 6,000 cases of Haitians who have arrived in the United
States since Oct. 10, when a special legal status granted the Cubans and
Haitians permitting them to remain here was revoked.

Some Exceptions to Be Made

''I am aware,'' Commissioner Meissner said, ''that work authorizations are no
longer being given for people who arrived after Oct. 10.'' She added that
exceptions would be made for those arrivals who had been processed by the
immigration service and were living with sponsors awaiting their hearings.

''People we never processed or registered are now showing up for work
authorization,'' she said.  By sending illegal Haitian refugees home to the
Caribbean island as soon as they arrived, she said, the immigration service
hoped to discourage others planning to make the same trip.

Yesterday, Attorney General William French Smith ordered the immigration
authorities to end mass hearings that began this week to exclude Haitians from
formal entry in the United States and send them back to Haiti. He also said
these hearings should be opened to the public.

Objections to Closed Hearings

Lawyers in Miami had objected to being denied access to the Haitians and their
hearings.  Representative Shirley Chisholm, Democrat of Brooklyn, asserted in a
letter to Mr. Smith yesterday that the recent arrests were ''clearly a change in
policy,'' and asked the reason for the alleged shift.

Commissioner Meissner said today that, ''The Attorney General has restated the
guidelines for generally acceptable jurisprudence,'' and added that she did not
think there was a need to continue closed proceedings.

There are about 800 Haitians in Miami now awaiting deportation proceedings.
Chief Immigration Judge Joseph Monsanto has said he expected 40 cases a day to
be processed next week.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              146 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                June 6, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

HAITIAN DEPORTATIONS START; U.S. ORDERS OPEN HEARINGS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 990 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, June 5


The immigration authorities in Miami have begun mass deportation proceedings
against newly arrived Haitians, processing 35 cases a day in locked courtrooms
from which private lawyers have been barred.

Justice Department officials, after receiving complaints and inquiries about the
unusual procedures, said tonight that they would direct the authorities in Miami
to hold the hearings in open court, one case at a time. Associate Attorney
General Rudolph W. Giuliani added that each Haitian would be clearly advised of
his right to consult a lawyer.

Verne Jervis, a spokesman for the immigration agency here, acknowledged that the
proceedings this week in Miami represented a change in practice. Haitians and
Cubans who arrived in the United States without visas before last Oct. 10 were
given special legal status permitting them to remain in the United States.
Action against those arriving since then was held in abeyance while immigration
officials decided what to do with them.

Mr. Jervis said that the agency was going forward with proceedings to expel the
6,000 Haitians who arrived after Oct. 10. The 35,000 Haitians who previously
arrived in Florida and were known to the immigration agency have been allowed to
stay.

Lawyer 'Thrown Out of Courtroom'

Steven D. Forester, an attorney for the Haitian Refugee Center in Miami, said
that the group hearings and deportations represented a ''total departure'' from
the practice followed by the Immigration and Naturalization Service over the
last two years.

''On Monday,'' Mr. Forester said, ''I was thrown out of a courtroom in which an
immigration judge was holding a mass hearing for 35 Haitians. Twenty-five of
them received final orders of exclusion.''

Representative Shirley Chisholm, Democrat of Brooklyn, said today that the
proceedings in Miami were ''clear violations of due process'' of law. In a
two-page letter to Attorney General William French Smith, she said the
deportations should be halted ''until there is a full and complete investigation
of the practices'' in court and at the detention center where the Haitians have
been held.

Mrs. Chisholm and other members of the Congressional Black Caucus have
complained for more than a year that Haitians were treated more harshly than
other aliens seeking refuge in the United States.

Many Willing to Return

Mr. Jervis and Judge Joseph W. Monsanto, the nation's chief immigration judge,
based in Miami, confirmed that the proceedings were being conducted on a larger
scale than in the past.

Mr. Jervis said that 11 Haitians who had entered the United States illegally
returned to Haiti yesterday and 14 more departed today.  These 25 Haitians, he
added, told the court they were not afraid to return to their homeland.

At least 140 Haitians have been through such proceedings this week, Mr. Jervis
said. Ninety indicated that they were willing to go back to Haiti, he said, and
the others were to have further hearings.

The immigration agency maintains that the Haitians arrived in the United States
without visas and have no right to remain. In the past, most of the Haitian
refugees were allowed to stay here pending a resolution of their request for
political asylum.

Judge Monsanto said, ''I am requiring the judges to perform their tasks strictly
as the law requires - nothing more, nothing less.''

Violation of Ethics Alleged

He also said that Mr. Forester's attempt to seek access to the Haitians was an
effort to solicit business in violation of the canons of professonal ethics. The
Haitians ''have as much of a right not to have a lawyer as to have one,'' Judge
Monsanto said, noting that Mr. Forester had not been hired by the aliens.

The judge said that the courtroom had been closed in keeping with Section 236 of
the Immigration and Nationality Act, which says that an inquiry into the
admissibility of an alien ''shall be kept separate and apart from the public.''

Mr. Forester added, however, that under the immigration agency's rules, an alien
could waive his right to a closed hearing and ask for an open proceeding.

In her letter to the Attorney General, Mrs. Chisholm said that the new practices
were reminiscent of Carter Administration policies that were condemned last year
by Federal District Judge James Lawrence King in a class-action suit filed on
behalf of 5,000 Haitians.

Federal Judge's Opinion Cited

''Those Haitians who came to the United States seeking freedom and justice did
not find it,'' Judge King said in his opinion.  ''Instead, they were confronted
with an Immigration and Naturalization Service determined to deport them.'' The
results, he said, were ''offensive to the very notion of constitutional due
process and equal protection.''

Dale Frederick Swartz 3d, an attorney for the Lawyers' Committee for Civil
Rights Under Law, who represented the Haitians in the case before Judge King,
said the immigration agency had apparently decided that ''it must resort to sham
and secret proceedings'' because the Haitians might otherwise qualify for
political asylum.

Mr. Forester and a Justice Department lawyer who visited Haitians being held at
the Krome Avenue detention camp outside Miami said that telephone service there
had been disrupted, apparently by construction work in the area. As a result,
they said, the Haitians often could not communicate with lawyers.

Altogether, according to Judge Monsanto, there are about 800 Haitians for whom
proceedings must be held. The judge said he intended to step up the pace to 40 a
day next week. It was not immediately clear whether those plans would be
affected by the directive issued tonight by the Justice Department.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              147 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 5, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Around the Nation;
11 Haitians Are Deported As U.S. Steps Up Hearings

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 10, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 85 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, June 4


After a major step-up in Immigration and Naturalization Service hearings, 11 of
the Haitians who fled to this country by boat were deported today. Thirteen more
refugees are scheduled to be deported tomorrow.

This is the first time since early 1979 that groups of Haitian refugees have
been sent back to Haiti.  Until now, most refugees have been able to remain in
the United States pending resolution of their claims for political asylum.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              148 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 June 1, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

FUTURE UNCLEAR FOR REAGAN'S BOLD IMMIGRATION PLAN;
News Analysis

BYLINE: By JOHN M. CREWDSON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 15, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1277 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON, May 31


With reports that a Cabinet-level advisory committee has completed its charter
for restructuring this country's immigration policy, the Reagan Administration
has taken a critical and long-awaited first step toward resolving a problem
that, after decades of inattention, is fast assuming the proportions of a
national crisis.

The problem may be stated briefly: To what extent is the United States prepared
to permit or at least to tolerate the continued immigration of impoverished and
oppressed refugees and aliens, legal and illegal, and with them the enhanced
potential for social conflict inherent in a permanently multilingual,
multicultural society?

Whatever the answer, the dimensions of the crisis are now clear.  The
committee's report said that, given current rates of fertility and immigration,
in just 50 years a fifth of the country's projected population of 300 million
would be made up of immigrants who had arrived here since the report or their
descendants, many of whom will speak little or no English and will be competing
against one another and the indigenous poor for jobs, housing and social
services.

The Reagan plan has its bolder elements, going far beyond anything proposed by
preceding administrations. It would eventually transform nearly 3 million
illegal aliens already living here into legal residents, while allowing others
to enter the United States legally as temporary workers for limited periods.
Both steps will certainly reduce the magnitude of illegal immigration, if only
by definition.

Reinforcement of Border Patrols

As a counterweight, the plan would provide more than a token reinforcement of
patrols along the Mexican border in the hope of keeping out more uninvited
foreigners. It would also remove the chief incentive for illegal immigration by
making it unlawful for an employer to hire anyone who does not have permission
to live or work in this country.

The plan recognizes that there is no way, short of turning the country into a
police state, to deport those foreigners already living here illegally. The
Census Bureau estimates their numbers at 3 million to 6 million, and other
estimates have put the figure as high as 12 million.

It also takes account of what President Reagan has termed the special
relationship that exists among the three nations of North America by doubling
the number of immigrant visas available to citizens of Mexico and Canada, now
limited to the ceiling of 20,000 annually applied to all other countries.

But like price controls, gasoline rationing and other public policy concepts
that work well on paper, the Administration's ambitious proposals on amnesty and
temporary workers may prove more than a bit difficult to implement even if they
are approved by Congress.

Admitting Additional Mexicans

Though critics are certain to protest that even a limited amnesty amounts to a
reward for having broken the law, the most controversial proposal is likely to
be the Administration's recommendation to admit 100,000 additional Mexicans over
the next two years as temporary workers to fill jobs that Americans do not want.

Organized labor and its supporters in Congress, mainly big-city Democrats in the
House of Representatives, are sure to oppose such a plan, partly out of fears
that employers might reduce wages until American workers are driven off,
replacing them with Mexicans willing to work for the minimum wage.

Another concern is whether the ''guest workers,'' as the Administration says it
wants them to be known, will overstay their welcome, as has been the case in
West Germany, Switzerland and other Northern European countries that imported
millions of workers from Southern Europe two decades ago and now find that they
do not want to leave.

Finally, the Reagan proposals would admit as guest workers barely a tenth of the
half million or so aliens estimated to settle here illegally each year. This
number is not likely to get smaller unless economic and political pressures for
migration abate throughout Mexico, Central America and the Far East, which they
show no signs of doing.

Questions About Enforcing Law

The Reagan Administration reportedly plans to ask Congress for a new Federal law
that would prohibit the employment of anyone except citizens, legal resident
aliens and guest workers. No such statute now exists.

There are serious questions about the Federal Government's ability to enforce
such a law, however. Employers, particularly smaller ones, are bound to protest
that they will have no way of determining which prospective workers are here
legally. This complaint will take on added force in view of the Administration's
decision not to issue a new national identity card for employable citizens and
residents, advocating instead a ''counterfeit-resistant'' Social Security card
that would be issued only to newly hired workers.

It remains to be seen whether the clandestine network of document forgers along
the Mexican border can be thwarted by that card. A veteran Border Patrol Agent
remarked, ''There's not a document in the world that can't be counterfeited.''

The amnesty envisioned by the plan presents other logistical problems, the major
one arising from the fact that the amnesty will not be unconditional.

Qualifying for Amnesty

Only certain classes of illegal aliens will be eligible, the primary requirement
being continuous residence in the United States for either three or five years
before Jan. 1, 1980.

Officials estimate that about 2.7 million illegal aliens will qualify, but the
process is likely to be neither simple nor speedy, with tens of thousands or
perhaps hundreds of thousands of claims, some of them disputable and others
simply bogus, being presented for adjudication.

Many who are fully qualified for such an amnesty will have trouble establishing
the fact. Agricultural workers, for example, often have no fixed place of
residence, moving from employer to employer several times a year, receiving pay
in cash at the end of the week. As a result, they will have no rent receipts,
payroll vouchers or similar documents to show to the authorities.

Even those aliens residing in cities and working at service and manufacturing
jobs, as more and more of them are these days, frequently pool their cash to pay
rent and other living expenses.  Most illegal aliens do not have checking
accounts or pay property or income taxes, and while they may carry Social
Security cards and drivers' licenses, these documents are often not authentic.

For its success, the Reagan plan will depend largely on the Federal Government's
ability to deter future illegal immigration.  Although the figures are subject
to change, the task force reportedly recommended a 13 percent increase in the
overall budget of the Immigration and Naturalization Service that would support
the addition of some 1,600 enforcement personnel.

The Administration, according to the committee's report, expects the additional
personnel to result in nearly 400,000 more apprehensions of aliens a year, the
bulk of them along the Mexican border. But as one senior official of the
immigration service pointed out, more border guards might simply mean that some
aliens were caught and returned to Mexico more often before making a successful
entry.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Analysis

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              149 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 31, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Quotation of the Day

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 2, Column 4; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 82 words


''It is to such totalitarian states and the kinds of punishment they mete out
that we doom people to return, if we accept and carry to its logical conclusion
the I.N.S. action. In my view, this Administration does not wish to be seen as
contributing to the creation of that kind of tragedy.'' - Secretary of State
Alexander M. Haig Jr., in a letter urging reversal of an immigration policy
limiting the entry of Indochinese refugees. (13:5.)

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              150 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 30, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

RISE IN IMMIGRATION URGED FROM MEXICO AND CANADA

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 936 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 29


A Cabinet-level advisory committee has decided to recommend that President
Reagan ask Congress to double the annual limit on legal immigration from Mexico
and Canada.

There is now a limit of 20,000 immigrants a year for natives of any foreign
country. The advisory panel, in a report scheduled for submission to the
President in the next few weeks, suggests increasing the limit to 40,000 each
for Mexico and Canada.

This proposal, according to the report, ''recognizes the unique relationship
with our neighbors'' and ''provides a means for reducing pressures for illegal
immigration from Mexico.''

The recommendation is one of many being made by the President's Task Force on
Immigration and Refugee Policy. Attorney General William French Smith is
chairman of the panel, which includes seven other Cabinet members. In a
memorandum last week to all members of the group, David D. Hiller, a special
assistant to the Attorney General, said that the proposals were ''the component
parts of a final draft report to the President.''

Border Patrol Rise Urged

In its final draft, the panel also recommends a ''moderate increase'' in the
enforcement budget of the Immigration and Naturalization Service to provide
additional Border Patrol agents, investigators and other personnel.

The report also gives additional details of these proposals, including penalties
for employers hiring illegal aliens; an experimental program to admit Mexicans
as ''guest workers,'' and an amnesty for about one million illegal aliens.

''Increased enforcement resources and employer sanctions,'' the report says,
''in combination with a pilot temporary worker program, will reduce
substantially illegal immigration by expanding the opportunity for Mexican
nationals to work lawfully in the United States and by prohibiting employers
from hiring Mexicans outside of that program.''

In recent years, Mexico has used its quota of 20,000 visas, while Canada has
used only 12,000 to 16,000 of its allotted share. Under the panel's proposal,
any visas unused by Canada could be used by Mexico. The likely effect, if
migration patterns continue unchanged, would be to make 40,000 additional
immigrant visas available to Mexicans.

The panel estimated that its proposals would cost $256 million to $286 million a
year. Much of the cost, it said, could be offset by increasing the fees charged
by the Government for providing various immigration benefits to aliens.

Delays in Issuing Report

The report was originally to have been submitted to the President in the first
week of May. Then officials said that May 25 was the target date. Mr. Smith, at
a breakfast meeting with reporters yesterday, said that the study would probably
not be submitted until after Mr. Reagan meets here with President Jose Lopez
Portillo of Mexico on June 8 and 9. A copy of the draft report was obtained by
The New York Times from an official of one of the Federal agencies that
contributed to the report.

The report makes these recommendations:

- Brothers and sisters of adult citizens should no longer receive preference in
the allocation of visas. About 65,000 visas a year go to aliens in this
category. The special treatment for brothers and sisters, according to the
report, causes an exponential growth in visa applications.

- Congress should ''enact legislation prohibiting employers of four or more
employees from knowingly and willfully hiring illegal aliens.'' Employers
violating the law should be subject to civil fines of $500 to $1,000 for each
illegal alien they hire. The Justice Department should seek injunctions to halt
a ''pattern or practice'' of violations.

- Job applicants should be required to show identification, including a new,
counterfeit-resistant Social Security card, to establish that they are eligible
to work in the United States. This requirement would apply to citizens and
aliens alike. For a person to make ''knowing and willful'' use of false
identification papers in obtaining a job would be illegal.

- President Reagan should ask Congress to establish an experimental ''guest
worker'' program with Mexico. In each of the next two years, 50,000 Mexicans a
year would be allowed to enter the United States to search for employment. The
Mexican workers would be allowed to bring their spouses and their children under
the age of 18. They would have access to public schools and health care but not
to welfare, food stamps or unemployment insurance.

- There should be an amnesty for illegal aliens who were present in the United
States before Jan. 1, 1980, and who have been ''continually resident'' in the
country for at least five years. The estimated 1.2 million aliens in this
category could apply for status as lawful permanent residents.

The panel said that there was a net influx of 500,000 illegal aliens each year
and that its recommendations, if accepted, might reduce the flow to 100,000 a
year.

The report emphasizes demographic projections much more than similar studies
have in the past. The panel predicted that with the recommendations of the
report in effect the population of the United States would grow from the current
226 million to 267 million in the year 2030. The panel said that its
recommendations were a ''middle course'' between a very restrictive and a very
liberal immigration policy.

Under these assumptions, the Hispanic portion of the population would rise from
its present level of 6.5 percent to 10.4 percent in 2030. If illegal immigration
continued at current levels, it was estimated, Hispanic-Americans would account
for 15 percent of the population in 2030.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              151 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 29, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

A Police Chief Says He Rejected Smith Plea on Immigration Post

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 4, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 67 words

DATELINE: SAN DIEGO, May 28


Police Chief Bill Kolender said today that he had rejected a personal request
from Attorney General William French Smith to reconsider and take the nation's
top immigration post.

Mr. Kolender, 42 years old, said that although he withdrew his name from
consideration as Commissioner of Immigration and Naturalization last week, Mr.
Smith called him Tuesday and asked him to reconsider.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              152 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 29, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Five Charged in Beating Of Refugees From Cuba

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 15, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 187 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 28


A supervisor at the Immigration and Naturalization Service and four detention
officers were indicted yesterday, charged with beating and abusing Cuban
refugees at Fort Chaffee, Ark., last fall.

A Federal indictment returned in Federal District Court in Fort Smith, Ark.,
also charged one of the men with conspiring to attempt a cover-up by erasing
medical records.

The indictment named Curtis A. Clark, a supervisory detention officer from Elk
Grove Village, Ill.; and four detention officers: Jimmy P. Davis of Yuma, Ariz.,
James A. Lane and Eugene Pallaschi of New York City and Wayne Richardson of
Denver.

All five employees were charged in one count with conspiring to inflict bodily
harm on the refugees by assaulting them with such weapons as riot batons between
Sept. 23 and Oct. 27, 1980.

Attorney General William French Smith said the indictment resulted from a
six-month investigation of the handling of a disturbance at the refugee camp,
where Cubans were placed after an exodus from Cuba last spring.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              153 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 27, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Index;
International

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1245 words


A year after uprising, Chun has firm grip in South Korea A2
Around the World A5
France supports new sanctions against South Africa A6
South Africa discloses use of for- eigners in army A6
Mitterrand plans to assure Arabs on French policy A7
New Salvador mediation effort starts A7
Dutch coalition loses majority in Parliament A7
Syria, long isolated, gains Arabs' support on missiles A10
Syrian-Soviet friendship on paper but not on the streets A10
Turkey asking Bulgaria for extra- dition of hijackers A11

Government/Politics
Detroit's Mayor pleads for fiscal rescue package A15
Supreme Court Roundup A20
Independent political groups bat- tle over truth in ads A20
Liberal activists having hard time in capital A20
Officials urged special prosecutor for Vesco-White House inqury A20
Carey calls state Medicaid take- over his ''primary focus'' B2
Civic groups plead for more money for city causes B3
Liberal Party scheduled to select Mary Codd as candidate B3
Legislation seeks to reduce mal- practice suit awards B20

General
Around the Nation A12
Coal trains plaguing small towns near Rockies A12
Atlanta investigator implies pat- tern seen in selection of victims A14
Strange hospital deaths raise questions in desert town A12
Narcotics squad scandal hits Port- land, Ore.  A19
Indian Point nuclear plant re- sumes operation B2

Living Section
Food Dining from the food carts on the Avenue of the Americas C1

Being creative when a picnic impulse hits C1

''Rental weekend'' shopping: agroup effort C1

60-Minute Gourmet C3

Best Buys C9

Summer cooking classes: List of what's available C10

Wine Talk: Gallo offers limited bottling of chardonnay C16
Living Metropolitan Diary C2

Kitchen Equipment C2

A well-kept secret in Phoenix or Scottsdale C3

In Italy, la signora still shops neighborhood stores C14

Euroblend wines worry the Ger- mans C18

Feeling safe under the protec- tion of women C21

Health/Science
U.S. tentatively approves process to destroy toxic PCB's A15

Arts/Entertainment
More writers in public readings of their works C20
Spoleto U.S.A. Festival, at five, faces a crossroads C23
Foreign publishers active at book- sellers' convention C23
Actors Equity's licensing of theat- rical agents ruled legal C23
What happens when a rock band's star goes solo C24
''July's People,'' novel of South Africa, is reviewed C26
Leon Redbone, singer and guita- rist, revisits the past C26
Marisa Gioffre's ''Trouble'' at Ark Theater Company C27
'' Cuban Odyssey'' on Channel 13 C27

Obituaries
Rosa Ponsella, fabled soprano of the Met A22
John J. Reynolds Sr., real estate broker A22

Sports
Yankees lose, 6-4, to Orioles B5
N.L.R.B. upholds players' claim of owners' bad-faith bargaining B5
Phils beat Mets, 7-5 B5
Grete Waitz ready for toughest mini marathon B5
Nine challenges accepted for 1983 America's Cup B6
Rangers win fifth straight, top- ping Twins, 2-1 B7
Red Smith on a history lesson for baseball B7
Appeal by Unser to delay Indian- apolis outcome up to a month B7
Mrs. Lloyd wins in Paris; Nastase scores upset B8
Rozelle defends N.F.L.'s ban on Raiders' move B8

Features/Notes
Notes on People A17

News Analysis
Douglas Martin discusses Saudi role in OPEC D13

Editorials/Letters/Op-Ed
Editorials A26

Multiple choice on immigration Reassessing radiation The Battery's glittering
prize How to save set-aside contracts Letters A26
James Reston: pray silence for ''the Chief'' A27
Russell Baker: sauce for the gan- der A27
William G. Tucker: Keynes, Rea- gan, rabbit and hat A27
Lloyd S. Etheredge: the old im- agery of war is outdated A27

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              154 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 27, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

TV: 'CUBAN ODYSSEY,' REFUGEE DRAMA

BYLINE: By JOHN J. O'CONNOR

SECTION: Section C; Page 27, Column 3; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 581 words


ACQUIRED by Public Broadcasting Service's ''World'' series, ''Against Wind and
Tide: A Cuban Odyssey'' can be seen on WNET-TV, Channel 13, tonight at 9
o'clock. This is part of the story - the not always pleasant part -of the more
than 120,000 Cubans who fled Fidel Castro's regime in the spring and summer of
last year. The refugees are seen as the victims in this country of confused
immigration policies and election-year politics.

The film begins with a deceptive casualness. Jim Burroughs, the director and
narrator, tells how he tried to get to Cuba with a camera crew shortly after the
refugees started arriving in Florida.  One boat trip was aborted when the
captain was warned about an ''ugly mood'' in Cuba. But the Burroughs expedition
finally succeeded and some interesting footage was recorded in and around Mariel
Harbor.

Returning to Florida, Mr. Burroughs traveled on one of the refugee boats and
interviewed several of the people who clearly believed the song that promised a
reception with open arms - ''Now we will be respected in a society that loves
liberty.'' But, it's noted, President Jimmy Carter was already having second
thoughts about his open-door policy. American boat owners learned that they were
subject to fines for ''overcrowding.'' Boats were being confiscated in Florida.

The refugees found themselves being herded into assorted detention camps, caught
in a web of screenings and investigations. Those with convincing credentials and
relatives in Florida were generally fortunate. The rest were definitely not. The
documentary finds people becoming just numbers. It charges that distorted press
reports led to refugees being ''increasingly portrayed as either criminals or
homosexuals.''

But ''Against Wind and Tide'' focuses on several individual cases to argue that
the truth was far more complex and disturbing. A young, obviously refined girl
is seen being shunted about for months because her family lived far away in
California. In an Arkansas camp, the ''criminals'' who merely had trouble
finding sponsors, include a medical student from Havana and a high school
teacher familiar with the poetry of Longfellow and Whitman.

One of the film's more disheartening sequences features a group of white
Arkansas citizens in a state of rampant paranoia about a people of a different
color and language. ''Them that's over now ain't nothin' but queers and thugs,''
says one mid-American, ''they should be shot.'' Another suggests that they be
thrown out of a high-flying plane. Meanness and stupidity have rarely been
captured so bluntly.

The story has decidedly racial overtones. Darker-skinned Cubans clearly are in
the majority of those kept in the camps (and thousands are still there). It's
estimated that three-quarters of them are nonwhite while only a third of the
entire immigration was so designated.

Beginning on a rousing note of freedom and generosity, the film ends with
stories of disappointment and some bitterness. The high school teacher is now a
gas-station attendant in Maryland. Living alone, he says quietly, ''if America's
Baltimore, I don't like it.'' But he insists, convincingly, that he has the
courage to survive.

''Against Wind and Tide'' was produced by Suzanne Bauman and Paul Neshamkin. The
executive producer of ''World'' is David Fanning.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of a refugee

TYPE: Review

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              155 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 27, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

MULTIPLE CHOICE ON IMMIGRATION

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 578 words


What does a good conservative think Government should do about immigration of
workers from Mexico: (a) Keep them out. America should be for Americans, or at
least immigration should be balanced among different countries. (b) Keep them
out. We don't need any more people to create social problems and soak up scarce
social welfare dollars. Even the temporarily legal have a way of becoming the
permanently illegal. (c) Letthem in, to discipline the domestic labor force and
provide workers for the stoop labor that American simply won't do. (d) Let them
in. We need to please Mexico, whose oil is all-important.

What does a good liberal think Government should do about immigration of workers
from Mexico: (a) Let them in; this land of opportunity is enriched by immigrants
spunk and vitality. (b) Let them in; we have a duty to share our riches with
people from the Western Hemisphere (if not, indeed, the world). (c) Keep them
out. Our first duty is to maintain social welfare for poor-people already here.
(d) Keep them out. They undercut American pay standards and are easily
intimidated and exploited.

The answer to both questions, obviously, is the same-all of the above. Which is
what a Cabinet committee seems ready to propose as the Reagan immigration
policy-a little of this, a little of that, pleasing everyone a little. Still, it
could have a practical effect, providing more seasonal workers, and a huamne
effect, lifting the cloud that hangs over many aliens. It could be a
considerable achievement-but only if combined with serious enforcement.

The Cabinet committee evidently has three proposals in mind. One, legalize the
status of about a million aliens. Two, crate a pilot program authorizing the
admission of legal temporary workers. Three, substantially strengthen
immigration enforcement.

Enforcement is the key to all the rest. An amnesty would be welcome, removing a
cloud of exploitation and fear tha thangs over illegal aliens for year.s But
without stronger enforcement, amnesty would only encourage more illegal
immigration.

The merits of any guest worker program are debatable. But leeting in 50,000 a
year would obviously be preferable to 500,000 or 750,000, as some Administration
officials suggest. That's 750,000 every year. When the year is up, how many will
go into hiding-and bring their families? Without strong enforcement, a guest
worker program risks becoming an invitation to illegal residence.

The immigration enforcement now in the cards seems startingly contradictory. One
kind is direct: more guards at the borders. Yet the Border Patrol is depleted
and dispirited; it cannot afford to keep all its vehicles running even now - and
the new Reagan budget cuts more.

The Cabinet committee also recognizes the need to penalize employers who hire
illegal aliens. For that to work, applicants would have to show identification,
now easily forged. The remedy, mroe secure identification, incites fears of
internal pasports and police statism. Such fears are unjustified, in
ourjudgment, and the committee seems rightly intent on developing a
forgery-resistent Social Security card.

But no such decision has yet been made, nor has the Border Patrol yet been
allocated any new funds. Only if the Administration takes such steps can it
demonstrate it is sincere in wanting a legal, practical immigration policy. If
not, people on both sides of the border will quickly get the real message, and
it won't be multiple choice.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              156 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 24, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

PROGRAM ON ALIENS OFFERED TO REAGAN

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 18, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1002 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 23


A Cabinet-level advisory committee has tentatively decided to recommend that
President Reagan back a program of amnesty for about one million illegal aliens
along with improving enforcement of the immigration laws, penalizing employers
for hiring illegal aliens and permitting a limited number of Mexicans to work
legally in the United States under an experimental program.

Aides to the President's Task Force on Immigration and Refugee Policy said
yesterday that the panel agreed Thursday to include those proposals in a plan to
be submitted to Mr. Reagan next week.

Attorney General William French Smith is chairman of the panel, which includes
seven other Cabinet members and the director of the Office of Management and
Budget. The President established the panel Feb. 27 to help develop an
immigration policy for the Administration. White House officials said this week
that Mr. Reagan had not made any decisions on the subject.

'Two-Tier' Program Planned

The advisory panel was said by its staff to have agreed on this ''two-tier''
program for legalizing the status of illegal aliens:

- Those who were present in the United States before Jan. 1, 1980, and who have
been ''continually resident'' in the United States for at least five years,
could apply to the Government to become permanent resident aliens. The panel
estimated that there were 1.2 million people in this category, although the
estimate, like most counts of illegal aliens, had a large margin of error.

- Illegal aliens who have resided in the United States for three to five years
would be eligible for temporary worker status. They could legally work in this
country and could convert their status to that of permanent resident aliens
after living here for five years. It was estimated that there were 1.5 million
aliens in this class.

Census Bureau researchers have estimated that there are 3.5 million to 6 million
illegal aliens in the United States. Most studies suggest that Mexicans account
for no more than half the total.

The amnesty proposal envisioned by the advisory panel resembles proposals made
by President Carter in 1977 and by another study group, the Select Commission on
Immigration and Refugee Policy, headed by the Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh,
president of the University of Notre Dame, in its final report last February.
However, the residence requirements in the proposal being submitted to Mr.
Reagan appear more stringent than those in the earlier plans.

Congressional Approval Needed

The legalization of illegal aliens, sanctions against employers' hiring
undocumented workers and a guest-worker program would need the approval of
Congress. The Immigration and Naturalization Service itself could step up
enforcement at the border and inside the country, assuming that Congress would
grant additional money and manpower for existing programs.

After much debate, the task force reportedly agreed to recommend a two-year
''pilot program'' under which 50,000 Mexicans could come to the United States as
temporary workers.

As a Presidential candidate, Mr. Reagan expressed support for a much larger
guest-worker program. Since taking office, he has reaffirmed his interest in the
idea, emphasizing the need to provide a ''safety valve'' for the Mexican
economy. The subject is likely to be on the agenda when Mr. Reagan meets
President Jose Lopez Portillo of Mexico, who is scheduled to visit Washington
June 8 and 9.

In its report to President Reagan, the advisory panel plans to list a
large-scale guest-worker program as one option, although not the preferred
option. Under such a program, the United States might admit 500,000 to 750,000
Mexicans a year.

Workers Would Be Documented

Details of the guest-worker proposal are not definite, but the basic idea is
that Mexicans would receive visas to enter the United States and look for jobs.
Under this program, such workers would be documented, giving the Government a
way to keep track of them.

Some Hispanic Americans have suggested that Mexicans might still prefer to work
here as illegal aliens, but advocates of the program say that many Mexicans
would participate because they would gain protection under American labor laws
and would not have to fear arrest.

Administration officials said that, under the panel's proposals, employers who
made a practice of hiring illegal aliens would be subject to a graduated series
of civil and criminal penalties.  Citizens and aliens alike, when applying for
jobs, would have to show some identification, but the panel is not recommending
the use of a data bank or a nationwide system of identification cards. Civil
libertarians have objected to these proposals as a threat to privacy.

Recent comments by some members of Congress suggest that they favor a more
enforcement-oriented, restrictionist immigration policy than seems to have been
endorsed by the Reagan panel.

Some Conditions to Amnesty

Senator Alan K. Simpson, a Wyoming Republican who is chairman of a Senate
Judiciary Subcommittee on Immigration, has said that he would not grant an
amnesty to illegal aliens until a system of stronger enforcement, employer
sanctions and worker identification was in place. Members of the Reagan panel
did not attach such a condition to their proposals.

Nor did they favor putting a ceiling on the total number of immigrants and
refugees who could be admitted to the United States each year. Senator Walter D.
Huddleston, Democrat of Kentucky, has introduced legislation to limit total
immigration, including refugees, to 350,000 people a year.

More than 800,000 people were admitted to the United States last year as legal
immigrants. In each of the two preceding years, more than 500,000 were admitted.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              157 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 24, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

REFUGEE POLICY;
ANNANDALE, Va. - In May 1980, President Carter welcomed the Cuban ''boat
people'' with open arms. But now, in May 1981, President Reagan's interagency
Task Force on Immigration and Refugee Policy may recommend that boats carrying
Haitians be intercepted in international waters. In the intervening year, the
United States' desire to live up to its tradition of welcome and to honor a
United Nations treaty to which it is a party has confronted a fear that this
country has become vulnerable to repeated inundations by masses of deprived
peoples.

BYLINE: By Ronald S. Scheinman and Norman L. Zucker

SECTION: Section 4; Page 19, Column 2; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 792 words


Two fundamentally conflicting attitudes are at the heart of the immigration
issue: the instinct to protect what we have achieved, and the equally strong
impulse to preserve our heritage as history's most open and successful
multi-cultural society.

The large-scale influx of Cubans into Florida underscored a phenomenon largely
ignored until then: the accelerating flow of arrivals into the United States as
a country of first asylum.  Haitians, Nicaraguans, Salvadorans, and others
pushed and pulled by political and economic forces had been entering in large
numbers.  Unlike the Mexican undocumented aliens, who were clearly economic
migrants, many of these others contended that they were refugees.

The problem of distinguishing bona fide refugees from economic migrants has
become acute. It is true that neither our domestic laws nor the United Nations
treaty on refugees, which we ratified in 1968, obliges us to accept refugees; we
must only refrain from forcibly returning them to territories where their lives
or liberty might be endangered. Our asylum policy relating to this hemisphere
has in the past considered only one set of alternatives: resettling the refugees
in this country or returning them to their homes. Both approaches, however, have
been merely reactive.

What is needed is a cost-conscious policy that tries to respect this country's
ethical and legal obligations, protect its economic achievements, reduce the
potential for domestic conflict, and serve its interests in promoting sound
international economic development.

Such a policy should have two priorities: the long-term objective of improving
economic and political conditions in the sending countries, and the more
attainable goal of providing appropriate inducements for countries in this
hemisphere to resettle aliens that the United States cannot accept permanently.
Although successful programs for assistance abroad are not legion, and although,
at a time of dramatic United States domestic cutbacks, the political climate is
hardly right for proposing new disbursements for foreign expenditures, the first
step toward relieving pressures at home ought to be economic incentives for
neighboring countries to accept and resettle numbers of emigres.

There are three reasons why such a policy could prove attractive here and
abroad. First, in the United States the expense of resettling refugees is higher
than anywhere else. We estimate that the average initial resettlement costs in
this country are $3,000 per capita. This figure does not include social
services, medical benefits, and cash support that may continue for years until
the migrant is self-sufficient. Second, funds to resettle refugees in third
countries, if channeled through international bodies and flexible enough to
benefit the host country's population, may well attract other public and private
money for development and investment. Finally, these migrants - the peasants as
much as the educated elite - are the seeds of the Western Hemisphere's
productive and intellectual capacities. It is both more sensible and more
humanitarian to distribute their potential regionally than to concentrate it in
this country or to forcibly repatriate them to the conditions they fled.

The United States should have no illusions about the ease or speed of
implementing such a policy, or even of its ultimate realization.  We tried, with
thundering lack of success, to internationalize responsibility for the Cuban
entrants last spring. (We did not, however, offer financial inducements.)
Furthermore, the origins of this problem lie in large-scale social and political
problems that transcend national boundaries, and therefore exceed the reach of
national decision-making. We ought not to delude ourselves that our
technological achievements can be duplicated in the social and economic spheres,
because the circumstances that create refugees and economic migrants are part of
the larger human condition.

Our immigration problems will not be resolved, at least within the bounds of our
laws and political philosophy, until these other issues are confronted.
---------------------------------------------------------------------
Ronald S. Scheinman, who has worked for the United Nations High Commissioner for
Refugees and the United Sates Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee
Policy, is a consultant on immigration matters. Norman L. Zucker, professor of
political science at the University of Rhode Island, is writing a book on
refugee policy.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: op-ed

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              158 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 21, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

FLAWED OPPOSITION TO A FOREIGN-WORKER PLAN

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 4; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 663 words


To the Editor:

Your May 11 news story ''Plan Would Let Mexicans Work as U.S.  Guests'' tried
for balanced treatment of the White House proposal for a temporary foreign
worker (T.F.W.) program by citing some opinions from outside the Administration.
Unfortunately, those opinions, which were almost all in opposition to such a
program, were neither well-informed nor fully representative.

o begin with, the ''bracero'' program, which operated from 1942 to 1964, was far
from having ''stimulated illegal immigration.'' Official records show that
illegal entrants fell well below 100,000 a year from 1956 to 1964 but after the
end of the bracero program rose continuously, to reach over one million by 1977.

It is true that many braceros were abused, and sometimes cheated, by their farm
employers, and that they were not adequately defended by Federal and local
authorities. Yet they kept coming because their earnings far outran the jobs and
pay rates available in Mexico. As for the alleged adverse effect on the wages
and working conditions of American agricultural workers, the records of the U.S.
Department of Agriculture show a markedly rising trend of their wages right
through the bracero period and beyond.

The interpretation of the Western European experience, as cited in your
dispatch, is similarly incomplete. It is true that when recession set in after
1973 repatriation was slow - but it was not zero. Furthermore, it was largely
the presence of wives, children and other dependents that intensified the
reluctance to leave.

However, a U.S. program for temporary workers only, excluding their dependents,
should induce homeward flows. Conversely, the European programs entailed few
complaints about abuse of guest workers, except for poor housing and cultural
isolation in some countries. Our own small H-2 visa program works with few
abuses or overstays.

The assertion that temporary foreign workers in the U.S. would become a
''sub-class'' and ''subject to exploitation'' ignores the realities of both the
present illegal aliens and the alternatives they have left in their homelands.

Exploitation in fact takes advantage of the undocumented status and furtive life
of illegals here; legal foreign worker status would rescue them from abuse.
Furthermore, the foreign workers do not see ''exploitation'' in wages that are
at the U.S. legal minimum, or even illegally below it, when their earnings
generally amount to as much in an hour here as in a whole day back home - if
they could only find a job there.

The most confused opposition to a temporary foreign worker program is the
assertion that ''it makes no sense to bring additional workers to the U.S. when
there are 8 million unemployed already.'' This argument ignores the structural
segmentation of the U.S. labor market. In particular, the low-level jobs - low
in skills, in pay, in status, in interest and in working conditions but mostly
urban jobs nowadays, rather than farming - are hard to fill with Americans.
U.S. workers are variously able to withhold their labor from such work, and in
effect are leaving vacancies which foreign workers fill.

This adjustment in the labor market does not undermine prevailing labor
standards or American employment - although it may prevent wage increases and
might therefore be said to help fight inflation and imports.

A temporary foreign worker program carefully designed to meet the indicated
realities deserves a judicious hearing in this country.  EDWIN P. REUBENS
Professor of Economics The City College New York, May 13, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              159 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 19, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
80 Haitians Are Detained After Arrival in Florida

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 158 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, May 18


Immigration officials were holding six Haitians today on smuggling charges and
74 others were being detained at a refugee camp after they were arrested on
their arrival here yesterday.

A Border Patrol officer, Gary Hatmaker, said the refugees arrived aboard the
Marizia, a 65-foot boat equipped with secret compartments to hide refugees.

Mr. Hatmaker said the Marizia was the third ship in a week to dock at Habrew
Maritime International with smuggled Haitians. Crewmen of the other two ships
were indicted by a Federal grand jury yesterday.

The officer said the crewmen forced the refugees into secret compartments when
they passed land or other boats on their way from Port-de-Paix, Haiti, to Miami.

Tonight a Coast Guard cutter towed a homemade sailboat with more than 90
Haitians aboard into New Smyrna Beach. That group was also to be taken to be
refugee camp near Miami.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              160 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 17, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. AIDES' UNCERTAINTY ON RULES IS KEEPING THOUSANDS IN ASIA REFUGEE CAMPS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 16, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1250 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 16


United States immigration officials, uncertain of the new legal standard for
identifying refugees, have held up the admission of 5,000 to 6,000 people from
Indochina who have been stranded for months in refugee camps in Southeast Asia.

The State Department insists that they are refugees because they have a
''well-founded fear'' of suffering persecution if they return to their homes in
Vietnam, Cambodia and Laos. Secretary of State Alexander M. Haig Jr. has written
to Attorney General William French Smith complaining that American Federal
immigration officers in Southeast Asia have deferred action on refugee
applications at a rate much higher than was justified.

Senior State Department officials, including Walter J. Stoessel Jr., the Under
Secretary for Political Affairs, and Morton I.  Abramowitz, the Ambassador to
Thailand, met Wednesday with Mr. Smith to emphasize their concern.

The Associate Attorney General, Rudolph W. Giuliani, who attended the meeting,
said yesterday that immigration officers had deferred action on 16 percent of
the Indochina refugee applicants interviewed since January. In recent months, he
said, the rate of deferrals was even higher, and since last October 5,000 to
6,000 applications, representing 8 percent of the people interviewed, had been
deferred.

The Obligation of the U.S.

These cases represent a small fraction of the 317,000 people living in the Asian
camps. The debate over them is part of a larger concern over what obligation the
United States has to the people of Indochina after two decades of American
involvement there. After Federal officials decide the cases now in dispute, they
will have to act on many thousands of similar matters involving refugees who
want to come to the United States.

Mr. Giuliani said that, on the basis of information provided by the State
Department, the ''vast majority'' of the 5,000 to 6,000 applicants were
legitimate refugees and should be recognized as such. Mr. Smith said he would
probably issue a directive to that effect next week.

Mr. Giuliani and other Justice Department officials said that immigration
officers in Southeast Asia had apparently changed the way they were applying the
law without going through the chain of command by checking with the State
Department or consulting Congress.

Questions and Problems Posed

The controversy illustrates some of the questions and problems that have arisen
in the Indochinese refugee program in its six years.  Among the questions are
these:

If the United States has a special responsibility to the people of Southeast
Asia arising from its involvement in the war there, how long does the
responsibility last?

Is it important for the United States to provide a non-Communist alternative to
the peoples of Indochina?  Do generous opportunities for resettlement stimulate
the exodus of people from Vietnam and other countries of Indochina?  At what
point does the flow of refugees become simply a stream of immigrants?  In the
past, Attorneys General admitted refugees on an ad hoc basis, and the definition
of ''refugee'' was limited to those fleeing Communist countries or the Middle
East. The Refugee Act of 1980 ended those restrictions, deleted the reference to
Communist countries and incorporated the broader United Nations definition,
under which a refugee is anyone outside his home country who will not return for
fear of persecution.

The law also required the Attorney General to consult with Congress at the
beginning of each fiscal year on the number of refugees to be admitted from each
country.

In recent months, immigration officers in Southeast Asia have reported that some
of the Asians they interviewed were apparently not political refugees or persons
of ''special concern'' to the United States. State Department officials contend
that last fall formal consultations with Congress established a presumption that
the Indochinese were refugees. As a result of those consultations, the United
States pledged to take 168,000 Indochina refugees this year, or 14,000 a month.

State Department officials said that hardly any refugees were escaping from
Cambodia but that ''boat people'' were still leaving Vietnam at a rate of 5,000
to 6,000 a month. Also, they said, the exodus from Laos continues at a rate of
4,500 a month. The officials estimated that of the 317,000 refugees in camps
throughout the region, 247,000 were in Thailand. They said that many of the
Khmer refugees from Cambodia had been in Thai camps for a year and a half.

'Blanket Assumption' Questioned

A study published last November by the Joint Economic Committee of Congress said
there was reason to question the ''blanket assumption'' that all those leaving
Laos and Vietnam were refugees. The study, written by Dr. Astri Suhrke of
American University here, said, ''Most recent arrivals are 'low-risk' refugees
that do not belong to harassed minority groups, do not have close family ties in
the United States and were not associated with American programs during the
war.''

Dr. Suhrke said that the policy of the United States toward persons fleeing such
non-Communist countries as Haiti was stricter than its policy toward Vietnamese
and Laotians. The Refugee Act was intended to curb such differentiating
treatment of would-be refugees.

The State Department, in a formal comment on Dr. Suhrke's study, said it was
flawed by a ''benign view'' of the Communist totalitarian governments in
Indochina.

To answer some of the questions raised by Dr. Suhrke and others, the United
States says it plans to send a fact-finding team to Southeast Asia to visit
refugee camps, interview refugees and talk to officials in the ''first-asylum''
countries, including Thailand and Malaysia.

Habib's Task Delaying Panel

Tentatively selected as members of the panel are Philip C. Habib, a former
Assistant Secretary of State for East Asian Affairs, and James F. Greene, former
Deputy Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization Service. The panel's
departure has been delayed by Mr. Habib's role as a special envoy assigned to
try to ease the crisis caused by Syria's deployment of missiles in Lebanon.

The first-asylum countries of Southeast Asia have provided a haven for Indochina
refugees on the assumption that most of them would ultimately be resettled
elsewhere. State Department officials say that if the United States and other
countries stopped taking refugees for resettlement, they fear that the
first-asylum countries might once more push refugees out to sea or back across
their borders.

State Department officials said immizration officers were not trained to
appreciate the political conditions in Southeast Asia.  They said that each of
the ethnic groups of Indochina, the Khmer, the Hmong and the Lao, had
distinctive problems that must be evaluated with care.

Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, proposed last year to let
State Department consular officers process refugee applications, as immigration
officers now do, but Congress did not accept the proposal.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              161 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 6, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRANTS REVITALIZE CITY, BUT STRAIN ITS RESOURCES

BYLINE: By MICHAEL GOODWIN

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 2101 words


Immigrants are coming to New York City from virtually every country, territory
and island on the globe, creating a city more diverse in race, language and
ethnicity than it was at the turn of the century when immigrants from Europe
poured through Ellis Island.

The new influx, ranging from Europeans to Orientals and including Indians, South
Americans and natives of the Caribbean, has brought vitality and a new
entrepreneurial spirit to the streets of New York and new strength to its
neighborhoods. But the surge of immigrants has also put a strain on the city,
particularly its educational, health and police services.

The 800,000 aliens who registered in New York State last year listed 164
different countries and dependencies as their places of birth, the Federal
Immigration and Naturalization Service reported.  While the Immigration Service
does not keep separate statistics for New York City, other estimates for the
total number of foreign-born people who have come to the city in recent years
range as high as two million.

''Certainly the notion that New York is a melting pot is more true now than ever
before,'' said William F. Hill, regional director of the Bureau of the Census.
''People are coming here from every corner of the globe. Everywhere you go, you
see it. In the streets, on the subways.''

The growing diversity has come about in two basic ways. First, groups that had
almost no presence here - such as the Indochinese, of whom there are now about
5,000 in the city - have gained a foothold in the last 10 years and appear to be
establishing substantial, tightly knit communities.

Second, other groups, such as people of Hispanic descent from numerous
countries, Orientals, Indians and Caribbean blacks, have grown dramatically from
scattered small communities to a point where whole neighborhoods are becoming
ethnic enclaves.

In something of a change from previous patterns of immigration, the new arrivals
have included substantial numbers of rich and highly skilled or educated
immigrants, such as fashionable and privileged Europeans seeking opportunities
for investment and entertainment.

At the same time, many immigrants are impoverished. Among them, for example, are
many Salvadoran and Haitian families fleeing repression and war.

Others have come to New York for the time-honored reason: to make a new start in
the land of opportunity. These include a substantial merchant class, especially
among Koreans, Indians, Greeks and Albanians, many of whom can be found owning
and operating businesses from fruit and vegetable stands and newsstands to
coffee shops and apartment buildings.

While the city profits from the hard work of many immigrants, it also suffers
because of them.  City schools are particularly strained. For example, there are
70,000 students in city schools whose first language is not English.  Most of
these students are being taught in their own languages by 3,500 teachers at a
cost of $48 million a year, $40 million of which comes from the Federal
Government. The city expects to lose some of that money because of budget cuts
by the Reagan Administration.

Growing Backlash Is Seen

And a report issued in the mid-1970's said that 25 percent of those in custody
of the Department of Corrections were of Hispanic descent. Hospital emergency
rooms serve virtually the same function for the poor, many of them immigrants,
that private doctors do for the middle class.

''There is a growing backlash against immigration in this country,'' warned
Auxiliary Bishop Anthony J. Bevilacqua of the Roman Catholic Diocese of Brooklyn
yesterday at a conference called by Mayor Koch to discuss the problems of
immigrants. He and others asserted that this backlash had led to a reduction in
services to immigrants.

Despite these concerns, however, Joseph Fitzpatrick, a professor of sociology at
Fordham University, echoed a commonly expressed idea that the positive
contribution of the immigrants outweighed the problems they caused. ''Just look
at the intensity and character of street life throughout the city,'' he said.
''It's like an open bazaar everywhere. The tremendous number of people are
providing a new vitality on the streets, which is traditionally characteristic
of immigrant populations.''

An Inexact Accounting

Exactly how many foreign-born people are in the city, either permanently or on
extended stays - attending school, for instance - is the subject of considerable
debate among Federal and city officials and private researchers. It is generally
agreed that many are here illegally. The Census Bureau put the city's 1980
population at slightly more than seven million. However, the city is challenging
the count in court, saying the bureau missed upward of 750,000 people.

And a spokesman for the Immigration Service said it assumed that many legal
aliens ignored the requirement that they register annually. The service also
assumes that illegal aliens do not register.

Nonetheless, even if there were as many as two million foreign-born people now
in the city, the total still would not rival the records set near the turn of
the century, when millions of Irish, Italians, Germans and Poles passed through
the immigration office at Ellis Island.

From 1901 through 1910, for example, more than seven million immigrants entered
New York through Ellis Island. In 1907 alone, more than one million came.

Differences Within Groups

Those who have worked with immigrant groups say that outsiders tend to
categorize the groups along broad racial and ethnic lines, but that there are
often great differences within those groups.

Mr. Fitzpatrick, who has extensively studied Hispanic culture and influence in
the Eastern United States, said: ''To outsiders, all Hispanics may appear the
same. But within the Hispanic community, there are great differences among the
groups.''

He and others cited the city's Hispanic population, which the Census Bureau has
put at about 1.4 million, as perhaps the clearest example of the growing
diversity in the city. A decade or so ago, virtually all city residents of
Hispanic descent were Puerto Ricans.  Now, greatly increasing numbers are
arriving from abroad, especially from Santo Domingo, Colombia, Ecuador and Cuba.

At the same time, some observers believe that more Puerto Ricans are leaving the
mainland than are arriving, and that they number about 900,000, as they did in
1970.

Thus, if there are at least 1.4 million people of Hispanic origin in the city,
the official increase of 500,000 in the last 10 years has come from groups other
than Puerto Rican.

Dominicans Becoming Dominant

''There are about 12,000 to 15,000 Dominicans coming here legally each year
alone,'' said Douglas Gurak, a researcher at the Hispanic Research Center at
Fordham University. He said there were 300,000 Dominicans in the city, ''give or
take 100,000.''

It is widely believed that many Dominicans are here illegally. Jim Sleeper, an
aide to Carol Bellamy, the City Council president, said that Dominicans had
replaced Puerto Ricans as the dominant Hispanic group in some areas, including
the south Williamsburg section of Brooklyn. Nearly half of the Dominicans there,
he said, are in the United States illegally.

The situation is similar among the city's Chinese population. In the past, most
Chinese immigrants came primarily from Canton, but many of those rapidly
swelling the New York community - estimated to include 100,000 who were born
outside the United States - now come from Taiwan and Hong Kong. In addition,
Charles Wang of the Chinatown Planning Council said, ''In the last year and a
half, since the U.S.  and China resumed diplomatic relations, we've been getting
a lot of people from the mainland.''

A More Difficult Adjustment

Before that, several thousand ''boat people,'' ethnic Chinese expelled from
Vietnam, came to New York. In addition to language, culture and finances, they
had the added burdens of the ordeal they endured. This, along with the fact that
they were immigrants for a second time, has made their adjustment much more
difficult than most, according to Paul Martin, director of the Indochinese
resettlement program at the Catholic Charities.

''Some had relatives from China living here, and they reverted to the Chinese
spelling of their names,'' Mr. Martin said. ''But they didn't exactly fit in
with either the Vietnamese or the Chinese community.''

James Haggerty, an official with the United States Catholic Conference, said he
was amazed at the constant variety of immigrants he dealt with.

'The List Goes On'

''Recently we've been getting a lot of Egyptians,'' Mr. Haggerty said. ''We've
had about 4,000 Salvadorans register with us in recent months. And we've had
refugees from Afghanistan, Ethiopia, Uganda, Poland, Hungary, Chile, Guatemala.
The list goes on.''

One result of the increasing diversity of points of immigration is that there
are many groups with communities roughly similar in size, at least by official

The Immigration Service estimates that New York State at present contains 81,000
Dominicans, 59,000 Italians, 44,000 from the United Kingdom, 40,000 Jamaicans,
30,000 Chinese. Scores of other groups are thought to range from 5,000 to
20,000. But city officials are also skeptical about the accuracy of any numbers.

''You have the problem of how many are here legally and how many are here
illegally,'' said Evelyn Mann, director of the the city's office of population
research and the city's census coordinator. ''It would be futile to try to
attempt to quantify any group too accurately.''

The Census Bureau, which asks for country of birth, has not yet compiled its
1980 answers to that question.

Visible Changes in City

The obvious evidence of the city's changing character includes a proliferation
of Indian restaurants on the Lower East Side, the takeover of large segments of
Brooklyn by immigrants from numerous islands in the West Indies, and the brisk
business many newsstands are doing in Spanish-language and African publications.
Many Israelis, estimated four years ago to number 150,000 in the metropolitan
region, have taken to driving taxicabs.

Also, New York, apparently cured of its most serious fiscal ills, has become
more than ever a mecca for international business. There are about 150
foreign-owned banks in the city and trendy Italian and French boutiques
increasingly dot midtown streets.

There are less visible effects as well.  ''A sub-marginal garment industry has
sprung up'' using undocumented immigrants, according to Victor Gotbaum,
executive director of District Council 37 of the American Federation of State,
County and Municipal Employees. ''Nobody has ever made a serious study of what
these immigrants have meant to marginal and service industries,'' he said.

Last month, an investigation by the United States Department of Labor found that
many sweatshops were operating in Chinatown and that some employed children as
young as 10 years old, in violation of labor laws.

Crime Also Affected

That many immigrants are involved in crime, either as victims or those who
commit crime, comes as no surprise to many sociologists.  Dr. Marvin Wolfgang, a
professor of sociology and law at the University of Pennsylvania, said that the
city's growing mix could mean even higher crime rates. He said the fact that
many immigrants are poor could be an obvious contributor to crime, especially
with the cost of essentials such as food and shelter being so high.

Also, Dr. Wolfgang said, the diversity could make it difficult for ethnic groups
to establish tightly knit neighborhoods that are essential havens of support for
those having troubles with language, culture and money.

''As you increase the diversity in small spaces, the informal social networks
begin to break down and disappear,'' Dr. Wolfgang said. ''When that happens,
relationships break down and alienation sets in. Then the crime rates will be
higher.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 2 photos of immigrants (Page B4) 3 photos of immigrants

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              162 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                May 6, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

VETO RULE ATTACKED BY ADMINISTRATION

BYLINE: By STUART TAYLOR Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 761 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, May 5


The Reagan Administration has questioned the constitutionality of all
legislative vetoes in urging the Supreme Court to strike down a provision in the
immigration law that authorizes either house of Congress to veto certain rulings
by the Attorney General.

''Various forms of Congressional control of executive action, short of duly
enacted legislation, are unconstitutional,'' the Justice Department stated in
papers filed in the Supreme Court Friday, in what it said was ''the view of this
and previous Administrations.''

The statement contrasted with campaign statements by Mr. Reagan last year and a
Republican platform provision, which broadly endorsed use of the legislative
veto as a means of controlling regulatory agencies.

A legislative veto is an action by Congress or, in some cases, a Congressional
committee to overrule a regulation or other action by an executive branch or
independent regulatory agency without meeting the constitutional requirements
for enacting a new law.

Veto Authorized by 150 Laws

More than 150 existing laws have provisions authorizing legislative vetoes. Some
allow either the House, the Senate or a committee of either body to veto
specified regulations or other executive branch actions. Others require
agreement by both houses on such a veto but allow no role for the President.

In its brief to the Supreme Court, the Justice Department argued that the
one-house veto provision in the Immigration and Naturalization Act was
unconstitutional because ''any exercise by Congress of its legislative powers
must receive the concurrence of both houses and be submitted to the President
for his approval or veto.''

The provision ''also violates the separation of powers under the Constitution by
involving the legislative branch in the execution of the law,'' the Justice
Department argued.

The Supreme Court has never ruled on the constitutionality of the legislative
veto, which has become increasingly popular in Congress in the last decade but
which has been opposed by every President since Herbert Hoover as an
encroachment on Presidential powers.

Related Case in Appeals Court

The Justice Department's appeal to the Supreme Court was unusual in that the
department had argued successfully against the veto in a case in the United
States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit in San Francisco. The appeals
court struck down the one-house veto provision as unconstitutional in December.

The case involved deportation proceedings against Jagdish Rai Chadha, a Kenyan
of Indian extraction, who came to the United States in 1966 on a student visa
and sought to stay after the visa expired in 1972. He said it would be difficult
or impossible for him to return to Kenya or go to Great Britain because of his
race.

Immigration officials ''suspended'' deportation of Mr. Chadha on hardship
grounds, under a provision of the immigration act authorizing the Attorney
General or his designate to take such action subject to the power of either
house of Congress to invalidate it.

The House disapproved this decision without debate or a recorded vote and called
for the deportation of Mr. Chadha and five other aliens in December 1975. Joshua
Eilberg, then a Democratic Representative from Pennsylvania and the sponsor of
the disapproval resolution, said that the six aliens did not appear to meet the
legal requirements for suspension of deportation.

Ruling Praised by Carter

Mr. Chadha's lawyers, joined by the Justice Department, asked the appeals court
to declare as unconstitutional the legislative veto and the immigration act
provision.

The appeals court's ruling in favor of Mr. Chadha was the first time a Federal
court had invalidated a legislative veto provision.  Jimmy Carter, then
President, praised the decision as ''profoundly significant.''

Justice Department lawyers had said that they would seek a Supreme Court ruling
affirming this decision, hoping to resolve the constitutionality of legislative
vetoes, and that there was precedent for such an appeal in cases involving the
constitutionality of acts of Congress.

Last month, the Justice Department denounced as unconstitutional a bill that
would give either house of Congress the power to veto rules and regulations
adopted by Federal agencies in the absence of contrary action by the other
house.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              163 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 3, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

CBS Reporter Is Seized at Airport In Guatemala and Held Overnight

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 20, Column 5; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 125 words

DATELINE: GUATEMALA, May 2


A CBS reporter, George Natanson, was detained without explanation yesterday by
airport immigration officials here, held overnight and then taken under armed
guard to a plane bound for Tegucigalpa, Honduras, the United States Embassy said
today.

The Government refused to comment.  According to the American Consul, Paul
Kline, who waited through the night at the airport with Mr. Natanson: ''It
appears his name was on a list of persons the Government does not want in the
country.''

Mr. Natanson, interviewed by telephone from Honduras, said that he had arrived
on an evening flight from Mexico City to Guatemala. ''It was never really clear
what they were doing,'' he said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              164 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 3, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

COMPLAINTS OF BIAS ON BORDER CONTROL UNDER INQUIRY

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 25, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 657 words

DATELINE: TUCSON, Ariz., May 2


Complaints of widespread discrimination among white Border Patrol agents here,
affecting both Hispanic-American patrol officers and illegal aliens, are under
investigation by the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

A spokesman for the service refused to comment on the investigations, but senior
Border Patrol officers at the Tucson station and its headquarters sector office
say that most of the charges can be disproved by checking time sheets, tapes of
radio conversations and other internal documents.

As a result of the controversy, however, Edward J. Kohn, the object of many of
the bias complaints, was transferred in March from his position as agent in
charge of the Tucson station to a supervisory role at the smaller Douglas
station, 120 miles southeast of Tucson.  To protest the transfer, most of the
Tucson border patrolmen staged a two-day ''sick-out.''

According to formal written complaints and interviews with officers at the
Tucson station, the Hispanic-American agents assert that they have been
discriminated against in assignments, promotions and in job evaluations by their
superiors. Two of them contend they have been ''repeatedly harassed, badgered,
cornered, bullied'' by white agents. One of those agents, and a third, say their
lives have been threatened by fellow officers.

Comments 'All the Time'

''I see and hear racial and racist comments all the time,'' said Victor C.
Ochoa, 34 years old, one of seven Hispanic Americans currently assigned to the
33-agent Tucson sector. Another described a white officer who often bragged of
his antiblack and anti-Mexican feelings while the two were on detail together.

In another incident being investigated by the service's Office of Professional
Responsibility, an agent, John A. Quirindongo, 25, accused a fellow agent,
Marvin Foust, of hitting him with ''a backhanded swing with a closed fist''
while driving an agency vehicle. The incident was dismissed as ''frivolous'' by
local Border Patrol officials, and an assault charge Mr. Quirindongo filed with
the Tucson police was dropped for ''insufficient evidence.''

Hispanic-American agents have also accused other officers of abusive treatment
of aliens who lack legal dolcuments. Cited among the abuses are refusing to give
water to aliens after apprehension in the desert, taking items from aliens for
personal use, and filling vehicles with aliens far beyond capacity. On one
occasion, Mr. Ochoa said, eight Mexicans were crammed into the back seat of a
patrol cruiser so tightly that ''their faces were pressed up against the screen
with the meaty part bulging through. I got chewed out for calling a van,'' he
said.

Humiliation of Central American

In another case a Border Patrol agent allegedly forced an undocumented alien to
stand naked atop a table in the write-up room.  The alien, said to be crying in
humiliation, turned out to be a Central American, who required a formal
deportation hearing. The border patrolman who apprehended him was said to have
made the alien a ''quick Mexican'' and put him on the next busload of Mexicans
to be repatriated on the border at Nogales 60 miles south.

''Until two years ago this office had no trouble of this sort whatsoever,'' Mr.
Kohn said of the complaints recently. ''But this whole thing has brought on
bigotry and hatred.''

According to Ruben Salazar, a Mexican-American agent: ''Allegations of racism
are unfounded here. There is no discrimination in this station.''

The investigation of the Hispanic Americans' charges was spurred by the office
of Senator Dennis DeConcini, Democrat of Arizona, after the agents expressed
dissatisfaction with the results of going through normal channels.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              165 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 3, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Cuban Refugee Site Sought

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 2; Page 57, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 89 words

DATELINE: EL PASO, Tex., May 2


The Federal authorities are trying to find a new location for the Cubans who
will probably not have sponsors when a refugee resettlement center in Arkansas
closes, says the acting head of the Immigration and Naturalization Service.
David Crosland told the agency's national advisory committee Thursday that the
Fort Chaffee center was to close in June and at the rate the Cuban refugees were
being released ''they won't all be out by June.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              166 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 May 2, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

The Unluckiest Cubans

SECTION: Section 1; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 393 words


The story sounds like Dickens, rewritten by Kafka and updated by Joseph Heller:

The exhausted Cuban refugee confronts a stern immigration official who asks,
''Have you ever been in prison?'' He has, briefly, for a bit of black
marketeering frowned upon by Fidel Castro. In Cuba he would lie about it, but
this is America. So he tells the truth, and is hustled off to a penitentiary. He
is ''excludable.''

Eventually he gets a hearing, but it doesn't go well. He lacks court records and
witnesses, yet the burden is on him to prove that he is not a dangerous
criminal. As it sinks in that he might remain locked up indefinitely, he wonders
if it wouldn't be better to return to Cuba, to take his chances. But the Cubans
won't hear of it.

Finally outrage takes over. What about the wonderful American Constitution? Ah,
that only applies to people who are in America.  Because he is ''excludable,''
at least legally, he is not yet ''in'' America.

But of course this K. and 1,800 other Cuban emigres who are being held as
excludables are most decidedly in America. Some have serious criminal records
and would pose a danger if set free. But many appear to have only slightly
blemished records. No one knows for sure. The immigration laws, however, do not
entitle them to the presumption of innocence, and so the doubt works against
them. The situation so disturbed a Federal judge in Kansas that he ordered the
release of a 48-year-old Cuban inmate in whom he recognized no ''threat to
public safety.'' The man remains in prison pending appeal.

The Carter Administration undertook a two-part program for dealing with such
Cuban prisoners. It proposed a review panel that would assess each case and
release those judged not dangerous. At the same time, it started quiet
negotiations with Cuba to arrange the return of truly ''undesirable'' criminals.
Before any deal could be nailed down, Ronald Reagan assumed office and suspended
the talks until there had been a wider review of refugee and immigration policy.

May that review, soon to be completed, give these unluckiest Cubans some reason
for hope. When there is little recourse in law, a year is too long to spend in a
maximum-security prison - for administrative reasons.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              167 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                  May 1, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. REVIEWS STAND ON DEPORTING ALIEN TROTSKYISTS

BYLINE: By ARNOLD H. LUBASCH

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 572 words


An immigration official testified yesterday that a review was being conducted to
determine whether aliens who belong to the Socialist Workers Party can be
deported from the United States.

Glenn A. Bertness, acting associate commissioner of enforcement for the
Immigration and Naturalization Service, presented the testimony in the four-week
trial of the party's $40 million lawsuit against the Government in Federal
District Court in Manhattan.

After the immigration review was disclosed, the Socialist Workers issued a
statement saying that the action could subject hundreds of party members and
supporters to deportation proceedings ''solely because of their political
ideas.''

Jack Barnes, the party's national secretary, added that the Government was
resorting to ''threats and intimidation'' to defend itself in the lawsuit, which
accuses Federal agencies of using informers, break-ins, wiretaps and harassment
to violate the party's rights.

Focus on F.B.I. Inquiry

The seven-year-old suit has largely focused on a long investigation that the
Federal Bureau of Investigation conducted against the Socialist Workers, a small
Trotskyist party that says it has 2,000 members.

The party's lawyers called Mr. Bertness as a witness after the Government
submitted a document in the trial disclosing that the immigration agency was
''presently reviewing the nature of the Socialist Workers Party.''

In the document, Mr. Bertness is quoted as saying, ''There is good reason to
believe that the Socialist Workers Party of the United States is an organization
that advocates the economic, international and governmental doctrines of world
communism.''

According to the testimony of Mr. Bertness, the immigration service has
undertaken the review of the Socialist Workers to decide if the party should be
classified as a ''proscribed'' organization that advocates totalitarian
doctrines of world communism. If it is so classified, he said, deportation
proceedings could begin against aliens who have been members or affiliates of
the party.

Authority to deport members and affiliates of organizations given that
classification, Mr. Bertness said, comes from provisions of the Immigration and
Nationality Act of 1952, known as the McCarran-Walters Act.

Mr. Bertness testified that the immigration agency regarded the Socialist
Workers as a ''proscribed'' organization with regard to aliens from 1956 until
1966, when it removed the party's classification.

He added that his belief now that the party could be classified again on the
ground that it advocated Communist doctrines was based on an immigration hearing
that took place 20 years ago.

Mr. Bertness said the current review grew out of documents submitted recently in
the party's lawsuit, showing that the immigration agency and the State
Department had adopted conflicting classifications of the party.

The State Department still classifies the party as ''proscribed,'' he said,
adding that the immigration agency wanted a consistent Government policy on the
Socialist Workers.

Mr. Bertness said the immigration agency would now seek information about the
party from the F.B.I., and estimated that the agency's review process would take
at least six months.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              168 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 28, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

REPORT ON REFUGEES URGES A CRACKDOWN

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 1201 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 27


Reagan Administration officials have tentatively decided to recommend a series
of tough enforcement measures designed to deter illegal immigration of Haitians
and Cubans to the United States.

Members and staff of the President's Task Force on Immigration and Refugee
Policy said today that the Cabinet-level body would probably advise the
President within the next two weeks to pursue a policy combining two or more of
these elements:

- Legislation authorizing the Coast Guard to intercept boats carrying Haitians
to the United States so that the Haitians could be returned to their homeland or
taken to some other country. The boats might be stopped in international waters.

- Legislation to expedite deportation and exclusion proceedings so that claims
for asylum could be disposed of more quickly, with fewer levels of appeal and
review.

- Detention of any additional Haitians or Cubans who arrive in southern Florida
without visas. This would prevent the aliens from disappearing inside the
country while awaiting deportation or official action on claims for asylum.

- Legislation to legalize the status of at least some of the Cuban and Haitian
''boat people'' already here so that they could remain indefinitely.

David D. Hiller, a special assistant to Attorney General William French Smith,
confirmed that the proposals were under study, but he said that nothing had been
sent to the President. The Attorney General is chairman of the task force, which
includes the secretaries of seven other Cabinet departments.

The panel was to submit its report to the President May 4, but it may require
another week to complete its work. Frank S.M. Hodsoll, a Presidential aide who
is also a member of the task force, said today he doubted that the report would
be made public.

The panel was established by Mr. Reagan on Feb. 27 to review the proposals of
another study group, the Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy,
headed by the Rev. Theodore M.  Hesburgh. The work of the select commission
reflected to some extent the policies of President Carter, who had appointed 8
of its 16 members.

The Hesburgh commission recommended a one-time amnesty for most illegal aliens,
an increase in Border Patrol strength along the Mexican border and civil and
criminal penalties for employers who hire illegal aliens in the future.

The boldest step being studied by the Reagan Administration is the interdiction
of Haitian vessels on the high seas, probably in the strait between Haiti and
the Bahamas. The Haitians have been arriving in south Florida at a rate of more
than 1,000 a month since January 1980.

Boats Would Be Searched

Under this proposal, boats would be stopped and searched for evidence of intent
to violate United States immigration laws.  Refugee claims would be adjudicated
aboard a Coast Guard vessel.  Those not eligible to enter the United States
would be returned to Haiti, assuming the Haitian Government would accept its
citizens, as it has in the past.

In a formal opinion for the Attorney General, the Justice Department's Office of
Legal Counsel has said that although there was no precedent for such an
operation the President had the necessary power, arising in part from his
authority in the field of foreign affairs.

However, Justice Department lawyers said the President's hand would be
strengthened if he had an explicit mandate from Congress. The department has
thus prepared a first draft of legislation that would permit Federal authorities
to enforce the immigration laws beyond the territorial limits of the United
States, with respect to aliens coming to this country.

Transportation Department officials have privately expressed reservations about
such an operation, contending that it might divert Coast Guard resources from
drug enforcement, search-and-rescue missions and other activities. The
interdiction program would cost at least $10 million to $15 million a year,
according to Coast Guard estimates.

A Bad Example for Others

In addition, some officials say that if the United States turned away Haitian
''boat people'' it would set a bad example for countries in Southeast Asia. The
United States has repeatedly urged those nations to live up to their obligations
as countries of ''first asylum'' by accepting Indochinese refugees arriving by
boat.

Haitians account for less than 2 percent of all illegal immigration to the
United States, according to Justice Department estimates. The President's task
force has apparently not made firm decisions about how to deal with the other
sources of illegal immigration.

The State Department maintains that the vast majority of the Haitian emigres are
not eligible for asylum because they left their island for economic rather than
political reasons. Haiti is the poorest country in the hemisphere, with a per
capita income of less than $300 a year.

The State Department rejects the contention of most Haitians that they would
face persecution if sent home. Under the Refugee Act of 1980, the legal test for
asylum is whether an alien has a ''wellfounded fear of persecution'' upon return
to the homeland.

Old Practice Is Reconsidered

Another step being studied by the task force is detention of illegal aliens who
arrive in southern Florida. This would resume a practice discontinued in
November 1977. Since then, boat people arriving without visas have been released
into the community and given work permits while awaiting official action on
their asylum claims. Federal officials note that the influx of illegal aliens
has increased substantially since 1977.

The task force directed the Attorney General to make an inventory of sites
available for use as refugee camps or detention facilities.  Justice Department
officials acknowledged that a large-scale effort to detain and deport Haitians
might risk a repetition of Government practices that were condemned by a Federal
judge in July. Judge James Lawrence King of Miami ruled that thousands of
Haitians seeking political asylum had been denied due process of law because of
a selective, discriminatory policy followed by Federal immigration officials in
1978 and 1979. He ordered the Government to reprocess all the asylum claims. The
Government has appealed his decision.

Judge Tells of Persecution

Judge King said in his 179-page opinion that many of the people expelled from
the United States were ''imprisoned and persecuted'' when they were returned to
Haiti.

In a meeting April 15 at the White House, the task force also agreed to
recommend legislation giving the Cubans and Haitians legal status as permanent
residents after they have lived here for two years.

Task force officials said that such legislation was necessary as a practical
matter because most of the Cubans and Haitians had already been resettled. But
they expressed concern that it might encourage further illegal migration and
could be seen as inequitable to other aliens such as the Mexicans, Nicaraguans
and Salvadorans.

48 Refugees Reach Florida

RIVERIA BEACH, Fla., April 27 (AP) - Forty-eight Haitian refugees packed into a
small sailboat arrived today at the Customs Service dock at the Port of Palm
Beach, officials said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              169 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 27, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

YEAR LATER, 1,800 CUBANS WAIT IN U.S. JAILS

BYLINE: By PAUL L. MONTGOMERY, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 1697 words

DATELINE: ATLANTA


Jorge Morales Alfonso says he has thought about the moment a thousand times,
worrying over each detail of it at night in his cell at the Federal Penitentiary
here.

It was last spring, at Eglin Air Force Base in Florida. Mr. Morales was in the
immigration line in a hastily assembled processing center at the base, having
just arrived in the vanguard of the 124,789 refugees who came by boat from Cuba
in 1980. He remembers that the sun was as hot as the sun on the island he had
come from and that he was thinking about the new life he was going to start at
the age of 31.

''The man in front of me had murdered somebody on the street in Havana,'' Mr.
Morales recalled being told by the man's friends.  Managing a smile at the
imminent irony, he continued: ''The officer asked him if he had ever been in
jail. He said 'No.' He was sent on.  The officer asked me the same. I didn't
want to begin in this country with a lie - I said 'Yes.' You see where I am.''

Where Mr. Morales is is in detention, along with about 1,800 other refugees from
last year's influx who are still being held by the immigration authorities
because of alleged criminal records.

In a case that may affect them all, a Federal appeals court is to hear arguments
on a contention by a compatriot of Mr. Morales, Pedro Rodriguez, that the
Government has unlawfully detained him in Topeka, Kan., without right of review.
A number of other cases are in the lower courts.

The Immigration and Naturalization Service contends that these refugees are
ineligible for admission to this country because they have records of felonies
or crimes of ''moral turpitude.'' In Mr.  Rodriguez's case, it was a record of
theft and escape charges in Cuba.

Mr. Morales was first arrested as a teen-ager in Cuba and served three years in
prison for evading the draft. Later, while working in a state factory making
shoes for export, he was convicted of embezzlement; he received a 10-year
sentence and served eight.

''We were selling the shoes to friends,'' he explained. ''It was not a small
thing, $50,000 worth, but everybody was doing it. I think they did a put-up job
on me because of my trouble with the army.''

Applied for Emigration

In 1979 Mr. Morales was free, working as a construction helper in Havana, with a
wife and two children. Last April he heard of the possibility of emigrating and
applied to the authorities. ''I presented myself and they gave me the pass,''
Mr. Morales said. ''My family was not able to come.''

Under immigration law, convicted felons or those convicted of a crime of moral
turpitude, such as prostitutes, embezzlers, petty thieves, cannot be admitted to
the United States and must be returned ''to the country whence they came.''

But the Cuban prisoners, almost all of whom are being held at the
maximum-security Atlanta Penitentiary, cannot be deported because the Cuban
authorities refuse to take them back; in many cases those authorities forced
former prisoners, mental patients, homosexuals and others they regarded as
undesirable to board the boats.

Talks between the governments were broken off in January and have not resumed,
pending a re-evaluation of Cuban policy by the Reagan Administration.

Law Is Under Challenge

Meanwhile, the situation has produced intensive questioning of immigration law
by attorneys representing the prisoners. In the past, courts have upheld the
Government's position that it has virtually absolute power over people not yet
granted admission to the United States, but the attorneys have sought and won
some modifications in behalf of the Cubans, and civil liberties lawyers expect
more.

For example, courts have affirmed the refugees' right to a speedy hearing on
detention and periodic review.  Other matters under challenge by the refugees
include previous rulings that such prisoners, since they are technically not in
the United States, do not have ordinary constitutional rights. Many, like Mr.
Morales, were incarcerated on their own admission, since the United States has
no access to Cuba's criminal records. The prisoners' right to summon and
cross-examine witnesses at their exclusion hearings is limited, and the burden
of proof is on them to show they are worthy of entering the country rather than
on the Government to show they are not.

Even though most had completed their sentence in Cuba for the crimes allegedly
committed, the law does not provide for their release.

In January, the Carter Administration proposed that a review panel be set up,
similar to a parole board, that could have permitted the release of refugees no
longer regarded as dangerous. However, the Reagan Administration is reviewing
immigration policy and an interagency panel is preparing a report.

About 50 prisoners who had records of minor crimes or who were jailed by mistake
have been released, and a source in the Bureau of Prisons said that 175 more
would probably be eligible if the proposal for the review panel was revived.

Problems at Fort Chaffee

While the refugee prisoners have their problems, 2,600 other refugees are still
at the resettlement camp in Fort Chaffee, Ark.  Almost all of them are young,
single, black men with limited education and skills, the type of refugee most
difficult to find sponsors for. And many have been in at least minor trouble
with the law in Cuba; the immigration authorities say that 16,170 of the Cuban
refugees told them of involvement in minor crimes or acts that are considered
crimes in Cuba but not in this country.

Several hundred are resettled throughout the United States in an average week
and officials are now talking of being able to close the camp in June. More than
400 of the hard-to-place have been sent to halfway houses established by the
National Catholic Conference. The Government pays about $2,000 to volunteer
agencies such as the Catholic Conference for each resettlement, in addition to
plane fare for the refugee.

Among those remaining at Fort Chaffee are 137 mentally retarded people and 330
people receiving psychiatric treatment. (There are also 59 people classified as
violent mental cases being held at St.  Elizabeth's Hospital in Washington.) The
Government has been trying to contract with public or private institutions to
remove them from the camp.

Forced to Cut Sugar Cane

Lieut. William Boggs, a camp psychiatrist, said treatment had been complicated
by an undue reliance on drugs instead of therapy in Cuba. He also said a number
of patients had said in interviews that during sugar harvests in Cuba they had
been trucked to the fields to cut cane and that they had been given stimulants
to get them working and tranquilizers to calm them at night.

There are also about 200 homosexuals among the Chaffee refugees awaiting
placement. Most homosexual refugees have been resettled in Los Angeles and San
Francisco, many through the efforts of the Metropolitan Community Church, which
has a largely homosexual congregation. Robert M. Falls, the pastor of the
church, said that sponsors had been found in the San Francisco area for 171
homosexuals. He said most were working and a few were doing well enough to move
out on their own, but that two of the group were in jail for assault and 20 more
were ''people who have made no effort to help themselves - people who want to
party all night and sleep all day.''

The waiting for placement has been blamed in part for recurrences of violence at
Fort Chaffee.  According to Mike Sweeney, a spokesman, the camp has been sending
about a dozen refugees a week to the Atlanta Penitentiary because of involvement
in the disturbances and in attacks on one another. ''I guess the rights of the
few have to be made subordinate to the rights of the many,'' Mr. Sweeney said.
''We just can't afford violence here.''

Attorneys representing the prisoners argue that such disciplinary transfers mean
that the Cubans are, in effect, being tried and punished without Constitutional
safeguards.

Among other refugees transferred to Atlanta recently was Mr.  Rodriguez, the
prisoner originally suing because of his detention in Topeka, Kan.

'In a Cage Like an Animal'

At the 79-year-old Atlanta prison, which was made an all-Cuban facility at the
turn of the year, the authorities have tried to establish recreation and work
programs tailored to the Cubans, but they acknowledge that the size and sudden
arrival of the group has made things difficult. They say that there are periodic
disciplinary problems and that makeshift knives and clubs are frequently found
among the inmates.

''The treatment by the officers is very good, but we have had trouble among
ourselves,'' said Mr. Morales, a small man with a gentle voice. ''When you lock
a man up in a cage like an animal, he starts to act like one.''

Mr. Morales, who makes $7 a month working in the prison kitchen, has taught
himself to read English, though he has found speaking the language is
maddeningly difficult. He is resigned to returning to Cuba if that becomes
possible, though he still hopes for release here.

''Maybe one day I'll be free,'' he said. ''That is what I came to this country
for.'' Mr. Morales is also a poet, writing tough-minded laments about the
troubles that have come to him. This is an excerpt from ''It's Raining,'' his
first poem in English: I seek in my memory A clear sky with the rumble of some
foliage Where the melodies of the birds project And I take her in my arms. But
my memory fails In its lost search on the naked and cold Wall of this place
Where only fear sings.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 3 photos of Cuban refugees (Page B6) photo of a Cuban
refugee

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              170 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 19, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

NEW U.S. PASSPORTS TO BE ISSUED SOON

BYLINE: By RICHARD D. LYONS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 15, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 690 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, April 18


Americans who travel abroad will soon be issued a new passport that can be read
by a machine in an effort to speed the passage of travelers through red tape at
borders and to reduce fraud.

State Department officials said that 15,000 of the new, so-called
machine-readable passports had already been printed in a test and that the
system was to be operational on a limited basis late this spring.

The palm-size document has a royal-blue cover and a picture of the bearer that
is laminated inside a plastic coating. When placed in the appropriate machine,
the new passport will display for an immigration officer examining it a coded
symbol invisible to the unaided eye.

''We're not going to help counterfeiters by divulging what it is,'' said Norbert
J. Krieg, director of the Passport Office. ''They'll find out fast enough.''

At a Congressional hearing this week, Mr. Krieg and other State Department
officials conceded that the fraudulent use and counterfeiting of United States
passports was on the rise and was increasingly linked to narcotics trafficking
in Latin America.

Similar machine-readable passport systems are under development in Britain, West
Germany and Ireland. The aim of immigration officials over this decade is to
have the equipment to scan the new documents at the busier ports of entry in
North America and Europe.

Long-Range Passport Plans

An even longer-range aim would be the linking of the machines that read the
passports to a central computer system that would, at least in theory, keep
track of the comings and goings of the vast majority of international travelers.

In the United States alone, this is no insignificant task, officials of the
State Department testified last Monday before the immigration subcommittee of
the House Judiciary Committee.

They said that some 800,000 people who enter the United States each year with
valid visas were not documented as having left the country when the visas
expired.

While it is not believed that most of the 800,000 people remain in the United
States, estimates of the number who do vary widely, and investigators are
attempting to determine the number.

''The real aim of the machine-readable passport is not keeping track of people's
movements, but production of the documents themselves and eventually speeding up
the examination process,'' Mr.  Krieg said.

He noted that the State Department was issuing more than three million passports
a year, a number that was likely to rise, and said that the equipment to produce
them had been wearing out.

''We decided to replace the old equipment with more modern technology that would
eventually speed the process up,'' Mr. Krieg added.

The State Department is also lobbying Congress for a change in the law that
would extend the validity of a passport to 10 years, instead of the current five
years, as another means of reducing the work load.

One countermove, however, is the new requirement that even small children have
passports. Heretofore, this has been true only for teen-agers.

'One Citizen - One Passport'

'' 'One citizen, one passport' is the new policy,'' Mr. Krieg said. In taking
European vacations, for example a full family might start out together, he said,
but various members might then peel off along the way, leading to delays at
borders and complaints from passport offices of other countries.

The new passport will contain the bearer's name, sex, birthplace, birthdate, and
issuance and expiration dates. Colors of eyes and hair, which passports
routinely included for years, were discarded several years ago.

The Planning Research Corporation, the computer company that developed the new
passports under a $14 million Federal contract, is testing the machine that
produces them at the passport office here.  Similar machines are to go into
operation in Chicago and Los Angeles by the end of the year, followed by the
other 11 passport offices around the country.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              171 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               April 18, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

The Talk of Virgin Islands;
GROWTH BRINGS PROBLEMS TO VIRGIN ISLANDS AS IMMIGRATION PUTS A STRAIN ON
SERVICES

BYLINE: By JO THOMAS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1028 words

DATELINE: CHARLOTTE AMALIE, V.I.


The water pipes, recalcitrant on the golf greens and nearly always dry in the
housing projects, had been coughing air downtown for six days. Ann Johnson,
proprietor of The Snack Box, a local lunch counter, apologized for the paper
plates and cups.

''We've had a water emergency since December 1976,'' she said. ''We got the
garbage emergency in January 1979; they cut off the downtown pickups. We have
power emergencies and the road emergency, and then we have the school emergency.
The only emergency we don't have is on sunshine.''

She stood, flushing pink in the heat, watching the hamburgers on the propane
grill. ''I've been mugged, hit over the head with a gun, and every member of my
family has been robbed. And groceries,'' she sighed. ''We used to say that no
matter what you bought, it was $10 a sack. Now it's $30. The price of food is
higher than it is in Washington, D.C.''

The Johnsons came to St. Thomas from the mainland 18 years ago, but now they are
thinking of going back. ''We have the feeling we're not wanted,'' Mrs. Johnson
said.

When the jet plane opened the Virgin Islands, a United States territory, to
large-scale tourism in the 1960's, and to large-scale industrial development,
the Johnsons were only two in a torrent of outsiders who flooded into the
islands to share in the boom. There were merchants, construction workers, hotel
workers and refinery workers. Some, like the Johnsons, black as well as white,
came from the states because they were looking for a tropical way of life.
Others, mostly black, came from the desperately poor islands of the Eastern
Caribbean, looking only for a few dollars to send home.

As the population tripled, to 95,214 from 32,000 from 1960 to 1980, the school
enrollment quadrupled. The number of telephones rose to 41,174, from 3,905, and
the number of cars grew to 37,889, from 4,264.

The electrical system, one of the costliest under the American flag, became
overburdened and produced rotating power failures. Rain used to provide the
water supply; now sources include desalination plants and water barged in from
Puerto Rico. It is not enough.

Little of this affects the tourists, who numbered about 56,000 cruise ship
passengers in 1960 but increased by 1980 to well over a million visitors
stopping to spend a few hours in the bustling dutyfree shops around the islands'
beaches.

The growth and the crowding has put severe strains on the islands' services and
on its psyche.  ''When you have Robinson Crusoe alone on an island, you have no
problem,'' said Otis L. Felix, the Police Commissioner, a veteran of 26 years on
the force.

When the population was smaller, he said, Virgin Islanders ''were neighborly
people, where I was your keeper and you were my people.'' He added, ''People had
a respect for law and order.'' Now Commissioner Felix has trouble getting
cooperation from witnesses.And last December, for the first time in history, a
policeman was attacked and killed while on a routine patrol.

After that shooting, a Federal court determined, the police beat a confession
out of a suspect, Juan Francis, a member of the Rastafarian sect, and the Rastas
taunted the funeral cortege.

The problem, Virgin Islanders say, is knowing just who the community is these
days. ''It's newcomers talking to newcomers,'' said Leslie Reovan, a sociologist
at the College of the Virgin Islands. Natives of the islands, although they are
the largest group, are outnumbered in their own land by the rich
''continentals'' from the mainland, who are driving up the price of real estate,
and the poor ''aliens'' from the Caribbean, who want jobs, homes, schools and
medical care.

Last fall, the Middle States Association of Colleges and Schools notified the
territory that Charlotte Amalie High School in St.  Thomas and Central High
School in St. Croix were in danger of losing their accreditation because of
staff shortages, lack of supplies, termite damage, poor maintenance and poor
attendance.

''We really need help,'' said Mrs. Enez Harvey, an aide to the Superintendent of
Schools. ''We really need some understanding.'' So many children are flowing
into the schools from the Eastern Caribbean, including Haitians this year, that
the school system conducts registration three times a year, she said.

As outsiders migrate to the islands, many young people leave to find jobs and
opportunity. A high percentage enlists in the armed forces.

''The tragedy of the Virgin Islands is loss of its nationals, the youths who go
away and don't come back,'' said Mr. Reovan. ''It's this drifting situation that
leads to a society's having no center and no future, and we keep incorporating
more and more of the irrelevancies of continental politics into this place.''

A particularly cruel ''irrelevancy'' has been the importation of American-style
racism to islands in which native blacks tended to feel superior to the poorly
educated white French immigrants.

Racial slurs that white Americans have applied to blacks are now used by blacks
here to refer to the many American whites who have come from the Southern states
since 1960 to work in the giant Hess Oil refinery on St. Croix. It is a
self-contained community that mixes little, if at all, with the local
population, and blacks here are not at all impressed.

''They come from Texas, Mississippi, Georgia, Florida,'' said Leona Watson, a
black community activist in St. Croix who has been critical of Mr. Hess's
operations. ''They can't read or write, but they come down as bosses.''

''They can't deal with a black person who is highly educated,'' she said, ''but
the shoe's on the other foot now. They're on our ground now.

''Last week, one of them said to seven or eight of our boys, 'I feel like
getting a machine gun and mowing you all down,' and those were the most
dangerous boys he could ever mess with. I told them to mark his face well and
don't make someone else pay for his mistake.''

She is equally upset about the black aliens who now have permanent resident
status. ''They're interested only in the U.S. dollar, not the land. They have
their own homeland. They've improved their country. We have nowhere to run.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of condominiums on St. Croix photo of tourists on
St. Croix photo of fast food sign on St. Croix

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              172 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 14, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

POSTHUMOUS PULITZER GIVEN WRITER WHO COULDN'T GET NOVEL PUBLISHED

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1075 words


The winners and their work, page B4.

By PETER KIHSS

The comic novel ''A Confederacy of Dunces,'' whose author, John Kennedy Toole,
committed suicide 12 years ago after failing to find a publisher, won the 1981
Pulitzer Prize for fiction yesterday. The drama prize was awarded to ''Crimes of
the Heart,'' by Beth Henley, a play performed so far only at regional theaters
and Off Broadway.

In journalism, two prizes went to staff members of The New York Times - John M.
Crewdson, for national reporting on immigration problems and illegal aliens, and
Dave Anderson, sports columnist, for commentary.

The Pulitzer Prize Board awarded no prizes in two of the 19 categories -
editorial writing, where a jury nominated three writers, and music, where a jury
held there were no works with a first performance last year that warranted an
award as outstanding.

Public Service Medal

The 1981 Pulitzer Prize gold medal for public service was given to The Charlotte
(N.C.) Observer for exposures of ''brown lung'' disease among textile workers
breathing in cotton dust.

In letters, winners included two books on foreign subjects - ''Peter the Great:
His Life and World,'' by Robert K. Massie, for biography, and ''Fin-de-Siecle
Vienna: Politics and Culture,'' by Carl E. Schorske, for general nonfiction.

Lawrence A. Cremin, president of Teachers College, won the history prize for
''American Education: The National Experience, 1783-1876.'' James Schuyler's
''The Morning of the Poem'' took the poetry prize.

Wrote Novel in 1958

Mr. Toole wrote his novel in 1958 while serving in the Army. In 1969, depressed
because he could not find a publisher, he committed suicide by inhaling
automobile exhaust.

His mother, Thelma, took his manuscript, about grotesque characters in New
Orleans, to more publishers. She finally captured the interest of the novelist
Walker Percy, who persuaded the Louisiana State University Press to publish it
last year. The National Endowment for the Arts said yesterday it had given
$3,500 to help pay for the publishing cost.

Once before there was a posthumous award in the fiction category - in 1958 for
''A Death in the Family'' by James Agee, whose book was published after his own
death.

Under a policy adopted in January, plays from regional as well as New York
theaters were considered for the drama prize for the first time. Miss Henley's
first full-length play, about three sisters in Mississippi, was produced in
Louisville and then in St. Louis, Baltimore, Los Gatos, Calif., and the
Manhattan Theater Club. A Broadway production is planned for this fall.

Mr. Crewdson, Houston correspondent for The Times, wrote more than 40 stories
last year on the smuggling of Mexican workers, with whom he trekked across a
desert; on Cuban refugees, whom he accompanied in a small boat, and on migrant
camps, border jails and Chicago sweatshops. His articles led the Justice
Department to investigate and review its immigration policies.

Mr. Anderson's sports columns appear four times a week in The Times. He said
yesterday that sports writing was ''part of American culture, just as much as
music, art or anything else - I'm delighted that it's recognized.''

Eight other Pulitzer prizes in journalism were awarded. They were: Spot news
local reporting - the staff of The Longview (Wash.) Daily News, with a
circulation of 26,000, for coverage of the volcanic eruption of Mount St.
Helens, 35 miles away, last May 18.

Special local reporting - Clark Hallas and Robert B. Lowe of The Arizona Daily
Star in Tucson for an investigation of the athletic department of the University
of Arizona.

International reporting - Shirley Christian of The Miami Herald for dispatches
from El Salvador and elsewhere in Central America.  Editorial cartooning - Mike
Peters of The Dayton (Ohio) Daily News for cartoons including one that showed a
handgun labeled as killer of 9,000 Americans in a year and a package of
saccharin labeled as killer of four white rats; Mr. Peters asked, ''Can you
guess which one's been banned?''

Spot news photography - Larry C. Price of The Fort Worth Star-Telegram for
pictures of the aftermath of a military coup in Liberia, including a firing
squad's execution of 13 members of the ousted Government.

Feature photography - Taro M. Yamasaki of The Detroit Free Press for recording
living conditions of inmates of Southern Michigan State Prison.

Criticism - Jonathan Yardley, book critic of The Washington Star since 1978.
Feature writing - Janet Cooke of The Washington Post for an article about an
8-year-old heroin addict.  Jury nominations of finalists from among entries in
various fields go to the 17-member Pulitzer Prize Board. The board sends its
recommendations to the president of Columbia University - currently Michael I.
Sovern - for a final decision. The university's trustees were originally
designated to make the awards by Joseph Pulitzer, publisher of The New York
World.

In editorial writing, where no award was given, the jurors ''very strongly''
recommended Kirk Scharfenberg of The Boston Globe for editorials seeking to
improve race relations, according to William Hosokawa, editor of the editorial
pages of The Denver Post and chairman of the jury.

The jurors sent a letter saying the Globe editorials ''exhibited a depth of
understanding and constructive moral leadership'' in a particularly trying
complex community problem. The jury offered two other nominees - Jack Burby of
The Los Angeles Times and Morris S.  Thompson of The Miami Herald.

In music, the jurors - Lester Trimble of the Juilliard School, chairman; Donal
Henahan, music critic of The Times, and Donald Martino of Brandeis University, a
1974 Pulitzer Prize winner for music -agreed they had not encountered any work
meeting the criterion of ''distinguished musical composition by an American in
any of the larger forms'' with its first performance in the United States last
year.

''The orchestras around the country had better start playing a little more
contemporary music,'' Mr. Trimble said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              173 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 13, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE WORLD;
New Political Party Planned For Whites in Zimbabwe

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 5, Column 5; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 186 words

DATELINE: SALISBURY, Zimbabwe, April 12


Andre Holland, who served as a Deputy Minister of Information, Immigration and
Tourism in the white minority Government of Ian D. Smith before Zimbabwe gained
independence, announced today that he was leaving Mr. Smith's Rhodesian Front to
form a new party.

He said the new group, to be called the Democratic Party, would ''offer back the
hand of friendship that has been extended to the whites'' by Prime Minister
Robert Mugabe's Government.

''Unlike the Rhodesian Front, we will criticize the Government only in a
constructive manner,'' Mr. Holland, 48 years old, said.  Mr. Holland's decision
to form the new party was an apparent response to a mood of disenchantment among
some of the country's 200,000 whites over the critical attitude the Rhodesian
Front's 20 members of Parliament have shown toward the black-majority
Government.

The new party will remain all white ''for the time being'' because the
Constitution specifically reserves 20 seats in Parliament for white voters, Mr.
Holland said.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              174 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 April 5, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Japan Moves to Increase Rights of Korean Minority

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 20, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 677 words

DATELINE: TOKYO, April 4


After 30 years, Japan is moving to eliminate one of its most blatant forms of
official discrimination against 280,000 Korean and 8,000 Taiwanese residents.
Many of them were brought to Japan for forced labor before World War II or were
born here.

Proposed changes in the immigration law would rectify what the Koreans and
Taiwanese claim is one of the most annoying forms of discrimination against them
- a requirement that they reapply every three years for permission to stay in
Japan.

The Justice Ministry has drafted legislation to grant permanent residence to
minorities who lost their Japanese citizenship when Japan renounced its claim to
two former colonies, Korea and Taiwan, with the signing in 1951 of the San
Francisco Peace Treaty, formally ending World War II against all the allies
except the Soviet Union.  The change also covers children and grandchildren
living here.

It is the fifth attempt by the Justice Ministry to revise the law and the first
since the early 1970's. Previous versions were defeated primarily because
minority political parties and pro-alien lobbyists opposed provisions barring
political activity by foreign residents.

Susumu Yamagami, a legal adviser to the Justice Ministry, said in an interview
that officials are confident that the latest version, which contains no such
clause, will be approved when it reaches Parliament, probably this month.

Koreans are Japan's largest minority. In December 1979 there were 662,600,
including visiting businessmen and students. Many chose to stay here after World
War II to rear their children in spite of social and legal restrictions in
education and employment.

A recent case that attracted attention was that of Kim Kyeong Deuk, the first
Korean in Japan to become a lawyer and keep his Korean nationality. Although
born and educated here, Mr. Kim had to go to court to win permission to enter
law school, which until then was restricted to Japanese citizens.

About 350,000 South Koreans obtained permanent residence under a 1965 treaty,
but not all of those who were eligible for residency applied for it, Mr.
Yamagami said.

An additional 214,000 Koreans - supporters of Communist North Korea, which has
no diplomatic relations with Japan - were excluded from the agreement between
Japan and South Korea but would apparently still benefit from the changes in the
law. Lacking legal status, they are allowed to live here but normally cannot
return if they leave Japan.

Mr. Yamagami estimated that 280,000 people, including 3,000 thirdgeneration
Koreans, would be affected if the proposed changes become law.

''In three decades, things have changed in Japan,'' he said.  ''Second- and
third-generation Koreans and Taiwanese have become accustomed to Japanese life.
Some can't even speak their mother tongue, but use Japanese.''

Under Japanese law, only the children of Japanese fathers automatically receive
citizenship, regardless of the mother's nationality. The proposed revisions in
the immigration law, while not directly related to the citizenship law, would
make it easier for spouses and children of Japanese nationals and permanent
residents to obtain resident status.

According to an Immigration Bureau booklet, ''permanent residence is permitted
only when a person has established a permanent base of livelihood as a result of
many years of stay in Japan and where it is considered that the permanent
residence of such a person is in keeping with the national interest of Japan.''

To meet these standards a person must be at least 20 years old, must have lived
in Japan at least 10 years, and must be financially sound, healthy and with a
record of good conduct.

Mr. Yamagami said the 10-year residence requirement was a guideline rather than
a rule. The proposed bill includes no specific residence requirement.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              175 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 4, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

ERODING IMMIGRATION POLICY

SECTION: Section 1; Page 22, Column 3; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 500 words


To the Editor:

The much-awaited report of the U.S. Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee
Policy, issued recently, contrasts ''humanitarian concern'' and ''national
intererst.'' Father Theodore Hesburgh, chairman, said Senator Alan Simpson had
reminded the commission at several points that its work was at the service of
the ''national interest.'' In fact, the title of the final report is ''U.S.
Immigration and the National Interest.'' In his introduction, Father Hesburgh
suggests that national interest is incompatible at points with humanitarian
concern.§enator Simpson last December further eroded the concept of humanitarian
concern in immigration policy by saying that the people of the United States
were suffering from ''compassion fatigue.''

The commission and its report recognize the contributions of all immigrants.
Yet, the policy recommendations seem to say that some are admitted because we
want to be nice, and some are welcome because they can help us. These latter
ones are called ''seed immigrants'' as if the others were the end of a
generation.

Maybe the time has come to define national interest primarily as humanitarian
interest. It is not a time for fully open borders and resultant chaos, but for
reflection on the best course of action that will work for everybody in the long
run. We need to be aware that massive economic and political problems anywhere
in the world in this century are by necessity our problems.

The dichotomy between ''humanitarian concern'' and ''national interest'' makes
for an inconsistent policy package, with some of the suggestions and
recommendations, at best, the result of guesswork and political maneuvering. It
was not for the Select Commission to judge what Congress could deal with and to
round up a package full of trade-offs. We expected the commission to listen to
the people involved, and to seek to fill in the enormous gaps in basic
information in order to draw up policy.

The commission should have proposed basic changes from a status quo that now
benefits nobody, especially the undocumented immigrant. When Father Hesburgh, in
his introduction, discusses the ill effects of undocumented migration, he
forgets to mention that the one who stands to lose the most is the migrant
forced to live underground at the mercy of employers, landlords and smugglers.

We cannot think of the ''national interest'' at one time, ''humanitarian''
interest at another. There is only one Earth and one human race. Immigration
policy, to be in the national interest, must be based on that simple fact.
AURORA CAMACHO DE SCHMIDT Director, U.S.-Mexico Border Program American Friends
Service Committee New York, March 25, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              176 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 April 3, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

TAPE SHOWS WILLIAMS VOWING TO GIVE 'SHEIK' AID WITH IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: By JOSEPH P. FRIED

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 840 words


A videotape played yesterday at the bribery trial of Senator Harrison A.
Williams Jr. of New Jersey shows him giving an F.B.I.  agent posing as an Arab
sheik assurances of help in seeking permanent residency in the United States.

The Senator said on the tape that he would provide the help, in part, because he
wanted to bring to fruition a titanium-mining venture in which he had previously
agreed to accept a hidden 18 percent interest. The sheik - actually an
undercover agent for the Federal Bureau of Investigation - had been described to
the Senator by other agents as ready to lend $100 million for the venture.

'Leave With My Assurance'

''You can leave with my assurance that I will do those things that will, will
bring you on for the consideration of permanency,'' Senator Williams says to the
man he knew as ''Sheik Yassir Habib.'' The ''sheik'' was Richard Farhart, an
F.B.I. agent.

The videotape, made surreptitiously by the F.B.I. at the Plaza Hotel in New York
in January 1980, was presented at the Senator's Abscam trial in Federal District
Court in Brooklyn. It was part of the prosecution's effort to prove that the
61-year-old Democrat agreed to sell his influence in behalf of the mining
enterprise and the sheik's immigration needs.

The prosecution has charged that a conspiracy by the Senator, several alleged
co-conspirators and the undercover agents offered the promise of a $12.6 million
profit for Mr. Williams.

Mr. Williams, a member of the Senate for 22 years, faces up to 15 years in
prison if convicted of bribery.  The Senator denies that he is guilty, as does
his co-defendant, Alexander Feinberg, a 72-year-old New Jersey lawyer. They
argue that they were ''fooled'' and manipulated by the undercover agents, who,
the defense attorneys say, were able to ''steer and control'' conversations with
the defendants while surreptitiously recording them. The cases of two other
alleged co-conspirators have been severed.

Rejects Money Offer

At one point on the tape, the agent -speaking English very slowly and pretending
to have great difficulty with the language - offers the Senator money for the
promised immigration aid. Mr. Williams, also speaking very slowly throughout the
meeting, rejects the money.

''No,'' he says, ''my interest is with my associates - to see this very valuable
mining area appropriately developed.'' In a second videotape played yesterday,
the Senator is seen telling undercover agents that he interceded with Joseph P.
Lordi, chairman of New Jersey's Casino Control Commission, to help gain a
commission decision that would have saved a casino-development group $30 million
had its proposed Atlantic City project been carried out.

On this same tape - made at the Plaza Hotel in 1979 - Senator Williams also
discusses an arrangement to receive a concealed $1 million finder's fee as part
of a proposed $70 million loan from the supposed sheik to the same casino
enterprise. The enterprise was the Ritz-Carlton, proposed by a subsidiary of a
company for which the Senator's wife, Jeanette, was a paid consultant.

Prosecution Objection Denied

Mr. Lordi, reached later yesterday at his Atlantic City office, said he had
''never been influenced by Harrison Williams in any matter, let alone the Ritz,
nor has he tried to influence me.''

The Senator's trial does not involve charges related to the casino matters, but
Judge George C. Pratt permitted the chief prosecutor, Thomas P. Puccio to play
the videotape in which these matters were discussed, despite defense objections.

The judge ruled that the tape was ''relevant to issues of this case'' in that it
might help the jury determine the defendants' ''predisposition'' to commit the
crimes alleged in the titanium-mine and immigration matters.

The performance by the F.B.I. agent posing as the sheik brought smiles to the
faces of Judge Pratt and the nearly 100 spectators in the crowded courtroom.
Senator Williams, sitting at the defense table, occasionally smiled, too.

Later, the defense played two of the F.B.I. videotapes in the case to illustrate
what George J. Koelzer, the Senator's attorney, has charged was the ''coaching''
of Senator Williams by undercover agents to say seemingly incriminating things
before the hidden cameras.

On one tape, of a meeting the Senator did not attend, an agent suggests to two
of Mr. Williams's alleged co-conspirators that the Senator - when he meets the
''sheik'' two days afterward at the Plaza Hotel - should assure him that
''whatever it takes to get you the citizenship, I'll get it done.''

In the second tape - made before a second meeting between the Senator and the
supposed sheik - another agent instructs the Senator to impress the sheik with
''how important you are.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Williams (page D15)

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              177 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 2, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

QUEBEC NATIONALISTS UNEXPECTEDLY SEEM TO BE LEADING IN PROVINCIAL RACE

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 1012 words

DATELINE: MONTREAL, April 1


Parti Quebecois, fighting to hold power despite the defeat in a referendum last
year of its goal of independence, showed a surprising lead over the weekend in
two polls.  And from the underdog position it has generally been thought to
occupy, it has now suddenly begun to look like a possible winner in the
provincial election April 13.

But in the district of Mercier, a densely populated, lower-middle-class area of
eastern Montreal, the Parti Quebecois candidate says he is "a little worried."
Gerald Godin, appointed Minister of Immigration five months ago, has the same
problem that other candidates of the party in the Montreal region must contend
with - a large proportion of immigrants who tend to side with the native
English-speaking minority against the French-speaking majority.

MANY IN POLL UNDECIDED

In political terms, the Greeks, Italians and Portuguese, who with native English
speakers made up about one-third of the population, tend to vote against the
kind of Quebec nationalism represented by Parti Quebecois.  Instead, they prefer
the federal links with Canada that are favored by the Liberal Party.  Mr.
Godin's Liberal Party opponent, Yves Beriault, a 38-year-old lawyer, is spending
most of his time knocking on doors to remind citizens of that.

Uncertainty about the overall outcome is created by the large proportion of
individuals who told poll takers that they were undecided or who refused to
answer at all.  In one poll this group constituted 12 percent of the total, and
in the other, 21 percent.

In Mercier, 38 percent of those who have been canvassed by Parti Quebecois
refused to be pinned down.  Since the party's followers tend to be outspoken
about their opinions, the 38 percent is felt to be leaning heavily toward the
Liberals and this is especially true in the so-called "ethnic" neighborhoods.

In November 1976, Mr. Godin achieved political fame by defeating the most
important Liberal of all, Premier Robert Bourassa.  But as part of a
redistricting that has increased the number of seats in the assembly from 110 to
122, Mercier's boundaries were changed.  In what was an overwhelmingly
French-speaking district, the non-French speaking district, the non-French now
make up close to a third of the residents.  Of these, Greeks predominate.

"We are running slightly behind," Richard Filiatrault, Mr. Godin's campaign
director, acknowledged.  "The immigrants have always been a difficult clientele
for the Parti Quebecois," he explained.

WANTED CHILDREN TO LEARN ENGLISH

Of the hundreds of thousands of people who came to Montreal from Europe and
elsewhere after World War II, most had little idea that they were coming to a
French-speaking province.  They regarded Quebec as part of a country and a
continent that was English-speaking, and in their search for better
opportunities for their children, they sent them to English schools from which
they could later enter the mainstream of Canadian and North American life.

Alarmed by the shift in the cultural balance in Quebec's largest urban center,
the French community reacted strongly.  In 1974 the Bourassa government passed a
law designed to make French predominant, partly by restricting entry into the
English schools for newly arrived people.  This was bitterly resented by the
English-speaking and immigrant population, and one factor in the Liberal defeat
in 1976 was the language question.

Once in power, however, Parti Quebecois introduced an even more stringent law to
make French the only language of the province.  In general, since the law was
approved in August 1977, everyone coming into Quebec, even from the rest of
Canada, must attend French schools. This was not well received in the immigrant
communities even though those already residing in the province were not
affected.

RESPECT FOR NEGATIVE VOTE PLEDGED

The government's bid to start negotiations for a sovereign Quebec further
indisposed residents of those communities, who feared being cut off from the
rest of Canada.

As a result of the referendum defeat, Premier Rene Levesque and the party have
pledged to respect the negative vote and to have no new referendums during a
second term.  The emphasis is on good government and economic development,
themes also being emphasized by Mr. Godin as he climbs the steep staircases of
the row houses that line miles of streets through the eastern part of the city.

But Claude Ryan, the Liberal leader, continues to use the referendum defeat as a
major trump card, contending that Parti Quebecois no longer represents public
opinion and is "hiding" its real intentions.  In Mercier, Mr. Beriault, who is
running in his first election, is playing the same card and exuding great
confidence that it will work.

In an area of high unemployment, he also talks about economic development, but
he links it with the question of Quebec's political status.  For him Parti
Quebecois is still a separatist party, however much it plays down its
independence goal.

"The economic problem is partly the result of the indecision that is hanging
over our heads," Mr. Beriault said.  "People here have to vote for the Liberals
to end this uncertainty.  The referendum will go for naught unless we get rid of
the Parti Quebecois."

Mr. Godin has worked hard in the last four years to be of service to the Greek
commmunity, even learning a little Greek.  This has paid off in some support
among Greeks who say they are willing to forget his political options.

But Mr. Godin thinks he has no more that 25 percent of the community behind him
at this point.  And Mr. Filiatrault said, "We get a friendly reception
everywhere, but we don't know what they say about us afterward in their
kitchens."

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of Claude Ryan Photo of Rene Levasque

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              178 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                April 2, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Cubans Who Left Plane in Miami Won't Be Given Political Asylum

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 19, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 120 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, April 1


Immigration officials refused to offer political asylum and instead ordered
deportation hearings today for 41 Cubans who got to the United States by posing
as tourists and then left a Spain-to-Mexico flight on a Miami layover.

Immigration and Naturalization Service officials in Miami could not cite similar
instances in which Cubans had been denied asylum, but they said that in the
future most Cubans who arrive from a country other than their homeland would not
be granted asylum.

The 41 Cubans got off an Aeromexico flight on a refueling stop in Miami on March
21 and refused to reboard the plane to continue to Mexico City.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              179 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 29, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Headliners;
Worthy Opponents

SECTION: Section 4; Page 9, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 282 words


Had he not been the victim, Ronald Biggs might have appreciated the daring of
his kidnappers. The mastermind of Britain's Great Train Robbery was snatched
from a bar in Rio de Janeiro and deposited last week with immigration officials
in Bridgetown, Barbados, within the reach of British extradition. Mr. Biggs had
been out of reach for 15 years, living openly in Brazil following his escape
from prison two years into a 30-year sentence. Last week, his abductors went
free, but he was detained for extradition proceedings.

$1.6 Million Aftertaste

When The National Enquirer depicted Carol Burnett traipsing around a Washington
restaurant ''offering everyone a bite of her dessert,'' the editors couldn't
have known it would end with them catching their lunch. Last week in Los
Angeles, The Enquirer was found guilty of libel and ordered to pay Miss Burnett
$1.6 million in damages. The Enquirer had previously retracted the libelous
item, which had Miss Burnett arguing loudly with former Secretary of State Henry
Kissinger and implied she was intoxicated. But Miss Burnett pursued her case
and, after five years, won.

Oh, Sweet Suspense

''A slip of the lip can sink a ship,'' said New York Gov. Hugh Carey last week.
''I don't intend my ship to sink.'' Still, Mr. Carey could not resist dropping
broad hints that he and his companion of recent weeks, Evangeline Gouletas, a
Chicago widow, were about to be married. Miss Gouletas and two brothers are
principals in American Invsco Corporation, a condominium developer. At a party
in her honor in Chicago last week, Miss Gouletas sported a ''friendship ring''
given her by Mr. Carey, but neither would say the word ''marriage.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 3 Photos

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              180 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 29, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

A CARIBBEAN SAMPLER: THREE HOLIDAYS IN THE SUN

BYLINE: By JOSEPH HERRINGTON; JOSEPH HERRINGTON is head of the Times's
metropolitan copy desk.

SECTION: Section 10; Page 1, Column 3; Travel Desk

LENGTH: 2104 words


Our Boeing 707 dropped quickly and the cloud-capped peak on the island of Saba
appeared below the right wing. We banked to the left, with the extinct volcano
of St. Eustatius slipping by below. Moments later the lush green mountains of
St. Kitts rose on the left before we settled down on the runway at Golden Rock
International Airport just outside Basseterre, the Kittitian capital.

The 3-hour, 20-minute trip was one of the first weekly BWIA nonstop flights from
Kennedy International Airport in New York, and we moved quickly through
immigration and customs for-
malities in the new terminal. The terminal, the nonstop flights from New York, a
similar weekly flight from Miami and frequent charters are all signs that St.
Kitts has entered the mainstream of tourism in this part of the Caribbean's
Leeward Islands.

But the island is really only tiptoeing into that mainstream.  Visitors can
still find streets uncluttered by other tourists, a capital whose stores are not
geared to the bargain-hunting cruiseship passenger and menus that take advantage
of such native foods as the spiny lobster, parrotfish, yams, breadfruit,
christophine and soursop.

Perhaps the island's biggest attraction, though, is its sense of serenity. Most
of the hotels have vistas overlooking the usually calm Caribbean. Winds ripple
the sugar cane fields leading to the sea.  Poinsettias, bougainvillea and
hibiscus blooms abound.

On hand to meet me at the airport with their rented car were Vi and Les, friends
from Indiana whom I see every year at the Fairview Inn, three miles northwest of
Basseterre at Boyd's Village. And on hand to greet me at the hotel were St.
Clair, the major-domo, and Michael, the barman, who prepared a welcoming drink.
The owners, Betty and Freddy Lam, would greet us later.

I have been going to the Fairview since 1970, shortly after it opened, and there
always seem to be guests whom I have met before.  Kathleen and Geoff from
Halifax were there this year, as were Mary and Rick from Toronto. After catching
up on each other's doings during the last year, we settled down to days around
the pool, reading Agatha Christies we had missed, chauffeuring new visitors to
some of the sights, adventuring off to another hotel for lunch and shopping in
Basseterre. Nights were generally spent at the Fairview, where after dinner by
candlelight in the 18th-century greathouse that forms the nucleus of the hotel
there was often a string band or other entertainment.

One night I lost my annual gambling fund - $20 - at the island's only casino, at
the Royal St. Kitts Hotel. Another night we went to the Fort Thomas Hotel to
hear the Maple Leaf Steel Band - and none of us will quickly forget the sound of
15 or so pans attacking ''In the Mood.'' The weather, as usual, was a major
topic. We decided that it had been rainier and warmer than usual this February,
but still more than pleasant.

Visitors who arrive after the winter season ends, in the middle of April, will
find that not only will hotel rates generally be 25 or 30 percent lower but also
that temperatures vary only slightly from the winter season. There is a little
more rain in the fall, residents say, but there is no real rainy season.
Humidity is low except on those rare days when the trade winds fail to blow. The
record high and low temperatures for this century are 92 and 62.

The island, running on a northwest to southeast axis, is 23 miles long and
totals 68 square miles. Two miles across a strait at the southern tip lies
Nevis, a sister island that makes up half of the associated British state of St.
Kitts-Nevis. A third island, Anguilla, broke away a few years ago and is a
British colony.

Mount Misery, a 3,792-foot dormant volcano, is the highest peak in the range
that runs up and down the center of the northern part of St. Kitts. The slopes
gentle out near the sea, with most of the land planted in sugar cane.

About half of the 35,000 residents of St. Kitts live in Basseterre, most of
whose buildings date from 1867, when a fire leveled all but a few of the city's
Georgian buildings.

The island, discovered by Columbus on his second voyage in 1493, is actually
named St. Christopher, in honor of the discoverer's patron saint. Almost
everyone uses the nickname, though, and even the new issue of postage stamps
says simply St. Kitts.

The next important date in the island's history is 1623, when Thomas Warner and
a small band of adventurers landed near what is now Old Road Town and, in an
attempt to grow tobacco, founded the first British settlement in the Caribbean.
From St. Kitts settlers went out to Nevis, Antigua and Montserrat.

A couple of years after Warner's arrival came the French, and the island was
jointly occupied, which led to a century of intermittent fighting before Britain
got it for good under the Treaty of Versailles in 1783.

Thomas Warner's tomb is in the cemetery at St. Thomas Anglican Church in Middle
Island Village, and is worth a visit if only to read the heroic epitaph. The
stone tomb, above ground in a small wooden pavilion, has a marble top with the
epitaph, which reads: An Epitaph upon The Noble and much lamented Genrl Sir Tho.
Warner, Kt Lieutenant General of ye Carribee Ielands and Govern of ye Ieland of
St. Christopher Who Departed This Life the 10th of March 1648 First Read them
weepe when thou art hereby taut That Warner lyes interr'd here, one that bought
With losse of Noble bloud Illustrious Name, Of a Commander Greate in Acts of
Fame Trayned from his youth in Armes, his courage bold Attempted brave
Exploites, and vncontrolled By Fortunes fiercest Frownes, hee still gave forth
Large Narratives of Military worth Written with hi swords poynt, but what is man
In the midst of his glory, and who can Forsee this life A moment since that hee
From Perils by Sea and Land, so long kept free Through dreadful Mortal strokes
at length did yield With Knightly grace to conquering

Death the field St. Kitts's most famous historical site, though, is Brimstone
Hill, named for the area's sulfur fumes. The formidable bastion, the so-called
''Gibraltar of the West Indies,'' was developed over much of the 18th century,
eventually containing soldiers' barracks, officers' quarters, a hospital, an
ammunition store, a 100,000-gallon cistern, cemetery and citadel. The latter
fort, atop the hill, overlooks the island's second largest city, Sandy Point
Town, and offers views of St. Eustatius and Saba, two islands in the Dutch
Antilles.

The fortress was abandoned in the middle of the last century, and guns and
stones from the buildings were stolen and sold. The Society for the Restoration
of Brimstone Hill, however, has begun a project to bring back some of its former
glory. Most of the recent work has been concentrated at the citadel, where the
stone flooring and walls have been restored. Plans are afoot to establish five
of the rooms as examples of what Caribbean rooms might have looked like in the
late 17th and early 18th centuries under the British, French, Dutch, Spanish and
Americans - not as they were when the citadel was in use.

Brimstone Hill and the few other sightseeing ''musts'' can be done in a day or
less, by taxi or rented car or moped. There is a good road that girdles the main
part of the island, and another good road leads to the Frigate Bay beach, golf
and hotel development southeast of Basseterre.

Traffic is not heavy, but it moves on the left and local driver's licenses must
be obtained at the police station in Basseterre. A tourist must fill out an
application, show his or her driver's license and pay $10 in Eastern Caribbean
currency or $4 in American dollars. Two major worries for American drivers are
the roundabouts (keep to the left, even though it is the longest way, and give
the right-of-way to vehicles coming from the left) and the stop signs
(reflectors imbedded in the pavement on the left at intersections).

A sightseeing tour of the island by taxi will cost about $30. Cars, either left
or right-hand drive, rent for $25 to $30 a day or $150 a week. Renting a moped
costs $16 a day, $12 a half-day; bicycle rentals are $3 an hour or $10 a day.

Stamp collectors will want to stop by the new Philatelic Bureau on Bay Road in
Basseterre, a couple of blocks west of the post office.  The bureau sells all
the current postal varieties as well as firstday covers. Collectors may also set
up an account and arrange to receive future issues by mail. The bureau, however,
has only St.  Kitts stamps. Collectors wanting Nevis stamps must go to the
bureau on that island, near the pier at Charlestown.

Not counting cruise-ship passengers and the small number of tourists coming by
sea, St. Kitts-Nevis registered 25,000 visitors in 1979, up from 15,000 in 1975.
The figures for last year are still being compiled, but they probably will show
a sharp rise, a trend expected to continue as more and more people discover
''the Cradle of the Caribbean.''

For those visitors who must have a white sand beach outside their doorway, two
hotels provide the answer -the Cockleshell and the Banana Bay Beach. Both are at
the far southeastern edge on the island facing Nevis; both offer 10 double
rooms, and both are under new management. They can be reached only by boat, and
arrangements to meet guests are made when reservations are confirmed.

The six other hotels for tourists all have swimming pools. The biggest, the
138-room Royal St. Kitts, is on the new 18-hole championship golf course at
Frigate Bay and near both Atlantic and Caribbean white beaches. At the edge of
Basseterre with views over the city are the 63-room Fort Thomas and the 30-room
Ocean Terrace Inn. The Fairview has 30 rooms in modern cottage units behind the
handsome greathouse, which was built for the commander of the French Army
troops. At the far northeast are the Rawlins Plantation, with six rooms set
among the remains of an old sugar factory, and, on a black sand beach, the
Golden Lemon. The latter's 12 rooms in an 18thcentury sugar warehouse were
decorated by a former editor of House and Garden magazine and its kitchen
matches or exceeds any on the island.

Accompanying the increase in tourists has been a flowering of restaurants. The
Palms offers a garden cocktail area and a secondstory dining room overlooking
the Circus, where four streets come together in the heart of Basseterre. The
Anchorage has long been a fixture on the beach at Frigate Bay and advertises
that it will serve diners at any hour. There is a Chinese restaurant, Jong's, at
Conaree Beach, and the interior of a historic building on Pall Mall Square is
being rebuilt into a restaurant by the former owners of the Cockleshell Hotel.
On my last night on the island, a group of us went to the Anchorage, a hundred
feet from the beach. All of us enjoyed the spiny lobster. I had the lobster
thermidor ($13.50); my only complaint was that it, along with a small salad and
a vegetable, was almost too much for me to eat. The others at our table had
boiled lobster or lobster salad; all the lobsters were huge, and all were
perfectly prepared. The decor is simple: a concrete floor, luncheonette tables
and chairs and three sides of the dining area open to the breezes. Nearly all
the tables were filled, with both Kittitians and tourists.

It was all just a pleasant memory the next day as our jet landed at Kennedy
Airport in a late-winter snowstorm.
If You Go ...
...to St. Kitts from New York, BWIA (800-327-7401) has nonstop flights that
leave New York and St. Kitts every Thursday morning. The island can also be
reached by carriers connecting to airports at St.  Croix, St. Martin, San Juan,
P.R., and Antigua.

The BWIA 3-to-21-day excursion rate is $393; it drops to $367 after April 15.
Fares for trips by connecting airlines will be higher. The currency used is the
Eastern Caribbean dollar, currently worth about 38 cents.

The Fairview Inn's winter rates were $40 (single, no meals) and $50 (double, no
meals); after Easter, singles are $30 and doubles $40.  The inn offers a
modified American plan at $18 for an adult and $10 for a child under 12.

In general, off-season hotel rates for single rooms without meals may range from
$25 to $35 a day and from $35 to $50 a day for doubles. Count on $16 a day and
up for meal plans offering breakfast and dinner. The room tax is 5 percent and a
service charge of 10 percent is added to bills.

Save $8 in Eastern Caribbean funds for the airport departure tax.  Tourists
should know that it is necessary to use stairs to reach the upper departure
level of Golden Rock International Airport. - J.H.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photos map of St. Kitts map of Caribbean

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              181 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 25, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

BILLS IN CONGRESS SEEK SHARP REDUCTION IN IMMIGRATION

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 624 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, March 24


Senator Walter D. Huddleston and several other members of Congress today
introduced a comprehensive bill that would reduce immigration to the United
States and more than double the size of the Border Patrol.

The proposal reflects what appears to be a growing restrictionist sentiment on
Capitol Hill. The bill would require employers to verify that all the people
they hired were either citizens or aliens legally authorized to work in the
country. It would establish civil and criminal penalties for hiring illegal
aliens.

The bill would also require the Government to develop contingency plans to cope
with another heavy influx of aliens like the boatlift that brought 125,000
Cubans into this country last year.

''The immigration policies of this country have virtually gone out of control,''
Senator Huddleston, a Kentucky Democrat, said at a news conference in his
office. ''Fidel Castro and leaders of maybe a dozen other countries really have
more to say about how many people we bring to this country, who they are and
when they come than does the Congress of the United States or even the executive
branch.''

Identical Bill in House

Senators Lawton Chiles, Democrat of Florida, and Thad Cochran, Republican of
Mississippi, were among eight co-sponsors in the Senate. Representative Robin L.
Beard, Republican of Tennessee, introduced an identical bill in the House.

The most significant feature of the bill is a proposal to limit total
immigration to 350,000 aliens a year. Refugees and immediate relatives of
citizens would come under that ceiling, which is substantially lower than the
immigration levels of recent years.

Gross immigration last year exceeded 800,000, and in each of the two preceding
years, it was more than 500,000.  The Huddleston bill appears to refelect some
of the views of key Republican Senators, including Strom Thurmond of South
Carolina and Alan K. Simpson of Wyoming. However, they did not sign the bill as
co-sponsors, presumably because they are waiting for the Reagan Administration
to formulate and announce its immigration policy.

Panel Offers Proposals

Senator Simpson served on a 16-member Federal commission that studied
immigration and refugee policy. The commission recommended a moderate increase
in legal immigration, a secure means of worker identification and penalties for
those who employ illegal aliens.

Senator Simpson endorsed an ''absolute annual ceiling'' on immigration, although
the panel did not favor such rigid limits.  Under the Huddleston proposal, the
President could admit aliens above the established ceiling only by ''borrowing''
from future years.

The bill introduced today would require expansion of the Border Patrol to 6,000
officers and would give them authority to buy the best available equipment.
There are now 2,260 officers, nearly 2,000 of whom are stationed at the Mexican
border, according to a spokesman for the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

Senator Huddleston estimated that his proposal for strengthening the Border
Patrol would increase current spending by $200 million a year.

In its proposed budget for the fiscal year 1982, which begins next Oct. 1, the
Reagan Administration requested $363 million for the entire immigration service,
of which the Border Patrol is a part. The request was $21.6 million less than
the Carter Administration had sought. However, Attorney General William French
Smith said earlier this month that the Reagan budget might permit a slight
increase in the strength of the Border Patrol is a part.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              182 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                March 22, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

FRAUD TIED TO RISING VISA ABUSE BY VISITORS TO U.S.

BYLINE: By JOHN M. CREWDSON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 1, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 2415 words

DATELINE: HOUSTON


Showing visas obtained with bribes or fraudulent documents, hundreds of
thousands of illegal immigrants are openly entering the United States each year,
posing as tourists, business executives or other visitors and then simply taking
up residence in the ethnic neighborhoods of the nation's big cities.

The number of ''overstayers,'' as such illegal aliens are called, is growing,
though no one knows precisely how fast. Figures compiled by the Immigration and
Naturalization Service, which concedes that it would not have the resources to
expel the unwanted visitors even if it knew where they were, suggest that their
ranks may be increasing by several hundred thousand each year, about the same
number estimated to cross the border surreptitiously.

The key problem lies not in the immigration service but in the State Department,
whose officers issue visas at United States embassies and consulates abroad. By
law, such visas are reserved for those who can produce convincing evidence that
they are likely to return home - a good job, a house or a substantial bank
account.

But as visa abuses increase, some difficult questions are being asked in
Congress and at the State Department about shortcomings of the visa process and
the necessity for the visa requirement itself.

The shortcomings, according to officials of the State Department and the
immigration service, include the mounting demands placed on overworked,
inexperienced junior consular officers who are confronted with ever-larger
numbers of foreigners seeking to visit the United States. Of equal concern,
however, is the department's acknowledgement that it is investigating at least
five cases of alleged sales of visas by American diplomats overseas and 30 cases
involving local employees of several United States embassies.

Three cases of what the State Department calls ''visa malfeasance'' by career
Foreign Service officers were recently referred to the Justice Department for
prosecution, according to James Webb Jr., a spokesman for the department's
Bureau of Consular Affairs. Mr. Webb refused to name the officers or give any
details.

The State Department first charged an officer with visa fraud in 1977, and there
has been only one such indictment since then. In the first case, Carolyn J.
King, a vice consul posted to Haiti, was convicted. In the second, Steven
Vitale, a consul in the Bahamas, was acquitted.

A third concern is what some inside the State Department term the department's
attitude that its officers, because of their education and dedication, are
beyond temptation or reproach. One result, some officials say, is a reluctance
to pursue cases in which a career diplomat is suspected of visa fraud. Another
result, they say, is frustration among the department's small corps of criminal
investigators.

'Heat for Looking the Other Way'

''We've taken some heat for looking the other way,'' a senior official conceded.
Mr. Webb did acknowledge that one State Department official, whom he would not
name, was recently allowed to resign ''in lieu of prosecution.'' But he said,
''Since Watergate there has been an increased sensitivity to fraud. We don't
have any qualms about seeking it out.''

Because the State Department lacks the resources to investigate the backgrounds
of all but the most suspect visa applicants, visa officers must rely on a
cursory scan of letters from employers and other documents in assessing the odds
that a person will return when his visa expires.

Bogus documents are readily obtainable throughout Latin America, however, and
consular officials concede that most visas are granted or denied according to
the officer's instincts as much as anything else.

The United States is one of the few large countries in the world that requires a
visa of anyone arriving for any purpose. Earlier this month the Select
Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy, noting the resulting ''heavy
strain'' on many United States embassies and consulates, suggested that the visa
requirement be waived altogether for visitors from such countries as Great
Britain and Japan, whose citizens rarely abuse the terms of their admission.

Automated Visa System Urged

The commission also urged the adoption of an automated system, which the
Government does not now have, to ''allow the prompt tracking of aliens'' who
overstay their visas.

Many of the visas issued to overstayers come from consuls who are careless or
too harried to assess applications accurately. Because of the demand at some
embassies, a decision must be made after an interview of a minute or less, and
the demand is increasing by the month.

At the United States Embassy in Buenos Aires, some 60,000 visas were issued in
June 1979, more than double the total for the same month a year before. Next
July the embassy in Mexico City, where the average visa interview lasts 80
seconds, expects to issue 87,000 visas, one-third more than it issued last July.

The problems of overwork and fraud do not seem to be unrelated.  ''We have found
a direct correlation,'' said Barbara Watson, Assistant Secretary of State for
consular affairs in the Carter Administration, ''between cases in which we have
not detected fraud as early as we should have and extreme work pressures.''

Of the 11 million foreigners who entered the country last year with nonimmigrant
visas, immigration service records show that fewer than 10 million left. The
figures are not precise, because airlines do not always collect the forms that
are supposed to be surrendered by departing visitors, and there is no effort to
count those who leave the country by crossing the border into Canada or Mexico.
But, even allowing for slippage in record-keeping, those who overstay their
visas could number 200,000 or 300,000 a year, as high as the estimated number of
illegal aliens who enter the country by slipping across the border.

Tourists and Business Travelers

With the decline of the dollar abroad, the United States has become a favored
stopping place for travelers from Europe and the Orient, who are estimated to
have spent some $10 billion here in 1979. State Department officials concede
that, in view of concerns over the balance of payments, policies regarding the
issuing of nonimmigrant visas are more liberal than they might otherwise be.

More than 6.5 million tourist visas were issued in 1978, as against just over
two million a decade before, and the number of business travelers has risen at
about the same rate. At the same time, political and economic pressures for
emigration in less developed countries have increased the number of foreigners
willing to pay for a temporary visa they can use to emigrate here illegally.

Asked whether the 35 current visa fraud investigations suggested that there was
more fraud than before, or simply that more was being uncovered, one senior
State Department official replied, ''The answer is both.'' Among the current
inquiries, he said, were ''particularly serious'' ones in the Dominican Republic
and Colombia.

''The basic feeling,'' said Mr. Webb, the spokesman for the Bureau of Consular
Affairs, ''is that these 35 cases are a result of a more activist sensitivity on
the department's part.'' But another State Department official said some of the
35 cases were not being fully investigated because of a shortage of personnel in
the department's Office of Security. No one from that office would speak for
attribution about visa fraud.

In assessing the possible reasons for such malfeasance, several diplomats
suggested that efforts to ''democratize'' the Foreign Service in recent years
had lowered the caliber of the younger officers most likely to be assigned to
consular work. ''We've taken in people with a greater propensity for fraud,''
one diplomat said.  Another said, ''You've got lots of people who come from
backgrounds where they've never had anything and then you send them to Santo
Domingo.''

Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, now the ranking minority
member on the Senate Judiciary Committee, asked the State Department more than a
year ago for details of visa fraud being investigated because he was concerned
by reports of what an aide described as ''serious breaches of consular
procedures in Latin America.''

Mrs. Watson, who then headed the Bureau of Consular Affairs, replied that 13
such inquiries completed in the first half of 1979, all of them in Latin America
and the Caribbean, had resulted in the dismissal of eight local employees,
including seven from the United States Embassy in Buenos Aires. ''No American
employees were implicated in the investigation,'' Mrs. Watson's letter said.

But some State Department investigators asserted that some of Mrs.  Watson's
assurances were unfounded. The investigators said that several American
diplomats had been ''implicated'' in investigations in Colombia, Argentina,
Bolivia and Paraguay, and that other American personnel were ''highly
suspected.''

The number of visa fraud investigations now under way was cited by some State
Department officials as evidence that suspected wrongdoing by American diplomats
was not being ''swept beneath the rug,'' as one put it, to preserve the
department's reputation, as Foreign Service rumor says has happened in the past.

One official disputed such assertions, however, maintaining that the State
Department was now ''looking for it more than we used to'' only because ''we
totally ignored it in the past,'' and that there had been a particular upsurge
in such investigations in the last month. Even so, he said, ''They only catch
the obvious cases. The really good frauds they never catch.''

The principal problem, he said, is that the State Department, burdened with what
he called a ''pin-striped suit mentality,'' is reluctant to acknowledge that its
personnel are susceptible to corruption. As a result, he said, some inquiries
are not ardently pursued.

''We never get a conviction because of the way we do the investigation,'' the
man said. ''They don't come out and say you can't do it, they just make your job
so hard you can't do it. When you send off a lead to Washington, they just sit
on it. You open a case, you do what you can, then you close it because you don't
have the resources or authority to do it right.''

Another longtime department official agreed. ''We can't seem to get a mandate to
go out and do it,'' he said. ''The Foreign Service is a good old boy club where
everybody takes care of everybody.'' But he acknowledged that over the last year
or so the State Department had been ''pushing a little more'' on visa fraud. ''I
don't think the department was looking into it at all 10 years ago,'' he said.

Issue of 'Third-Country Nationals'

Two of the recently completed investigations, other officials said, involved
visas issued to ''third-country nationals,'' citizens of Korea and Taiwan, by
American consuls in Argentina and Paraguay. A third case under scrutiny involves
Iraqi Christians who say they are fleeing religious and political persecution in
their homeland.

Given the difficulty of weighing the applications of home-country nationals, it
is next to impossible for a visa officer to check the credentials of, say, an
Iraqi citizen who applies for a visitor's visa at the United States Embassy in
Mexico City. For that reason, a longtime consular officer said, any case
involving a third-country national is an automatic ''red-flag situation.''

''You're going to want to see some pretty good proof,'' the officer said.
Though visas in cases of fraud are most often secured with money, one
investigator told of an American diplomat in an African nation, the subject of a
recent inquiry, who had been sexually compromised by an Arab woman and then
blackmailed into supplying visas to Lebanese citizens. Asked what action the
State Department had taken, the investigator said the consul had been
transferred ''to some other garden spot.''

Two other officials recalled an American diplomat in a Latin American country
who, by one estimate, made $1 million selling visas before he left the State
Department two years ago. ''They just let the guy retire,'' one of the officers
said, adding that the diplomat had been ''quite literally advertising himself''
as one who could provide visas for a price.

Possibility of Doubling Income

Consuls assigned to visa work are generally younger officers on their first
assignment. They earn as little as $17,000 a year but are nevertheless expected
to dress well and to move easily through the upper levels of local society. One
official calculated that a junior consular officer could double his income by
selling fewer than 20 visas a year at the going rate of $1,000 to $1,500 each.

''We are trying, through training incoming consular officers, to get more
sensitivity to fraud and malfeasance problems,'' said Mr.  Webb, the department
spokesman.

Other officials said, however, that the department's Office of Security had no
intelligence network and no funds earmarked for making undercover purchases of
visas from suspected consuls in the way that narcotics agents buy drugs from
suspected peddlers. The State Department, another official said, remains the
only major Federal department whose Inspector General's office has no statutory
authority to conduct internal investigations.

The first official estimated that 20,000 to 50,000 visas were sold by American
diplomats or local employees every year, but that only 5 or 10 percent of the
cases were uncovered because of the State Department's limited investigative
resources and restrictive policies. With the necessary resources, he estimated,
20 to 50 dormant cases of visa fraud could profitably be reopened.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photos of aliens at Kennedy International Airport (page
50)

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              183 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 19, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

LEGISLATIVE VETOES FACE LEGAL ATTACK

BYLINE: By STUART TAYLOR Jr., Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 17, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1024 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, March 18


Attorney General William French Smith said today that the Reagan Administration
planned to argue before the Supreme Court that legislative vetoes, an
increasingly popular Congressional device, are unconstitutional if they intrude
upon the President's power to manage the executive branch.

President Reagan asserted in a campaign speech last Oct. 8 that ''both Congress
and the President'' should be granted ''greater authority to veto regulations
approved by executive agencies,'' and a Republican platform provision had
supported ''use of the Congressional veto'' as a ''means of eliminating
unnecessary spending and regulations.''

The Attorney General stopped short of saying that all legislative veto
provisions were unconstitutional.  The case before the Supreme Court involves an
effort by the House of Representatives to exercise its authority under a
provision in the immigration laws that gives either house of Congress the power
to veto by a majority vote a decision by the Immigration and Naturalization
Service not to deport certain foreign citizens who are illegally in the country.
The High Court has not yet announced whether it will hear the case.

A Provision of Numerous Laws

More than 150 Federal laws now authorize Congress - and in many cases either
house of Congress acting alone or a committee of one house - to veto certain
regulations and other actions by various executive branch departments and
independent regulatory agencies.  However, the Supreme Court has never ruled on
the constitutionality of such provisions.

''As a general proposition, we view a legislative veto that intrudes on the
authority of the President as being unconstitutional,'' Mr. Smith said in a
statement.

He said that ''the executive branch has taken this position on numerous
occasions and the new Administration will take that position'' in the
immigration case now before the Court.

Mr. Smith qualified his statement by noting that ''a legislative veto can take
many forms'' and that ''with respect to any specific piece of legislation, it
would have to be considered on an individual basis.''

This apparently leaves open the possibility that the Administration might
approve of a law giving one or both houses of Congress power to veto regulations
by independent regulatory agencies that do not report to the President, such as
the Federal Trade Commission.

In campaigning for the Presidency, Mr. Reagan did not qualify his endorsement of
the legislative veto device with any mention of possible constitutional doubts.
But every President since Franklin Delano Roosevelt has opposed legislative veto
provisions as encroaching on the powers of the executive branch.

In the case referred to by the Attorney General, the Justice Department last
December obtained the first ruling ever by a Federal court striking down a
legislative veto provision.

Legislative Veto Is Overturned

A three-judge panel of the United States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit
in San Francisco struck down a one-House veto provision in the immigration laws
as violating the constitutional principle of separation of powers ''because it
is a prohibited legislative intrusion upon the executive and judicial
branches.''

The panel's decision invalidated an effort by the House of Representatives to
veto the Government's decision not to deport Jagdish Rai Chadha, an Asian-born
student from Kenya who had overstayed his visa. The Justice Department last week
obtained an extension until May 1 of its deadline for filing appeal papers in
the case.

Although it is unusual for parties that are victorious in the appeals courts to
seek Supreme Court review, it is not unprecedented. Mr. Smith's statement
apparently indicates that the Administration will try to use the Chadha case to
obtain a definitive Supreme Court ruling that at least some legislative vetoes
are unconstitutional.

Response From Congress

Meanwhile, lawyers representing the House and Senate last week obtained the
appeals court's permission to intervene in the case for the purpose of urging
the full court to reconsider the decision of the three-judge panel.

The legislative veto device is politically sensitive because it has become a
favorite tool of both Republican and Democratic members of Congress seeking to
assert control over Federal regulators in recent years.

Many members of Congress support legislative veto provisions as a means of
reining in what they view as the tendency of administrative agencies to use the
powers delegated to them under vague laws as a basis for issuing regulations
that Congress did not intend to authorize.

Argument Against Such Vetoes

Opponents of legislative vetoes argue that Congress should not be able to
override decisions of the executive branch without passing a law, which requires
a majority vote in each House and is subject to the President's own veto power
under the Constitution.

Mr. Smith did not go that far today. He kept the Administration's options open
with respect to future laws containing provisions that authorize legislative
vetoes. ''We are well aware of the fact that previous Presidents have signed
bills that included legislative vetoes, while opposing the legislative veto
generally, after considering the merits of the legislation,'' Mr. Smith said.

The Attorney General's statement came in the aftermath of intensive discussions
within the Administration concerning what position to take on the legislative
veto device, both in pending litigation and with respect to pending legislative
proposals that would enable either house of Congress to veto almost any
regulation issued by any agency, in the absence of an objection to the veto by
the other House.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              184 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 19, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

The City;
More Inspectors Asked for Kennedy

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 89 words


The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey asked for a 25 percent increase in
the number of immigration inspectors at Kennedy International Airport to reduce
delays in the clearance of foreign visitors, especially during the summer.

Morris Sloan, deputy aviation director for the authority, said before a
Congressional hearing in Washington that 30 inspectors should be added to the
complement of 120 that worked at Kennedy last summer.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              185 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 12, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

HOUSE JUDICIARY MEMBERS RESIST IMMIGRATION SERVICE BUDGET CUT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 3; National Desk

LENGTH: 589 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, March 11


Members of Congress from both parties told Attorney General William French Smith
today that they were deeply distressed by the Administration's proposal to
reduce the staff and budget of the Immigration and Naturalization Service. They
said that the agency did not have enough resources to do its job even now.

Concern for the immigration agency was the theme most often expressed at a
hearing on the Justice Department's budget.  Mr. Smith, in his first appearance
before the House Judiciary Committee, said that the proposed cuts would not harm
the ''operational capability'' of the immigration service. He said there could
even be a modest increase in the strength of the Border Patrol.

The budget requested for the immigration service for the fiscal year 1982 is
$363 million. The total Justice Department budget request is $2.3 billion. The
Administration is seeking $21.6 million less for the immigration service than
the $384.6 million sought by the Carter Administration. A budget of $371 million
was authorized by Congress for the current fiscal year.

President Reagan's proposed budget, which was sent to Congress yesterday,
requests funds for 9,531 employees at the immigration service. That is 1,355
fewer persons than Congress authorized for the current year, 750 fewer than
President Carter requested for fiscal 1982 and 251 fewer than the agency said
were ''on board'' at the end of last month.

''On board or off board, please don't cut into muscle,'' Representative Henry J.
Hyde, Republican of Illinois, said to the Attorney General. Mr. Hyde called the
immigration service ''the worst agency of Government,'' an ''embarrassment,''
and recalled that it was unable to locate Iranian students and diplomats in the
United States last year.

Concern for More Attention

Representatives Daniel E. Lungren of California, Harold S. Sawyer of Michigan
and Hamilton Fish Jr. of upstate New York, all Republicans, joined Romano L.
Mazzoli of Kentucky and George E.  Danielson, both Democrats, in pleading for
more attention to the immigration service. ''It truly is a disaster area,'' said
Mr.  Danielson, who estimated that there were 200,000 illegal aliens in his Los
Angeles County district.

Mr. Sawyer said he had been ''horrified'' to learn that the immigration agency
''operates out of shoeboxes.'' Mr. Lungren said it was essential for the Federal
Government to do a better job because state and local officials had no authority
to police the border or enforce the immigration laws.

Several Congressmen said they were disappointed that the Justice Department
budget showed no money to match Mr. Smith's stated commitment to a more vigorous
fight against violent crime.  Representative William J. Hughes, Democrat of New
Jersey, said that the Administration was apparently ''not allocating any
resources to assist the states'' in fighting violent crime.

Mr. Smith noted that he had appointed a committee to advise him on that subject.
But Mr. Hughes said the results would not be available in time to guide Congress
in its budget deliberations.

The Attorney General confirmed that the proposed budget would eliminate the
department's entire juvenile justice program, which is designed to help local
governments prevent and control juvenile delinquency.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              186 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               March 4, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

LOOKING BACKWARD, AND FORWARD;
America, Again

SECTION: Section A; Page 26, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 151 words


Just last week the idea was expressed in gray, abstract words in the report of a
Federal commission on immigration: ''Historians, in their support of increased
immigration, have cautioned against overly restrictionist tendencies. They point
out that U.S. citizens have always been concerned about the arrival of
immigrants, but note that immigrants have always made contributions to U.S.
society.''

This week, the abstraction became flesh. One of the finalists in the annual
Westinghouse Science Search for outstanding student achievement was a
16-year-old Bronx boy who completed a complicated analysis of a problem in
numbers theory. Students from the Bronx, and from New York, always do well in
the competition. But this student is unusual. His name is Tan Dinh Ngo. He is a
refugee from Vietnam, and a year and a half ago he spoke no English.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              187 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 March 2, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. RETURNS ILLEGAL IMMIGRANTS WHO ARE FLEEING SALVADOR WAR

BYLINE: By JOHN M. CREWDSON, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 2237 words

DATELINE: LOS ANGELES, March 1


Refugees from the fighting in El Salvador are streaming into the United States
in ever-greater numbers, in many cases having sold all they own to finance the
difficult, expensive and illegal journey from their Central American homeland.
But they are being sent home again nearly as fast as they are captured, to what
many of them fear may be mistreatment or death.

Lawyers working in behalf of the Salvadorans say that, in an effort to keep them
from clogging the overloaded immigration system, the Immigration and
Naturalization Service sometimes does not tell the refugees that they have the
right to have a deportation hearing or to seek political asylum, or it
intimidates them into forgoing these procedures.

One Mexican immigration official in Tijuana said last month that some of the
Salvadorans apprehended in this country had simply been sent back across the
border by American officers.

Response of Immigration Service

A spokesman for the United States immigration service, Verne Jervis, said that
this practice would be illegal but denied that it was going on. Mr. Jervis said
that while there ''might be some violations'' by local offices of the service,
he was unaware of widespread trampling on the Salvadorans' rights.

In the fiscal year that ended in September, 11,792 Salvadorans were apprehended
by the immigration service, up from 7,890 four years before. Border Patrol
Agents estimate that for every illegal alien they catch, from two to five others
manage to evade detection, which would place the number of new arrivals at
25,000 to 60,000 a year.

The Salvadorans are only one small group among the uncounted people entering the
United States illegally south of the border. But they are the only ones for whom
church groups and others are seeking a temporary haven in this country. Unlike
the hundreds of thousands of Mexicans who commute here each year to work, the
Salvadorans are driven not by poverty but by war, and for them the prospect of
returning home holds far more anguish.

In January, alarmed by an unconfirmed report that some refugees sent home in
December had been murdered by right-wing ''death squads'' shortly after they
arrived in San Salvador on Christmas morning, 42 Salvadorans at the immigration
service's detention facility in El Centro, Calif., 150 miles southeast of here,
released a statement saying they had begun a hunger strike to underline their
appeal for asylum from ''the political situation which presently exists'' in El
Salvador.

The report of the Christmas murders, which has gained currency among Salvadoran
exiles in this country, remains unconfirmed. But many of those knowledgable
about conditions in El Salvador say there is little doubt that some number of
those sent home by the immigration service have been killed, as victims of
random violence if not as specific targets of the left or right.

''It just stands to reason,'' said Millard Arnold, who was deputy assistant
Secretary of State for human rights in the Carter Administration. ''The odds are
some of them are going to be killed.''

Prof. Blase Bonpane, a sociologist and Latin American expert at California State
University here, went further. ''There is no doubt in my mind that somewhere
between 5 and 10 percent of those who are returned are executed, because the
Government had something on them, a member of a union or something,'' he said.

Some of the refugees, among them teachers and trade unionists, say their names
have appeared on what purport to be ''death lists'' circulated by various
right-wing ''terror squads.'' But United States immigration officials say most
of those they apprehend seem to be associated with no political faction.
''They've seen the fighting,'' said one, ''but they're generally uninvolved in
it. They're just frightened.''

Whatever their reasons for leaving, the identities of those who are caught once
they arrive here are made known to the Salvadoran Government. Before they can be
''repatriated,'' at a cost to the Federal Government of about $300 apiece,
officials of the immigration service said, the refugees are interviewed by the
Salvadoran Consul General in Los Angeles to confirm their nationality. When they
arrive home, according to Professor Bonpane, they are interviewed again and
asked ''to give some kind of explanation'' for having left the country. He said
he had seen films of such interviews, adding that ''the level of abuse is
frightening.''

A spokesman for the United States Embassy in San Salvador said that he had heard
many reports of mistreatment or killing of Salvadorans returned from the United
States, but that he had no evidence that any of the reports were true. But Mr.
Arnold said the State Department had repeatedly asked the embassy whether it
could confirm or disprove the reports and was told, ''No one really knows, the
situation is so chaotic.''

Reports of People Missing or Dead

Among the Salvadorans in this country, it seems, almost everyone knows, or has
heard of, someone who has been sent back and is now missing or dead. Mario
Vasquez, a Los Angeles lawyer representing a 27-year-old Salvadoran mechanic who
has been awaiting deportation at El Centro for 13 months, said his client had
received a letter from his mother reporting that two friends sent back to El
Salvador a few weeks earlier had been killed.

Such reports are spread mainly through the mail and by word of mouth, but there
are also occasional telephone calls from home. It was such a call to a refugee
at El Centro, from someone who had been detained there whom he knew only as
''Carlos,'' that provided the Salvadorans with their first account of the
rumored Christmas massacre.

The rumor swept through the camp and was passed on to a reporter for El Diario,
the Spanish-language newspaper in New York City, which published a brief account
Jan. 4. It was later picked up by other Spanish-language newspapers, but none of
the published reports have contained any confirmation.

Documents of the Immigration and Naturalization Service made available to The
New York Times showed that a group of 25 Salvadorans left here Dec. 24 aboard
Western Airlines Flight 746, spent the night at the Mexico City airport and
arrived in San Salvador on Christmas morning aboard a Costa Rican airliner.
Twelve of the Salvadorans were returning under orders of deportation and the
rest as ''voluntary returnees.''

Bodies Along the Road

''Carlos,'' the man who telephoned El Centro with news of the incident, was said
to have been among those aboard the plane who somehow escaped death, and the
list of passengers includes three persons with that first name. The man
reportedly said he had returned to the airport the morning after his arrival and
had recognized the bodies of some of his fellow passengers lying along the road.

The immigration service rejected a request by The New York Times, made under the
Freedom of Information Act, for the home addresses of those who returned on
Christmas Day, saying it was concerned that any inquiries in El Salvador about
their well-being might jeopardize their lives.

As is true of all illegal aliens, no one knows how many Salvadorans are living
in the United States. Community services officials here estimate that there are
100,000 to 300,000 in the Los Angeles area alone, and there are also sizable
Salvadoran communities in San Francisco and the District of Columbia.

Deaths of 13 in Arizona Desert

The flow of refugees abated somewhat last summer, after the deaths from
dehydration of 13 Salvadorans who had crossed the border into Arizona without
sufficient water, a case that was widely reported in El Salvador. But
immigration officials say the refugees are once again arriving at a rapid pace.

The route they follow leads through Guatemala and Mexico, which as a result are
now confronted with illegal immigration problems of their own, and the journey
is an expensive one. Rings that specialize in smuggling Salvadorans charge from
$1,000 to $1,700 for passage to Los Angeles and $500 more for a trip to the East
Coast. Because they come with the intention of remaining here until the
Salvadoran conflict is resolved, many of the refugees sell their houses and
personal possessions to pay their way. If they are captured and returned home,
there is often nowhere for them to go.

Not many of the refugees appear to be applying for political asylum, which
requires a showing that the applicant has a specific reason to fear that he will
be harmed upon returning home, for example because of membership in a particular
political group. The immigration service has no reliable figures, but some
estimates place the total number of applicants as low as 400.

Even though there may be more who could meet the criteria for asylum, the great
majority of the refugees are probably not qualified under a strict
interpretation of the rules requiring a threat of political persecution. ''They
say they left because they don't want to take sides,'' said John Weis, an El
Centro lawyer who has many refugees among his clients. ''But they're caught in
the middle, and they feel that they're in real danger.''

Status of Temporary Refuge

United States law also provides, however, for giving temporary refuge to aliens
unable to return home because of ''civil war or catastrophic circumstances.''
Such status has been conferred at different times on citizens of Vietnam, Laos,
Uganda and, most recently, on Nicaraguans after the fall of the Government of
President Anastasio Somoza Debayle. Last fall, President Carter ordered the
admission of more than 150,000 Cubans and Haitians who had landed in Florida in
boats.

A coalition of Congressmen, religious organizations and other groups, among them
the National Council of Churches, the United States Catholic Conference and the
American Civil Liberties Union, has been urging the State Department to follow
the same policy in admitting the Salvadoran refugees. In a letter to Secretary
of State Edmund S. Muskie in January, the coalition quoted Phillip Sargisson,
the Central American representative of the United Nations High Commission on
Refugees, as having declared that ''anyone who comes out of El Salvador today
deserves refugee status.''

When the Carter Administration left office, according to Millard Arnold, the
former State Department official, it was ''very, very close to working out a
compromise'' that would have allowed the Salvadorans to remain here temporarily,
not through any official action but simply by not sending them home.

The plan was endorsed, he said, by the department's human rights bureau, after
reports that more than 10,000 people of El Salvador's 4.5 million people had
been killed there last year, a figure Mr.  Arnold termed ''an enormous number of
deaths in a country that size.'' But he said that it was rejected by other State
Department officials concerned that it might suggest that the United States,
which had been pushing for a political settlement of the Salvadoran conflict,
''did not have faith in the ability of the Salvadorans to resolve their own
problems.''

Concern of Drawing More Refugees

There were also concerns, he said, that such a policy might lead to a still
greater influx of refugees, and that the arrangement would be ''difficult to
police'' since it might be impossible to distinguish Salvadoran citizens from
other Central and South Americans.

Of the nearly 12,000 Salvadorans arrested last year, only 2,378 were formally
deported, suggesting that a large number were returned through what the
immigration service calls ''voluntary departure,'' an agreement by an illegal
alien to return home without demanding the deportation hearing, with its
expensive and time-consuming appeals process, to which he is entitled. Without a
large number of voluntary returns, immigration experts agree, the overloaded
adjudication system would quickly collapse.

The immigration service is required to provide all those it arrests with a
written notice of rights, including the right to free legal counsel. But lawyers
working with the Salvadorans say they are convinced that the options are not
being fully explained by immigration officials.

Reasons for Returning Questioned

''I.N.S. would like people to return voluntarily without going through the
system,'' said Mr. Weis, the El Centro lawyer. Another lawyer, William H.
Steiner of Los Angeles, questioned why so many Salvadorans were agreeing to
return home voluntarily ''when they've risked their lives and spent their life
savings to go 2,500 miles to get here.''

''It's a safe assumption,'' he said, ''that they were forced back.'' Mr. Steiner
said he had seen some voluntary departure agreements signed with an ''X'' by
Salvadorans who could neither write nor read what they were signing. In
''practically every case,'' Mr. Weis said, his clients withdrew their agreements
to return home after being told of the available alternatives.

There are also accounts of instances in which the advice of rights has been
followed by what what Mr. Steiner termed ''mental coercion.'' ''They're told if
they want a hearing or asylum they'll have to stay in jail, or that their
relatives will be arrested,'' he said.

''You'll get an overzealous border guard who says, 'You either go back or we'll
lock you away for the rest of your life,' '' Mr. Arnold said. ''So the poor
fellow elects to go back.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of refugees (Page A14)

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              188 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 March 2, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

AT STRATFORD FESTIVAL, HIRSCH WELCOMES TALENT THE WORLD OVER

BYLINE: By ANDREW H. MALCOLM, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section C; Page 14, Column 1; Cultural Desk

LENGTH: 928 words

DATELINE: TORONTO, March 1


John Hirsch, the new artistic director of the troubled Stratford Shakespeare
Festival, was holding cast tryouts the other day in the borrowed basement of St.
George's Church here.

''I need all the help I can get from God,'' he said, ''whether it's Greek
Orthodox or Catholic or something else.'' He is right. After many months of
artistic and political turmoil, the famed festival is in disarray. The
difficulties began with the expected resignation last year of Robin Phillips as
artistic director, followed closely by the appointment of four Canadians as
co-artistic directors, their mass dismissal one month later, the appointment of
John Dexter, a Briton, as their replacement, the threat of a boycott by Canadian
Actors Equity in support of the four discharged Canadians, and the refusal of
Canada's Immigration Minister to grant a work permit to Mr. Dexter because the
festival board had not carried out ''a thorough and reasonable search for a
Canadian artistic director.''

Situation Appears Calmed

The appointment in December of Mr. Hirsch, a naturalized Canadian born in
Hungary, appears to have calmed the situation. He is known as an ardent
nationalist and says, ''We ought to use and encourage the talent of the home
country.'' But he warns: ''That doesn't mean closing the doors to Americans,
English or Albanians. It's important that the world not deal with Stratford as a
xenophobic place. It is not and will not be under me.''

As seeming proof, the festival has just announced its 1981 program -months later
than usual - and its list of stars, including Danielle Darrieux, the French film
star, as Claire in Friederich Durrenmatt's ''The Visit.'' There will also be
Brian Bedford as Alceste in ''The Misanthrope'' and as director of
''Coriolanus'' and ''The Rivals,'' and Len Cariou, of ''Sweeney Todd'' fame, as
Coriolanus and as Petruchio in ''The Taming of the Shrew.''

The eight-production program, which is less than half the 17 plays presented in
1980, runs from June 4 to Oct. 31 and also includes ''The Comedy of Errors,''
''H.M.S. Pinafore'' and ''Wild Oats'' by John O'Keeffe. Jean Gascon will direct
''The Visit'' and ''The Misanthrope''; Leon Major will direct ''Pinafore'' and
Peter Dews will direct ''Taming of the Shrew'' and ''Comedy of Errors.''

''It takes a minimum of a year to plan a season,'' said the 50-year-old Mr.
Hirsch, who was taking a day off from his many other commitments, ''We had no
plays decided on in mid-January,'' he added. ''We start rehearsals March 2.''

Not Completely Free

Among other activities, Mr. Hirsch is under contract to the Seattle Repertory
Company until July 1; he will not be able to begin fulltime work at Stratford
until a month after opening night. Until then, Muriel Sherrin, a longtime
theatrical associate, will produce much of Stratford's season, which will be its
29th.

Mr. Hirsch is pleased that he has a three-year contract with Stratford. ''I'm
here to put it all back on the rails and it will take not just this season but
another two anyway.''

Besides the problems of the immediate season, which see him constantly on the
phone to coax reluctant actors back to Stratford, Mr. Hirsch sees his most
important tasks as aiding the healing process and building a very strong
ensemble of festival players.  ''Then,'' he said, ''all those marvelous visiting
cherries can come and sit on a marvelous sundae. But with TV and films and
commercials these days, actors can make horrendous money elsewhere.''

But, he said, all performers need to exercise themselves in new demands.
''Acting is not like riding a bike, that is, once you learn it, you never
forget,'' he explained. ''Most actors today do 'Chopsticks' for a living. But
you've got to constantly exercise your talent muscles and challenge yourself
with a fine concerto.'' That is one of the arguments he uses when actors and
agents, embittered by the year's confrontations with Stratford's board of
directors, shy away, as many have done.

In the National Service

Another argument is the concept of national service. ''This theater is important
to the cultural life of the continent,'' says Mr. Hirsch, who was wearing a
flannel shirt, a stocking cap and hiking boots. ''Forty percent of our audience
is American. Their foundations and corporations should be supporting us too.''

Many foreigners missed the point of Stratford's confrontation, Mr.  Hirsch
mantains. It was not that the Government denied a work permit to Mr. Dexter. It
was that the Stratford board had previously hired four prominent Canadians to
share the job and then suddenly dismissed them.

Mr. Hirsch hopes to improve relations between actors and administrators.
''There's been a recent tendency,'' he said, ''to 'Gulf-and-Westernize' the arts
and the small theater. But we've all got to recognize the total interdependence
of the board and the administrators and the people on the stage. The small
theater is really a cottage craft. And you must always remember the preciousness
of that craft.''

''The damage at Stratford is not irreparable,'' Mr. Hirsch added, ''It happens
at the Comedie Fran,caise every 20 years. At times, good can grow out of bad and
vice versa. That's a theme of Shakespearean drama, you know.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of John Hirsch

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              189 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 March 1, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

NOW UP FOR DEBATE, A CHAIN OF PROPOSALS ON ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 4; Page 3, Column 1; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1104 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON


Illegal aliens regularly scamper across the United States-Mexican border,
140,000 Cubans and Haitians swamped south Florida last year, and more than 7
million Americans are out of work. Yet a Federal study commission called last
week for a ''modest increase'' in the number of visas granted to immigrants.

Readers of its report could be pardoned for thinking that the Select Commission
on Immigration and Refugee Policy, a 16-member advisory panel, was out of touch
with reality. But in fact many of its recommendations, taken together, made some
sense. And they illustrate both the strengths and weaknesses of blue-ribbon
commissions, an instrument of Government used with great frequency in recent
years.

The immigration study commission, headed by the Rev. Theodore M.  Hesburgh,
president of the University of Notre Dame, differed from many similar bodies in
that it was created by Congress, not the President, and half its members came
from Congress. Four members served in President Carter's Cabinet and four were
private citizens.

The large proportion of high level Federal officials meant that the panel had
the resources and expertise of the Government at its disposal. Although there
were many public hearings and ''consultations'' with experts, the commission was
so high-powered that its members had time for only seven formal business
meetings.  Some of the members, instead of wrestling with the issues firsthand,
delegated their duties to aides. Participation by top Federal officials insured
that the recommendations would be politically acceptable; at least they would
have been acceptable to the Carter Administration and to lawmakers who held
power over immigration bills in the last Congress.

But on some questions, the presence of politicians may have made the select
commission overly cautious. Most members saw a need to revise the long list of
''immoral'' acts and politically unpopular beliefs for which aliens must be kept
out of the country, but they refused to recommend specific changes, for fear of
the public reaction. A totally independent commission might also have been
harsher in its criticism of some agencies, such as the Immigration and
Naturalization Service, but it was difficult for Carter Cabinet appointees to
denounce the performance of their own agencies.

When Democrats controlled the Senate, Edward M. Kennedy presided over Judiciary
Committee hearings on immigration, and he consistently emphasized the need to
assist refugees, generally welcoming them and other aliens. Now, however,
Senator Alan K.  Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, will set the tone, as chairman
of a new subcommittee on immigration and refugee policy. His more cautious
approach reflects concerns that appear to be shared by many Americans. In
comments at the end of the select commission report, Mr. Simpson said that there
should be an ''absolute annual ceiling'' on the number of immigrants, an idea
opposed by a majority. He said that Spanish-speaking aliens seemed to adopt the
English language and other aspects of United States culture less completely than
other immigrants, and he worried that ''linguistic and cultural separatism''
might erode ''the unity and political stability of the nation.''

Senator Simpson joined more liberal members of the commission in endorsing its
key recommendations: a one-time amnesty for illegal aliens coupled with strict
enforcement measures, including the imposition of penalties upon employers who
make a practice of hiring illegal aliens. By a vote of 8 to 7, the commission
recommended a more secure method of identification for citizens and legal aliens
- not necessarily a national identification card system - so employers could
distinguish those who have a right to work from those who don't.

Looking Beyond the Short Term

The Hesburgh commission's proposals have a certain internal logic as a total
package. But any one element taken by itself - for example, the increase in
legal immigration -might look silly. At present, the United States' immigration
policy is, basically, no policy at all; there has been a conscious decision to
keep a mishmash of old laws and practices. Although hardly anyone defends the
present system, it does have some virtues. The United States and Mexico have
apparently worked out a modus vivendi on the border, which serves the short-term
interests of impoverished aliens and their employers in states of the South and
West.

But the purpose of a Federal study commission is to look beyond the short term,
to help shape a consensus for the future. Thomas R.  Wolanin, a Congressional
aide who has written a book about Presidential advisory commissions, found that
there were 99 established between 1945 and 1972. He found that panels formed in
response to crises, such as the Kerner commission, which studied the urban
riots, often had little direct effect on Government policies.

However, contrary to the common belief, Mr. Wolanin said, commissions are not a
means for avoiding issues, and most commission reports have not been ignored.
Two out of three commissions saw substantial action taken upon some of their
recommendations, he said.

Despite intense public concern about illegal immigration, the Hesburgh
commission found that the proportion of foreign-born people in the United States
at the end of the 1970's was ''actually lower than at any previous point since
1850, when statistics were first kept.'' Census Bureau researchers estimated
that there are now 3.5 million to 6 million illegal aliens in the country, but
the commission had no reliable data on where these people live or what they do.
And the panel did not hire scholars to do extensive research on the illegal
aliens because, according to Dr. Lawrence H. Fuchs, the executive director, ''it
would only fuel emotional arguments based on prejudice.''

Vilma S. Martinez, president of the Mexican American Legal Defense and
Educational Fund, cited the lack of this important information as a reason for
her disappointment with the commission. The panel, she said, recommended strict
enforcement measures to abate illegal immigration even while conceding that the
economic effects of immigration on domestic workers were largely unknown.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of illegal aliens

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              190 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                 March 1, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Immigration and the Missing Nail

SECTION: Section 4; Page 18, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 626 words


Who should decide which foreigners are allowed into the United States, the
foreigners or the United States? In a responsible society, the question would
answer itself. But that's not the way things now work in the United States.

We are a rich and generous country given to bragging about our immigrant
origins. When there is obvious need, we live up to the romantic images of Miss
Liberty and the Golden Door, taking in waves of freedom fighters or boat people.
But romance notwithstanding, there is no longer any such thing as unlimited
immigration. A million people are waiting in line to enter the United States
legally; millions more are eager to jump the line; and the nation must choose
which to let through the door.

The United States now purports to choose, to make its own rational immigration
policy. But, in great part the policy is made by hundreds of thousands of
individual foreigners who slip into the country illegally. In the process,
America loses.

Undocumented farm workers from Mexico, for instance, may be brave and
industrious. But each takes a place that, if society were choosing fairly, might
be assign instead to a refugee from Somalia, a sister from Korea or a more
deserving Mexican applicant. The country is not now making the choice. The more
the system spins out of control, the more Americans lose patience with
Government - and perhaps with any immigration at all.

How should the country regain control of its own immigration choices? A
blue-ribbon commission, led by the Rev. Theodore Hesburgh of Notre Dame, has
just provided a careful and reasonable way. Wars are lost for lack of a
horseshoe nail; as the commission shows, creating a rational immigration policy
turns on a nail called worker identification. That is:

- If the United States wants to decide how much immigration to permit, it must
do a far better job of controlling illegal immigrants.

- If the United States wants to control illegal immigrants better, it needs a
far better enforcement system than the starved Immigration Service's, and
without requiring the Reagan budget-cutters to find much new money.

- If the United States wants effective but economical enforcement, the surest
way is through employers, who now are legally free to hire illegal aliens and in
any case have no good way to check an employee's status.

- If the United States wants to make an enforcement system effective by making
employers culpable, employers must have a reliable way to screen out illegal
aliens, without discriminating against legal residents who look or sound
foreign.

The Hesburgh Commission could not agree on exactly how to do this.  Some members
would have workers show forge-resistant Social Security cards. But that conjures
up police-state images to others. They would institute an automated call-in
system, like that used with credit cards.

Still, whatever the differences over method, almost the entire commission
strongly agreed on the need for some secure identification system. One way or
another, it's the nail without which the country will keep losing the illegal
immigration war.

Now the public focus shifts: to Alan Simpson, Wyoming Republican and new
chairman of the Senate immigration subcommittee; to Romano Mazzoli, Kentucky
Democrat and new immigration subcommittee chairman in the House. Most of all,
attention turns to the Reagan Administration, which has so far evaded the
commission - and the issue. Until they act, American immigration policy will
stay in foreign hands.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: Editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              191 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 28, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

FIRST REVIEWS ON IMMIGRATION PROPOSALS: ENCOURAGING WORDS, UNCERTAIN PROSPECTS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7,; National Desk

LENGTH: 1030 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 27


A nearly unbroken chorus of favorable comments greeted the final report of the
Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy today, but the initial
public reactions might be deceptive.

The commission has galvanized interest in immigration, but it is not clear what
the Reagan Administration's reaction to the report will be. Moreover, no
consensus has been forged in Congress to support its key proposals: penalities
against employers who hire illegal aliens, an amnesty for most illegal aliens
already in the United States, a modest increase in legal immigration and
stricter enforcement measures, especially along the Mexican border.

The focus of attention shifts now from the commission to Congress.
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, a Kentucky Democrat who serves as chairman of
the House Judiciary subcommittee on immigration, said the report, issued
yesterday, was ''the opening salvo of a very serious re-examination of this
nation's immigration and refugee policies.''

Served on Commission

Mr. Mazzoli's counterpart in the Senate, Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming,
and the ranking Republican on Mr. Mazzoli's subcommittee, Hamilton Fish Jr. of
upstate New York, served on the 16-member commission headed by the Rev. Theodore
M. Hesburgh, president of the University of Notre Dame. So they are prepared for
the task of rewriting the nation's immigration laws, which are unmatched in
complexity by any Federal statutes except perhaps the tax code.

''There is a very strong disposition in the House among my colleagues for
passage of some kind of measure,'' Mr. Mazzoli said.  ''This gives us an
outline, a matrix in which we can then find the politically feasible elements.''

The House majority leader, Jim Wright of Texas, and Strom Thurmond, the South
Carolina Republican who is president pro tem of the Senate and chairman of the
Judiciary Committee, both said that dealing with immigration policy should have
a high priority, but the momentum built up by such comments is fragile at best.
In the absence of some public response by the Reagan Administration, the
commission and its work could disappear into a vacuum.

Cabinet Members to Confer

President Reagan created a Cabinet-level committee today to review the Hesburgh
commission proposals. It consists of the Attorney General, William French Smith,
who was designated as chairman, and the Secretaries of State, Labor, and Health
and Human Services.

Edwin J. Gray, director of the White House Office of Policy Development, said he
was familiar with the main points of the Hesburgh commission report, but he
declined to discuss its merits.  ''This was not a report put together by any of
President Reagan's appointees,'' he said in a brief interview. ''It's a result
of efforts by others. We will take it under advisement.''

Several themes of the report appear to run counter to broad policies already
formulated by the Reagan Administration. A statute establishing penalties for
employers who hired illegal aliens would increase Federal regulation of the
workplace at a time when Mr.  Reagan says he has a mandate to reduce Government
regulation.

The executive director of the commission, Dr. Lawrence H. Fuchs, said that its
proposals for improved enforcement along the Mexican border would cost $43
million. He acknowledged that such an expenditure was ''totally out of sync''
with the cost-cutting austerity advocated by the Office of Management and
Budget.

Long-Term Costs Cited

Commission members said, however, that if such ''relatively small'' expenditures
were not made to curtail illegal immigration, the long-term social and economic
costs could be great.

In its thinking on immigration, the Reagan Administration is less subject to the
influence of organized labor and more interested in the revival of a
guest-worker program than was the Carter Administration. Reagan Administration
officials are also acutely sensitive to the needs of the South and West, where
most illegal immigrants from Latin America have settled.

The League of United Latin American Citizens, which describes itself as the
country's largest Hispanic organization, said that the commission had offered
''politically expedient solutions'' overemphasizing enforcement.

''Immigration is a cultural phenomenon with worldwide patterns and
implications,'' said Ruben Bonilla Jr., president of the league.  ''It's much
too complex to be resolved by the simple Band-Aid approaches reflected in many
sections of the commission's report.''

Attention to Causes Urged

Likewise, the Mexican American Legal Defense and Educational Fund said that the
United States, instead of stressing enforcement at the border, should pay more
attention to the economic causes of immigration from Mexico.

In an effort to encourage public debate on immigration, representatives of 18
organizations announced today that they were starting a ''national forum'' in
which to conduct research and share opinions. The list of members, reflecting
the diversity of interests concerned about immigration, includes the American
Jewish Committee, the American Civil Liberties Union, the Lawyers' Committee for
Civil Rights Under Law, Zero Population Growth, the United States Conference of
Mayors and the National Association of Counties.

Dale Frederick Swartz of the Lawyers' Committee said: ''Many of us have strong
objections to the commission's recommendations and analysis, but we are, in
effect, holding our fire. We want to study it very carefully, and where we
disagree, we want to offer well reasoned alternatives.''

Some of the commission's other proposals, overshadowed by its principal
recommendations, may prove just as important in the long run. The panel, for
example, suggested a Federal program of ''impact aid'' for local governments
that resettle refugees; punitive fines for schools that fail to keep track of
their foreign students, and creation of a special court to handle all
deportation cases.

The commission also said that there should be somewhat greater supervision of
State Department consular officers, who now have almost absolute authority in
deciding whether to grant visa applications.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              192 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 27, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

PANEL ASKS RISE IN IMMIGRATION, WITH TIGHTER LAW ENFORCEMENT

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section A; Page 1, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 1169 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 26


A Federal study commission called today for a ''modest increase'' in legal
immigration, a one-time amnesty for most illegal aliens and strict enforcement
measures, including penalties for employers who hired illegal aliens.

The recommendations were made by the Select Commission on Immigration and
Refugee Policy, a 16-member advisory panel, which delivered its final report
today to the President and Congress.

The Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh, president of the University of Notre Dame and
chairman of the commission, said in his introduction that ''we recommend closing
the back door to undocumented/illegal migration'' while ''opening the front door
a little more to accommodate legal migration in the interests of this country.''

The commission was created by Congress in 1978 to provide a comprehensive review
of a field frequently said to be

Excerpts from report, page B5.
dominated by confused, conflicting policies and archaic laws. In its 453-page
final report, the panel said that the overall goals of immigration policy should
be ''family reunification, economic growth consistent with protection of the
United States labor market and cultural diversity consistent with national
unity.''

Amnesty Tied to Improvements

The commission said that its proposal for legalizing the status of illegal
aliens was contingent upon improvements in the enforcement of immigration laws
both at the border and inside the United States.  Without such improvements, it
said, the amnesty ''could serve as a stimulus to further illegal entry.''

Reagan Administration officials had no immediate comment on the report. The
executive director of the commission, Dr. Lawrence H.  Fuchs, said the White
House had indicated that President Reagan would not participate in a formal
presentation ceremony that was tentatively scheduled for tomorrow.

Four Cabinet officers from the Carter Administration served on the commission, a
bipartisan group that also included eight members of Congress and four private
citizens appointed by President Carter.

Many of the commission's proposals, including those for additional enforcement,
would cost money, perhaps substantial sums, that were not estimated in the
report and that might be difficult to find at a time when Mr. Reagan is cutting
the budgets of most civilian agencies. Even the Carter Administration, in its
final budget proposals, suggested some cutbacks for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service.

The commission said it did not rule out the possibility of a ''slight
expansion'' of the existing Federal program under which about 30,000 aliens
enter the United States each year as temporary workers. In the Presidential
campaign last year, Mr. Reagan expressed support for a ''guest worker'' program
under which millions of Mexicans could cross the border to accept jobs for
several months at a time.

Report Hailed by Kennedy

Senator Edward M. Kennedy, Democrat of Massachusetts, who served on the
commission, said that its report represented ''the most significant and
thoughtful study of American immigration law in three decades.'' That assessment
was shared by many specialists in the field, although hardly anyone agreed with
all the panel's recommendations.

The commission suggested raising the ceiling on ''numerically limited''
immigration to 350,000 a year, from the current 270,000.  The commission would
allow 100,000 more visas in this category for each of the next five years to
clear the backlog of visa applications. These figures do not include either
refugees or the estimated 150,000 aliens who would have automatic rights to
enter the United States as immediate relatives of citizens.

Assuming a normal annual flow of 50,000 refugees, the commission said that under
its program there would be 650,000 people admitted legally as new entrants in
each of the next five years, as against an average of 580,000 a year for the
last five years.

'Mass Asylum Emergencies'

The commission assumed that there would not be a repetition of the sudden,
unexpected migration that brought 125,000 Cubans here last year. It did not say
precisely how it would stop such an exodus in the future. But it did say that
Federal agencies should work together in planning for such ''mass asylum
emergencies.''

The commission said it had concluded that a ''modest increase'' in legal
immigration would advance the interests of the United States without harming
domestic workers. To allow flexibility in the admission of refugees and
immediate relatives, the commission said there should be ''no total cap or
ceiling'' on the total number of immigrants.

The panel repeatedly expressed its belief in the value of immigration as a force
for economic growth and cultural enrichment, stating that 30 percent of the
United States' Nobel laureates were immigrants. The commission said that ''some
immigrants do compete with United States workers for jobs, particularly in times
of high unemployment,'' but this was a secondary theme of the report.

In a study for the commission, the Census Bureau estimated that there were 3.5
million to six million illegal aliens in the United States. The number who might
come forward to take advantage of the proposed amnesty would probably depend on
conditions to be specified by Congress, such as a requirement for continuous
residence in the United States for a certain period. Dr. Fuchs said that one
million to four million illegal aliens might come forward, but he acknowledged
that in other countries ''amnesties have been notoriously unsuccessful.''

Ending Legal Inconsistency

The commission saw an anomaly in the fact that, under current law, illegal
aliens could be arrested and deported but the employers who knowingly hired them
could not be punished, except under a special law that covers only farm labor
contractors. To end this inconsistency, the commission said that employers
hiring undocumented workers should be subject to civil and criminal penalties
such as administrative citations, fines and court injunctions.

By a vote of 8 to 7, with one abstention, the commission said that penalties
against employer should be coupled with ''some system of more secure
identification.'' The panel, however, did not say whether the system should use
a ''counterfeit-resistant'' Social Security card or a computer that employers
could call, in the same way retailers now verify a person's credit card number.

Commissioners who opposed a new, more secure means of identification said that
it could be abused by Government agencies and posed a potential threat to civil
liberties.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              193 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 27, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

EXCERPTS FROM FINAL REPORT OF COMMISSION ON IMMIGRATION AND REFUGEE

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times POLICY

SECTION: Section B; Page 5, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1626 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 26


Following are excerpts from ''U.S.  Immigration Policy and the National
Interest,'' the final report of the Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee
Policy:

The number of undocumented/illegal residents in the United States remains
uncertain. Census Bureau researchers, in a report for the select commission that
was based on a review of existing studies, offered the following cautious
speculation:

The total number of illegal residents in the United States for some recent year,
such as 1978, is almost certainly below six million, and may be substantially
less, possibly only 3.5 to 5.0 million.

According to this report, Mexican nationals probably account for less than half
of the undocumented/illegal population. Other large numbers come from Jamaica,
the Dominican Republic, El Salvador, Haiti, South America and various Asian
countries.

All studies indicate that undocumented/illegal aliens are attracted to this
country by U.S. employment opportunities. Most come from countries that have
high rates of under-@ and unemployment.

'Pernicious Effects' Indicated

Although the research findings and theoretical arguments with regard to the
impact of undocumented/illegal immigration upon the U.S. economy and social
services are inconclusive, there is evidence that shows that the toleration of
large-scale undocumented/illegal immigration can have pernicious effects on U.S.
society.

This illegal flow, encouraged by employers who provide jobs, has created an
underclass of workers who fear apprehension and deportation.
Undocumented/illegal migrants, at the mercy of unscrupulous employers and
coyotes who smuggle them across the border, cannot or will not avail themselves
of the protection of U.S. laws. Not only do they suffer, but so too does U.S.
society.

Most serious is the fact that illegality breeds illegality. The presence of a
substantial number of undocumented/ illegal aliens in the United States has
resulted not only in a disregard for immigration law but in the breaking of
minimum wage and occupational safety laws, and statutes against smuggling as
well. As long as undocumented migration flouts U.S. immigration law, its most
devastating impact may be the disregard it breeds for other U.S.  laws.

The select commission favors immediate action to reduce the flow of
undocumented/illlegal migration. To take no action will result in a worsening of
the problem. Migrants will continue to enter the United States illegally, U.S.
workers will continue to face competition from this source of inexpensive labor
and the disregard for U.S. law will continue to strain the fabric of society.

No Temporary Work Program

The commission has carefully weighed these arguments. Most commissioners have
concluded that the commission should not recommend the introduction of a
large-scale temporary worker program.

The commission proposes a three-part program to address this problem:

- Better border and interior controls;

- Economic deterrents in the workplace; and

- Once new enforcement measures have been instituted, legalization of certain
undocumented/illegal aliens who are already in this country.

The select commission recommends that Border Patrol funding levels be raised to
provide for a substantial increase in the numbers and training of personnel,
replacement sensor systems, additional light planes and helicopters and other
needed equipment.

During the past 10 years, the number of undocumented/illegal migrants, as
measured by apprehensions, has increased much more rapidly than the personnel
and funding levels of the Border Patrol.

At any given hour no more than 450 Border Patrol agents are directly engaged in
activities to stop persons attempting to enter the United States without
inspection. Lack of funds has also stretched the replacement schedule for sensor
systems - introduced during the last 10 years to aid the Border Patrol in
detecting movement in isolated areas of the borders - to seven years, at least
two years longer than the expected operating life of the systems.

Regional Enforcement Posts

The select commission recommends that regional border enforcement posts be
established to coordinate the work of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, the U.S. Customs Service, the Drug Enforcement Administration and the
U.S. Coast Guard in the interdiction of both undocumented/illegal migrants and
illicit goods, specifically narcotics.

The select commission recommends that the law be firmly and consistently
enforced against U.S. citizens who aid aliens who do not have valid visas to
enter the country. Recent U.S. experience with the Cuban push-out and the
resulting ''freedom flotilla'' in which private U.S. citizens transported
persons who did not have valid visas to the United States has been a cause for
concern. Though the commission recognizes the good will behind this and other
such actions on the part of U.S. citizens, U.S. law is clear with regard to
aiding the entry of aliens who do not have valid visas - such assistance is
illegal.

The select commission recommends that investigations of overstays and student
visa abuses be maintained regardless of other investigative priorities.

The select commission recommends that a fully automated system of nonimmigrant
document control should be established in the Immigration and Naturalization
Service to allow prompt tracking of aliens and to verify their departure. U.S.
consular posts of visa issuance should be informed of nondepartures. No adequate
system now exists to check whether nonimmigrants leave the country in compliance
with limitations on authorized stay or whether foreign students and other
nonimmigrants are in status.

High Priority for Training

The select commission recommends high priority be given to the training of
Immigration and Naturalization Service officers to familiarize them with the
rights of aliens and U.S. citizens and to help them deal with persons of other
cultural backgrounds. Further, to protect the rights of those who have entered
the United States legally, the commission also recommends that immigration laws
not be selectively enforced in the interior on the basis of race, religion, sex
or national origin.

The select commission recommends that legislation be passed making it illegal
for employers to hire undocumented workers. Current Federal law provides no
basis for the prosecution of employers who knowingly hire undocumented/illegal
aliens. Even if an employer is found to be employing undocumented workers, the
penalty is merely the cost of finding and training replacements. Furthermore,
the employer is free to hire still more undocumented/ illegal aliens without
incurring any additional penalties.

Although sanctions should apply to all employers, many commission members
believe that small businesses employing only a few persons should not be the
target of employer sanctions enforcement efforts.

The select commission recommends that a program to legalize undocumented/illegal
aliens now in the United States be adopted.

'Enormous' Costs to Society

The select commission holds the view that the existence of a large
undocumented/illegal migrant population should not be tolerated. The costs to
society of permitting a large group of persons to live in illegal, second-class
status are enormous. Society is harmed every time an undocumented alien is
afraid to testify as a witness in a legal proceeding, to report an illness that
many constitute a public health hazard or disclose a violation of U.S. labor
laws.

As continuing to employ existing enforcement techniques merely assures the
continuation of current problems, the commission holds the view that
legalization is a realistic response to the problem of resident
undocumented/illegal aliens. It is of the opinion that legalization - following
the institution of new, more effective enforcement measures - would be in the
national interest of the United States for many reasons:

- Qualified aliens would be able to contribute more to U.S. society once they
came into the open. Most undocumented/illegal aliens are hard working,
productive individuals who already pay taxes and contribute their labor to this
country.

- Legalized aliens would no longer contribute to the depression of U.S. labor
standards and wages.

- For the first time, the United States would have reliable information about
the sources (specific towns, villages and provinces) of undocumented/illegal
migration and the characteristics of undocumented/illegal aliens.

The select commission recommends that legalization begin when appropriate
enforcement mechanisms have been instituted.  The commission believes that a
legalization program is a necessary part of enforcement, but it does not believe
that the United States should begin the process of legalization until new
enforcement measures have been instituted to make it clear that the United
States is determined to curtail new flows of undocumented/illegal aliens.

The select commission recommends that those who are ineligible for a
legalization program be subject to the penalties of the Immigration and
Nationality Act if they come to the attention of immigration authorities.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh

TYPE: text

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              194 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 26, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

A Federal Jury Indicts 2 In Immigration Scheme

SECTION: Section B; Page 11, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 222 words


A Federal immigration investigator and a Long Island businessman were indicted
yesterday on charges involving an immigration-fraud scheme in which the
investigator allegedly sold his influence to help foreigners enter or remain in
the United States. Law enforcement officials said the indictment was an indirect
outgrowth of the Abscam investigation of corruption.

A second businessman was cited as an unindicted co-conspirator in the alleged
scheme. The 15-count indictment was handed up by a Federal grand jury in
Brooklyn. The prosecutor in the case, Laura A.  Brevetti, said the three men had
been promised a total of $15,800 in payments and had received $7,300 from
various foreigners who were aided.

The defendants were identified as Gerard W. Gentile, 33 years old, of Commack,
L.I., an investigator for the Immigration and Naturalization Service, and Manuel
Horacio Lima de Jesus, 40, of Great Neck, L.I., the businessman. The unindicted
alleged coconspirator was identified as Dieter Schmidt, 36, a former businessman
now living in Florida.

At their arraignment in Federal Court in Brooklyn last night, Mr.  Gentile and
Mr. de Jesus pleaded not guilty and were released pending further court
proceedings.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              195 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 26, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. Orders 21 Iranians to Leave

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 12, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 78 words

DATELINE: JACKSON, Miss., Feb. 25


Twenty-one Iranian students arrested for visa violations have been ordered this
week to leave the United States within 15 days. Janet Graham, a spokesman for
the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said 2,445 of the 64,000 Iranians in
the United States had been asked to leave and 757 had gone. She said 2,900 had
asked for political asylum, including three who were ordered to leave yesterday.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              196 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 20, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

The City;
4 Charged in Effort To Smuggle Aliens

SECTION: Section B; Page 3, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 107 words


Four men have been indicted on Federal charges of violating immigration laws in
connection with the Feb. 2 seizure of a trailer truck carrying 84 aliens in the
South Bronx.

Those indicted were Jose Abreu, 24 years old, and Cesar Victorino, 35, -both
citizens of the Dominican Republic - and two Bronx men, Efraine Vega, 39, and
Roopnarine Singh, 22, a citizen of Guyana, who allegedly were driving the truck.

The four men, each of whom is being held in $200,000 bail, were accused of
violations involving transportation of 43 of the aliens cross-country and
harboring them.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              197 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 19, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Israeli Quits Over Emigration

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 2, Column 3; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 67 words

DATELINE: TEL AVIV, Feb. 18


Shmuel Lahis, director general of the Jewish Agency, which oversees immigration,
resigned today, saying that the Government was not acting on a report he wrote
cautioning against emigration. The report contended that up to 500,000 Israelis
were living in the United States alone, and he urged that financial benefits be
paid to induce Israelis to return home.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              198 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 15, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

NO CHANGES SOUGHT ON EXCLUDING ALIENS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 28, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 1022 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 14


The Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy has decided not to
recommend any change in the law that bars certain classes of aliens, including
Communists and homosexuals, from the United States.

The 16-member commission decided, in effect, to sidestep one of the main
functions it was expected to perform, apparently because the subject was too
controversial. In its final report, to be issued Feb. 27, the commission urges
Congress to re-examine the criteria for excluding aliens, but avoids making
specific proposals on the subject.

Congress, in creating the commission three years ago, had asked for a
comprehensive review of immigration law, together with ''legislative
recommendations to simplify and clarify'' it. The commission has voted to
recommend a general amnesty for illegal aliens now in the United States, a
comprehensive revision of how visas are allocated and stiff penalties for
employers who hire illegal aliens in the future.

At the final meeting of the commission last month, several members characterized
the current list of exclusions as archaic, but said the commission would be
going too far if it urged Congress to ''modernize'' the criteria. ''The less
said, the better,'' Senator Alan K. Simpson, Republican of Wyoming, told his
colleagues on the commission.

Defining Grounds for Exclusion

Allen E. Kaye of New York, president of the Association of Immigration and
Nationality Lawyers, said yesterday he was ''distressed and disappointed'' that
the commission had not said more about the grounds for exclusion. ''It seems
like such a cop-out,'' he said.

William Fliegelman, former chief immigration judge for the Federal Government,
said that commission members ''failed to measure up to their responsibility'' to
help eliminate what he called outmoded, unworkable features of the law
concerning exclusion of aliens.

The existing law explicitly forbids the issuance of visas to 33 classes of
aliens, including those who are mentally retarded or insane; those afflicted
with ''sexual deviation'' or a ''dangerous contagious disease''; paupers,
vagrants, polygamists and prostitutes; aliens who are ''likely at any time to
become public charges,'' and aliens who have been convicted of drug violations,
even minor marijuana offenses.

One section of the law contains a 1,000-word description of the political and
ideological grounds for excluding anarchists, Communists, those ''affiliated
with any organization that advocates the economic, international and
governmental doctrines of world Communism'' and those who publish or circulate
materials advocating the use of force to overthrow the Federal Government.

Popular Support Cited

Despite the exclusions, the United States still takes a larger number of legal
immigrants each year than any other country.  Although none of the commissioners
publicly defended the exclusions, several members said privately that there was
popular support for many of the restrictions and that with a more conservative
mood in Congress, it would be difficult to change this aspect of the law.

The influx of 125,000 Cubans last year, including at least 1,700 criminals, the
demonstrations by Iranian students and growing concern about illegal aliens were
all cited as reasons for what was called a ''restrictionist'' climate in
Congress.

Commission staff members recommended major changes in the law, noting that
respected scholars and artists had been denied visas because of their political
views. Other aliens, according to the staff members, have been excluded because
of medical conditions that pose no threat to public health and because of minor
misconduct in the distant past.

''An alien convicted of stealing a loaf of bread and firewood in Italy during
World War II to keep from starving and freezing is still inadmissible to the
United States,'' said Sam Bernsen, director of legal research for the commission
and former general counsel of the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

In 1979, according to the State Department, consular officers denied more than
600,000 visa applications.

'Anachronistic Remnants'

The American Association for the Advancement of Science, the American
Association of University Professors and the Association of the Bar of the City
of New York urged the commission to recommend repeal of the so-called
ideological exclusions. ''Our reputation for allowing expression free from
unnecessary governmental restraint will continue to be tarnished by these
anachronistic remnants of a fearful era,'' the bar association said.

The Attorney General may grant a waiver to a member of a proscribed political
organization, but there is often a delay, and many aliens dislike the disclosure
requirements concerning political beliefs.

Commission members said they feared that any recommendation to liberalize the
rules against homosexual aliens would overshadow their other proposals.
Representative Romano L. Mazzoli, Democrat of Kentucky, the new chairman of the
House Judiciary Committee panel on immigration, said, ''I can think of nothing
that will more quickly blow this really quality work product out of the water
and breach it forever than to get too deeply into this subject.''

The section of the law barring homosexual aliens has become difficult to
enforce. The Public Health Service, noting changes in the medical view of
homosexuality, will no longer certify aliens as being victims of a mental
disease or defect on the basis of homosexuality. The commission, created by
Congress in 1978, consisted of 16 members headed by the Rev. Theodore M.
Hesburgh, president of the University of Notre Dame. There were four members
from the House, four from the Senate, four Cabinet officers from the Carter
Administration and four members from the public at large.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              199 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 8, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

BRITAIN DEBATES IMMIGRATION AND RACE

BYLINE: By WILLIAM BORDERS, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 3, Column 1; Foreign Desk

LENGTH: 930 words

DATELINE: LONDON, Feb. 7


A Government attempt to resolve the longstanding question of what constitutes
British citizenship has touched off a national debate about immigration and a
growing problem in race relations.

The controversy, which goes to the heart of the people's perception of
themselves, reflects some of the social tensions that have appeared in the last
generation as the country has ceased to be a homogeneous, virtually all-white
society.

It has also prompted new examination of the golden age of the British Empire,
when, as a Member of Parliament scathingly recalled last week in a floor debate
on the legislation, Britons went ''across the world to subjugate the peoples of
India, Africa and the West Indies, to obtain raw materials and to exploit the
labor in those countries.''

It was the Empire and its aftermath that produced the current problem: millions
of people all over the world who consider themselves British in one way or
another.

'The Reality of Today's World'

Timothy Raison, Minister of State in the Home Office in the Conservative Party
Government, stated the official view this way: ''We have got finally to dispose
of the lingering notion that Britain is somehow a haven for all those countries
we once ruled. Our new citizenship law will reflect the reality of today's world
rather than our imperial past.''

The measure, one of the major elements in Prime Minister Margaret Thatcher's
program for the current session of Parliament, would do away with the term
''British subject'' and would limit citizenship to those who have what the
Government describes as ''a close personal connection with the United Kingdom.''

In practice, under the new rules, the privileges of citizenship, notably
including the right to live here, would generally be limited to those here now
and their families. Naturalization would still be possible but would be
restricted. The Government insists that the bill is absolutely color-blind, but
critics regard it as racist since most of the people dealt with under it are
likely to be nonwhite.

The bill, which was introduced last month and is in committee, has attracted the
opposition not only of the Labor and Liberal parties but also of immigrants' and
civil rights organizations and of Roman Catholic, Protestant and Jewish
religious groups.

Recognition of Changed Makeup

One of several basic changes that the church groups have proposed is the
addition of an explicit acknowledgment that the British racial makeup has
changed. The Roman Catholic bishops, in a statement, put it this way: ''Britain
has become irreversibly a multiracial, multicultural society. Any new
nationality law should state as a matter of principle that our national identity
is multiracial, thereby avoiding any potentially racialist conception of
national identity.''

Many Britons are not prepared to agree that this is a multiracial society
despite a nonwhite population of 4 percent nationwide and much more in the
cities. That view was reflected by a number of speakers in the debate in the
House of Commons, which is all white.

John Stokes, a Conservative, said: ''The ordinary Englishman still clings
obstinately to his Englishness and to the old, known ways. He knows only too
well that if immigration continues at the present rate the indigenous population
will in time be supplanted by aliens and British people will gradually disappear
from these islands.''

Immigration from what used to be the Empire was encouraged right after World War
II to fill jobs that were going begging, so nonwhites came in a flood -from
Barbados to run the buses and subways, from Jamaica to work in the hospitals,
from Pakistan to operate the textile plants.

This so-called primary immigration -the admission of breadwinners as opposed to
their dependents - began to be restricted sharply more than a decade ago as the
outlines of the racial problem took shape; now it has all but stopped. But the
nonwhite population continues a steady natural increase, causing additional
tensions.

Bending to Prejudice Deplored

Some opponents of the citizenship bill say that it will only make feelings worse
by increasing the insecurity of the nonwhites already here. ''We seem to sink
lower as we try to accommodate prejudice instead of standing foursquare against
it,'' said a Member of Parliament, Reginald Freeson.

One of the most disputed provisions would take away the automatic grant of
citizenship that every child born in Britain, even a child of foreign parents,
now has. Citizenship would be withheld for at least 10 years if the foreign
mother giving birth was here illegally or temporarily - a tourist or a student,
for example.

The Government maintains that since this section, like the rest of the bill,
does not mention race, it is not discriminatory. Critics reply that in practice
it is nonwhite women from the Commonwealth countries of Africa, Asia and the
Americas who are likely to be giving birth while here in a legal status that is
questionable.

In Parliament last week Sydney Bidwell, mentioning the recent sharp increase in
the number of Asians born in Britain, said: ''Who is afraid of babies? Those
babies belong here. They will be an asset and a credit to Britain, especially if
they have the benefit of the customs of an Asian family unit.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of London bobby

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              200 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 7, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Suit in Florida Challenges U.S. Release of Refugees

BYLINE: Special to The New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 6, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 175 words

DATELINE: MIAMI, Feb. 6


Attorney General Jim Smith of Florida filed suit in Federal District Court here
today contending that the Immigration and Naturalization Service did not follow
its own policies when it classified refugees from Cuba and Haiti as ''entrants
pending status'' and then released them into the community.

About 100,000 Cuban and Haitian refugees have settled in the Miami area since
April 1. The suit, asking the transfer of all Cubans and Haitians now held in
Dade County jails and mental institutions, is aimed at relieving overcrowding in
those facilities, which Miami officials attribute to the improper release of
refugees into the community.

The suit contends that the failure to examine each case individually resulted in
the parole of many aliens who by reason of their criminal records or mental
conditions would be excludable refugees.

Don North, a spokesman for the Florida Attorney General's office, said, ''We say
these people should be taken into Federal custody, which would solve the jail
problems and the problems in the community.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              201 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 7, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

Miami Businessman, Cuba-Born, A Contender for Immigration Job

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 7, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 129 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Feb. 6


A Miami businessman emerged yesterday as a leading candidate for the position of
Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization Service.

Jose Manuel Casanova, 50 years old, who was born in Cuba and came to the United
States in 1960, confirmed that he had discussed the position with officials in
the Reagan Administration, but he declined to give details. White House aides
have been promising that Hispanic Americans would soon be named to several major
posts.

Mr. Casanova, reached at his home, said that he was once president of the
Flagship National Bank of Westland, Fla., and was now president of Agro-Com
Export, which exports food and medicine to Latin America.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              202 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              February 4, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

ILLEGAL ALIENS TERM 2,000 MILES IN LOCKED TRUCK 'HELL'

BYLINE: By PETER KIHSS

SECTION: Section B; Page 4, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 707 words


It was ''like a hell'' on the nonstop 2,000-mile trip for 85 men and women
locked into a truck for nearly three days on a trip from El Paso to New York,
Manuel Roberto Mejia said yesterday. Mr. Mejia, who was one of the people in the
truck, spoke Spanish, using the word ''infierno'' to describe conditions on the
long ride.

At the end, all 85 were rounded up by New York police officers Monday morning
and turned over to Immigration and Naturalization Service officials for hearings
and likely deportation as aliens entering the United States illegally.

Mr. Mejia, a 24-year-old university student majoring in history in the Dominican
Republic for the last two years, and five of his companions agreed to interviews
yesterday while in custody at the immigration processing center at 136 Flushing
Avenue, Brooklyn. They said none of the six could speak English.

''We came to the United States,'' Mr. Mejia said, clad in blue detention
fatigues, ''because the economic situation for Dominicans is too precarious. It
is very difficult.''

Minimum Wage $100 a Month

''It is almost impossible to buy necessities - the minimum wage is 125 pesos a
month,'' he went on. Prospero Ayala said this meant about $100 in American
money.

''Unemployment in the country is too great, calculated that we have one million
persons unemployed in a country so small,'' Mr.  Mejia said. He added that the
Government had just announced that it was going to lay off 30,000 public
employees.

Mr. Ayala, 33, said he was a diesel mechanic and married to an American woman
from Puerto Rico, Jovita Rodriguez Ayala, now in Chicago. Ever since they were
married in Santo Domingo in May 1975, he said he had been trying to get a visa
to come to the United States.

He got to Mexico on his own two months ago, he said, having sold an old car for
$700, and made his way from one place to another - Mexico City, Monterey,
Chihuahua - until he learned of the group heading for New York.

In Washington, the Immigration Service said the quota for the Dominican Republic
allowed a maximum of 20,000 immigrants a year, not counting parents, spouses and
children of United States citizens who also should be able to enter. In 1979, it
reported only 17,519 legal entrants from the island.

Papers Sought Were Unavailable

Mr. Ayala said he was continually asked by the United States consulate for
papers he could not get, for instance, ''a baptismal certificate - my family is
Evangelical.''

Manuel Medina, 28, said he graduated from the University of Santo Domingo with a
master's degree in social work in 1978, but had never been able to get a job in
his profession. He left his daughter, 8, and son, 4, and their mother in Santo
Domingo to come here for ''whatever work I could get.''

Mr. Medina said that visa applicants had to show property, for example, ''an
account of $5,000 on deposit in a bank for one year.'' Mr. Ayala, who comes from
Bani, said he had met a Dominican who said he could arrange for a trip to New
York by way of Mexico for 500 pesos, with $500 or $1,000 more to be paid after
getting jobs, which they would have to find. Usually they borrowed the initial
payment.

Plane Taken to Mexico

The people from the truck said they were flown in a commercial plane to Mexico
City last Wednesday, and taken by bus to ''the desert outside Ciudad Juarez.''
Last Friday, all 85 walked across the border. That night, they were crammed into
a tractor-trailer.

Men and women jammed together. They had food and soda, but no place to dispose
of refuse. They had to relieve themselves in plastic containers.

Two men, Roopnarine Singh, a Guayana native, and Efraine Vega, were held in
$200,000 bail Monday night by United States Magistrate Leonard Bernikow as
having illegally transported the aliens in the United States. Assistant United
States Attorney Robert J. Costello said the penalty of five years and $2,000
fine for each case, if convicted, could confront them each with 425 years in
prison and $175,000 fines.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of aliens

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              203 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 3, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

OFFICE IN BRONX SEIZE 84 PERSONS AS ILLEGAL ALIENS

BYLINE: By PETER KIHSS

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 747 words


Eighty-four suspected illegal aliens, many of them crowded into a
tractor-trailer truck, were seized in the South Bronx yesterday after shots were
fired without warning at two police officers responding to a report that
''suspicious persons'' were getting out of the truck.

Fifty-one of those arrested, including 14 women, were still in the truck, in
which all 84 had allegedly traveled for nearly three days.  Henry S. Dogin,
district director of the Immigration and Naturalization Service, said two men -
identified as Roopnarine Singh, a resident alien from Guyana, and Efrain Vega, a
United States citizen from Puerto Rico - were arrested on charges of unlawful
transportation of illegal aliens in the United States.

Said to Be From Mexico

Mr. Dogin said the 83 Dominicans and one Guatemalan seized in the roundup were
reported to have entered El Paso from Mexico late last Friday or early Saturday
and to have packed into the trailer for the trip to New York.

It was 6:30 A.M. yesterday when two police radio cars were directed to check a
report that seven ''suspicious persons'' were getting out of a trailer.

Officers James McCormack and Frank Califano of the Alexander Avenue station
found a trailer at East 156th Street and Cauldwell Avenue, in the Melrose
section of the Bronx, that was parked outside an egg factory on legitimate
business.

Another Truck Is Halted

Officer Califano then spotted another trailer truck down Cauldwell Avenue and
closer to Westchester Avenue. The two officers halted the vehicle as it started
to leave. Officer McCormack said the driver asserted that he had lettuce from
California in the trailer that he was taking to the Hunts Point Market.

Asked to open the truck, the driver said his brother had the keys, and pointed
toward a fourth-floor apartment at 647 Cauldwell Avenue.  The officers started
upstairs and got to the third floor.

''A female, about 35, saw us, and ran into an apartment and slammed the door,''
Officer McCormack said. ''Then shots came from the fourth floor, five of them,
five holes in the wall.''

''Me and Frank,'' he said, ''ran downstairs to get ourselves together. The
driver ran up to the fourth floor.'' About 20 officers responded to a radio call
for reinforcements.  Officers McCormack and Califano, who had both been wearing
their bulletproof vests, went up to the fourth floor.

23 People in One Apartment

''A lady opened the door,'' Officer McCormack said. ''We couldn't see anybody
inside. 'Mind if we take a look?' we asked. The bedroom was jammed. People were
sitting on the floor and in chairs. There were seven in the bedroom, a total of
23 people in the apartment.''

One was the driver, he said.  In a second-floor apartment, the police found 11
more persons.  There were six women among the group in the apartments, Mr. Dogin
of the Immigration Service said.

Officer McCormack said a search found more than $10,000 in cash hidden in the
fourth-floor gas oven-broiler, with the money in denominations of $50 and $100.
He said there was a report that a driver could ''clear $500'' for each person
transported in such an operation.

According to the office of District Attorney Mario Merola of the Bronx,
investigators found a .25-caliber automatic revolver in a closet in the
fourth-floor apartment but could not immediately determine who was the owner of
the weapon or whether it had been fired.

51 Found Huddled in Trailer

Members of the police emergency service unit cut the padlocks on the
tractor-trailer and found 51 people huddled inside. Officer McCormack said that
apparently seven persons at a time were unloaded into the apartment building.

An assistant United States attorney, Robert J. Costello, who ordered the arrest
of Mr. Singh and Mr. Vega as drivers of the tractor-trailer, said the interior
of the vehicle was filthy and pockmarked with foodstuffs and garbage.

The aliens were to be held at the immigration detention center at the former
Brooklyn Navy Yard, pending a hearing before a Federal immigration judge.

Mr. Dogin said the roundup was believed to be ''the largest seizure in smuggling
in the New York district, certainly in the last seven years.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              204 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               February 1, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

IRVING S.K. CHIN, 50; SERVED RIGHTS UNIT

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 32, Column 3; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 288 words


Irving Sheu Kee Chin, a lawyer, Chinatown civic leader and the first person of
Chinese descent to serve on New York City's Human Rights Commission, died Friday
at the age of 50 of a heart attack.

Mr. Chin was appointed to the commission in 1971 by Mayor John V.  Lindsay at a
time when the city's Oriental community was encountering special problems,
particularly in housing and employment, because of the influx of refugees
following the relaxing of Chinese immigration quotas. At Mr. Chin's swearing in,
Eleanor Holmes Norton, then the commission chairman, characterized the Oriental
community as ''longneglected.''

During his three years of service on the commission, Mr. Chin pushed for medical
clinics for the elderly, special English instruction for refugees, better
housing, greater police protection and employment.

Sought Civil Court Post

He also was education chairman of the Chinatown Advisory Council, president of
the New York Chinatown Foundation, a community service center, and legal counsel
to the Chinatown Planning Council.

In 1973, he was narrowly defeated for the Democratic nomination for a Civil
Court judgeship on the West Side. He was affiliated with several Wall Street law
firms, but in his last years he had his own practice.

Mr. Chin, who was born in Chicago on Nov. 27, 1930, served in the Air Force in
1953. He was a graduate of Yale College and Harvard Law School.

Mr. Chin, who was single, is survived by his mother, Lay Shee of New York City;
three brothers, Wesley Chin of Los Angeles, Raymond Chin of Boston and Eugene
Chin of Chicago; and by a sister, Ruby Chin of New York City.

Services will be held tomorrow at 7 P.M. at the Cheung Sang Funeral Home, 22
Mulberry Street.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: Photo of Irving S.K. Chin

TYPE: obituary

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              205 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 31, 1981, Saturday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. MOVES TO EXPEL GROUP OF HAITIANS

BYLINE: By ROBERT PEAR, Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section 1; Page 8, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 561 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 30


The Immigration and Naturalization Service moved today to expel 3,900 Haitians
who have entered the United States since Oct. 11 last year.

David W. Crosland, Acting Commissioner of the immigration service, sent
telegrams to all agency field offices instructing district directors to begin
proceedings against ''those Haitians who were encountered on or after Oct. 11,
1980, in the Miami district.''

Mr. Crosland said in an interview that he had not discussed his order in advance
with the new Attorney General, William French Smith, or with other Reagan
Administration officials. The ''exclusion hearings,'' he said, will be the first
such hearings held for Haitians since 1976, when proceedings were halted because
of a judge's order.

Mr. Crosland said that the United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit,
in a decision last December, had removed legal barriers to resumption of the
hearings.

Aliens ordered to leave the country have extensive rights of appeal, and Mr.
Crosland said that he expected the Haitians to try to delay the proceedings that
he ordered. Mr. Crosland, who used to be a civil rights lawyer, denied that
there was any racial motivation for his order.

Policy Set Last Year

Mr. Crosland's order carries out a policy foreshadowed by the Carter
Administration last June. Under that policy, Cubans and Haitians who had arrived
in the United States from April 21 to June 19 were allowed to stay here with a
special legal status.

Victor H. Palmieri, President Carter's Coordinator for Refugee Affairs, said at
the time, ''New arrivals after the June 19 cutoff date can rest assured that
they will have to pass the strict test of asylum on a case-by-case basis.''

Mr. Carter extended the cutoff date to Oct. 10, and Congress voted to provide
special educational and other benefits for Haitians and Cubans arriving before
that date.

In Miami, Haitian refugees criticized Mr. Crosland's order today as a
continuation of a ''discriminatory'' policy adopted by the Carter
Administration. They noted that the directive referred to Haitians, but not to
Cubans, Nicarguans, Salvadorans or others seeking asylum in the United States.
The Haitians also voiced a suspicion, as they have in the past, that they had
been singled out for harsh treatment because they are black.

Janet R. Graham, a spokesman for the immigration service, said that only about
30 Cubans had arrived illegally since Oct. 10.  The Rev. Gerard Jean-Juste, who
operates a center for Haitian refugees in south Florida, said that instead of
trying to expel those already here, the Reagan Administration ''should focus its
attention on the political conditions which cause Haitians to flee their
homeland, the repression of the Duvalier regime.'' Only the elimination of those
conditions, he said, can stem the flow of refugees from Haiti.

The Haitians will be able to press their claims for asylum in the hearings to be
held before immigration judges. Under the law, asylum may be granted to a person
who has a ''well-founded fear of persecution'' upon return to his homeland.

The Carter Administration maintained that most of the Haitians here had left
their impoverished Caribbean homeland for economic rather than political reasons
and therefore did not meet the legal test for asylum. The Reagan Administration
has not announced any change in that policy.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              206 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 30, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

U.S. Keeping Curbs;
on Iranians, Acting Chief of Immigration Says

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 151 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 29


David Crosland, Acting Commissioner of the Immigration and Naturalization
Service, said today that restrictions on Iranian nationals would remain in
effect until the Reagan Administration decided to change them.

A spokesman for the service said that about 4,000 Iranian students had not
complied with a Presidential order, issued in response to the seizing of
American hostages in Iran, to report to immigration officials. He said 53,654
Iranian students had been found to be in the country legally, 743 had left the
country and 2,800 Iranians, including nonstudents, had asked for asylum.

''No one is forced to leave while their asylum application is pending,'' the
spokesman said.  In April, President Carter barred the entry of Iranians except
for humanitarian reasons and few have entered the country since then.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              207 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 25, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

Antiques;
THE ANCIENT GLASS TREASURES OF ISRAEL

BYLINE: By Rita Reif

SECTION: Section 2; Page 29, Column 1; Arts and Leisure Desk

LENGTH: 1014 words


Two of the finest ancient glass collections formed in this century are found not
far from where much of the glass originated - at the Israel Museum in Jerusalem
and at the Museum Haaretz, in Ramat-Aviv outside of Tel Aviv. Both were formed
by men who became connoisseurs and deeply interested in the evolution of the
material in antiquity.

The nucleus of the collection at the Israel Museum was acquired by Eliyahu
Dobkin, after the Russian-born Israeli had emigrated to Palestine in 1932. From
the late 1930's through the late 1950's he served in and then headed the
department of Immigration of the Jewish Agency, an organization that promotes
immigration to Israel. He later became involved internationally in fund raising
for Israeli causes.

Although Mr. Dobkin traveled extensively, he bought most of his glass in Israel.
When he began collecting 50 years ago, the interest in ancient glass was not
nearly as widespread as it became in the 1970's. Many of the greatest
collections in today's museums were being formed then by men who were attracted
to these antiquities because of an interest in the esthetics of glass. Mr.
Dobkin claimed he was not. Rather, he used to say, he became involved because
the craft was native to the area he had chosen as his home - the land now called
Israel. And he frequently stressed that glassmaking was always ''an outstanding
achievement of Jewish artisans.''

Indeed, most emanantes from Eretz Israel, the term by which Jews referred to the
land now known as Israel. References to Jewish glassmakers are found in the
Talmud. It was known that glassmakers flourished in Jewish Jerusalem and around
Tyre around 70 A.D. as well as in the 14th century (A.D.) in Beit Shearim. Jews
were also prominent in introducing the craft in Europe, assisting in its
development in Venice. According to a spokesman for the Israel Museum, Mr.
Dobkin liked to remind those viewing his collection that it was a 19th-century
Jew returning from Venice who started the glass industry in Arab Hebron,
bringing the craft full circle.

Several years before his death in 1976, Mr. Dobkin gave his collection of about
700 objects to the Israel Museum. Now most of his treasures - about 80 percent
of the museum's 1,000 pieces -are on view in an impressive two-year-old glass
pavilion, the gift of Joseph and Rebecca Meyerhoff of Baltimore. The selection
also includes glass objects from the collection of Teddy Kollek, the Mayor of
Jerusalem and board chairman of the museum. And it will soon grow again with the
addition in August of 300 additional glass objects assembled over the last 25
years by Hans Cohn, a Los Angeles investment banker, in his travels to Egypt,
Iran, Switzerland, England, Germany, and the United States. Mr. Cohn's
collection will be on permanent loan to the museum.

All of the museum's glass objects are being documented by Yael Israeli, the
curator and an outstanding scholar in the field, in a definitive catalogue that
will be published later this year. No book will, however, suffice in getting to
know this splendid collection, which is arranged in open displays and lighted to
dramatize the primitive shapes, the fragility of the material, the extraordinary
patterns created by molds or extravagant plays of color.

At the Museum Haaretz, the same level of excellence is evident in the collection
of the late Walter Moses, a German-born Israeli cigarette manufacturer. But the
design of the displays is dramatically different. Mr. Moses assembled a few
thousand examples of ancient glass from the early 1930's until his death in
Israel in 1955. The collection then became the basis for the Museum Haaretz
collection, a glass museum which opened in 1959. The comprehensive assemblage
includes excellent historic examples and an abundance of superb pieces, all of
which are arranged in vitrines and small show cases to teach viewers about both
the history and techniques of glassmaking. It is an intimate, highly satisfying
experience perusing these displays.

Great care has been taken to explain what glass is and how it was crafted down
through the ages. Visitors see, for example, how the earliest glass vessels were
made by the ancient Phoenicians who probably took coils of molten glass and
swung them around a core of pottery or other material which was was broken and
removed after the glass had first become viscous and then congealed into a hard
solid.  Such glass objects are, more often than not, small, opaque vessels
devised as imitations of alabaster, jasper, agate and other semiprecious stones,
and made mostly for holding perfumes and ointments.

Each of the museums' assemblages have examples dating to the 14th century B.C.
in Mesopotamia, where glass was first produced, through the Islamic period of
the 14th century A.D. Rare though these objects are, they are far less magical
than the mass-produced examples of blown Roman glass which are frequently rich
in iridescence, primitive in their shaping and alive with textures.

Although glass antiquities sell in shops and at auction today for hundreds, or
many thousands of dollars, most works were available at modest prices of less
than $100 when these collections were formed.  This is especially true of the
Roman period, when blowing turned glass into a mass produced commodity. The
period - from the first century B.C. to the second century A.D. - also inspired
the artisans to invent new shapes, colors and textures in glass, many of which
cannot be repeated today. One example, a Roman glass cage-cup, commanded the
highest price ever for an antiquity when it was sold at Sotheby Parke Bernet in
London in 1979 for $1,081,600. The bowl-like glass vessel is framed at the base
with an intricate interlacing of glass threads that defies technical
explanation.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of vase

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              208 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 23, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Border Patrol Aide Hails U.S. Supreme Court Ruling

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 140 words

DATELINE: McALLEN, Tex., Jan. 22


An official of the Border Patrol has said that a ruling by the United States
Supreme Court could effectively restore the patrol's authority to stop vehicles
in border areas and search for illegal aliens.

James Selbe, Border Patrol deputy chief in the McAllen district, said yesterday,
''This decision does seem to put us back to operating under the statutes of the
Immigration Nationality Act.''

In the Supreme Court decision yesterday, Chief Justice Warren E.  Burger held
that the test was not whether there was ''probable cause to conclude the vehicle
they stopped would contain a group of illegal aliens.''

''Rather,'' he wrote, ''the question is whether, based on the whole picture,
they as experienced Border Patrol agents, could reasonably surmise that the
particular vehicle they stopped was engaged in criminal activity.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              209 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 23, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Marcello Deportation Order Is Upheld by Appeals Court

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 14, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 218 words

DATELINE: NEW ORLEANS, Jan. 22


A Federal appeals court today upheld an order to deport a reputed organized
crime chief, Carlos Marcello of New Orleans, an effort that began almost 30
years ago.

The United States Court of Appeals for the Fifth Circuit reversed a ruling by
Federal District Judge Jack Gordon of New Orleans, who had blocked a deportation
order upheld by the Board of Immigration Appeals.

''It means that Marcello's latest attempt to avoid deportation has been
unsuccessful,'' said John Volz, a United States Attorney. ''The deportation
order, arguably, is now back in effect.''

In refusing Mr. Marcello's 1972 application for suspension of the deportation
order, the Board of Immigration Appeals said the reason was that he ''lacked
good moral character.''

The board's refusal to suspend the deportation order was appealed to Judge
Gordon in 1979. He vacated the board's ruling and sent the case back for a
reassessment of Mr. Marcello's character.

Judge Gordon said he felt the board had relied on ''rumor and innuendo'' instead
of reading more than 30 sworn affidavits obtained from Louisiana residents
saying that Mr. Marcello is a fine man.

But the appeals court said, ''We are unable to adopt these objections to the
board's order.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              210 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 22, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Border Patrol's Searches For Aliens Are Resuming

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 148 words

DATELINE: SAN DIEGO, Jan. 21


Almost a year after the United States Border Patrol was ordered to stop its
searches of camps for alien farm workers because the searches might complicate
the 1980 census, two-man teams are again searching for illegal aliens.

The ban, imposed by the Immigration and Naturalization Service last March, was
lifted last week by the Attorney General's office. In the fiscal year 1980,
which ended Sept. 30, the number of aliens apprehended in the Chula Vista
sector, including San Diego County and parts of Riverside and Orange Counties,
was down by 50,000. In three days this week, 203 illegal aliens were found on
ranches and farms.

Unsanitary conditions in the aliens' camps were disclosed before the searches
were stopped. Federal officials said they feared that undocumented aliens might
be counted in the census more than once.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              211 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 21, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

52 WHO BECAME A NATIONAL SYMBOL;
Thomas Leo Ahern Jr. ... 48 years old, of Falls Church, Va. ... listed as
narcotics control coordinator on embassy staff ... one of the Americans accused
by Iranian militants of being a spy ... on Dec. 6, 1979, militants displayed
documents, including a forged Belgian passport, a set of instructions detailing
the cover to be used, and a set of immigration stamps, all allegedly his ... 20
years with State Department ...  arrived in Teheran in May 1979 ... journalism
degree from University of Notre Dame, 1954 ... Army Counter-Intelligence Corps,
1954-60 ...  security officer in Laos embassy in 1960's ... wife, Gisela, is
active in organization of hostages' relatives, Family Liaison Action Group ...
13-year-old daughter.;
Clair Cortland Barnes ... age unknown ... of Falls Church, Va. ... one of nine
hostages not seen in the Christmas 1980 film or photos released by Iran ...

SECTION: Section A; Page 6, Column 1; National Desk

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 11 Photos of the American hostages

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              212 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 21, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

Vesco May Stay in the Bahamas

SECTION: Section A; Page 12, Column 4; National Desk

LENGTH: 102 words


As Cabinet Reviews His Appeal1.3-

NASSAU, the Bahamas, Jan. 20 (UPI) - Robert L. Vesco, the fugitive financier who
was under an order to leave the Bahamas today, will be allowed to remain until
the Cabinet acts on his appeal, a Government spokesman said.

''So far as I know there is nothing in the Immigration Act that specifies the
length of time the Cabinet has to act on an appeal,'' Bill Kalis, a spokesman
for the Bahamas News Bureau, said. ''Until the Cabinet acts on that appeal, he
will be permitted to stay past the expiration date.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              213 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 19, 1981, Monday, Late City Final Edition

'A TINGE OF ELITISM'

SECTION: Section A; Page 24, Column 6; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 179 words


To the Editor:

Do I read correctly that Edith T. Shapiro sees as ''crucial ... the need to
change current labor, immigration and social policy'' in order to provide
''nurses and housekeepers'' for the current crop of bright young working
mothers? (''Tomorrow's Career Women at a Crossroads,'' letter Jan. 10.)

This crass suggestion carries with it more than a tinge of suburban elitism. Dr.
Shapiro speaks of the ''legitimate aspiration'' of women who would combine
motherhood with a career and suggests that their problems be partially addressed
by what sounds to me very much like a system of indentured servitude.

I am compelled to wonder if the safely professionalized woman who wrote that
letter gave a moment's thought to the equally legitimate aspirations of the
women she would import and legislate into acolytes for her clever younger
sisters.

MICHAEL MCGILL, New Rochelle, N.Y., Jan. 12, 1981

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: letter

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              214 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 15, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION

BYLINE: United Press International

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 6; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 29 words


In The Times of Jan. 7 on proposals by a special commission on immigration
policy included incorrect information. A clarifying article appears on page B9.
wore a parka

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: correction

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              215 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 15, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Immigration Unit Backs New Identification Form

BYLINE: Special to the New York Times

SECTION: Section B; Page 9, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 238 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 14


By a narrow margin, the Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy has
voted in favor of recommending some new and more secure method of identification
for citizens and legal aliens, together with penalties for employers hiring
illegal aliens.

The commission, a 16-member advisory panel created by Congress in 1978, will
issue its final report in early March. The vote for a new form of identification
was 8 to 7, with one abstention. The commission did not say whether it supported
cards, a computerized data bank or some other means of verifying identities.

A dispatch by United Press International, published in The New York Times on
Jan. 7, said the select commission had rejected any form of identification
cards. According to U.P.I., the dispatch was based on incorrect information
provided by a spokesman for the panel.

The votes were taken Dec. 6 at a meeting from which the public was excluded. The
initial vote, as reported by commission officials, was 7 to 5 against a new
means of identification. However, three members absent from the meeting later
recorded their votes in favor of a new, more secure method of identification,
making the final tally 8 to 7.

By a vote of 14 to 2, the commission decided to recommend sanctions against
employers who knowingly hire illegal aliens. The House of Representatives has
twice passed legislation to establish such sanctions, but the bills died in the
Senate.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              216 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 13, 1981, Tuesday, Late City Final Edition

N.A.A.C.P. TO ASK REAGAN TO CALL PARLEY ON THE PLIGHT OF MINORITIES

BYLINE: By SHEILA RULE

SECTION: Section B; Page 6, Column 5; National Desk

LENGTH: 483 words


The board of the National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
plans to ask President-elect Ronald Reagan this week to convene a conference in
the first 100 days of his administration to address the economic plight of
minorities.

The recommendation was one of a series in the draft of a policy statement that
was debated by the association's national board as it ended its annual meeting
here yesterday.

The draft statement also called on the Reagan administration to strengthen
enforcement of affirmative action programs and civil rights laws, extend the
Voting Rights Act, remove allegedly racially biased restrictions in immigration
laws, implement a youth jobs training program, increase the real level of
current financing under the Comprehensive Employment Training Act, establish job
programs to encourage private-sector involvement in blighted inner-city
neighborhoods and discontinue all aid to South Africa.

Further Action Planned

Each of the recommendations is expected to be completed and voted on in the next
90 days for forwarding to the Reagan administration.  The N.A.A.C.P., the
largest and oldest civil rights organization in the country, says the document
represents the first ''definitive policy document'' for improving the economic
condition of blacks that has been presented to an incoming administration by a
major civil rights group.

At a news conference yesterday, Benjamin L. Hooks, executive director of the
organization, pledged the N.A.A.C.P.'s cooperation with the Reagan
administration in any efforts that coincided with the association's philosophy
of reducing inflation and unemployment.

Mr. Hooks said Mr. Reagan had assured black leaders that he supported their
basic goals of equality but that the President-elect ''disagrees with us on
nearly every approach'' to implement those goals. For example, Mr. Hooks said,
his organization disagreed with Mr. Reagan's support of increased power for
states over programs affecting welfare and a lower minimum wage for youth.

Approach Called 'Fruitless'

''I will not and do not question the sincerity of his adherence to our goals,''
Mr. Hooks said, adding, however, that he believed Mr.  Reagan's approaches would
be ''fruitless.''

Mr. Hooks said that he believed that the ''climate of fear'' in the black
community that grew out of the election of Mr. Reagan was ''out of proportion to
reality'' and that the nomination of a black member to his Cabinet and his
meeting with black leaders, among other things, had helped to alleviate that
fear. But Mr. Hooks said that he believed blacks would have ''grave
difficulties'' with Mr. Reagan and that, if the incoming administration was not
responsive to minorities, blacks would use their voting power to change
conditions.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              217 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 11, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION IN SUMMARY;
Identifying the Problem Is Easy

BYLINE: By Caroline Rand Herron and Michael Wright

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 193 words


A Federal commission on immigration policy, like the Democratic President that
appointed it, is finishing up appointed rounds. Among them is deciding whether
to recommend that Americans adopt a timehonored European custom, and carry
cartes d'identite.

As it has been all along, the 16-member Select Commission on Immigration and
Refugee Policy is closely divided on the issue.  Last week, the panel voted, 8
to 6, with one abstention, in favor of a new, more secure method of
identification for citizens and legal aliens - and again, as it did last month,
for civil and criminal penalities for employers who hire illegal aliens. Whether
a new system implies the ''counterfeit-resistant worker I.D. card'' the Rev.
Theodore M. Hesburgh, chairman of the panel, has been pushing is not clear. It
could also imply a national computer identification system, such as that
credit-card companies use.

Neither is likely to meet civil libertarians' fears of potential Government
abuse. Such arguments led to a tentative vote against cards last month.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              218 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 11, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

To Turn the Illegal Tide

SECTION: Section 4; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 601 words


At last, the country seems to be getting somewhere in the tormenting effort to
reduce illegal immigration.

To some people, the numbers are so alarming they are ready to close the Golden
Door with a slam. Others, for whom immigration means infusions of energy, resist
closing it at all, even to illegal migrants. Still others, and we count
ourselves among them, advocate keeping the Golden Door open - while shutting the
back door.

Whatever one's view, the debate so far has been sterile. How can one seriously
argue whether to increase legal immigration by 80,000 or 250,000 when maybe 6
million illegal aliens are already here and thousands more are coming daily?
There can be no sensible policy without the means to enforce it.

The good news is that last week, after 19 months of work, a blueribbon Federal
commission took two final votes that, taken together, will vitalize the debate.
If Congress goes along, a humane and consistent immigration policy will not be
far behind.

In the first, more important decision, the Select Commission on Immigration
voted 14 to 2 for something called employer sanctions.  It was, in simpler
language, a resounding vote against hypocrisy.

At present, the United States says to the Immigration Service: patrol the
border, conduct sweeping raids - keep the illegals out.  But the message to
employers is a big wink: even if we catch illegals working for you, they're
culpable, not you. So the economic magnet continues to draw thousands. The
Border Patrol, understaffed by budget-cutters and undermined by employers, is
dispirited, and small wonder. If Congress now in fact makes employers culpable
for hiring illegal aliens, that alone would be a strong deterrent.

The second commission vote, concerning the emotional question of identification,
was disappointing.  Employers cannot be held accountable if they can't readily
tell which aliens are illegal. Since forged papers are cheap, the answer is some
form of secure identification. One proposal is to require job applicants to
identify themselves with several pieces of I.D. and to swear that they are legal
residents. Another idea is a call-in data bank, permitting employers to check an
applicant's truthfulness, the way retail clerks verify credit-card purchases.

The most effective method would probably be forgery-proof Social Security cards.
That arouses fears of internal passports and police statism. But all workers
must now supply their number when they start a job, or a bank account; it's hard
to see what freedom is at issue, beyond the freedom to give a false number.

Which method did the commission choose? None; it ducked. By the narrowest
imaginable vote, 8 to 7 with one pass, it voted for some kind of more secure
identification without specifying. Commissions are meant to lead opinion and
absorb criticism. That hair-thin vote is not likely to inspire Congressional
courage.

Two things have been missing from the debate.  First, technical information; for
years, people in Congress have been saying, yessir, we need to clean up the
immigration mess, but it's complicated and needs further study. The Select
Commission has provided that study and nullified that excuse. What has been
missing, second, is the will to enforce sound immigration rules once they're in
place. The commission has expressed that will. The rest is up to Congress.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              219 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 11, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

To Turn the Illegal Tide

SECTION: Section 4; Page 22, Column 1; Editorial Desk

LENGTH: 601 words


At last, the country seems to be getting somewhere in the tormenting effort to
reduce illegal immigration.

To some people, the numbers are so alarming they are ready to close the Golden
Door with a slam. Others, for whom immigration means infusions of energy, resist
closing it at all, even to illegal migrants. Still others, and we count
ourselves among them, advocate keeping the Golden Door open - while shutting the
back door.

Whatever one's view, the debate so far has been sterile. How can one seriously
argue whether to increase legal immigration by 80,000 or 250,000 when maybe 6
million illegal aliens are already here and thousands more are coming daily?
There can be no sensible policy without the means to enforce it.

The good news is that last week, after 19 months of work, a blueribbon Federal
commission took two final votes that, taken together, will vitalize the debate.
If Congress goes along, a humane and consistent immigration policy will not be
far behind.

In the first, more important decision, the Select Commission on Immigration
voted 14 to 2 for something called employer sanctions.  It was, in simpler
language, a resounding vote against hypocrisy.

At present, the United States says to the Immigration Service: patrol the
border, conduct sweeping raids - keep the illegals out.  But the message to
employers is a big wink: even if we catch illegals working for you, they're
culpable, not you. So the economic magnet continues to draw thousands. The
Border Patrol, understaffed by budget-cutters and undermined by employers, is
dispirited, and small wonder. If Congress now in fact makes employers culpable
for hiring illegal aliens, that alone would be a strong deterrent.

The second commission vote, concerning the emotional question of identification,
was disappointing.  Employers cannot be held accountable if they can't readily
tell which aliens are illegal. Since forged papers are cheap, the answer is some
form of secure identification. One proposal is to require job applicants to
identify themselves with several pieces of I.D. and to swear that they are legal
residents. Another idea is a call-in data bank, permitting employers to check an
applicant's truthfulness, the way retail clerks verify credit-card purchases.

The most effective method would probably be forgery-proof Social Security cards.
That arouses fears of internal passports and police statism. But all workers
must now supply their number when they start a job, or a bank account; it's hard
to see what freedom is at issue, beyond the freedom to give a false number.

Which method did the commission choose? None; it ducked. By the narrowest
imaginable vote, 8 to 7 with one pass, it voted for some kind of more secure
identification without specifying. Commissions are meant to lead opinion and
absorb criticism. That hair-thin vote is not likely to inspire Congressional
courage.

Two things have been missing from the debate.  First, technical information; for
years, people in Congress have been saying, yessir, we need to clean up the
immigration mess, but it's complicated and needs further study. The Select
Commission has provided that study and nullified that excuse. What has been
missing, second, is the will to enforce sound immigration rules once they're in
place. The commission has expressed that will. The rest is up to Congress.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

TYPE: editorial

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              220 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 9, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

IMMIGRATION OFFICIAL SAYS CARTER'S BUDGET WILL CUT AGENCY STAFF

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section A; Page 13, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 300 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 8


David Crosland, the Acting Immigration Commissioner, said today that President
Carter was planning to propose significant manpower cuts for the Immigration and
Naturalization Service at a time when ''everyone would agree we have more of a
problem'' with illegal aliens.

At a breakfast meeting with reporters, Mr. Crosland said that the budget for the
fiscal year 1982, which Mr. Carter will submit to Congress next week, would
contain noticeable reductions in manpower and would cut total appropriations
below the agency's 1980 level.

A spokesman for the service, Vern Jervis, later corrected Mr.  Crosland to say
Mr. Carter's actual dollar request would be slightly higher than the $380.7
million sought for the fiscal year 1981, which began last Oct. 1.

However, because of inflation, the dollar increase will result in a reduction of
the service's staff below the 10,886 employees it had in the last year.

Request Is Cut Back

''We asked for more than we got and we got less than we have,'' said Mr.
Crosland, who was sharply critical of the Office of Management and Budget for
cutting back his request for additional investigators to track down illegal
aliens. Mr. Crosland said that the immigration service had under 900 domestic
investigators, fewer than it had 22 years ago, and would lose a significant
number under the proposed budget. This will mean more and longer delays in
immigration inspections at ports of entry, he said.

The administration of President-elect Ronald Reagan will send Congress a
proposed revision of the Carter budget plan. Mr.  Crosland's comments were seen
as an effort to make sure his service got better treatment from the new
administration.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              221 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 9, 1981, Friday, Late City Final Edition

Index;
International

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 1132 words


France acts to counter Libyan move into Chad A2
Poland charts a program of wide economic reforms A3
Polish Communist paper assails ''anarchial'' labor agitation A3
Soviet Communist paper attacks a leading Polish dissident A3
Around the World A5
Namibia conferees clash, then get down to business A6
Japanese pleased that Mansfield will remain as Ambassador A7
Key members of Begin coalition talk of early elections in Israel A9

Government/Politics
Immigration official complains of budget cut A13
14 more judges to handle criminal cases in New York City B1
Ravitch hails Carey's program for mass transit improvements B4

Energy
Federal regulation pending on nu- clear shipment routes B2

General
Around the Nation A10
People in the Sunbelt take rosy fu- ture calmly A10
Search shifts for suspect in Idaho deaths A10
Mixup blamed for release of de- fendant accused in boy's death B1
Witness says Mrs. Harris seemed depressed on day of slaying B2
Defense wins right to examine sketch in Met murder case B3
Families seek warmth in armory B3
Garwood linked to four mental disorders D14

PARKING REGULATIONS
Because of expected bad weather, al- ternate-side parking regulations are
suspended throughout New York City today.

Weekend
Weekender Guide C1
Theater: New York stage brushes up its classics C1

Broadway C2

''Pirates of Penzance'' opens on Broadway C3

''The Admirable Crichton'' at Long Wharf C5

BAM Company opens with ''Midsummer Night's Dream'' C13
Screen: New West German films at Modern Museum C6

At the Movies C6

''The Case Against Ferro'' on bill at Thalia C6
Music: Chamber groups filling halls C1

The Pop Life C7

An evening with ''Annie'' lyri- cist at the Y C9

Gregg Smith Singers at St.  Peter's C12

Andre Watts-James VanDe- mark duo at Tully Hall C16
Art: Korean art at Met Museum C15

Views of children at the Modern C17

Postcard views by Phillip Pearlstein at gallery C19
Books: Publishing C20

''A Little Order'' by Evelyn Waugh reviewed C20

Education/Welfare
Judge who defied court over inte- gration becomes a hero A10

Style
The George Bushes are in town for a private party B5
Singles group owes its strength to a good cause B5
U.S. issues menus to go with its dietary guidelines B5

Obituaries
Alvar Lidell, the voice of BBC dur- ing the war B6
Lawrence P. Neal, a poet, critic and playwright B6

Sports
Phil Esposito to play his final hockey game tonight A15
Austin and Navratilova gain semi- finals in Colgate tennis A15
B3
Dennis Johnson, former Sonic, is thriving with Suns A15
Knicks lose to Pacers in overtime, 116-115 A15
Red Smith on two budding free agents from Boston A16
Unbeaten Connecticut five defeats Holy Cross, 66-57 A17
Esposito felt loss of prowess A18
Cowboys, Chargers appear to have edge in title games A18
Indoor track suffers from eco- nomic crunch A18

News Analysis
Hedrick Smith discusses speed of Reagan transition A1
Drew Middleton on Soviet mili- tary intentions against Poland A4

Editorials/Letters/Op-Ed
Editorials A22

Courage and the economy Staring at Connecticut's deficit Robert Kleiman: El
Salvador Letters A22
Tom Wicker: an inquiry into the new 'missile gap' A23
Flora Lewis: Reagan's oppor- tunity for action on Namibia A23
Edward J. Markey: decontrol of oil is not an alternative A23
J. Lawrence Matthews: the Debentures' annual report A23

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              222 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 8, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

SCHEDULED AIR SERVICE FROM CHINA TO U.S. RESUMES

BYLINE: By WALLACE TURNER

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 689 words

DATELINE: SAN FRANCISCO, Jan. 7


Scheduled passenger airline service between China and the United States was
restored today after a 32-year hiatus when a Boeing 747 with 139 Chinese
passengers arrived exactly on time at San Francisco International Airport.

Mayor Dianne Feinstein and Consul General Hu Ding-yi held a ribboncutting
ceremony, which included a cake, decorated with ''CAAC Welcome to San
Francisco,'' and two bottles of champagne.  Meanwhile, the passengers on the
flight, which arrived at 10 A.M., were steered around the welcoming committee
directly to the customs and immigration clearance areas. Mayor Feinstein
described the landing as ''an historic and exciting occasion.'' Consul General
Hu said he was ''delighted and excited'' and predicted more travel between China
and the United States.

New York Is Next Stop

Two hours later the plane, with 85 passengers and a crew of 23, left for Kennedy
International Airport in New York, where it landed at 7:55 P.M.  The 747, one of
three purchased last fall by the Civil Aviation Administration of China, the
country's official airline, is scheduled to leave at 10 A.M. tomorrow for San
Francisco, Shanghai and Peking.

On April 4 the Chinese airline will add another flight, which will stop here,
and on April 6 will add a flight that skips Shanghai, stops in Tokyo and
continues nonstop to New York.

In the meantime, Pan American World Airways, selected by the United States
Government to operate the American flights that are authorized under the
agreement on aviation rights, will begin flights to China Jan. 28. The first Pan
Am flights will go from New York to Tokyo and Peking. On Jan. 31 Pan Am will
begin a flight from San Francisco to Tokyo, Shanghai and Peking, and on April 26
will add a final flight, which will also originate here.

The first scheduled flights from the United States to China were begun in 1935
by Pan American. The service ended when the Communists took control of the
Chinese government in 1949.

Pan Am provided dockage and ground services for today's flight from China, and
will be provided reciprocal services on its own flights to China, a spokesman
for the American airline said.

Until today there had been no scheduled air service originating from China. But
since the reopening of relations between the United States and China began in
1972 the Chinese government has been improving its air services. In 1973-4 the
Chinese were delivered 10 Boeing 707's and has used them on routes in Asia and
to Europe.

Last fall, Boeing Airplane Company, based in Seattle, sold China three
long-range 747 aircraft, each with 331 seats and a range of 5,900 statute miles.
Today's flight was the first of those planes to come nonstop from Shanghai.

The resumption of scheduled air service was an addition to the growing traffic
between West Coast cities and China, which began two years ago with the arrival
of a Chinese cargo ship, the first in 30 years, at Seattle to take on a cargo of
grain.

The financial details of Boeing's transactions with China have not been
released. But the planes are known to cost $49 million to $58 million each.

San Francisco-based employees of the Chinese airline said that all the
passengers on today's flight paid.  They also showed a fare schedule of $1,250
for first-class travel to San Francisco from Peking, $820 for business class and
$625 for coach class.

---- Chinese Pact With Hotel Company

Intercontinental Hotels Corporation, a subsidiary of Pan American World Airways,
has negotiated a draft contract with the Peking city government concerning a
combination hotel, office building and apartment complex that is to be built in
the capital, an Intercontinental spokesman said here yesterday.

The spokesman said the contract is now ''awaiting the approval of higher Chinese
authorities,'' but she declined to say what Intercontinental's precise role
would be in the complex.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Chinese airplane

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              223 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 8, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

AROUND THE NATION;
Immigration Panel Modifies Opposition to Identity Cards

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section A; Page 16, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 165 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 7


A Federal immigration commission today retracted its earlier outright opposition
to issuing identification cards for American workers, and said it favored the
idea when coupled with penalties for hiring illegal aliens.

A spokesman for the Select Commission on Immigration and Refugee Policy
announced earlier that the 16-member panel had rejected the identification card
proposal by a vote of 9 to 6, with one abstention.

Later, reacting to published reports of the announcement, Elaine Daniels, a
spokesman for the panel, ''clarified'' the vote. She said that the commissioners
voted, 8 to 7, in favor of the I.D. proposal when provisions to sanction
employers for hiring undocumented workers were included. One commissioner
abstained from voting.

The spokesman said the 9-to-6 vote simply favored the continued use of birth
certificates, drivers' licenses, immigration cards and other forms of
identification to keep track of illegal aliens.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              224 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

               January 8, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

Bahamian Officials Order Vesco To Leave the Country by Jan. 20

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section B; Page 17, Column 2; National Desk

LENGTH: 199 words

DATELINE: NASSAU, the Bahamas, Jan. 7


Bahamian immigration officials who want to deport Robert L. Vesco have given the
45-year-old fugitive financier a new deadline of Jan. 20 to leave their country.
Mr. Vesco was served with a deportation order yesterday at his home here.

A previous order was served on Mr. Vesco's son, Anthony, last Wednesday when
officers found that the financier had left Nassau for an undisclosed
destination, reportedly a remote island in the Bahamas, to spend the New Year's
holiday with his family.

Mr. Vesco, who has applied for political asylum in the Bahamas, returned here
Sunday but was not available for comment. Last week, in a statement released to
reporters by his attorney, Mr. Vesco said he would fight Bahamian efforts to
deport him.

Mr. Vesco has been sought by the authorities in the United States since the
early 1970's. The United States contends that he looted Investors Overseas
Services of $224 million while he headed the investment company, and that he
tried to have charges in the case dropped by contributing $200,000 in 1972 to
President Nixon's reelection campaign.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              225 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 7, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition

ABSCAM TRIAL'S TAPE SHOWS LEDERER ACEPTING $50,000

BYLINE: By JOSEPH P. FRIED

SECTION: Section B; Page 1, Column 4; Metropolitan Desk

LENGTH: 668 words


Representative Raymond F. Lederer of Pennsylvania is seen taking a paper bag
filled with $50,000 in cash from an Abscam undercover agent in a surreptitiously
made videotape played yesterday at his trial in Federal Court in Brooklyn.

''I hope you spend it well,'' Anthony Amoroso, a Federal Bureau of Investigation
agent, tells Mr. Lederer after handing him the money at the end of a 40-minute
meeting in a room at the Hilton Inn near Kennedy International Airport in
Queens.

Earlier in the meeting, which took place on Sept. 11, 1979, and which other
F,B,I, agents secretly recorded, Mr. Lederer told Mr.  Amoroso and another
undercover operator that he would introduce private immigration legislation to
aid a rich Arab sheik whom the undercover men pretended to be representing.

''I can give you me,'' the Congressman said in describing how he could aid the
sheik.  The sheik did not exist, and the entire ruse was part of the
Government's investigation into political corruption, which has led to
convictions of four other members of the House of Representatives for taking
money from the undercover people.

Mr. Lederer, a 42-year-old Democrat from Philadelphia who on Monday was sworn in
for his third term in the House, is charged by the Government with bribery and
conspiracy. He is the only Abscam defendant to have been re-elected to Congress.


Defense Is Entrapment

The prosecution says Mr. Lederer took the money ''in return for his assurances
that he would introduce private immigration bills to enable'' Middle Eastern
businessmen to remain in the United States.  He allegedly shared the payment
with three co-conspirators.

Mr. Lederer's attorney, James J. Binns, while not disputing that his client took
the money, argues that the defendant is not guilty because he was a victim of
illegal ''entrapment'' by Mr. Amoroso and the second undercover man at the
meeting, Melvin Weinberg, a convicted swindler who worked for the F.B.I. in the
investigation.

A defendant is generally considered a victim of entrapment when law-enforcement
agents induce him to perform an act constituting a crime when he is not
otherwise disposed to do it. Mr. Binns took this tack in his opening statement
to the jury before the videotape was played yesterday, when he said that the
undercover agents had used ''very subtle inducements on his client.''

These inducements, he said, were talk of hundreds of millions of dollars worth
of investments that the ''Arabs'' could make to benefit Philadelphia, as well as
appeals to Mr. Lederer's ''humanitarianism.'' The attorney said these appeals
were made throughs stories of the supposed sheiks' possible need to immigrate to
the United States to escape political turmoil that would threaten them at home.

At one point in the videotaped meeting, Mr. Lederer tells Mr.  Amoroso and Mr.
Weinberg: ''I don't think what you're asking is impossible because if it was I'd
walk through the door. It's a big ball game, all right, I don't think you're Boy
Scouts. I'm not a Boy Scout.''

In his opening statement, John H. Jacobs, one of the prosecutors, said the
evidence would show Mr. Lederer guilty of taking a bribe in return for agreeing
to help people immigrate ''who he has never met and who he knew nothing about.''

As the videotape was played, Mr. Lederer, a slender, brown-haired man wearing a
gray suit and gray-rimmed eyeglasses, gazed steadily from the defense table at
one of the 10 screens on which his meeting was shown.

Also at the videotaped meeting was Mayor Angelo J. Errichetti of Camden, one of
three alleged co-conspirators with Mr. Lederer. His trial and that of the other
alleged conspirators, Louis C. Johanson, and Howard L. Criden, are being held in
abeyance.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              226 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

              January 7, 1981, Wednesday, Late City Final Edition
                              Correction Appended

IDENTIFICATION CARD IDEA SHELVED BY A U.S. PANEL

BYLINE: UPI

SECTION: Section B; Page 5, Column 6; National Desk

LENGTH: 218 words

DATELINE: WASHINGTON, Jan. 6


After months of intense lobbying and internal dissension, a Federal immigration
commission said today that it had decided American workers should not be issued
national identification cards.  The final vote on the identification proposal
was 9 to 6 against the idea, a spokesman for the 16-member Select Commission on
Immigration and Refuge Policy said. One commissioner abstained.  In a news
conference last month, the Rev. Theodore M. Hesburgh, chairman of the commission
and president of the University of Notre Dame, said a preliminary vote of 7 to 5
indicated that the panel might recommend the use of identification cards.  Mr.
Hesburgh, a strong advocate of "a counterfeit-resistant worker I.D. card," said
that the commission's recommendation to punish employers for hiring illegal
aliens was "meaningless" without identification cards.  But Hispanic Americans,
who asserted that the card would be discriminatory, and civil libertarians, who
protested the idea as an invasion of privacy by the Government, lobbied
vehemently against the proposal.  Elaine Daniels, the commission spokesman, said
that the commissioners had decided to recommend continued use of birth
certificates, driver's licenses, immigration cards and other usual forms of
identification to help keep track of illegal aliens.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

CORRECTION-DATE: January 15, 1981, Thursday, Late City Final Edition

CORRECTION:
In The Times of Jan. 7 on proposals by a special commission on immigration
policy included incorrect information. A clarifying article appears on page B9.
wore a parka

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              227 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 4, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

VESCO ASSERTS HE ISN'T IN HIDING

BYLINE: AP

SECTION: Section 1; Part 1; Page 20, Column 1; National Desk

LENGTH: 265 words

DATELINE: NASSAU, Bahamas, Jan. 3


Robert L. Vesco, the fugitive American financier, said in a statement released
by his attorney today that he had not ''disappeared, vanished or absconded'' and
that he would be back in Nassau Monday to fight Bahamian efforts to deport him.

''Besides,'' the statement said, ''I have no place to go.'' Mr. Vesco dropped
out of public sight last Tuesday, two days after he had said that he would ask
the Bahamian authorities for political asylum, and one day before Bahamian
immigration officials attempted to serve him with deportation papers that give
him 14 days to leave the island.

Mr. Vesco, 45 years old, has been sought by the American authorities since the
early 1970's. The Federal Government contends he stole millions of dollars from
a mutual fund he controlled and that he made an illegal campaign contribution to
President Nixon.

Whereabouts Not Disclosed

Arthur D. Hanna Jr., Mr. Vesco's attorney, who gave the statement to The Nassau
Tribune, said today that his client took a New Year's vacation on a remote
island, which the lawyer refused to identify. He declined to comment further.

Mr. Vesco fled to Costa Rica from the United States in 1972. He has been living
in the Bahamas since 1978. On Nov. 11, Bahamian officials said without
explanation that Mr. Vesco had 30 days to leave. He was later granted a brief
extension, which expired last Wednesday.

In today's statement, Mr. Vesco said that he had not known of the 14-day limit
until he heard a radio news report.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              228 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 4, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE NATION;
Back to the Old Teeming Shore

SECTION: Section 4; Page 2, Column 2; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 297 words


By Michael Wright and Caroline Rand Herron The acting commissioner of the
Immigration and Naturalization Service last week proposed adding one more
wrinkle to a system that, in the last decade, has been bent, folded and spindled
into all but complete disarray.

David W. Crosland, who has headed the immigration agency since October 1979,
said that aliens already in the United States who want to become permanent
residents - the first step toward becoming citizens - should be required to
return to their home countries to apply unless they are closely related to
American citizens. Such a requirement, he said, would negate the advantage that
such aliens now have over those applying from abroad and could reduce by more
than half the workload of the overburdened immigration agency.

Mr. Crosland acknowledged that much of that workload would simply appear in
another place - on the desks of State Department consular officers in foreign
countries. And a State Department official, Elizabeth J. Harper, said the plan,
which would be a reversion to the practice that generally prevailed before 1952,
would ''create unnecessary work'' for the consular officers and ''genuine
hardship'' for the affected aliens.

In 1978, the last year for which data are available, there were 103,638
applications from aliens for permanent resident status; 53 percent of those
would have been eliminated if only close relatives of American citizens were
considered, as Mr. Crosland proposes. The staff of the Select Commission on
Immigration and Refugee Policy, a 16-member body created by Congress, has made
the same proposal, which could be accepted by the commission.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              229 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 4, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

ISRAELI EMIGRATION INSPIRES ANGER AND FEAR

BYLINE: By HENRY KAMM

SECTION: Section 4; Page 4, Column 3; Week in Review Desk

LENGTH: 1090 words

DATELINE: JERUSALEM


With ''descents'' rising and ''ascents'' declining, each to record levels, 1980
was a bitter year for Israel. The mystical character of the words Zionists use
to describe, respectively, emigration of a Jew from Israel or his immigration to
the Jewish state shows the high degree of emotion contained in demographic
statistics in this country and explains the bitterness.

Definitive emigration statistics are unavailable in Israel, as is the case in
all open societies that do not require from their citizens an accounting of
their intentions every time they leave.  But immigration authorities keep track
of the total number of Israelis who depart and who return; emigration estimates
are based on the difference between them. The difference last year was about
30,000.

The previous record year was 1974 when, following the 1973 war, 25,000 more
Israelis left than returned. When a resident has been gone for four years, the
Central Bureau of Statistics lists him as an emigrant. The record total was
again in 1974, 16,400. Last year is likely, four years hence, to surpass that
record.

The bottom year of 1974 was followed by a contraction of emigration; the
difference between departures and returns was down to 7,000 in 1979. Thus, last
year's 30,000 total was not only a record but also marked a dramatic reversal in
the trend of outflow.

Perhaps even more dramatic than the rise in departures was the decline in new
immigrants. Last year's total of about 21,000 represents a drop of more than 40
percent from 1979. Even more frightening to Israel, last month was the first
month in the 12 years in which fewer than 1,000 Jews made their ''aliyah'' or
ascent.

Not all of the drop is due to a lack of desire among Diaspora Jews to come here.
The Soviet Union, through the 1970's the principal source of immigration, has
reduced the outflow of Jews by more than half. In 1979, 51,317 Jews left; the
total for the first 11 months of last year was 20,583. The percentage of Soviet
emigres who chose to come to Israel remained steady at about 35 percent.

''It's nothing short of a disaster,'' said a senior official of the Jewish
Agency, the semi-official body responsible for attracting and settling
immigrants.

Although both the rate of arrival and of departure cause great concern, the
principal focus recently has been on Israelis who leave. One reason was the
leaking of an internal report by a Jewish Agency official on Israelis in the
United States. The document put the cumulative total at as high as 500,000, or
roughly one-sixth of Israel's Jewish population.

The Central Bureau of Statistics rejects this estimate. Its records indicate
that about 350,000 Israelis have left the country for all destinations since its
founding in 1948. But whatever the statistics, emigration is clearly on the
increase, and therein lies the deeper reason for the anguished and angry debate.
In a country founded within recent memory and based on an act of faith that is
under increasing challenge from the non-Jewish world, departure from Israel,
particularly of Israeli-born Jews, not immigrants who have found the going too
tough, is a defection from an embattled cause. An Irishman or Italian who leaves
his country in hard times for a land of greater economic opportunity is not seen
as deserting or endangering the existence of Ireland or Italy. ''Yeridah,'' the
descent of a Jew from Israel, is viewed as all of that and more.

Resentment From Those Who Stay

''A person leaving the country denies his personal role in the rebuilding of the
Jewish state and contradicts the raison d'etre of the Jewish state,'' said the
Jewish Agency official, an academic who weighs and moderates his words. ''The
Diaspora is a disease, and we should have nothing to do with Israelis who join
it,'' said Geula Cohen, an ultranationalistic member of the Knesset, in an
inconclusive parliamentary debate last week. Former Prime Minister Yitzhak
Rabin, a man not given to verbal excess, once referred to yeridah, in
contemptuous Hebrew, as ''the dropping off of the weaklings.''

Israelis deeply regret the sharp decline in aliyah, and extremists like Mrs.
Cohen no doubt equate the failure of all of the world's Jews to gather in Israel
with disloyalty to Jewishness. But there is a vast difference in mainstream
Israeli perception between Jews who prefer to remain in the Diaspora - the
majority - and those who, in effect, take the active step of rejecting the
Jewish homeland.

A usually mild-mannered Israeli, forgiving of human failings and understanding
even of Israel's Arab enemies, surprised a friend with an unwonted note of steel
in his voice when he said, ''Let them go, those who don't want to say.'' And
jabbing the air with a clenched fist, he added, ''but don't make it easy for
them to come back.''

Israeli anger is keenest at the native-born citizens who leave. No figures are
available, because of the paucity of emigration data collected, but New Yorkers
know that Hebrew has become a frequently heard language and the sabra accent in
English has a familiar ring on Manhattan's West Side.

While the decline in new immigrants is conceded by Israeli officials to be at
least in part due to Israel's isolation and the decline in its international
standing, Israelis of all political stripes ascribe emigration entirely to
economic factors. Runaway inflation, which when last year's figures are
tabulated will show a rate of at least 135 percent, Government budget cuts that
affect employment opportunities and reduce Government investment and support for
the private sector, a serious housing problem and a decline in public confidence
that the economy can right itself are factors that enter into all decisions to
leave. A high proportion of emigres are middle class people for whom
opportunities for self-improvement in a richer economy - more university posts,
more and better equipped laboratories, more research grants - abound in the
United States.

Looking desperately for a silver lining, the Jewish Agency official said,
''Given the situation in which Israel has found itself for almost 33 years, one
often wonders why the rate of emigration isn't higher still.''

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: photo of Geula Cohen

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company


                              230 of 230 DOCUMENTS

                               The New York Times

                January 4, 1981, Sunday, Late City Final Edition

THE OLD STARGAZER'S ALMANAC FOR 1981

SECTION: Section 6; Page 26, Column 1; Magazine Desk

LENGTH: 2129 words


Bruce Feirstein is a writer living in New York.
CAPRICORN (Dec. 22-Jan. 20. The sign of Juanita Kreps, William Colby, Bobby
Hull, Albert Schweitzer, Ron Galella and tag-team wrestling.) It looks as if
1981 will be a banner year for the practical, ambitious and generally
well-heeled Republican Capricorn personality. With the planets Mercury, Venus
and Saturn making frequent appearances in your astral plane this year, you can
expect things to go well at your Senate confirmation hearings in mid-February.
Be wary, however, of cheaply dressed Arab emissaries who invite you to discuss
immigration problems at a Maryland motel in mid-March. Despite the dismal social
life you had last year, a new moon on Aug. 29 means that either Jacqueline
Bisset or Omar Sharif should appear in your home on Sept.  3, in the early
evening. On the financial side, early December seems like a good time to dump
those speculative loser stocks you haven't told your spouse about yet.
AQUARIUS (Jan. 21-Feb. 19. The sign of Fabian, Sidney Sheldon, Hans Morgenthau
and disposable bottles.) Alas, 1981 will not be a vintage year for the bright,
sympathetic, kind people born under the sign of Aquarius. In late January, you
can expect to have a short, passionate affair with a dry cleaner that will end
up in small-claims court. An ascending Mercury in April means that the
Book-of-the-Month Club will probably bill you repeatedly for $26.80 worth of
books you have not ordered. Given the alignment of Jupiter, Mars and the front
end of your BMW, it is probably best not to make your epic $40 million
personal-vision three-and-a-half-hour western this year; you'd probably be wiser
to channel your creative energies into something like knitting or stock
manipulation. Despite these bad omens, take heart: Your lost gloves, scarf,
glasses, checkbook and laundry receipts should turn up around the end of
November.
PISCES (Feb. 20-March 20. The sign of Roy Cohn, Erik Estrada, Willard Scott,
seltzer, Twinkies, Russia, Linus Pauling and the domino theory.) The outlook for
the first few months of 1981 for Pisces is excellent. It is a splendid time to
visit relatives, put together a multimillion-dollar Fifth Avenue real-estate
deal, start an antitrust action or just plain go bowling. With Venus and Mars
rising, however, there's trouble ahead in the third and fourth quarters of the
fiscal year. Expect uncontrollable inflation, shoddy craftsmanship, massive
recalls, unprecedented unemployment and torn ligaments. With Saturn
predominating during October, you may wish to take evasive action by
incorporating in the Bahamas or converting all your assets to Deutsche marks.
Look for relief from the pain and inflammation caused by arthritis sometime
around Nov. 20. If symptoms persist, call a doctor.
ARIES (March 21-April 20. The sign of Rudolf Serkin, Cesar Chavez, Milton
Friedman, Dragnet, Kim Il Sung and the first Citibank cash machine.) The Ram is
the heavenly symbol of Aries. Traits normally associated with this sign are a
quick mind, tremendous energy, blind courage and an unusually large appetite for
poached fish. The Aries personality should have a good, though uneventful, year
in 1981. It's a good time to insulate your house, order cable television or just
sow the seeds of discontent that will result in the demise of a competing
business associate during the following year. (Given the alignment of your
planets, late May through early July seems like an especially ripe time for
blackmail, innuendo, plunder or vicious rumor mongering.) Should you choose to
marry during 1981, the stars are optimistic about the outcome but offer one note
of caution: No marriage today is made in heaven. You should probably avoid
having yours made in New Jersey.
TAURUS (April 21-May 21. The sign of Metternich, I.M. Pei, the United States
Department of Agriculture and Touch-Tone dialing.) Always determined and
persistent, Taureans usually get what they deserve - which this year will be
either a nice, cushy position on a diplomatic mission to Zambia or an indictment
by a Federal grand jury on six counts of extortion, fraud, bribery and intent to
impersonate Lord Byron. This aside, Taureans should try to steer clear of brunch
and other forms of organized adult play during June; they'd also be wise to skip
meat, on-camera product endorsements and any glamour stock beginning with the
letter ''T'' that is selling at a multiple of less than eight times earnings on
Sept. 3. The Taurean romance outlook for 1981 is unchanged: Expect to meet Mr.
or Miss Right during late April and lose him/her over the July 4 weekend to
someone wealthier and better looking.
GEMINI (May 22-June 21. The sign of Jerzy Kosinski, Chuck Barris, Pat Boone,
Burl Ives, Supreme Court Justice Byron R. (Whizzer) White and Impressionist
painting.) Geminians are generally witty, friendly, nervous and - nothing
personal - a touch trite. As you might expect, the forecast for Gemini's 1981 is
''super.'' January is the perfect time to throw a Tupperware party, read
Jacqueline Susann or buy a resort condominium in one of Red Buttons's leisure
villages. April showers should bring May flowers, followed by a long hot summer
and, eventually, both fall and Christmas. With a variety of major stars
appearing in your horoscope during the vernal equinox, it is probably wise to
dress neatly and avoid low-fat cheese from Philadelphia. Like most Geminians,
you'll probably spend a great deal of time in front of the television this year.
Expect a sudden change in programming around the middle of September - which may
result in the loss of many old television friends. Expect a similar event to
take place with several new television friends exactly 13 weeks later. With
Neptune ascending, the third Sunday in September is probably the best time to
attempt The New York Times crossword.
CANCER (June 22-July 22. The sign of Merv Griffin, rent control, power steering
and orthopedic surgery.) The stars are going to shine on you in 1981. In
January, you will find a $189-a-month six-bedroom apartment on Central Park
South. Maitre d's, doormen and parking-lot attendants will treat you with
deference. Your car will pass inspection on the first shot. A long-lost uncle
will leave you the U.S.S. Nimitz. The day they discover a toxic spill in
Schaefer City you'll be in Marlboro Country. Group dental-insurance salesmen
won't harass you. In February, Fred Silverman will beg you to save ''Saturday
Night Live.'' Starting in May, your subway will come early and often. Random
House will pay you $1 million for the rights to your shopping list. M-G-M will
hire a director to start shooting it.  And you'll find not only ''true love'' in
October but also be the Nobel Peace Prize for determining -once and for all
-whether Certs are, indeed, candy mints or breath mints.
LEO (July 23-Aug. 23. The sign of Buford Pusser, George Hamilton's tan, Isaac
Hayes, Toto, Shelley and two of Pavlov's dogs.) With Uranus, Neptune, Pluto,
Mars, Venus and Saturn moving through your astral plane this year, it is obvious
you're going to have a full house.  Therefore, take two cards, double your bet
and hold. If your opponent ups the ante by less than one-half of one-third of
the prevailing prime rate, call his bluff. If not, fold and consider yourself
ahead of the game; he's either a cheater or a Cancer. This aside, there are
several other things to keep in mind: white with fish, red with meat; starve a
cold, feed a fever; turkeys should be cooked 15 minutes per pound at 375
degrees. The relative positions of the sun, moon and major planets make March
18, June 6 and Dec. 7 the ideal time to release a hit single or join a beach
house.
VIRGO (Aug. 24-Sept. 23. The sign of Ferdinand Marcos, Kate Millett, the
electric wok, Paul Harvey and Hugh Chapin.) The normally cautious Virgo
personality has even more cause for concern this year. Your star chart has been
partially obscured by air pollution and residual ash from Mount St. Helens,
resulting in a forecast that may be distorted or somewhat less than 100 percent
accurate. Starting in January, proceed at your own risk. During March, avoid
depressing books and made-for-television movies about cancer. Try to settle a
family dispute in April with something other than a small-caliber handgun or
purloined nuclear waste. Eat nothing but whole-grain pasta with pesto sauce on
the 11th, 16th and 22d of each month. A sudden change in the heavens may cause
you to reconsider your life style or municipal-bond investments during May, but
heavy tithing to television ministries and postponing that sexual-harassment
suit against your boss until December should help.
LIBRA (Sept. 24 to Oct. 23. The sign of Pele, East Germany, Lee Iacocca, John
Kenneth Galbraith, the Gang of Four and ''Battlestar Galactica.'') The Libra
personality is often characterized as being, well, dull. Expect a lot of mail in
January addressed ''Occupant.'' In February, you're likely to cheer up when you
establish a meaningful relationship with a mellow radio station. June will be
the month when you really - and I mean really - sit down and talk to your
plants. A full moon on the 13th of September could cause you to reexamine
carefully your relationship with a C.P.A. from the Bronx.  Phil Donahue will be
particularly relevant during October, but you could face a few critical days
when another network schedules ''The Days of Our Lives'' against him, forcing
you either to make a serious commitment or to change the channel. A sudden shift
in your fortunes on Nov. 6 could be either the result of a $20 bill found in a
jacket you haven't worn in years or a windfall-profit extra dividend declared by
A.T.&T.
SCORPIO (Oct. 24-Nov. 22. Absolutely no one who has ever amounted to anything
has been born under this sign.) The hallmark of the Scorpio personality has
always been strength, forcefulness and raw sex appeal. The first half of the
year should be extremely lucrative for Scorpians; along with the normal
cents-off days at the supermarket, a full moon on the 8th of February could
result in an uncontrollable urge to visit Club Med. Adverse trends in early
April may cause you to be late in filing your income-tax returns, but a
combination of the infamous Scorpian will and a small bribe will quickly remedy
the situation. During the latter half of the year expect bills, bills, bills and
nothing but trouble from that macho foreign car you shouldn't have bought in the
first place. A new moon on Dec. 26 means you should avoid powdered bleach and
any dealings in the spot oil market.
SAGITTARIUS (Nov. 23-Dec. 21. The sign of Real Men, Joan Didion, Walt Disney,
Kurt Waldheim, Margaret Chase Smith, Connie Francis and Alexander Haig.) Forget
it. Don't even bother. This year is so bad, so dismal, you might as well go back
to bed on Jan. 1 and set the clock for 1982. Expect to be audited. Your group
will be the one with 24 percent more cavities. Your car will be recalled. Then
stolen. You'll probably lose some low-rent brand of traveler's checks in
Tanzania next summer. It's going to rain during your vacation. Our advice: Try
not to walk on cracked sidewalks. Knock frequently on wood. Go for the whole
life policy. Lock your doors. Close the windows. Take in plenty of movies and
wear dark glasses. Get shots for diseases you've never heard of. Drink plenty of
liquid and keep warm. And when things seem their worst, try to keep the old
baseball adage in mind: There's always next year.

LANGUAGE: ENGLISH

GRAPHIC: Illustrations: 12 Cartoons

                   Copyright 1981 The New York Times Company
